Modern World History


MODERN WORLD HISTORY

Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

©O9®O

Modern World History by Dan Allosso and Tom Williford is licensed under a Creative
Commons Attributian-NonCommercial-Sharealike 4.0 International License, except where
otherwise noted,

Contents

Introduction

Modern World History Begins in Asia
Europe and Africa

The Americas and Columbus

Early Globalization and Revolutions
Troubled Nineteenth Century
Imperialism

The Great War

Modern Crisis

World War II

Decolonization

Cold War

Neoliberal Globalization

Limits to Growth?

Appendix A: Choosing a Chief Executive and Voting

Appendix B: Finance and Taxes

52

86

128

180

222

286

333

379

443

480

529

563

585,

591


‘Welcome to Modern World History! This is the textbook for
an undergraduate survey course taught at all the universities
and most of the colleges in the Minnesota State system. Similar
courses are taught at institutions around the United States and
the world, so the authors have made the text available as an
open educational resource that teachers and learners can read,
adapt, and reuse to meet their needs. We'd like to hear from
people who have found the text useful, and we’re always open to
questions and suggestions.

Readers of this text may have varying levels of familiarity
with the events of World History before the modern period
we will be covering. Occasionally understanding the text may
require a bit of background that will help contextualize the
material we are covering. This introduction will cover some of
that background.

The Agricultural Revolution

Farming developed in a number of different parts of the ancient
world, before the beginning of recorded history. That means
it’s very difficult for historians to describe early agricultural
societies in as much detail as we'd like. Also, because there are
none of the written records historians typically use to
understand the past, we rely to a much greater extent on
archaeologists, anthropologists, and other specialists for the
data that informs our histories. And because the science
supporting these fields has advanced rapidly in recent years,
our understanding of this prehistoric period has also changed —
sometimes abruptly.

N

Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Aneolithic (stone age) grindstone, used to process grain seeds collected by gatherers
and later cultivated by farmers.

Farming was once believed to have developed in the Middle
East at sites such as Jericho and Mesopotamia six or seven
thousand years ago, where the ancestors of modern Europeans
were usually credited with the invention of agriculture. More
recently, responding to evidence of prehistoric farming in
Africa, India, and China, some scholars suggested agriculture
may have developed more or less independently in several
regions of the world. But it was difficult to imagine how such
parallel development could have occurred, with people in
different parts of the world not only making the same basic
discoveries but making them pretty much simultaneously. Even
more recently, scientists have begun to suspect this confusion
may reflect the difficulty of finding archaeological evidence,
since plant materials decay in the ground much more quickly
than arrowheads and stone spear points. And some have
suggested we may have been thinking about agriculture wrong.

It now seems likely that agriculture began in a very gradual
process that goes back much farther than we had imagined.
Humans as a species began in southern Africa some 300,000
years ago and after a population crisis about 150,000 years ago,
modern humans seem to have left Africa between 80,000 and
100,000 years ago. They were not the first members of the

Modern World History 3

human family that left Africa: Homo erectus, Neanderthals, and
Denisovans all lived in Europe and Asia until they were
displaced by Homo sapiens.

eS =

Arrecent (2015) map showing updated theories of human migration out of Africa,
including major archaeological sites.

In the early millennia of their spread across the connected
continents of Africa, Europe, and Asia, modern humans lived
mobile lives as hunter-gatherers. According to archaeologists,
many left traces of their presence in the area north of the Black
Sea from about 80,000 to about 50,000 years ago. Although
they may have favored certain locations for long periods of
time, ancient people were forced to follow the herds they
hunted and to seek new food sources when conditions changed.
Climate changed very slowly, but the cycle of glaciation was a
factor in human development; especially the most recent ice
age which began about 36,000 years ago and lasted until about
11,000 years ago. This ice age displaced both animal and human
populations, and also allowed some people to migrate to the
Americas, as we will see.

4 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Agriculture probably began when hunter-gatherers began
favoring certain plants and weeding around them to help them
grow larger and make them easier to reach. At some point,
people discovered that seeds dropped into rubbish heaps
sprouted into new plants. People probably began planting or
transplanting their favorites closer to home, so they would not
always have to go far, looking for food. This horticulture or
part-time farming may have begun before these ancient
humans began to spread from the Black Sea area westward into
Europe and east into Asia, which would explain the seemingly
coincidental parallel development of farming across much of
the globe. Various regions may have each developed their
distinctive versions of what we now recognize as agriculture
from a deep pool of common techniques.

Wheat was discovered in a region we call the fertile crescent,
stretching from the Persian Gulf to the eastern Mediterranean.
As cultivation spread and surpluses of grain were produced,
civilizations like those of Egypt and Mesopotamia (today’s Iraq)
rose between 6,000 and 5,000 years ago. About the same time
(possibly a bit earlier) residents of the Pearl River estuary in
what is now China began cultivating rice in flooded fields called
paddies. The three other staple crops of the modern world
(corn, potatoes, and cassava) were developed between 9,000 and
7,000 years ago by natives of the Americas, as we will discuss
below.

The transition from nomadic hunt-and-gather groups to
more complex societies based on agriculture (and the
specialization and segmentation of work) allowed for the
development of sedentary cultures which established
governments, writing and number systems, and hierarchal
social systems able to build impressive structures, defend (and
sometimes expand) their borders, and create art and music.
Let’s look briefly at the ancient societies of Africa, Europe, Asia,
and the Americas to prepare for our coverage of them in the
early modern period in the opening chapters.


Modern World History 5

Is it significant that historians must rely on information from
other fields like archaeology to tell the story of the ancient
world?

Why does it matter where agriculture first developed?

Does considering human migrations in the deep past affect
your opinions on race and ethnicity?

Ancient Kingdoms of North Africa and the Eastern
Mediterranean

The ancient dynasties of the Egyptian empire developed along
the Nile beginning around 3100 BCE, built on the wheat
surpluses made possible by the annual flooding of the Nile
River. Among the most visible and lasting achievements of
the Egyptian empires are the pyramids of Giza, built between
2600-2400 BCE to serve as burial tombs for several emperors.
The Egyptian empires lasted for nearly 2300 years before being
conquered, in succession, by the Assyrians, Persians, and Greeks
between about 700 BCE and 332 BCE.

The Giza pyramid complex, with Cairo in the background.

The societies of ancient Greece, particularly in Athens, directly
influenced culture and intellectual life in Europe and the Middle
East to the present day. Greek dramas and tragedies continue
to be studied and performed; Pythagoras’ mathematical
discoveries are still taught in schools; and the thinking of

6 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Socrates, Plato, and Aristotle are the basis for Western
philosophy and political science today. The words “democracy”
and “republic” come from these ancient Greeks. Greek ideas
and culture were adopted by the Romans and spread
throughout their empire—indeed, many Greek gods became
Roman gods under different names.

Ancient Rome was a republic for nearly 500 years, expanding
its territory from the city of Rome on the western coast of
the Italian peninsula to nearly all lands surrounding the
Mediterranean Sea, including the former Greek and Egyptian
empires and even England. The Romans spread their language
(Latin) and their Latin alphabet to western Europe in particular.
After a period of political crisis, the Republic was replaced with
an Emperor under Caesar Augustus in 27 BCE.

The Egyptian, Greek, Assyrian, Persian, and Roman empires
all encountered the Hebrew people, who maintained their own
independent kingdom of Israel around 1000 BCE. The Hebrew
prophet Moses, influenced by spiritual ideas from the various
societies, developed the concept of only one god for his people.
Moses’ monotheism was an unusual innovation in an era when
most societies worshipped several gods and many honored the
gods of other cultures. The Ten Commandments and the laws
and regulations attributed to Moses in the Torah not only
formed the basis of Judaism, but also Christianity and later
Islam—all religions which only worship a single god.

Modern World History 7

117 AD

The Roman Empire at its greatest extent, in 117 CE.

Shortly after the Romans conquered the region of Israel, Jesus
of Nazareth, a Jewish thinker, began preaching a new more
peaceful and inclusive religion of salvation. He was turned over
by enemies to the Romans, who crucified him in approximately
83 CE. His followers, led especially by Paul (said to have never
met Jesus), preached that Jesus was the Son of God and invited
Gentiles (people who were not Jews) to join the faith. The new
religion was especially embraced by slaves in the Roman
Empire who were attracted to the promise of forgiveness, of a
single, all-powerful God’s unending love, and of eternal life after
death. The Romans, who saw the new religion as a challenge to
state religious authority, sometimes persecuted Christians.

In 330 CE, the Roman Emperor Constantine banned
persecution of Christians, and by 400 AC, Christianity had
replaced the worship of Rome’s traditional gods and goddesses
as the state religion of the Roman Empire. Because Constantine
embraced the new faith, the Roman Catholic Church is the
most direct descendent of the Roman Empire. The Pope, leader
of the Catholic Church, still lives in Rome, and the vestments
of Catholic priests (and the clergy of some other liturgical
Christian denominations) are similar to those worn by fourth-
century Roman officials.

8 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Questions for Discussion

On what types of historical evidence do you think references
to people such as Moses, Jesus, and Muhammad are based?
How might these sources differ from the archaeological
sources mentioned previously?

How do the cultures of ancient Europe continue to influence
life in the modern world?

The Eastern Roman Empire and the Fall of Rome

Constantine moved the capital of the Roman Empire to a
second imperial capital in 330 CE. Byzantium, which he
renamed Constantinople, was a powerful fortress controlling
the Bosphorus Strait which connects the Black Sea to the
Mediterranean. The city of Byzantium, already a thousand
years old when Constantine moved there, served as the eastern
administrative center of the empire and continued using Greek,
rather than Latin, as its official language. A somewhat separate
Christian church developed in this Greek part of the empire,
based on the idea that the different archbishops controlled
spiritual matters as a group, and that the Pope in Rome was
only another archbishop, equal to the others. After 1000 CE,
Catholics in the west and the Greek Orthodox in the east split
from one another.

During the fifth century CE, Germanic tribes from northern
Europe invaded the Roman Empire. They, in turn, were fleeing
from Attila the Hun and other invaders from Asia. Eventually,
the city of Rome itself fell to the barbarians in 476 CE. Western
Europe was divided up among various Germanic warlords. But
although the empire had ended the Roman Catholic Church
remained strong. Over the next 500 years, Christianity spread
throughout the region and was embraced by local and regional
rulers. The Church preserved much of the culture of the Roman

Modern World History 9

Empire, including its language, Latin, which was used in
liturgies and ceremonies until 1965.

When Rome fell in 476 CE, Western Europe was divided into a number of kingdoms,
although the Eastern Roman (Byzantine) Empire persisted.

Germanic languages were transformed through their contact
with Latin speakers. The English language is a good example
of both Germanic and Latin influences. Consider how time is
measured: the months of the year are all from the Roman
calendar, with the first six months named after Roman gods, and
July and August named after the early emperors Julius Caesar
and Caesar Augustus. The remaining months are ordinal
numbers seven through ten—although in a confusing change,
the Catholic Church decided to begin the calendar in January,
making “December” the twelfth month instead of the tenth. The
days of the week, however, reveal both Latin and Germanic
influences: Saturday, Sunday, and Monday come from the
sacred Roman orbs in the sky—Spanish, French and other more
Latin languages continue in this vein for the other four days,
but not English, which honors the barbarian gods Tieu, Woden,
Thor, and Frija for the remainder of the week.

The Eastern Roman Empire (Byzantium) lasted for nearly
another 1000 years after the fall of Rome. You can tell which

10 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

European peoples were converted by Catholic missionaries and
which were proselytized by Orthodox preachers by looking at
their alphabets—Russia, the Ukraine, and Bulgaria, for example,
use the Greek-based “Cyrillic” alphabet, while all western
European languages use a version of the Latin alphabet.

Islam and Its Influence

In 610 CE, the Prophet Muhammad began preaching and
organizing a new religion—Islam—on the Arabian Peninsula in
the region of Mecca. The Prophet's teachings, later gathered in
the Holy Quran, built upon Judaism and Christianity. Mecca
itself was long a site of religious pilgrimage honoring the
Hebrew patriarch Abraham, and Jesus is considered as an
important prophet in Islam. By the time of Muhammad’s
passing in 6382, Islam was well-established in the eastern Arabian
Peninsula; within the next one hundred years, it became the
dominant religion in North Africa, the Middle East, and Persia.
By 1200, Muslim rulers also dominated South Asia and the
Iberian Peninsula.

Modern World History 11

Islam brought stability to
the region and __ trade,
learning, and the exchange of
ideas flourished. The extent
of Muslim trade is notable in
the establishment of a center
of Islamic study in Timbuktu
in the middle of northern
Sub-Saharan Africa, located
across the Sahara Desert from
Mecca in today’s Mali.
Religious conversion often
accompanied Arab merchant

ty

HIS NIE activity. Indeed, the nation

hia BS

J with the largest Muslim
eT

population in the world,
Indonesia, is a South East
An 18th-century map of Mecca, showing agian archipelago located
the Al-Haram Mosque and the Ka’bah, °
which millions of Muslims visit on thousands of miles from the
pilgrimages every year. Arabian Peninsula; Arab
traders first introduced their
religion there in the 1200s. The Arab world benefitted from
relatively stable administrations and commercial links that
allowed merchants to bring new technology, science, and
mathematics from India and China to the region, which Arab
scholars refined in their own centers of learning.

Muslims, like Christians, Jews, and followers of all other world
religions, may share common sacred writings and liturgical
traditions, but are also divided by different theological
interpretations and religious practices. In Islam, a principal
division stems from an early debate over who should have led
the religion after the Prophet: should it have been a member of
his family, or simply anyone who was an effective and dynamic
leader? Sunnis, 90% of Muslims today, stem from the group who
believed in the latter, while Shi'ites, some 10% of all Muslims,
include the (often martyred) descendants of the Prophet as early
principle imams (spiritual leaders) of Islam. As will be discussed
later, the rulers of Persia—today’s Iran—embraced Shi'ism,
while most of their neighbors are Sunni. Although Sunnis and


12 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Shiites fought one another in the early years of Islam, many
have also lived together in relative peace for centuries, until the
last few decades (which will be examined in later chapters).

Questions for Discussion

How do you think the memory of the Roman Empire affected
Europeans?

How did conflict between Muslims and Christians shape
European history?

The Center of World Population: Asia

After thousands of years of hunting and gathering, the ancient
people of northern China began cultivating millet and rice at
about the same time and in much the same way that people of
the Middle East grew wheat and people of the Americas grew
maize, potatoes, and cassava. China’s recorded history began
about 2000 BCE, or over four thousand years ago, so historians
have a pretty good idea what happened there in the distant
past. Based on irrigated rice agriculture, the population of China
grew to 50 to 60 million people as early as 2,000 years ago. This
population was originally divided into several small kingdoms
whose ruling families were connected through political
marriages. Beginning in 221 BCE, the most influential and
powerful family organized the kingdoms into an empire
covering much of the territory of modern China. This empire
lasted over two thousand years under a series of over a dozen
dynasties until the fall of the Qing dynasty in 1911 and the
establishment of the Republic of China.

In the region that is now Pakistan and India, Indus Valley cities such as
Mohenjo-daro and Harappa, which reached their maturity by about 2600 BCE,
each housed 30,000 to 60,000 people. These cultures grew on an agricultural
base focused on wheat, barley, and millet. The permanent nature of sedentary
agricultural societies led thinkers to consider in more complex ways how people

Modern World History 13

should live correctly in the world, which led to the establishment of both religious
and civil structures that are the ancestors and sources of many of the world
governments and religions which still exist today. During the Vedic period in
India, Hinduism took root beginning around 2000 BCE, based on stories of gods
and goddesses, and their relationships with one another and the world. The
spiritual richness of South Asia inspired the Buddha (who was originally from
today’s Nepal) to engage in his own spiritual journey to enlightenment in the fifth
century BCE. Buddhist ideas inspired the spiritual aspects of Chinese, Japanese,
and Southeast Asian thought.

The extent of the Roman and Han Empires around the year 1 CE.

The earliest emperors of China began large public
works programs including construction of what
they called Long Walls which later formed the
basis of the Great Wall, partly to protect from
northern tribes and partly to expand their territory
northward. Around 200 BCE, the second Chinese
dynasty, the Han, established a trade route called
the Silk Road linking China through central Asia
with Europe. Artifacts from the Roman Empire
have been found in China and silk (which China
developed before 3000 BCE) became a luxury
fabric in Greece and Rome. The next dynasty, the
Sui, dug the Grand Canal to connect the Yellow
and Yangtze Rivers in the sixth century CE. The
canal allowed rice, wheat, and millet to be

14 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

transported on a protected inland waterway
instead of being shipped on the ocean where
shipments could be threatened by pirates. China
also led the world in iron, copper, and porcelain
production as well as in the “Four Great
Inventions”: the compass, gunpowder, paper-
making, and printing.

Questions for Discussion

Is it significant that China and India have always been centers
of world population?

Why do agricultural surpluses encourage the building of
cities, kingdoms, and empires?

Is it surprising to you that the Han and Roman Empires
existed at the same time and that there was trade between
Asia and Europe via the Silk Road?

The Isolated Americas

The people living in the Americas were separated by climate change from Eurasia
for nearly 12,000 years after the end of the ice age that had created Beringia
between what is now Alaska and Siberia, and allowed Eurasians to cross over
into the Americas. During this period, which we should remember is twice as
long as recorded history, the Native Americans were not idle. When they had
arrived in the Americas, they found very few large animal species available
to domesticate. Like the Europeans, Asians, and Africans, Native Americans
experienced their own agricultural revolution after a long period of hunting
and gathering; but instead of domesticating cattle, horses, sheep, goats, pigs,
and chickens, Americans developed certain plants, creating. three of the world’s

current top five staple crops.

Modern World History 15

Pra riessisik {hid ave WaSS:
Seo
J tretnvtr

cere er ner erect

An image depicting Teosinte, a Maize-teosinte hybrid, and Maize, developed 7,000 to
10,000 years ago in central Mexico.

Staple crops produce the foods that provide the greatest percentage of the calories
people eat. It might surprise you that today only about fifteen staple crops account
for 90% of the calories people eat every day. The top five are responsible for
nearly three quarters, including feed for the animals whose meat we eat. They
were all discovered/invented by ancient people between six and ten thousand
years ago, and three of the five were invented in the Americas. The world’s five
top five staples today (in order of importance) are maize (com), rice, wheat,
potatoes, and cassava. Only rice and wheat were known to Europe, Asia, and
Africa before contact with the Americas. Natives of what is now Mexico
developed maize from a native grass called teosinte beginning about nine
thousand years ago, and its use spread to nearly every part of the Americas. Over
generations, women (who were the farmers in ancient Mexico) selectively bred
the grass to produce more and bigger seeds. Maize is currently the most important
staple in the world for both human and animal feed, as well as in industrial uses

like High Fructose Corn Syrup, plastics and fuel.

Andean natives

in what is now Peru and Bolivia created many varieties of
potatoes beginning 10,000 years ago. Andean women developed different
varieties for different growing conditions and learned to freeze dry potatoes for
long-term storage. And the people of the Amazon region not only discovered
manioc trees growing in the rainforest, but developed processes to turn the trees”

poisonous roots into cassava (what we know as tapioca) between 10,000 and

16 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

7,000 years ago. Raw cas!

va root is toxic. So in addition to domesticating the
plant, Amazonian tree farmers had to develop technologies (combinations of
boiling, drying, and chemical leaching) to remove the cyanide compounds and
make the manioc useful. Along with rice and wheat developed in Eurasia, maize,
potatoes, and manioc are the most important staple crops in the modern world,

feeding billions of people. We have ancient native Americans to thank for them.

Cassava roots need to be processed to remove poisons before they can be eaten,

Of course, eating nothing but maize, potatoes, and cassava would be a very
bland diet. The indigenous in central Mexico developed other plants to flavor
their cuisine: the various types of hot peppers, beans, and tomatoes present in
Mexican food today were enjoyed by the Olmecs, Toltecs, and Mexica hundreds
of years before their encounter with Europeans in the sixteenth century. The
Meso-Americans also ground cocoa beans and added hot water, peppers, and
honey to make hot chocolate-even today, millions of Latin Americans begin and
end their day with a cup, prepared in a traditional olleta with a hand-held batidor,
using chunks of chocolate. However, such a delicious drink was originally
reserved for the nobility, and cocoa beans themselves were often used as a kind

of currency.

Questions for Discussion


Modern World History 17

Why would it matter that there were no large animal species
in the Americas for natives to domesticate?

Is it significant that the people breeding new staple crops in
the Americas were mostly women?

We will look more closely in the next several chapters at the
cultures of all these regions, as they entered the modern era.
Although the people of each continent and region developed
different traditions and customs, their agriculturally-based
cultures shared a lot of similarities and their civilizations were
all comparably advanced at the beginning of our survey. with
that introduction, let’s begin.

Media Attributions

Molino_neolitico_de_vaivén © José-Manuel Benito
Alvarez is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license
Putative_migration_waves_out_of_Africa © Saioa
Lopez, Lucy van Dorp and Garrett Hellenthal is
licensed under a CC BY (Attribution) license
Pyramids_of_the_Giza_Necropolis © KennyOMG is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

Roman_Empire_Trajan_l17AD © Tataryn is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

Europe_and_the_Near_East_at_476_AD © Guriezous
is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

OldmapofMecca © Unknown is licensed under a Public
Domain license

RomanandHanEmpiresAD1 © Gabagool is licensed
under a CC BY (Attribution) license

Maize-teosinte © John Doebley is licensed under a CC.

18 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

BY (Attribution) license

* Manihot_esculenta_dsc07325 © David Monniaux is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

[1]

Modern World History Begins in
Asia

Some of the 8,000 Terracotta Soldiers from the 209 BCE grave of the first emperor, Qin
Shi Huang, discovered in 1974 by farmers in Xi'an China.

20 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

We begin our survey of modern world history in Asia, This may
surprise many who grew up believing that most of the important
events of modern history happened in the West. Don't worry,
welll add Europe, Africa, and the Americas to the story soon
enough. But before we do that, it's important to understand
that the histories of China and India are as old as western
history if not older, and Asia has always been the center of
world population. So, let's look at how Asia achieved that global
preeminence

As mentioned in the Introduction, civilization began in India
about 4,600 years ago and China’s recorded history began about
2000 BCE. Based on irrigated rice agriculture, the population
of China grew to 50 to 60 million people as early as 2,000
years ago. This population was originally divided into several
small kingdoms whose ruling families were connected through
political marriages. Beginning in 221 BCE, the Chinese created
an empire that lasted over two thousand years under a series
of more than a dozen dynasties. The early imperial

overnments began construction of
the called Long Walls, and dug the
Grand Canal to connect the Yellow and
Yangtze Rivers in the sixth century CE.
China held a monopoly on the
creation of silk, which was a closely-
held state secret for millennia, and led
the world in iron, copper, and
porcelain production as well as a
variety of technological inventions
including the compass, gunpowder,
paper-making, mechanical clocks, and
moveable type printing.

The social stability that allowed Chinese culture to produce

Modern World History 21

these innovations was based on not only the imperial form of
government, but on an elaborate system of professional civil
service. The early establishment of a professional
administrative class of “scholar-officials” was a remarkable
element of imperial Chinese rule that made it more stable,
longer-lasting, and at least potentially less oppressive than
empires in other parts of the world. The imperial courts sent
thousands of highly-educated administrators throughout the
empire and China was ruled not by hereditary nobles or even
elected representatives, but by a class of men who had received
rigorous training and had passed very stringent examinations to
prove themselves qualified to lead.

The Liji or Book of Rites was one of the five Classic Confucian texts.

Young men who wanted to become civil administrators in
China entered training schools that concentrated on calligraphy
and the teachings of Confucius. Calligraphy in China equaled
literacy. Chinese language is based on characters rather than on
an alphabet, and is said to be the world’s oldest continually-used
writing system. A dictionary published in 1039 CE listed 53,525
characters, and a 2004 Chinese dictionary included 106,230.
Most Chinese words are made of one or more characters. For
comparison, the English alphabet uses 26 letters and the average
American has a practical vocabulary of about 10,000 words.
While a foreigner learning Chinese today would be judged

22 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

proficient on the national exam (the Hanyu Shuiping Kaoshi or
HSK) with a vocabulary of about 9,000 words, they would need
to know the 2,865 characters that made up these words in order
to study at a Chinese university or work in a Chinese business.

ms In addition to literacy, civil
service training focused on
the philosophy of Confucius,
a Chinese philosopher who
had lived from 551 to 479
BCE. Kong Fuzi (Master
Kong—he is known as
“Confucius” in the West)
taught principles derived
from what he described as old
Chinese classics. Confucius
claimed he was not so much
creating a new philosophy as
preserving and combining
the best traditions of the past,
which was very appropriate

Now about 600 years old, this portrait of .
Confucius was drawn nearly two thousand in a culture devoted to

years after his death. reverence of its ancestors. He

traveled as a teacher and
advisor of local rulers, and his practical philosophy spread.
Confucian ideas about conduct focus on five basic virtues:
seriousness, generosity, sincerity, diligence, and kindness.
When a student asked him “Is there any one word that could
guide a person throughout life?” Confucius replied, “How about
‘reciprocity’! Never impose on others what you would not
choose for yourself.” (Analects XV.24) The Chinese, who valued
silver higher than gold, called this the silver rule. Confucian
social morality is based on this reciprocity and on empathy and
understanding others rather than on divinely ordained rules.
Although Confucius occasionally talked about heaven and an
afterlife, his moral system was not based on the idea of
supernatural rewards and punishments. Confucian morality is
secular rather than religious, which left room for the Emperor
to be a representative of Divinity and claim “the Mandate of
Heaven” without the Chinese Empire becoming a theocracy.

Modern World History 23

Ming Dynasty painting of the highest-level Confucian examination at the imperial
palace.

Centuries after his death, Confucian ideas became the basis
of civil service education in imperial China. Scholars would
travel to testing centers and sit for exams that often took days
to complete. They brought food and a bedroll and remained
in their small testing cells until they had completed the exam.
There were four increasingly-difficult levels of testing: County,
District, Province, and Imperial. The highest exam was
administered by the emperor himself and passing it qualified
a scholar for assignments in the imperial court. The exams
were extremely difficult and at each level more people failed
than passed. But the exams were also democratic in a way:
even a scholar from a poor family could take the exam if he
could educate himself; success on the top exam was a ticket to
the highest levels of imperial society. Over the centuries, the
scholars became an upper class in Chinese society, a gentry
based on educational merit rather than merely on birth or
wealth. Although there were times when the system was
corrupted, for most of its history Chinese society was run by

24 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

educated men rather than by nobles who had inherited their

positions.

Confucianism is not a
perfect philosophy, since it
accepted and even reinforced
certain societal injustices.
Confucius incorporated
traditional Chinese ancestor-
worship into his system,
which implied a degree of

sacredness for ancestral
practices. For this reason,
Confucian principles

perpetuated and exacerbated
the oppression of women,
who had no standing in the
male-dominated family
structure. Girls were
considered an expense to
their birth families, since they
only became valuable when
they married and bore sons
for their new families. Female
infanticide has been a
problem throughout Chinese
history, as was, until the last
century, the practice of foot-

Although several earlier governments tried
to eliminate footbinding, the practice
persisted in China until the Communist
Revolution in 1949. These girls were among
the last to have their feet bound in the
1930s.

binding, which rendered generations of Chinese women
crippled and semi-mobile for the sake of what amounted to a

fetish of Chinese fashion.

But despite its faults, Confucian civil service insured that for
much of its history the Chinese empire, its various districts and
regions, and even small communities were run by educated
administrators and magistrates rather than by random rulers
who achieved power by conquest or inheritance.

Questions for Discussion


Modern World History 25

Why do you think the teachings of Confucius were such a
powerful influence on Chinese society?

How was the Confucian civil service potentially more effective
than rule by hereditary nobles?

The Confucian civil service was a central feature of Chinese
imperial culture for centuries. What were its advantages and
disadvantages?

LT

Pay

ae

c

This time-lapse map of the Mongol Empire shows the expansion of the Khanate after
Genghis Khan's 1227 death. The purple area in the east is Kublai Khan's Yuan Empire.

The Chinese Empire did face conquest several times, but
Chinese culture and social organization managed to absorb its
conquerors. In 1271, the Mongol leader Kublai Khan, the
grandson of Genghis Khan, defeated the Chinese army and
established the Yuan dynasty, which that lasted 98 years until
1368. Although Kublai Khan never completely conquered

26 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

China despite 65 years of struggle, Yuan rule marked the first
time the Chinese Empire was controlled by foreigners. The
Khan distrusted Confucian officials, but he did not completely
replace them as regional administrators. Still, through the Yuan
dynasty, China was exposed to foreign cultures, especially
Islamic cartography, mathematics, astronomy, medicine, food,
and clothing, while likewise, the West encountered Chinese
culture and technological advances in a serious way. The Silk
Road, the ancient trade route connecting China with Europe
had languished for several centuries under the Islamic
Caliphate in the Middle East; it was reestablished and in 1271
the Venetian merchants Niccolo, Maffeo, and Marco Polo visited
Kublai Khan at his summer palace in Shangdu (Xanadu). The
Mongol rulers also patronized China’s new printing industry,
which helped spread the idea of moveable type printing into
Europe.

~» Despite the fact that China’s
Mongol Yuan rulers
abandoned many of their
own traditions and adopted
the ways of the people they
had conquered, the ethnic
Han Chinese majority
continued to resent being
ruled by foreigners. Along

_ with exposure to foreign
cultures, the Mongols’
reopening of the Silk Road
brought foreign diseases to
China. Bubonic Plague, the
“Black Death” that killed a

quarter of the European
crmrce Pole depts tubleiknon bowing POPUation in the léth
the King of Burma with elephants. century, actually hit China

first. The plague began in
central Kyrgystan and killed up to 25 million people in China in
the 1330s and 1340s, about 15 years before it first arrived in
Constantinople. As in Europe, famine and social chaos followed


Modern World History 27

the plague when agriculture failed to produce enough to feed
the survivors.

A young man named Zhu Yuanzhang, born during the plague
years, watched his entire family die in famines that swept
through southern China in the 1340s. After taking refuge in
a Buddhist monastery, Zhu joined local rebels when the
monastery was destroyed by Yuan forces trying to contain a
local insurrection. Zhu joined forces with a rebel army called
the Red Turbans and rose quickly through the ranks. Zhu
married the daughter of the founder of the Red Turbans and
inherited his leadership position after eliminating several rival
generals. In 1356, the 28-year old general conquered the ancient
city of Nanjing and made it his base. In 1868, Zhu led his troops
north and chased the Yuans out of their capital of Dadu (now
Beijing). The Mongols retreated to Mongolia and Zhu claimed
the Mandate of Heaven and declared himself the first emperor
of the Ming (brilliant) Dynasty.

Question for Discussion

+ What were the main positive and negative results of the
Mongol conquest of China?


28 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Zhu Yuanzhang called
himself the Hongwu Emperor
(expansive and martial) and
made Nanjing his capital.
Imperial titles like “Hongwu”
relate to the reign of each
emperor, in which they
declare the nature of their
particular rule. These titles
are not the actual name of the
emperor, but this is how they
are known in Chinese history.

Hongwu ruled for thirty
years and tried to return the
empire to its ethnic Chinese
roots. Hongwu issued decrees
abolishing Mongol dress and
requiring people to abandon Zhu Yuanzhang, the Hongwu Emperor,
their Mongol-influenced reigned from 1368 to 1398.
names in favor of traditional
Han Chinese names. Administration of the empire by
Confucian scholars was reinstated, along with the elaborate
system of civil service examinations. Remembering the
suffering and famines during his youth, partly caused by the
flooding of the Yangtze River, Hongwu promoted public works
and infrastructure projects including new dikes and irrigation
systems to serve an agricultural system dominated by paddy
rice. He organized the building or repair of nearly 41,000
reservoirs and planted over a billion trees in his land
reclamation program. Hongwu distributed land to peasants and
forced many to move to less populated areas. During his three-
decade reign, China’s population recovered from plague and
famine, and grew from 60 to 100 million.


Modern World History 29

Hongwu had fought his way
to prominence by eliminating
his rivals and trusting only his
family. But when his first son,
the crown prince, died,
Hongwu left his throne to the
son of his favorite son, rather
than picking one of his other
sons.. Hongwu’s grandson
became emperor at 20, but
his reign was a short one. His
uncle Zhu Di, the emperor's
younger son, had been passed
Statue of Zhu Di, the Yongle Emperor, athis over for the crown but
tomb in Beijing. remained prince of a

northern territory around
Dadu, the previous Yuan capital close to the Mongol border. In
1402 Zhu Di overthrew his nephew and declared himself the
Yongle (perpetual happiness) Emperor.

Yongle tried to erase the memory of his rebellion by purging
a large number of Confucian scholars in the capital of Nanjing
and moving the government to his home in Dadu, which he
renamed Beijing. Yongle ruled through an extensive network of
court eunuchs who formed his palace guard and secret police.
Yongle repaired and reopened China’s Grand Canal, the
1,104-mile waterway that linked the Yellow and Yangxi Rivers
and enabled the new capital to receive rice shipments from the
south. Between 1406 and 1420, he also directed 100,000 artisans
and 1 million laborers in building the Forbidden City in Beijing
as a permanent imperial residence.

Question for Discussion

How did the early Ming emperors try to change the society
they ruled? Would you consider most of their changes
positive or negative for the Chinese people?


30 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

One of Yongle’s most
trusted subordinates was the
eunuch admiral Zheng He
(1871-1433), the son of a
Muslim soldier
southwestern China. At the
age of ten Zheng He was
captured, castrated, and sent
to serve Prince Zhu Di in
Dadu. Castration was a
common practice throughout
the ancient and early modern
world, used in China to insure
loyalty by eliminating conflict
between family and duty.
Educated in the prince's
household, Zheng He became
a loyal soldier and later a
general. Zheng He helped
Zhu Di depose his nephew

from |

Statue of Admiral Zheng He located in
Melaka, Malaysia.

and take control of the empire, and the new Yongle Emperor
appointed Zheng He admiral of his fleet and sent him on seven
expeditions between 1405 and 1430.

Modern World History 31

Zheng He's flagship compared to the caravel Santa Maria used by Columbus 87 years
later.

Zheng He’s first expedition left China in July 1405 with 62
large ships, over 200 smaller ships, and 28,000 soldiers. The
largest ships were 425 feet long, over six times the length of
the 65-foot caravels the Spanish and Portuguese would use on
their explorations nearly a century later. China’s four-decked,
1,500-ton flagships had shallow drafts to allow them to navigate
in river estuaries and watertight bulkheads to protect them from
sinking. Their nine masts were up to two hundred feet tall and
fitted with rattan sails.

Zheng He’s fleet was not interested in establishing colonies,
but in exacting tribute and opening trade relationships
throughout South Asia. The fleet traded for ivory, spices,
ointments, exotic woods, giraffes, zebras, and ostriches; while
also demanding tribute from the rulers of nations like Sumatra
and Sri Lanka. Often, when local leaders seemed unwilling to
submit, Zheng He seized them and brought them to Beijing
where they could be convinced of the overwhelming power
of the Chinese Empire. Among the places Zheng visited were
Bangkok, Java, Melaka, Burma, the east and west coasts of India,

32 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Hormuz in the Persian Gulf, Jedda on the Red Sea, and
Mogadishu and Mombasa on the east coast of Africa. Ninety-
five delegations from Southeast Asia and other more distant
nations reached the Yongle Emperor's court during his 22-year
reign, and he established a College of Translators to handle all
the correspondence he received from foreign contacts. Zheng
He’s seven expeditions extracted tribute from many
neighboring kingdoms, and Yongle trusted him so completely
that he sent Zheng He blank scrolls with his imperial seal on
them, to use in whatever way he chose.

The seven voyages of Zheng He, 1405-1433.

For many centuries the voyages of Zheng He were not
featured in histories of China, even in China itself. As historians
have rediscovered these expeditions, the superiority of Chinese
naval technology has challenged the belief that western nations
were the first to establish maritime power. One of the most
interesting questions about Zheng He’s voyages is, “Why did
they end?” China did not establish offshore colonies, perhaps
partly because there was so much territory available on the
empire’s northern and western frontiers. China’s rapidly-
growing population was a ready market for most of the empire’s

Modern World History 33

farm products and manufactures, and the international trade
that interested China already found its way to the empire
without much effort on China’s part. And unlike European
kings, the Yongle emperor was not interested in evangelizing
Confucianism or Buddhism to the rest of the world—the
Spanish and Portuguese, in particular, wanted to convert the
world to Catholic Christianity, which became not only a goal but
a justification for conquest and colonization.

When the Yongle Emperor’s son and grandson inherited the
throne, Zheng He's expeditions gradually became less of a
priority. After a final voyage in 1433, expeditions were halted
and the fleet was retired and ultimately burned. Ending China’s
navy was one of the major changes made by Yongle’s
descendants. The burning of the Chinese fleet left a power
vacuum in the South China Sea, which in the sixteenth century
was filled by Japanese and Chinese coastal pirates. Finally,
shortly after Yongle and Zheng He’s deaths, China was
challenged from the north again. Sixteen years after Zheng He’s
final expedition, Yongle’s great grandson, the sixth Ming
emperor, was captured and held hostage by Mongol raiders in
1449.

Questions for Discussion

What do you think was the most significant element of Zheng
He's seafaring missions?

With such a commanding technological lead, why did China
turn away from the outside world and suspend exploration?

What might the world look like now, if the Chinese Empire
had continued along the lines begun by Zheng He?


34 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The Great Wall of China at Jinshanling

The alarmed Chinese turned their attention to their border
defenses and rebuilt the crumbling Long Walls into a 1,550-mile
long fortification with hundreds of guard towers. The Long
‘Walls had existed since the beginning of the Chinese Empire,
but had failed to hold off Mongol invaders. Under the Mings the
Great Wall was improved and extended, especially around the
capital of Beijing and the agricultural heartland in the Liaodong
Province north of the Korean Peninsula. These defenses enabled
the Chinese population to rise from 100 million in 1500 to
160 million in 1600. However, the threat of a Manchurian land
invasion from the north was taken very seriously, to the
detriment of authorizing further naval expeditions. China’s
turning away from the ocean was a momentous decision in
world history, opening the door for Southeast Asians, Muslims,
and eventually Europeans to dominate the Indian Ocean and
the Pacific.

Modern World History 35

As the generations passed,
Ming emperors and _ their
courts became increasingly
isolated in the Forbidden City
the Yongle Emperor had
built. Some were
incompetent rulers, others
were just uninterested in
ruling. Similar to other new
imperial dynasties, the Ming
Dynasty began by
concentrating political power
in the Emperor and in the
civil servants chosen through
the Confucian examination
process. As time passed, a
ruling class grew and power
The Forbidden City as depicted in 1500. shifted as the new elite

protected their lands and
possessions from taxation. Corrupt officials siphoned funds
designated for public works into their own pockets and
infrastructure such as dams and dikes crumbled. Eventually,
irrigation systems failed and peasants died in widespread
famines.

At the same time, Manchuria was being unified under strong
military leaders who had adopted Chinese ways and who even
employed Confucian administrators. In 1644, a Ming
government official dealing with a local peasant insurrection
that threatened Beijing asked the Manchurians for military aid.
Of course, once the Manchu armies were past the Wall, there
was no way to send them back. They took control of Beijing and
declared the end of the Ming Empire and the beginning of a
new dynasty, the Qing (pure).


36 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

We will return later to the
history of China, the Qing
Dynasty, and what came after.
For now, the point of
beginning modern world
history with China is that in
terms of population and
economic power, it was the
center of the world in 1500
when our survey of Modern
World History begins. In
1500, the Chinese population
was growing rapidly, the
Ming Empire had a standing
army of over a_ million
soldiers and the Chinese navy
of Zheng He had recently Qing emperor Qianlong in ceremonial
projected the empire’s power Manchurian armor, ca. 1758.
throughout Asia. The Chinese
economy produced one quarter of the world’s gross domestic
product (GDP) in 1500, followed by India which produced
nearly another quarter. In comparison, the fourteen nations of
western Europe produced just about half of China’s GDP or only
one-eight of the global total production. The largest European
economy, in Italy, produced only about one-sixth of China’s
output.

The Ming Empire's population in 1500 was about 125 million.
The next largest empires were Southern India’s Vijayanagara
Empire (16 million), followed by the Inca Empire of South
America (12 million), the Ottoman Empire (11 million), the
Spanish Empire (about 8.5 million), and the Ashikaga Shogunate
of Japan (8 million). Keep the immense mass of China and
the gravity exerted by its economy in mind as we move on to
discuss events like the creation of a Spanish colonial empire
in the Americas—Spanish-American mines produced the silver
that accidentally became the world’s currency, filling not only
the treasuries Europe, but also that of China in the sixteenth and
seventeenth centuries.


Questions for Discussion

Modern World History 37

Discuss the symbolism of the Great Wall in Chinese culture.

Does the size, complexity, and age of the Chinese Empire
alter your understanding of the early modern world?

Primary Source Supplement #1: 99 Famous Sayings

attributed to Confucius:

Confucius (551-479 BCE) is
the most famous
philosopher of China. The
teachings of Kong  Fuzi
(Master. Kong—known as
"Confucius" in the West)
were the basis of regulating
relationships in Chinese
society. For centuries,
would-be civil__ servants
needed to study Confucian
precepts for the

Painting of Confucius discovered
recently in a Western Han tomb,
dated approx. 202 BCE to 9 CE.

examinations used to choose imperial administrators. Much
of Confucian teaching comes in the form of short aphorisms.
Drawing on ancient Chinese customs of patriarchy, filial piety,
and veneration of ancestors, Confucianism was extremely
chauvinistic and led to centuries of oppression of women in
Chinese culture-when Confucius said “man” or "he", he
actually meant it. However, that doesn’t mean Confucius
didn’t make some thought-provoking statements, if we
expand them to include all people. Here are 99 aphorisms
considered noteworthy by contemporary collectors of

quotes :


38 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

“The man who says he can, and the man who says he
cannot, are both correct.”

“Your life is what your thoughts make it.”
“Real knowledge is to know the extent of one’s ignorance.”

“The man who asks a question is a fool for a minute, the
man who does not ask is a fool for life.”

"The journey with a thousand miles begins with one step.”

“Choose a job you love, and you will never have to work a
day in your life.”

“You are what you think.”

“Looking at small advantages prevents great affairs from
being accomplished.”

“All people are the same; only their habits differ.”

“Learn avidly. Question it repeatedly. Analyze it carefully.
Then put what you have learned into practice intelligently.”

“We have two lives, and the second begins when we realize
we only have one.”

“if you are the smartest person in the room, then you are in
the wrong room.”

“Act with kindness but do not expect gratitude."

"Worry not that no one knows you; seek to be worth
knowin

“The man who moves a mountain begins by carrying away
small stones.”

“When it is obvious that the goals cannot be reached, don’t
adjust the goals, adjust the action steps.”

“The essence of knowledge is, having it, to use it.”
“One joy dispels a hundred cares.”

“When you see a good person, think of becoming like her/
him. When you see someone not so good, reflect on your own
weak points.”

“I slept and dreamt life is beauty, | woke and found life is
duty.”


Modern World History 39

“They must often change who would remain constant in
happiness and wisdom.”

“Don’t complain about the snow on your neighbor's roof
when your own doorstep is unclean.”

“Alion chased me up a tree, and | greatly enjoyed the view
from the top.”

“Be not ashamed of mistakes and thus make them crimes.”

“The superior man is modest in his speech but exceeds in
his actions.”

“Be strict with yourself but least reproachful of others and
complaint is kept afar.”

“Roads were made for journeys not destinations.”

“No matter how busy you may think you are you must
find time for reading or surrender yourself to self-chosen
ignorance."

“Think of tomorrow, the past can't be mended.”
“Respect yourself and others will respect you.”

"To be wronged is nothing, unless you continue to
remember it.”

“| hear and | forget. | see and | remember. | do and |
understand.”

"By nature, men are nearly alike; by practice, they get to be
wide apart.”

“Learn as if you were not reaching your goal and as though
you were scared of missing it.”

“Never contract friendship with a man that is not better
than thyself.”

“He who knows all the answers has not been asked all the
questions.”

“Those who cannot forgive others break the bridge over
which they themselves must pass.”

“Those who know the truth are not equal to those who love
it”


40 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

“The superior man thinks always of virtue; the common
man thinks of comfort.”

“The superior man acts before he speaks, and afterwards
speaks according to his action.”

“Success depends upon previous preparation, and without
such preparation there is sure to be failure.”

“Only the wisest and stupidest of men never change.”
“Study the past if you would define the future.”

“Our greatest glory is not in never falling, but in rising every
time we fall.”

“Learning without thought is labor lost; thought without
learning is perilous.”

“Do not impose on others what you yourself do not desire.”

“The superior man makes the difficulty to be overcome his
first interest; success only comes later.”

“If you make a mistake and do not correct it, this is called a
mistake.”

“Education breeds confidence. Confidence breeds hope.
Hope breeds peace.”

"To see the right and not to do it is cowardice.”

"Virtuous people often revenge themselves for the
constraints to which they submit by the boredom which they
inspire.”

“He who acts with a constant view to his own advantage will
be much murmured against.”

“The superior man is distressed by the limitations of his
ability; he is not distressed by the fact that men do not
recognize the ability that he has.”

"To see what is right and not to do it is want of courage, or
of principle.”

“When anger rises, think of the consequences.”

“To know what you know and what you do not know, that is
true knowledge.”


Modern World History 41

“| want you to be everything that’s you, deep at the center
of your being.”

The object of the superior man is truth.”
“When you have faults, do not fear to abandon them."
“To go beyond is as wrong as to fall short.”

“If you think in terms of a year, plant a seed; if in terms
of ten years, plant trees; if in terms of 100 years, teach the
people.”

“if you look into your own heart, and you find nothing
wrong there, what is there to worry about? What is there to
fear?”

“It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not
stop.”

“Virtue is not left to stand alone. He who practices it will
have neighbors.”

“Better a diamond with a flaw than a pebble without.”

“The superior man does not, even for the space of a single
meal, act contrary to virtue. In moments of haste, he cleaves
to it. In seasons of danger, he cleaves to it.”

“The will to win, the desire to succeed, the urge to reach
your full potential: these are the keys that will unlock the door
to personal excellence.”

“Go before the people with your example and be laborious
in their affairs.”

"When we see persons of worth, we should think of
equaling them; when we see persons of a contrary character,
we should turn inwards and examine ourselves.”

“If we don't know life, how can we know death?”

“The expectations of life depend upon diligence; the
mechanic that would perfect his work must first sharpen his
tools.”

“He who speaks without modesty will find it difficult to
make his words good.”

“What you do not want done to yourself, do not do to
others.”


42 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

“Without feelings of respect, what is there to distinguish
men from beasts?”

“You cannot open a book without learning something.”

“A gentleman would be ashamed should his deeds not
match his words.”

“When a person should be spoken with, and you don't
speak with them, you lose them. When a person shouldn't be
spoken with and you speak to them, you waste your breath.
The wise do not lose people, nor do they waste their breath.”

To see and listen to the wicked is already the beginning of
wickedness.”

“Wherever you go, go with all your heart.”

“Give a bowl of rice to a man and you will feed him for a day.
Teach him how to grow his own rice and you will save his life.”

“Study the past, if you would divine the future.”

“It is more shameful to distrust our friends than to be
deceived by them.”

“Life is really simple, but we insist on making it
complicated.”

“Silence is a true friend who never betrays.”

“By three methods we may learn wisdom: first, by
reflection, which is noblest; second, by imitation, which is
easiest; and third by experience, which is the bitterest.”

"Wisdom, compassion, and courage are the three
universally recognized moral qualities of men.”

“Death and life have their determined appointments; riches
and honors depend upon heaven.”

“Everything has beauty, but not everyone sees it.”

“The more man meditates upon good thoughts, the better
will be his world and the world at large.”

“He who learns but does not think, is lost! He who thinks but
does not learn is in great danger.”

“if you don’t want to do something, don't impose on others.”

“It is easy to hate and it is difficult to love. This is how the


Modern World History 43

whole scheme of things works. All good things are difficult to
achieve and bad things are very easy to get.”

“The strength of a nation derives from the integrity of the
home.”

“The superior man understands what is right; the inferior
man understands what will sell.”

“Never give a sword to a man who can't dance.”
“We should feel sorrow, but not sink under its oppression.”
“Imagination is more important than knowledge.”

“When you know a thing, to hold that you know it; and when
you do not know a thing, to allow that you do not know it ~
this is knowledge.”

Source: http://www.quoteambition.com/famous-confucius-
quotes/

Primary Source Supplement #2: Zheng He's Voyages

The Ming Shi-lu (The Veritable Records of the Ming) are the
imperial annals of the Ming Dynasty emperors (1368-1644).
The National University of Singapore has published an online
archive of over 2,800 pages of Geoff Wade's translations of
the annals . They contain a wealth of information about Ming
China, including twenty-two references to Chinese Admiral
Zheng He and his diplomatic voyages, dated from July 1405
to March 1431, Here are some entries, describing Zheng He's
missions and incidents related to them. In several, Zheng is
described as being sent as an emissary to fan countries. The
Mandarin word fan translates roughly as ordinary or mortal,
suggesting the attitude of the Chinese emperors toward


44 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

foreign nations and their rulers. The English word “enfeoff” is
also not well known. It means to grant something to a lesser
lord or noble, like a fiefdom. Entries are dated by imperial era
dates, with western calendar dates in parentheses:

“The eunuch Zheng He and others were sent to take
Imperial orders of instruction to the various countries in the
Western Ocean, and to confer upon the kings of those
countries patterned fine silks and variegated thin silks
interwoven with gold thread, as appropriate.”

Yongle: Year 3, Month 6, Day 15 (11 Jul 1405)

“The Eunuch Director Zheng He who had been sent to the
various countries of the Western Ocean, returned, bringing
the pirate Chen Zuyi and others in fetters. Previously, when
he had arrived at Old Port, he came across Zuyi and so on and
sent people to bring them to negotiated pacification. Zuyi and
the others feigned surrender but secretly plotted to attack the
Imperial army. He and the others found out about this and,
marshalling the troops, prepared defenses. When the forces
led by Zuyi attacked, He sent his troops out to do battle. Zuyi
suffered a great defeat. Over 5,000 of the bandit gang were
killed, while ten of the bandit ships were burnt and seven
captured. Further, two false bronze seals were seized and
three prisoners, including Zuyi, were taken alive. When they
arrived at the capital, it was ordered that all the prisoners be
beheaded.”

Yongle: Year 5, Month 9, Day 2 (2 Oct 1407)

“The eunuch Zheng He and others, who had been sent
as envoys to the various countries in the Western Ocean,
returned and presented Yalie Kunaier, the captured king of
the country of Sri Lanka, and his family members. Previously,
He and the others had been sent as envoys to the various
fan countries. However, when they reached Sri Lanka, Yalie
Kunaier was insulting and disrespectful. He wished to harm
He, but He came to know of this and left. Yalie Kunaier also
acted in an unfriendly way to neighboring countries and


Modern World History 45

repeatedly intercepted and robbed their envoys. All the fan
countries suffered from his actions. When He returned, he
again passed Sri Lanka and the king enticed him to the
country. The king then had his son Nayan demand gold, silver
and precious objects, but He would not give these to him.
The king then secretly dispatched over 50,000 fan troops to
rob He's ships. They also felled trees to create obstructions
and impede He's route of return, so that he could not render
assistance. He and the others found out about this and they
gathered their force and set off back to their ships. However,
the route had already been blocked. He thus spoke to his
subordinates, saying: ‘The majority of the troops have already
been dispatched. The middle of the country will be empty.’
He also said: ‘Our merchants and troops are isolated and
nervous and will be unable to act. If they are attacked by
surprise, the attackers will achieve their purpose.’ Thus, he
secretly ordered persons to go to the ships by another route
with orders that the government troops were to fight to the
death in opposing the attackers. He then personally led 2,000
of his troops through a by-path and attacked the royal city by
surprise. They took the city and captured alive Yalie Kunaier,
his family members and chieftains. The fan army returned
and surrounded the city and several battles were fought, but
He greatly defeated them. He and the others subsequently
returned to the Court. The assembled ministers requested
that the king be executed. The Emperor pitied the king for his
stupidity and ignorance and leniently ordered that he and the
others be released and given food and clothing. The Ministry
of Rites was ordered to deliberate on and select a worthy
member of the family to be established as the country's king
in order to handle the country's sacrifices.”

Yongle: Year 9, Month 6, Day 16 (6 Jul 1411)

“As the envoys from the various countries of Calicut, Java,
Melaka, Champa, Sri Lanka, Mogadishu, Liushan, Nanboli,
Bulawa, Aden, Samudera, Malin, Lasa, Hormuz, Cochin,
Nanwuli, Shaliwanni and Pahang, as well as from the Old
Port Pacification Superintendency, were departing to return
home, suits of clothing made from patterned fine silks were
conferred upon all of them. The eunuch Zheng He and others


46 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

were sent with Imperial orders as well as embroidered fine
silks, silk gauzes, variegated thin silks and other goods to
confer upon the kings of these countries, to confer a seal
upon Keyili, the king of the country of Cochin, and to enfeoff a
mountain in his country as the ‘Mountain Which Protects the
Country.

The Emperor personally composed and conferred an
inscription for the tablet, as follows:

‘The civilizing influences and Heaven and Earth intermingle.
Everything which is covered and contained has been placed in
the charge of the Moulder, who manifests the benevolence of
the Creator. The world does not have two ultimate principles
and people do not have two hearts. They are sorrowful or
happy in the same way and have the same feelings and
desires. How can they be divided into the near and the
distant!

One who is outstanding in ruling the people should do his
best to treat the people as his children. The Book of Odes
says: ‘The Imperial domain stretches for thousands of li, and
there the people have settled, while the borders reach to
the four seas.’ The Book of Documents says: ‘To the East,
extending to the sea, to the West reaching to the shifting
sands and stretching to the limits of North and South, culture
and civilizing influences reach to the four seas.’ I rule all under
Heaven and soothe and govern the Chinese and the yi. | look
on all equally and do not differentiate between one and the
other. | promote the ways of the ancient Sagely Emperors and
Perspicacious Kings, so as to accord with the will of Heaven
and Earth. | wish all of the distant lands and foreign regions to
have their proper places.

Those who respond to the influences and move towards
culture are not singular. The country of Cochin is far away in
the South-west, on the shore of the vast ocean, further distant
than the other fan countries. It has long inclined towards
Chinese culture and been accepting of civilizing influences.
When the Imperial orders arrived, the people there went
down on their hands and knees and were greatly excited.
They loyally came to allegiance and then, looking to Heaven,
they bowed and all said: ‘How fortunate we are that the


Modern World History 47

civilizing influences of the Chinese sages should reach us. For
the last several years, the country has had fertile soil, and
the people have had houses in which to live, enough fish and
turtles to eat, and enough cloth and silk to make clothes.
Parents have looked after their children and the young have
respected their elders. Everything has been prosperous and
pleasing. There has been no oppression or contention. in
the mountains no savage beasts have appeared and in the
streams no noxious fishes have been seen. The sea has
brought forth treasures and the forests have produced
excellent woods. Everything has been in bountiful supply,
several times more bountiful than in ordinary times. There
have been no destructive winds, and damaging rains have
not occurred. Confusion has been eliminated and there is no
evil to be found. This is all indeed the result of the civilizing
influences of the Sage. | possess but slight virtuous power.
How could | have been capable of this! Is it not the elders and
people who brought this about? | am now enfeoffing Keyili as,
king of the country and conferring upon him a seal so that
he can govern the people. | am also enfeoffing the mountain
in the country as ‘Mountain Which Protects the Country’. An
engraved tablet is to be erected on this mountain to record
these facts forever. It will also be engraved as follows: The
high peak which rules the land, guards this ocean state, It
spits fire and fumes, bringing great prosperity to the country
below, It brings rain and sunshine in a timely way, and
soothes away troubles, It brings fertile soil and drives off evil
vapors, It shelters the people, and eliminates calamities and
disharmony, Families are joyful together, and people have
plenty throughout the year, The mountain's height is as the
ocean's depths! This poem is inscribed to record all for
prosperity.”

Yongle: Year 14, Month 12, Day 10 (28 Dec 1416)

“The envoys from the 16 countries of Hormuz and so on
departed on their return to their countries. Paper money and
biao-li of silks were conferred upon them. In addition, the
Eunuch Director Zheng He and others were sent with Imperial
orders, together with brocades, fine silks, silk gauzes,


48 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

damasks and thin silks to confer upon the kings of these
countries. They departed together with the envoys.”

Yongle: Year 19, Month 1, Day 30 (3 Mar 1421)

“The Eunuch Director Zheng He and others were sent with
an Imperial proclamation to go and instruct the various fan
countries. The proclamation read: ‘I have respectfully taken
on the mandate of Heaven and reverently inherited the Great
Rule from the Taizu Gao Emperor, the Taizong Wen Emperor
and the Renzong Zhao Emperor. | rule over the ten thousand
states, manifest the supreme benevolence of my ancestors
and spread peace to all things. | have already issued a general
amnesty to all under Heaven and declared the
commencement of the Xuande reign. All has begun anew.
You, the various fan countries far across the ocean, will not
yet have heard. Now | am especially sending the Eunuch
Directors Zheng He and Wang Jinghong carrying this
proclamation with which to instruct you. You must all respect
and accord with the Way of Heaven, care for your people and
keep them in peace. Thus will you all enjoy the prosperity
of Great Peace’ Variegated silks, as appropriate, were to be
conferred upon the rulers or chiefs of all 20 countries through
which the eunuchs were to pass, including Hormuz, Sri Lanka,
Calicut, Melaka, Cochin, Bulawa, Mogadishu, Nanboli,
Samudera, Lasa, Liushan, Aru, Ganbali, Aden, Zuofaer, Zhubu,
Jiayile and so on, as well as the Old Port Pacification
Superintendency.

Xuande: Year 5, Month 6, Day 9 (29 Jun 1430)

“The chieftain Wubaochina and others from the country
of Melaka, arrived at the Court. They advised that the king
of their country wanted to personally come to Court and
offer tribute, but that he had been obstructed by the king
of the country of Siam. They also said that Siam had long
wanted to invade their country and that their country wanted
to memorialize but had had no one who could write the
memorial. At this time, the king had ordered that these three
ministers secretly attach themselves to a Samuderan tribute
ship and come to Court. They requested that the Court send


Modern World History 49

people to instruct the king of Siam to no longer oppress or
mistreat their country and that thereby they would be
unendingly grateful for the Court's grace. The Emperor
ordered the Auxiliary Ministry of Rites to confer rewards upon
Wubaochina and the others and to send them back to their
country with the ships of the eunuch director Zheng He.
Zheng He was ordered to take Imperial orders of instruction
for the king of the country of Siam as follows:

‘rule all under Heaven and look on all equally. You have
been able to respect the Court and have repeatedly sent
envoys to come to Court and offer tribute. | am pleased with
your service. However, recently, it has been heard that the
king of the country of Melaka wanted to personally come to
Court, but was obstructed by you. In my opinion, this certainly
cannot have been your will, king. Rather, it must have been
some of your attendants, who are unable to think deeply
about things, who have obstructed avenues and started strife
with neighboring states. How can such actions be a way to
long maintain prosperity? You, king should respect my orders,
develop good relations with your neighbors, examine and
instruct your subordinates and not act recklessly or
aggressively. Then it will be seen that you are able to respect
Heaven and serve the superior, protect the country and the
people's peace and maintain good relations with neighboring
states. This will accord with my will of looking on alll equally.’

The Ministry of Rites said:

‘There are precedents for conferring rewards on tribute
envoys from the various fan. However, Wubaochina did not
bring any tribute and there is no precedent on which to base
rewards’

The Emperor said:

‘This distant person has come tens of thousands of Ii from
abroad to complain of injustice. How can we not reward him!’

Accordingly, ramie-silk clothing, biao-li of variegated silks,
silks and cotton cloth were conferred upon him in the same

quantities as those conferred upon tribute envoys from other
countries.

Xuande: Year 6, Month 2, Day 7 (20 Mar 1431)


50 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Source: Geoff Wade, translator, Southeast Asia in the Ming
Shi-lu: An Open Access Resource, Singapore: Asia Research
Institute and the Singapore E-Press, National University of
Singapore, _http://epress.nus.edu.sg/msl/person/zheng-he,
accessed July 02, 2018

Media

Attributions

Terracotta_Army_Pit_1_-_2 © Maros Mrazis

licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

Liji © snowyowls is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license
Half_Portraits_of_the_Great_Sage_and_Virtuous_Me
n_of_Old_-_Confucius © Anonymous is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Palastexamen-SongDynastie © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license

4079285574_60bc820530_b © Ralph Repo is licensed
under a CC BY (Attribution) license

Mongol_Empire_map © Astrokey44 is licensed under a
CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

Marco_Polo,_II_Milione,_Chapter_CXXIII_and_CXX
IV © Marco Polo is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Hongwul © Unknown is licensed under a Public
Domain license

8139576703_a585a2d543_b © Keith Roper is licensed
under a CC BY (Attribution) license

Modern World History 51

3668431041_d826f18308_b © hassan saeed is licensed
under a CC BY-NC-SA (Attribution NonCommercial
ShareAlike) license

361639903 _8ff8b7b616_b (1) © Lars Plougmann is
licensed under a CC BY (Attribution) license
Voyages_of_Zheng_He © Sy is licensed under a CC
BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
The_Great_Wall_of_China_at_Jinshanling-edit ©
Severin.stalder is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

Verbotene-Stadtl500 © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

1920px-
The_Qianlong_Emperor_in_Ceremonial_Armour_on
_Horseback © Giuseppe Castiglione is licensed under a
Public Domain license
(4)CHINA-SHANDONG-DONGPING-ARCHEOLOGY-
FRESCOS © Unknown is licensed under a Public
Domain license

[2]

Europe and Africa

This chapter of our story is bracketed by two population
disasters. It begins in the 14th century with the Black Death
and ends with the American depopulation of the Columbian
Exchange, which welll talk about next time.

52

Modern World History 53

Nations and Empires

Map of Europe in 1500, showing the major national boundaries.

One of the major changes in Europe in the early modern
period, which we take for granted today, is the beginning of a
tendency toward nations rather than empires. Although some
European rulers like Napoleon, Queen Victoria, and later Hitler
tried to expand the scale of their realms into empires, these
were exceptions that proved the rule (and Victoria’s British
Empire was outside Europe). Europe’s nations were identified
by factors like ethnicity, language, customs, and religion. Often
these nations fought neighbors that were defined by different
identities. This made European nations unlike the empires of
Asia and the near east that typically included wide varieties of
cultures and ethnicities within their borders.

The first, oldest, and largest Asian empire was China, as we've
already discussed. But there were four additional empires that
set the scene for the early modern period, and whose histories
helped shape the world today. These were the Mughal Empire
in India, the Safavid Empire in Persia (Iran), the Russian Empire
on Europe’s eastern border, and the Ottoman Empire in the

54 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Middle East. The Ottomans were a Muslim dynasty that rose on
the borders of the Byzantine Empire in the 1800s and became
a world power when Sultan Mehmed II (called Mehmed
the Conqueror) overwhelmed the defenders of Constantinople
in 1453.

Constantinople had been the capital of the Eastern Roman
Empire (also called the Byzantine Empire) since the Emperor
Constantine had moved his government there in 380 CE. The
city was strategically important because it controlled the
Bosphorus and Dardanelles straits that connected the
Mediterranean Sea with the Black Sea. This made it the gateway
between Europe and Asia. Mehmed took the city as his new
capital and renamed it Istanbul. The Sultan allowed Christians
and Jews to continue living in Istanbul and granted the Eastern
Orthodox Church autonomy as long as they accepted Ottoman
authority. But many Christian refugees fled the city and found
their ways to cities like Venice and Florence, where they helped
ignite the period known as the Renaissance.

Istanbul quickly became the largest Eurasian city outside
China. Under Sultans like Suleiman the Magnificent (r.
1520-1566), the Ottomans expanded into Europe and nearly
captured Vienna in 1529 and again in 1683. They controlled
shipping in the western Mediterranean and the trade routes
and major markets connecting to the Silk Road such as Cairo
and Baghdad. The high cost of doing business in the Ottoman-
controlled Middle East created an incentive for European

Modern World History 55

merchants to seek other ways of reaching Asia. The Ottomans
were actually quite tolerant of ethnic, language, and religious
diversity, and their empire was multi-ethnic and multicultural.
Local languages, religions, and even self-government were
allowed as long as people remained loyal to the empire and paid
their taxes.

In regions that were too
poor to pay in money or
produce, the Ottomans often
took a tax in the form of
people. For example, young
boys were taken as tribute
captives from villages in the
Balkans. They were converted
to Islam, educated, and
trained into an elite fighting
force called the Janissaries
who reported directly to the
Emperor. Because they were
personally loyal to one man,
the Janissaries became
politically powerful. Fear that
the private army would
betray him and name another heir Sultan caused new rulers to
assassinate all their brothers as soon as they took the throne.
The Janissaries were the Ottomans’ most effective weapon from
1863 to 1826, when the sultan decided to disband them in favor
of a modern military. The Janissaries mutinied and marched on
the Sultan’s palace, but several thousand were wiped out by
modern artillery and the survivors executed.

The Ottoman Empire tried to modernize in other ways as
well, but fell behind its European neighbors in the nineteenth
century and finally met its end during the First World War. We'll
return to that story in a few chapters.

Janissaries in the Battle of Vienna, 1683

Questions for Discussion


56 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Why did Istanbul rapidly become the largest city outside
China?

Why was it dangerous that the Janissaries reported
personally to the Sultan?

The Safavid Empire of Persia (1501-1736) was a Shiite Muslim
dynasty that controlled the region from the eastern border of
the Ottoman Empire, through Iran, and into what is now
Afghanistan, Georgia, Armenia, and Pakistan. The Safavid’s
greatest ruler, Shah Abbas the Great, moved his capital to
Isfahan in central Iran. The ancient Persian city had once been a
home for Israelite refugees freed from the Babylonian Captivity
by Cyrus the Great in the 6thcentury BCE. Shah Abbas
continued the tradition of settling refugees in Isfahan,
welcoming hundreds of thousands of Armenians in the early
1600s from the disputed border region separating the Shiite
Safavid Empire from the Sunni Ottoman Empire. After the
Armenian genocide in 1915, during World War One, the
Armenian quarter of Isfahan became one of the oldest and
largest Armenian centers in the world.

Modern World History 57

py Seve rote
4801-1735 (AD)

The maximum extent of the Safavid Empire under Shah Abbas.

The Mughal Empire of India was established in 1526 by a
Persian-speaking dynasty that traced its authority back to
Genghis Khan’s second son, Chagatai. The empire formed in a
region that had been conquered by Tamerlane, a Mongol leader
who consolidated the remains of several khanates. Tamerlane
wanted to reassemble Genghis’s Mongol Empire, and he also
considered himself “the Sword of Islam.” He died in 1405 on his
way to a planned invasion of Ming China which his successor
immediately called off.

Inspired by Tamerlane’s fusion of cultures and religious
movements, a new religion called Sikhism developed in the
Punjab in the 15th century by combining elements of the
traditional Hinduism of the region with Islam. Sikhs opposed
India’s caste system, while becoming legendary warriors on the
sub-continent.

The Mughals (from whom we get the term mogul) ruled a
wealthy empire that included most of the Indian subcontinent
and large parts of Afghanistan. It lasted until 1857 and at its peak
ruled a population of over 150 million people.

58 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The Mughal golden age began
in 1556 with the reign of
Akbar the Great, who
expanded the empire's
territory but allowed his
Indian subjects to keep their
languages and religions.
Hinduism, which is still the
dominant religion of India, is The Taj Mahal

based on ancient traditions

and practices originating centuries before the development of
Judaism and other religions in the Middle East. It is a
polytheistic religion in which the stories of the relations among
the gods and goddesses help explain the human condition.
Unlike Muslims and Christians, differences related to religious
practice have rarely divided Hindus.

Akbar’s grandson Shah Jahan (7. 1628-1658) was also an
accomplished military leader, but his reign is remembered for
its architectural achievements. Among them is the Taj Mahal,
built as a tomb for Jahan’s favorite wife Mumtaz Mahal.

The Russian Empire grew out of resistance to Mongol rule
and the fall of Constantinople. A ruler of the Grand Duchy of
Moscow named Ivan III (later called Ivan the Great) refused to
pay tribute to the Golden Horde and after the death of the last
Greek Orthodox Christian emperor, Ivan decided his kingdom
would become the new Rome. Ivan (r. 1462-1505) tripled the size
of his state and rebuilt the Kremlin in Moscow. His grandson,
Ivan IV (Ivan the Terrible, r. 1547-1584) was the first to declare
himself Tsar of all the Russias—a title which is Russian for
“Caesar.” He annexed the khanates of Kazan, Astrakhan, and
Siberia and recruited Cossacks from southern Russia and
Ukraine to colonize Siberia.

Russia became the largest kingdom in the world, stretching
from the Black Sea to the Pacific Ocean, but much of it was
unoccupied and primitive. Peter I (Peter the Great, r. 1672-1725)
visited Europe in disguise for 18 months to study shipbuilding
and new administrative techniques that he used to modernize
his realm and establish the Russian Empire. We'll return to


Modern World History 59

Russia later, but let’s explore some of the things that attracted
Peter to Europe in the late 1600s.

Questions for Discussion

Why were the Ottomans and the Safavids always at war?

What was the advantage for empires like the Mughal of letting
subject peoples retain their languages, religions, and
customs?

What attracted Peter the Great to study Europe?

The Enlightenment and Protestant Reformation

sco Approximate border between the Principality a8 Land trade routes
= of Kiev and the Golden Horde - passa:

Prohibited for Christians. TK Maritime trade routes

Map of the spread of bubonic plague in Europe

Europe’s Dark Ages ended in the 15thcentury, after the disaster

60 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

of the Black Death. Even before the bubonic plague arrived,
harsh winters and rainy summers beginning around 1310 had
caused widespread famine. Feudal lords squeezed their peasants
for crops and labor, and states raised taxes. Several million died
during the famine, and then two thirds of Europe’s population
disappeared between the plague’s arrival in 1347 and 1353. This
depopulation threatened the power of the Church and the
nobility, as surviving peasants became less patient with the taxes
and labor demands of their bishops and lords. Peasant revolts
in France and England in the second half of the 14th century
showed the feudal system of the Middle Ages was coming to an
end.

Unlike the new eastern Muslim empires and the continuing
Chinese Empire, Europe was unable to reunify under a single
leader and create its own empire—although Austria’s Hapsburg
dynasty did its best to lead an alliance optimistically named
the Holy Roman Empire for centuries. Too many languages
and local centers of power competed for dominance, and the
Catholic Church (Europe’s largest landowner) was unable to
exercise secular as well as spiritual power. Instead the church
found itself pulled into regional contests for power, and in 1809
a French-born Pope moved his residence to Avignon. Seven
popes resided in France under the control of the French king
until 1378, when another French-born Pope decided to move
back to Rome. But the French rulers and a growing class of
aristocratic French cardinals were unwilling to give up the
power that came with having their own Pope. For another sixty
years there were two competing Papal Courts, one in Rome and
a rival in Avignon. Although the Avignon Popes have been called
Anti-Popes, it’s important to understand that the conflict was
primarily about political power rather than about theology or
religious doctrine. But theological conflicts were right around
the corner.

Modern World History 61

Papal Palace in Avignon, France

The arrival of the printing
press in Europe in the middle
of the fifteenth century
allowed critics of the church
like the friar Martin Luther to
publish books and pamphlets
calling for reform. Printing
was a Chinese invention that

. Gutenberg’s first complete book was
was improved by Johannes probably this Bible. He printed about 180
Gutenberg, a German copies of it in 1455.
goldsmith who understood
that moveable type was much more useful for an alphabet-
based language than for a character-based system like Chinese.
Printing spread classical Greek and Roman texts that had been
carried to Europe by refugees from Constantinople, helping
ignite the Renaissance (literally “rebirth”) of Europe. A new
philosophy called Humanism focused scholars on learning that
was not contained in Scripture or in church-approved sources,
and on skepticism toward the decrees of religious authorities.
Some Renaissance geniuses like Leonardo da Vinci and
Michelangelo did not directly challenge the claims of political
and religious authorities. Others like Machiavelli and Galileo
did. The encounter with the Americas (the topic of the next
chapter) also upset a traditional understanding of the world’s
origin and history that did not account for the existence of these
continents. And religious reformers like Martin Luther used the


62 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

ability to print books to radically change the way Europeans
thought about their Christianity and the Catholic Church.

Questions for Discussion

Do you think the existence of the Church in Europe was a
significant factor in preventing an empire from forming?

How did the spread of new knowledge encourage humanism

and skepticism?

A portrait of Martin Luther as an
Augistinian monk, before his break from
the Catholic Church

Martin Luther (1483-1546)
was an Augustinian monk
who began the Protestant
Reformation as a reaction
against what he perceived as a
betrayal of Christian ideals by
the wealthy and __ self-
indulgent Catholic Church.
The Church had long gone
through cycles of corruption
and reform, which was
usually led by new religious
orders of monks (such as the
Franciscans and Dominicans
in the early 13th century).
Among Among Luther's
radical ideas was that the
Catholic Church and _ the
Papacy were so corrupt and
far away from the teachings

of Jesus that Christianity needed to be reestablished, rather than

reformed.

Luther received a Doctorate in Theology in 1512 and joined
the faculty of the University of Wittenberg in Germany. In 1516
the Catholic Church began selling indulgences to raise money
for the construction of St. Peter’s Basilica in Rome. Indulgences

Modern World History 63

were basically tickets for “time off” in purgatory (the place souls
went to purify before entering heaven), and Luther objected
on theological grounds; he also criticized the wealthy Pope for
taxing the poor to build an unnecessary Vatican monument he
could easily afford himself. Luther did not intend to split from
the Catholic Church, but after his 95 Theseswere translated
from Latin to German, his criticism of the church and his new
approach to theology caught on.

Luther was tried for heresy (no laughing matter: Czech
religious reformer Jan Hus had been burned at the stake in 1415)
and was excommunicated in 1521. The church banned Luther’s
books, but Luther was a prolific writer who went on to publish
scores of works using the new printing press condemning the
Roman church. Luther translated the Bible into German and
wrote a hymnal, so Germans could worship in their own
language and understand what they were saying at
church—Latin was still the official language of the Catholic
Church (and would remain so until 1965).

Printing presses and expanding European literacy helped
accelerate the Reformation.

64 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Many members of the
nobility, particularly in
northern Germany and
Scandinavia, embraced
Luther’s ideas not only for
theological reasons but also
for political reasons: they
would no longer need to pay
tribute and pledge to submit
their authority to the Pope in
Rome. The Reformation was
not the only challenge that
alarmed religious authorities
into reacting with
persecution. When Galileo
used a telescope to prove
Copernicus’s new _ theories
that extended understanding
of planetary motion beyond Galileo's middle finger, preserved in the
the second-century theories scence museum of Florence italy
of Ptolemy, it was not the
ancient Greeks who put him under house arrest for the rest of
his life and nearly burned him as a heretic, but the Catholic
Church—Copernicus and Galileo were rejecting a human-
centered world founded by God Himself. Galileo’s challenge to
the Church’s outdated description of the natural world was the
first of many disputes that science has had (and continues to
have) with religious authority.

To be fair, though, the idea that new data should challenge
centuries of intellectual and theological tradition was as radical
as the idea that the Earth orbits around the Sun and not vice
versa. The Church, and European society in general, sought to
have eternal and unchanging answers for social and personal
conditions. Although today we are accustomed to the idea that
new information that can reorganize the ways we understand
the world is always becoming available, this was not part of
the early modern worldview—which makes Galileo and Luther
such radical figures in European and Western history.

As challenges became more frequent, some people tried to


Modern World History 65

resist them by force. The Inquisition and persecution of witches
flourished because authorities felt threatened. And the doctrine
of papal infallibility did not even exist until the First Vatican
Council in 1868 when science had gained a pretty substantial
lead over faith...something to think about, since it implies that
the Catholic Church never seemed to need to declare
infallibility until it was challenged (curiously, the Papacy has
only used that authority once, in 1950 in relation to doctrines
concerning Mary, the mother of Jesus).

Questions for Discussion

Was Luther justified in criticizing Church leaders in the
Vatican?

What other motivations did people have for rejecting Roman
authority, beyond theological differences?

Was the Church's reaction to the challenges of new doctrines
and new information about he world appropriate?

The development of
science in Europe during the
Renaissance would not have
been possible without the
contributions made by
Muslim scholars. During the
period when Europe was
suffering an intellectual “Dark
Age” in the centuries
following the fall of Rome,
the embrace of Islam in
North Africa, the Middle East,
and beyond created stability
that encouraged the
establishment of trade routes to China, which was accompanied
by an exchange of ideas and technology. While medieval monks
in Europe were busy copying illuminated Latin Bibles and

13th century illustration depicting scholars
in a public library in Baghdad

66 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

hymnals, scholars like Al-Khwarizmi (780-850) the inventor of
algebra, Al-Kindi (801-873) philosopher and musician Al-
Zahrawi (936-1013) the father of surgery, Ibn Al-Haytham
(965-1040) physicist and father of optics), Al-Biruni (973-1050),
historian and scientist, Ibn Sina (980-1087) astronomer and
physician, and Ibn Rushd (1126-1198) philosopher and scientist,
not only preserved classical Greek philosophy and science that
was lost in Europe but made important original contributions
to knowledge and culture. Arab mathematicians were also
impressed with the Indian number system, which included the
concept of zero—in the 1200s, western Europeans began to
change from Roman numerals (which did not have a zero) to
Arabic numerals. There would be no computers without this
revolutionary change in mathematics..try dividing using
Roman numerals. Arab scholars helped trigger the Renaissance
which led to both the European Enlightenment and the
Industrial Revolution that produced the modern world we live
in today.

In most of their kingdoms and caliphates, Muslim sovereigns
respected Jews and Christians as “people of the book.” This
was especially important in the Iberian Peninsula—present-day
Portugal and Spain—parts of which were dominated by Muslim
rulers from 711 to 1492. The introduction of ideas in astronomy,
navigation, and mathematics in Iberia soon spread to other
parts of Europe. In 1492, Christopher Columbus was able to sail
to the New World partly because of Arab naval and navigation
technology.

The European philosophers and scientists who led the
Enlightenment were dominated by Isaac Newton (1643-1727),
who co-invented calculus and produced the first unified theory
of nature. Newton’s Principia Mathematica (first published in
1687) created a foundation for all the physics and engineering
that followed it, and his theories were basically undisputed until
Einstein and quantum physics took up the challenge of
describing the universe at the macroscopic and microscopic
levels in the early 2O0thcentury. Other important
Enlightenment thinkers included Emilie du Chatelet, a French
aristocrat who studied and translated both Newton and his chief
rival, German mathematician Gottfried Wilhelm Leibniz.

Modern World History 67

Leibniz was the other inventor of Calculus, and the version we
now use is actually based a little bit more on his notation system
than on Newton’s. These scholars and their colleagues described
their field as “natural science” and they tried to find natural
laws for society, politics, and the economy to parallel Newton's
discoveries of gravity and optics. John Locke, Adam Smith, and
Voltaire formulated ideas about natural rights and society that
epitomized what English speakers called Enlightenment and
what Germans like philosopher Immanuel Kant called
aufklérung (literally, a “clearing up”). Kant famously explained
that his aufklarung was humanity’s emergence from its self-
imposed adolescence.

The Prague Orloj, or Astronomical Clock, dates back to 1410.

One of the consequences of Newton's physics and other
Enlightenment ideas was a crisis in religion. Although Newton
himself seems to have believed in a God of some type, the
universe he described in his theories did not require a personal
deity to be actively engaged in making things happen. Newton's
universe seemed more like one of the new mechanical clocks

68 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

that were just becoming popular. These complex machines
might require a mechanical engineer or a watchmaker to design
and build them, but once made and wound they could be left
to themselves. Absorbing this watchmaker metaphor, many
Enlightenment thinkers rejected the popular religious vision of
an activist God who was involved in the day-to-day operation
of the world, who rewarded the righteous and punished sinners,
or who chose sides in history. The Protestant idea of
predestination suggested that there was no free will, and that
from God’s perspective time and chance did not really
exist—Newton and other European scientists challenged that
notion. Many also began to doubt traditional stories of the
deity’s interference in history, including the Christian story of
Jesus.

For example, Scottish philosopher David Hume wrote an
essay on miracles in 1748 that was widely influential and is still
a required text for philosophy students. Hume did not argue
that miracles could not happen, but that people who believed
in miracles were usually not talking about events they had
witnessed themselves, but only retelling stories of miracles they
had heard or read about (for instance, in the Christian Bible).
For Hume, the issue that divided religious believers from
skeptics was not actually miracles, but testimony about miracles
reported to have happened years, decades, or even centuries
ago.

In contrast, Hume argued, laws of nature could be deduced
right now because they continued to operate and their effects
could be seen every day. Hume left this essay out of the first
edition of his book, An Enquiry into Human Understanding, to
avoid antagonizing the faithful. But it found its way into print
and remains an important challenge to traditions that seek to
assert their authority based on supernatural claims.

Questions for Discussion

How did Muslim scholars contribute to building the modern
world?


Modern World History 69

Do you think the term Enlightenment (or aufklarung) is an
accurate description of the change in our understanding of
the world produced by the new “natural science’?

Were philosophers such as David Hume justified in
suggesting that supernatural claims were problematic?

European intellectuals also
considered economic
questions. Capitalism, the
idea that invested wealth can
be an engine for economic,
social, and technological
development, was most
famously explained by the
English philosopher Adam
The old Town Hall where the Bank of Smith. An agricultural
Amsterdam was founded in 1609 revolution contributed to

increased crop production
and population growth in the 1400s, and that led to a surplus
population being able to gather in towns and cities to engage in
artisanal activities—metropolises which were once mainly
centers of commerce and government and Church
administration, began to produce goods for trade as well. Even
before the development of mechanized textile factories in
Great Britain, for example, weavers lived and worked in districts
like East London for generations. People began to specialize in
particular trades, making products for customers beyond their
own families and neighborhoods. Some general-purpose
craftsmen like blacksmiths became increasingly specialized,
focusing on manufacturing products with broader, mass
markets (for example guns or carriage-springs, rather than just
horseshoes, nails, hinges, and whatever the locals needed from
day to day).
Banks in Europe began forming financial networks that
standardized prices across larger regions, such as in Italy, the
Low Countries and along the Baltic coast. When transportation


70 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

and communication are poor, there are many opportunities
for arbitrage: buying products cheap where they are abundant
and then selling them for a profit where they are scarce. As
networks improved, these opportunities decreased — or at least
were pushed farther away.

Politics and finance were connected at this time: capitalism
did not develop in a vacuum. Although Adam Smith famously
described the “Invisible Hand” of market forces in 1776,
merchants were heavily involved in government in England
and Europe, influencing their nations’ policies and regulations
to favor their own goals. Also, as described in later chapters,
imperial expansion and colonial armies were indispensable for
the spread of capitalism throughout the world.

Question for Discussion

Is it significant that the stories we tell about the capitalist
system focus on the “Invisible Hand" and stress freedom, in
spite of the close ties between business and government
power?


Modern World History 71

The Reconquista and Portuguese Trade with Africa

Depiction of the Muslim surrender of Granada to Ferdinand and Isabella, ending the
Reconquista

In the next chapter, we will turn to the Americas and their
discovery by Europeans. The backstory for this discovery and
colonization is the Reconquista, a centuries-long effort by the
Portuguese and Spanish to push the Muslim Moors back to
Africa. Muslims had taken over most of the Iberian Peninsula
beginning in 711. The Reconquista begun by Christian nobles in
northern Spain took about 800 years to complete.

The Portuguese Christians “reconquered” more quickly,
because Portugal does not extend as far into the south and the
Spanish kings and princes had to contend with the fortified
cities of Seville and Granada. However, Portugal also captured
Ceuta, a Moroccan fortress in North Africa in 1415, which gave
them control over the western Mediterranean and the Atlantic.
After a brief but successful war with Castile, the principle
kingdom in central Spain, Portugal turned its attention to
exploring and acquiring territory along the coast of Africa in
the 1430s and 1440s under the direction of Prince Henry the
Navigator (Henry’s older brother Edward became King when
their father died of the plague). The Portuguese were becoming

72 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

merchants and traders while the Christian Spanish were still
fighting Muslims.

Portuguese mariners, following the route established by
Bartolomeu Dias and Vasco de Gama in 1488 and 1497, began
sailing to Asia around southern Africa. They conquered coastal
east African city-states, established colonies in Angola and
Mozambique, and took advantage of a slave-trading network
that provided possibly 10 million captives for Muslim slave
auctions from the 9th century to the twentieth. Portuguese
control of the African coast was one of the reasons the royal
court in Lisbon showed little interest in Columbus's proposal to
sail west across the Atlantic to India; it is also why the Spanish
were eager to take Columbus up on his plan in search of a route
to Asia. We will return to Spain’s interest in Columbus in the
next chapter.

Portuguese discoveries and explorations: first arrival places and dates, and main
Portuguese spice trade routes in the Indian Ocean.

As mentioned above, in the wake of the Black Death peasants
and artisans demanded and received better pay, leading to
increased commercial activity in Europe in the late 1800s which
included not only the important Mediterranean trade
dominated by Italian merchants, but also in the Baltic and
across the English Channel. However, economic expansion was
limited by the availability of gold and silver coins, which had
been used in exchange since the sixth century BCE in Greece
and Persia.

Portuguese merchants were interested in developing a route
around Africa to Asia for the trade in spice and silks, but they

Modern World History 73

were pleased to find trade in sub-Saharan Africa as well. The
story of the enormous gold reserves of Mansa Musa, Muslim
ruler of Mali, were well known to Europeans, especially after
he spent enormous amounts of gold in the Middle East during
his pilgrimage to Mecca in the 13827. The Portuguese enquired
about the availability of gold in every contact that they made
in their explorations, and were not disappointed. Present-day
Ghana in West Africa was known as the “gold coast” by
European traders and imperialists until its independence in
1957, and is still second only to South Africa in gold production
on the continent.

Detail from the Catalan Atlas of 1375 showing Mansa Musa sitting on a throne and
holding a gold coin

African gold certainly aided in economic exchange in Europe,
but it was not enough. As we will see in the next chapter, the
search for gold was an important motivation for the
exploration, conquest, and colonization of the Americas by the
Spanish and Portuguese.


74 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Why did Portugal complete its Reconquista earlier than Spain?

How did a lack of gold and silver slow economic growth in
Europe?

The African Slave Trade

As in most world societies in the 1400s, the institution of slavery
was a traditional element in African kingdoms and chiefdoms.
Captives were usually acquired through war or as for payment
of debts, and enslaved for a period of time or even for life.
However, enslaved captives often gained positions in the
societies that had captured them, and their children were
generally born free. African traders were willing to include this
human cargo in commerce with the Portuguese and other
Europeans, who readily accepted them as enslaved laborers and
domestic servants.

The trade of enslaved people, especially from eastern Europe,
had been important in many parts of that continent even into
the 1400s. We have seen that in the Ottoman Empire, the
Janissaries were eastern European captives who were trained as
an elite military corps. The thriving economies of all of the
Islamic empires, from Spain through Persia, also created a
demand for enslaved people from Europe. The Vikings of
northern Europe sold captives from Britain to the Middle East,
as did the Frankish kings of western and central Europe, who
enslaved prisoners-of-war from among the Slavic peoples of
eastern Europe (as had the Romans before them). Although the
demand for enslaved labor was less in Europe than in the more
economically-developed Muslim world, some European slaves
certainly served owners in the fiefdoms of the western Europe.

The human cargo brought to Europe from Africa by the
Portuguese in the 1400s, however, became much more highly
favored than that of eastern Europe: not only were dark-skinned
people more exotic for service in the royal courts, they also
could not escape by simply blending in with the local
population. One can easily imagine how this would lead to ideas

Modern World History 75

of superior and inferior races—within a few generations, slave-
owning “whites” would consider “blacks” to be only suited for
enslavement.

However, what made the African slave trade so lucrative by
the 1500s and into the beginning of the 1800s was not the
demand for labor in Europe, but rather on sugar plantations on
the islands of the Atlantic and later in Brazil and the Caribbean.
The vast majority of the enslaved from Africa were used as
forced labor in the back-breaking cultivation and processing of
sugar cane. Portuguese trade with sub-Saharan Africa coincided
with the discovery that sugar cane grew well on the eastern
Atlantic islands off the African coast controlled by the
Portuguese and Spanish in the 1400s.

A Portuguese sugar mill, worked by African slaves, 1648

Sugar cane itself was first developed in the archipelagos of
Southeast Asia. Arab traders brought the plant to the Middle
East, where Europeans discovered sugar during the crusades
and developed a taste for it through their commerce in the
region. Sugar was at first considered an exotic medicinal, but
once the Portuguese and Spanish began cultivating cane on the
Madeiras and Canary Islands, a European addiction to sugar
soon began—replacing honey as the region’s main sweetener.
Eventually, more than two thirds of all enslaved Africans in
the Western Hemisphere were involved in cultivating,
harvesting, and processing sugar cane in Brazil and the
Caribbean. Sugar was such a lucrative cash crop for plantation

76 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

owners, that they would import enslaved Africans, work them to
death in three to five years, and bring in more. We will examine
this history in a later chapter.

The Portuguese established the first European colony in sub-
Saharan Africa, which they called Angola, in 1575, south of the
powerful Kongo kingdom on the West African coast. The
Kongolese royal family had converted to Christianity and the
ruler, Afonso I, tried to negotiate as a peer with the rulers of
Portugal. King Afonso was not able to prevent Portuguese slave
traders from indiscriminately taking people with high social
status in his kingdom as slaves. Generally only criminals and
war captives were sold to foreign slavers, not the sons of
noblemen and the king’s relatives. It is unclear whether King
Afonso tried to ban all trade in slaves, or whether he
compromised to avoid antagonizing his European allies. Either
way, his ban was ineffective and the Portuguese carried off more
and more slaves to their sugar plantations in Brazil.

Occasionally the Iberians tried to claim that they were doing
the Africans a favor by Christianizing them. But conditions on
sugar plantations were so harsh that slaves typically only
survived a few years. So their conversions were not so much to
prepare them for a life as Christians, but to save their souls when
they perished from overwork and malnutrition. Over the next
several centuries, nearly six times more Africans were forcibly
sent to the Americas than Europeans who went willingly. In
all, about 16 million Africans were shipped to the Americas
in chains. About 4 million died on the way and were thrown
overboard into the Atlantic.

Questions for Discussion

How was the slave trade practiced by the Portuguese
different than earlier types of unfree labor?

How significant was the European interest in sugar to the
growth of slavery in the Atlantic world?

Modern World History 77

Primary Source Supplement #1: King Afonso | of the
Kongo’s letters to Jodo, King of Portugal

Sir, Your Highness should know how our kingdom is being
lost in so many ways that it is convenient to provide for the
necessary remedy, since this is caused by the excessive
freedom given by your agents and officials to the men and
merchants who are allowed to come to this kingdom to set
up shops with goods and many things which have been
prohibited by us, and which they spread throughout our
kingdoms and domains in such an abundance that many of
our vassals, whom we had in obedience, do not comply
because they have the things in greater abundance than we
ourselves; and it was with these things that we had them
content and subjected under our vassalage and jurisdiction,
so it is doing a great harm not only to the service of God, but
the security and peace of our kingdoms and state as well.

‘And we cannot reckon how great the damage is, since the
mentioned merchants are taking every day our natives, sons
of the land and the sons of our noblemen and vassals and
our relatives, because the thieves and men of bad conscience
grab them wishing to have the things and wares of this
kingdom which they are ambitious of; they grab them and
get them to be sold; and so great, Sir, is the corruption and
licentiousness that our country is being completely
depopulated, and Your Highness should not agree with this
nor accept it as in your service. And to avoid it we need from
those your kingdoms no more than some priests and a few
people to reach in schools, and no other goods except wine
and flour for the holy sacrament. That is why we beg of Your
Highness to help and assist us in this matter, commanding
your factors that they should not send here either merchants
or wares, because it is our will that in these kingdoms there
should not be any trade of slaves nor outlet for them.
Concerning what is referred above, again we beg of Your
Highness to agree with it, since otherwise we cannot remedy
such an obvious damage. Pray Our Lord in His mercy to have
Your Highness under His guard and let you do forever the
things of His service. | kiss your hands many times.

(dated July 6, 1526)


78 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Moreover, Sir, in our kingdoms there is another great
inconvenience which is of little service to God, and this is that
many of our people, keenly desirous as they are of the wares
and things of your kingdoms, which are brought here by your
people, and in order to satisfy their voracious appetite, seize
many of our people, freed and exempt men, and very often
it happens that they kidnap even noblemen and the sons of
noblemen, and our relatives, and take them to be sold to the
white men who are in our kingdoms; and for this purpose
they have concealed them; and others are brought during the
night so that they might not be recognized.

And as soon as they are taken by the white men they are
immediately ironed and branded with fire, and when they are
carried to be embarked, if they are caught by our guards’ men
the whites allege that they have bought them but they cannot
say from whom, so that it is our duty to do justice and to
restore to the freemen their freedom, but it cannot be done if
your subjects feel offended, as they claim to be.

And to avoid such a great evil we passed a law so that any
white man living in our kingdoms and wanting to purchase
goods in any way should first inform three of our noblemen
and officials of our court whom we rely upon in this
matter...who should investigate if the mentioned goods are
captives or free men, and if cleared by them there will be
no further doubt nor embargo for them to be taken and
embarked. But if the white men do not comply with it they will
lose the aforementioned goods. And if we do them this favor
and concession it is for the part Your Highness has in it, since
we know that it is in your service too that these goods are
taken from our kingdom, otherwise we should not consent to
this

Sir, Your Highness has been kind enough to write to us
saying that we should ask in our letters for anything we need,
and that we shall be provided with everything, and as the
peace and the health of your kingdom depend on us, and
as there are among us old folks and people who have lived
for many days, it happens we have continuously many and
different diseases which put us very often in such a weakness
that we reach almost the last extreme; and the same happens
to Our children, relatives and natives owing to the lack in


Modern World History 79

this country of physicians and surgeons who might know how
to cure properly such diseases. And us we have got neither
dispensaries nor drugs which might help us in. this
forlornness, many of those who had been already confirmed
and instructed in the holy faith of Our Lord Jesus Christ perish
and die; and the rest of the people in their majority cure
themselves with herbs and breads and other ancient
methods, so that they put all their faith in the mentioned
herbs and ceremonies if they live, and believe that they are
saved if they die; and this is not much in the service of God.
And to avoid such a great error and inconvenience, since it
is from God in the first place and then from your kingdoms
and from Your Highness that all the good and drugs and
medicines have come to save us, we beg of you to be
agreeable and kind enough to send us two physicians and
two apothecaries and one surgeon, so that they may come
with all the necessary things to stay in our kingdoms, because
we are in extreme need of them. We shall do them all good
and shall benefit them by all means, since they are sent by
Your Highness, whom we thank for your work in their coming.
We beg of Your Highness as a great favor to do this for us,
because besides being good in itself it is in the service of God
as we have said above.

(dated October 18, 1526)

Primary Source Supplement #2: Excerpts from Luther's
Address to the Christian Nobility of the German Nation, 1520.

The Romanists have, with great adroitness, drawn three
walls round themselves, with which they have hitherto
protected themselves, so that no one could reform them,
whereby all Christendom has suffered terribly.

First, if pressed by the temporal power, they have affirmed
and maintained that the temporal power has no jurisdiction

80 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

over them, but, on the contrary, that the spiritual power is
above the temporal.

Secondly, if it were proposed to admonish them with the
Scriptures, they objected that no one may interpret the
Scriptures but the Pope.

Thirdly, if they are threatened with a council, they invented
the notion that no one may call a council but the Pope.

Thus they have privily stolen from us our three sticks, so
that they may not be beaten. And they have dug themselves
in securely behind their three walls, so that they can carry on
all the knavish tricks which we now observe...

Now may God help us, and give us one of those trumpets
that overthrew the walls of Jericho, so that we may blow down
these walls of straw and paper, and that we may have a
chance to use Christian rods for the chastisement of sin, and
expose the craft and deceit of the devil; thus we may amend
ourselves by punishment and again obtain God's favor.

Let us, in the first place, attack the first wall.

There has been a fiction by which the Pope, bishops,
priests, and monks are called the ‘spiritual estate’; princes,
lords, artisans, and peasants are the ‘temporal estate.’ This is
an artful lie and hypocritical invention, but let no one be made
afraid by it, and that for this reason: that all Christians are
truly of the spiritual estate, and there is no difference among
them, save of office. As St Paul says (I Cor. xii), we are all one
body, though each member does its own work so as to serve
the others. This is because we have one baptism, one Gospel,
one faith, and are all Christians alike; for baptism, Gospel, and
faith, these alone make spiritual and Christian people.

As for the unction by a pope or a bishop, tonsure,
ordination, consecration, and clothes differing from those of
laymen-all this may make a hypocrite or an anointed puppet,
but never a Christian or a spiritual man. Thus we are all
consecrated as priests by baptism, as St Peter says: ‘Ye are a
royal priesthood, a holy nation’ (I Pet. ii. 9); and in the Book
of Revelation: ‘and hast made us unto our God (by Thy blood)
kings and priests’ (Rev. v. 10). For, if we had not a higher
consecration in us than pope or bishop can give, no priest


Modern World History 81

could ever be made by the consecration of pope or bishop,
nor could he say the mass or preach or absolve. Therefore the
bishop's consecration is just as if in the name of the whole
congregation he took one person out of the community, each
member of which has equal power, and commanded him to
exercise this power for the rest; just as if ten brothers, co-
heirs as king's sons, were to choose one from among them to
rule over their inheritance, they would all of them still remain
kings and have equal power, although one is appointed to
govern.

And to put the matter more plainly, if a little company of
pious Christian laymen were taken prisoners and carried
away to a desert, and had not among them a priest
consecrated by a bishop, and were there to agree to elect one
of them ... and were to order him to baptize, to celebrate the
mass, to absolve and to preach, this man would as truly be a
priest, as if all the bishops and all the popes had consecrated
him. That is why, in cases of necessity, every man can baptize
and absolve, which would not be possible if we were not all
priests. This great grace and virtue of baptism and of the
Christian estate they have annulled and made us forget by
their ecclesiastical law...

Since then the ‘temporal power’ is as much baptized as
we, and has the same faith and Gospel, we must allow it
to be a priest and bishop, and account its office an office
that is proper and useful to the Christian community. For
whatever has undergone baptism may boast that it has been
consecrated priest, bishop, and pope, although it does not
beseem every one to exercise these offices. For, since we are
all priests alike, no man may put himself forward, or take
upon himself without our consent and election, to do that
which we have all alike power to do. For if a thing is common
to all, no man may take it to himself without the wish and
command of the community. And if it should happen that a
man were appointed to one of these offices and deposed for
abuses, he would be just what he was before. Therefore a
priest should be nothing in Christendom but a functionary;
as long as he holds his office, he has precedence; if he is
deprived of it, he is a peasant or a citizen like the rest.
Therefore a priest is verily no longer a priest after deposition.


82 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

But now they have invented characteres indelibiles, and
pretend that a priest after deprivation still differs from a mere
layman. They even imagine that a priest can never be
anything but a priest-that is, he can never become a layman.
All this is nothing but mere talk and a figment of human
invention.

It follows, then, that between laymen and priests, princes
and bishops, or, as they call it, between ‘spiritual’ and
‘temporal’ persons, the only real difference is one of office
and function, and not of estate...

But what kind of Christian doctrine is this, that the
‘temporal power’ is not above the ‘spiritual, and therefore
cannot punish it! As if the hand should not help the eye,
however much the eye be suffering ... Nay, the nobler the
member the more bound the others are to help it...

Therefore | say, forasmuch as the temporal power has been
ordained by God for the punishment of the bad and the
protection of the good, we must let it do its duty throughout
the whole Christian body, without respect of persons,
whether it strike popes, bishops, priests, monks, nuns, or
whoever it may be...

Whatever the ecclesiastical law has said in opposition to
this is merely the invention of Romanist arrogance . ..

Now, | imagine the first paper wall is overthrown, inasmuch
as the ‘temporal’ power has become a member of the
Christian body; although its work relates to the body, yet does
it belong to the ‘spiritual estate’...

It must indeed have been the archfiend himself who said,
as we read in the canon law, ‘Were the pope so perniciously
wicked as to be dragging hosts of souls to the devil, yet he
could not be deposed. This is the accursed, devilish
foundation on which they build at Rome, and think the whole
world may go to the devil rather than that they should be
opposed in their knavery. If a man were to escape
punishment simply because he was above his fellows, then no
Christian might punish another, since Christ has commanded
that each of us esteem himself the lowest and humblest of all
(Matt. xviii. 4; Luke ix. 48).


Modern World History 83

The second wall is even more tottering and weak: namely
their claim to be considered masters of the Scriptures . . . If
the article of our faith is right, ‘I believe in the holy Christian
Church, the Pope cannot alone be right; else we must say, '
believe in the Pope of Rome,’ and reduce the Christian Church
to one man, which is a devilish and damnable heresy. Besides
that, we are all priests, as | have said, and have all one faith,
one Gospel, one Sacrament; how then should we not have
the power of discerning and judging what is right or wrong in
matters of faith? ..

The third wall falls of itself, as soon as the first two have
fallen; for if the Pope acts contrary to the Scriptures, we are
bound to stand by the Scriptures to punish and to constrain
him, according to Christ's commandment ... . ‘tell it unto the
Church’ (Matt. xviii, 15-17) ... Ifthen | am to accuse him before
the Church, | must collect the Church together . . . Therefore
when need requires, and the Pope is a cause of offense to
Christendom, in these cases whoever can best do so, as a
faithful member of the whole body, must do what he can
to procure a true free council. This no one can do so well
as the temporal authorities, especially since they are fellow-
Christians, fellow- priests ...

. .. Poor Germans that we are-we have been deceived! We
were born to be masters, and we have been compelled to
bow the head beneath the yoke of our tyrants, and to become
slaves. Name, title, outward signs of royalty, we possess all
these; force, power, right, liberty, all these have gone over
to the popes, who have robbed us of them. They get the
kernel, we get the husk . . . It is time the glorious Teutonic
people should cease to be the puppet of the Roman pontiff.
Because the pope crowns the emperor, it does not follow that,
the pope is superior to the emperor. Samuel, who crowned
saul and David, was not above these kings, nor Nathan above
Solomon, whom he consecrated .. . Let the emperor then be a
veritable emperor and no longer allow himself to be stripped
of his sword or of his scepter!


84 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Media Attributions

NIE_1905_Europe_-_About_1500 © Dodd, Mead &
Company is licensed under a Public Domain license

2710788094_85ae47bb0a_b © CIA is licensed under a
CC BY (Attribution) license

Battle_of_Vienna.SultanMurads_with_janissaries © G.
Jansoone is licensed under a Public Domain license

The_maximum_extent_of_the_Safavid_Empire_und
er_Shah_Abbas_I © Arab Hafez is licensed under a
Public Domain license

1600px-Taj_Mahal_(Edited) © Jim Carter is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

1178px-1346-1353_spread_of_the_Black_Death_in_Eu
rope_map.svg © Flappiefh is licensed under a CC BY-
SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

Avignon, _Palais_des_Papes_by_JM_Rosier © Jean-
Marc Rosier is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license
Gutenberg_Bible,_Lenox_Copy,_New_York_Public_L
ibrary,_2009._Pic_01 © NYC Wanderer (Kevin Eng) is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license
Portrait_of_Martin_Luther_as_an_Augustinian_Mon
k © Cranach Digital Archive is licensed under a Public
Domain license

902180838 _32af255793_b © plizzba is licensed under a
CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Maqamat_hariri © Zereshk is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Astronomical_Clock,_ Prague

1546px-Saenredam_-
_Het_oude_stadhuis_te_Amsterdam © Pieter Jansz.
Saenredam is licensed under a Public Domain license

1280px-La_Rendicion_de_Granada_-_Pradilla ©

Modern World History 85

Francisco Pradilla Ortiz is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Portuguese _discoveries_and_explorationsV3en ©
Hugo Refachinho is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

Catalan_Atlas_BNF_Sheet_6_Mansa_Musa ©
Abraham Cresques is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Guilherme_Piso_engenho_1648 © Guilherme Piso is
licensed under a Public Domain license

[3]

The Americas and Columbus

Christopher Columbus is depicted in the rotunda of the U.S. Capitol building, landing in
the West Indies, on an island that the natives called Guanahani on October 12, 1492.

When your parents were in school, Modern World History and
U.S. History usually began in 1492, with the Italian Cristoforo
Colon’s “discovery” of America. Even today, typical histories of
America tend to consider the moment of Columbus’ landing
on October 12, 1492, to be a significant turning point. Some
continue to consider Columbus a heroic explorer while others

regard him as a monster and accuse him of deliberate genocide.

86

Modern World History 87

European contact with the Americas was a momentous event,
but the story is a bit more complicated than it is usually
depicted. This chapter will add detail to the traditional stories of

One of the most important things to know is that in 1500,
the populations of Europe, Africa, and the Americas were quite
similar. European and Asian populations had substantially
recovered from the plagues of the previous two centuries and
were on the rise. Continental Asia dominated. China led the
world with 125 million people, followed by India with about
90 million. Europe and Africa had about 80 million each, and
the Americas probably had a total population of around 65
million. It’s important to understand that on the eve of Europe’s
encounter with the Americas, their populations were very
similar. This demographic parity changed very quickly, as we
will soon see.

Questions for Discussion

Why do you think stories of Columbus remain controversial?

Why is it important that Europe, Africa, and the Americas had
populations of similar size just before contact?


88 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

As described in the Introduction, the people living in the
Americas had been separated from Eurasia for nearly 12,000
years, since the end of the Ice Age. During this period, Native
Americans experienced their own agricultural revolution
around the same time as Africans and Eurasians, but instead
of domesticating cattle, horses, sheep, goats, pigs, and
chickens—-which were not native to the Americas-they
developed certain plants, creating three of the world’s current
top five staple crops: corn, potatoes, and cassava, as well as
additional plants such as hot peppers, tomatoes, beans, cocoa,
and tobacco.

The pyramid of Kukulcén in Chichén Itza

Reliable, storable, staple food supplies are a necessary
precondition for long-term settlement and population growth
- in other words the creation of cities. Like the Europeans,
Africans, and Asians, once they had created a reliable food
supply, American natives built remarkable cities, especially in
Central and South America. From present-day Mexico's
Yucatan Peninsula south through Guatemala, the Maya
developed a complex society which reached its most intense
flourishing during their “Classic Period” (250 CE-900 CE).
However, by the time the Spanish arrived, the Maya were living
in more separated independent city-states, seemingly having
abandoned some of their more impressive temples and
structures such as Chichén Itza in Yucatan. This led to an

Modern World History 89

interpretation that the original society suffered a partial collapse
sometime around 900 CE due to feuding among these separate
cities.

However, more extensive surveying using recently developed
laser technology has revealed that the city-states were never that
separate during the Classic Period—there are new structures
and buildings that are revealed through this new research,
showing that the Mayan area was probably more populated than
previously calculated. To support such a population, the Maya
used raised irrigated fields, creating canals—and again, more
recent research has revealed that they bred a certain kind of
fish to use as fertilizer, in addition to water plants and algae. In
mountainous areas, the Maya terraced the hillsides to provide
flat areas for planting.

Religion and governance intertwined in Maya society, and
stories of gods and goddesses were fundamental in the building
of temples and determining the best times for planting and
harvest. The Maya origin story, Popul Vuh, is surprisingly similar
to that found in the Judeo-Christian Book of Genesis. Corn
and the god related to corn were the principal concern for
Maya religion and society. To record their beliefs and run their
complex society, the Maya developed a written language based
on 800 hieroglyphs that represented different syllables. They
also developed a base-20 number system that included “zero”
centuries before the concept was introduced into Western
Europe. The preciseness of Maya mathematics, along with the
importance of the stars and planets to their religious beliefs,
allowed the Maya to be more advanced than the Europeans in
astronomy and to develop a more exact calendar.

Mayan religious beliefs included scraping down and
redecorating their temples every sixty years. One famous
carved calendar used to calculate the precise time for this
renovation and other key ceremonies ended on December 21,
2012, leading many to believe that the Maya had predicted the
end of the world. In reality, it seems that the astronomers had
simply run out of room on that particular calendar.

Questions for Discussion


90 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Is it significant that several pre-Columbian cultures were not
at their peaks when the Europeans arrived?

How does the existence of a written language alter how we
think of people's level of civilization?

An 1.8 meter high Olmec Head from San Lorenzo, carved of basalt, 1200-900 BCE.

Farther north in today’s Mexico, the Olmecs were among the
first to form a complex society-they carved impressive statues
including large stone heads some 3,000 years ago. Another
society built the structures of Teotihuacan between 100 BCE
and 750 CE. The nearby twin Mexica Triple Alliance capitals
of Tenochtitlan and Texcoco, built in the 1320s in the Valley
of Mexico, each had more than 200,000 inhabitants when they
were first encountered by the Spanish, making them as large
as Paris and Milan, Europe’s most populous cities at the time.
Tenochtitlan was built on an island in Lake Texcoco and was
connected to the lakeshore by a series of causeways.

(Bi Brackish Water
Fresh Water
Marshes

Causeway

can
Teoti

acan

Xochimileo

Map of the Valley of Mexico when the
Spanish arrived, showing the chinampas
surrounding Tenochtitlan and in
Xochimilco, where some persisted until the
present

Modern World History 91

The urban Aztecs had a lot
of people to feed. They
surrounded their island
capital of Tenochtitlan with
raised planting-beds called
chinampas on __ floating
platforms in Lake Texcoco.
This technique allowed Aztec
farmers to carefully control
soil fertility and watering.
The Aztecs were so
concerned about the quality
of the water, they created a
dike across the lake that
separated the fresh water
around their city from the
brackish water of the main
lake to the east; and they
drank water brought into the
city via an aqueduct from

springs in the hills overlooking the lake. The Aztecs supported
six people per acre using chinampas in the fifteenth century. By
comparison, Chinese intensive rice farming, the most successful
agricultural technique known in Europe and Asia, supported

only about one person per acre

Tiwanaku, located near the
shores of Lake Titicaca in
what are now the Bolivian
highlands, was built about
3,500 years ago. Its 30,000

inhabitants developed a
farming technique called
flooded-raised field

agriculture and covered the
hills around the lake with
walled terraces.

at the same time.

Ancient terraces surrounding Lake Titicaca

Centuries later, the Incas maintained and

expanded by thousands of square miles these terraced farms
throughout the Andes to achieve a level of agricultural
production similar to the Aztecs. For example, surrounding

92 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Lake Titicaca in Bolivia there were terraces rising from the
lakeside elevation of 12,500 feet (nearly 3,700 meters). Dotting
the eastern slopes of the Andes were cities like the Inca capital
at Cusco and its nearby towns and villages, which were also
surrounded by terraced farms, many of which are still in use
today. These terraces were not only built and irrigated by hand
at extremely high altitudes, but guano from coastal islands
hundreds of miles away was carried in via well-built Inca roads
to fertilize the Andean farms. Many of these native cities have
been hidden and their buildings and terraces torn apart by
rainforest trees over the last five centuries. Machu Picchu, a
smaller settlement located on a mountain peak about sixty
miles from Cusco, was only encountered by Westerners in 1911.
The fact that it had been undiscovered by the Spanish provided
a clearer picture of how the Inca had organized their
settlements, with terraces for agriculture and buildings made
of seamless stonework using large blocks of carved rock—far
superior to most European masonry at the time.

View of the residential section of Machu Picchu

Complex societies in the Americas were not restricted to just
the Aztec, Maya, and Inca. In Colombia there is evidence of
large ceremonial cities built in the northern highlands near

Modern World History 93

the Caribbean Coast before the arrival of the Spanish, while
other indigenous groups built complex irrigation systems in
the lowlands just off the Caribbean Coast. The Muisca in the
eastern highlands of present-day Colombia, settled at a high
altitude, around 8000 feet (2600 meters) above sea level. They
cultivated corn and quinoa on the extensive flatland valleys
between the mountains, controlled extensive salt deposits, and
traded salt for gold, emeralds, fruits and other lowland products
with neighboring indigenous groups. Their architecture was
impressive, but built with massive tree trunks rather than stone,
so that no examples survived the Spanish conquest.

The Muisca did not develop a writing system like the Maya
and Aztecs, but maintained religious rituals and beliefs focused
on ancestor worship and the sacredness of their kings. Each
year, at a round ceremonial lake outside of present-day Bogota,
the Muisca king powdered himself in gold dust and dove into
the waters as a purification rite for the gods. This practice is the
origin of the myth of El Dorado, the “Golden Man,” sought by
the Spanish in their early explorations. Over time, Spaniards
such as Coronado came to believe they were searching for a city
of gold, which they never found.

Question for Discussion

Why are native agricultural systems so impressive?

The natives of North America also settled in complex societies
in various regions, based mainly on the cultivation of corn, wild
rice, squash, and pumpkins and on managing the environment
to promote the success of game animals. The traditional U.S.
and Canadian Thanksgiving dinner celebrates the native foods
of North America, including the turkey. Along the Mississippi
River and its tributaries, indigenous people lived mostly in
villages but occasionally gathered into cities and built mounds
like those found at Cahokia. The Algonquian and Iroquois were
semi-sedentary, living throughout what is now upstate New
York and southern Quebec and Ontario. By the time of contact

94 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

with Europeans, the Iroquois had formed a confederacy of five
major tribes. The Ojibwe and Dakota were also semi-sedentary,
living in settlements in the western Great Lakes region and on
the edge of the northern Great Plains. By the time of contact
with the Europeans, the Dakota dominated the Plains, where
they took advantage of the large herds of buffalo as a source
of protein, clothing, and housing, while gathering wild rice and
cultivating corn and squash for carbohydrates. Many North
American forest-dwellers also developed the sap of the maple
tree as a key source of sugar.

Of course, all this agriculture and city-building and
civilization was happening in the Americas without anyone in
Europe, Asia, or Africa knowing about it. Although it is NOT
true that everybody believed the world was flat until Columbus
came along, some Europeans were unclear on the actual size of
the Earth, the existence of American continents and the Pacific
Ocean. But NOt all Europeans were unaware
there was something valuable across
the Atlantic. It’s important to_realize
that European exploration did not
BEGIN with Columbus. Around 1000
CE, five hundred years before the
Italian explorer set out to discover a
new trade route to Asia for Spain,
Norse explorers from Europe and
Iceland had established a presence on
Greenland. The Greenland colony
lasted four hundred years and was a
base for exploration and settlement
even further west. Leif Erikson, son of
the Greenland colony’s leader Erik the
Red, began a colony in what is now
northern Newfoundland. For a long
time, historians thought Scandinavian
claims about a North American colony
called Vinland were just patriotic

Modern World History 95

folktales. But in 1978, archaeologists
discovered a site called LAnse aux
Meadows that dates to about 1000 CE.
The settlement was more than just a
fishing camp: the eight buildings
include a blacksmith shop and a
spinning room including artifacts that
suggest women lived there and wove
loth for their families.

er se eT ae el The Little Ice Age was a
aN period of global cooling that
hit the North Atlantic
particularly hard beginning
around the 1480s. Sailing
became increasingly
dangerous and as_ the
agricultural season was cut
short by longer and more
severe winters, the Greenland
colony was abandoned in the
early 1400s, and without a
__ base in Greenland the Vikings
were unable to sustain a

1570 map from Skalholt, Iceland, showing ‘
Greenland and North American locations North American colony. They

visited by Vikings. also faced strenuous

opposition from natives they
called Skraelings, who according to the Viking sagas were fierce
warriors. This map made in Iceland in 1570 identifies the area at
the latitude of Newfoundland as Skralinge Land. North of that is
Markland (land of forests) and Helleland (land of flat stones),
then Greenland. And on a more recent map of Greenland, from
1747, you can see the names of old Viking settlements as well as
a channel it was believed had once cut through the island. The
text on the map reads, “It is said that these streights [sic] were
formerly passable, but now they are shut up with ice.” On both
sides of Greenland, the map says “The Coast is for the most part
inaccessible by reason of floating and fixed mountains of ice.”

96 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Textbooks tend to stress European desire for gold and silver,
and finding precious metals was very important to explorers like
the conquistadors. But we shouldn't underestimate Europeans’
fear of famine, especially during the Little Ice Age. Even before
Columbus's voyage, Basque and Portuguese fishermen were
regularly visiting the Grand Banks off the coast of
Newfoundland to catch cod. A 1497 account by Giovanni Caboto
(another Italian explorer who anglicized his name to John
Cabot) claimed cod were so plentiful on the coast of North
America that European fishermen could almost walk from ship
to ship on their backs. Salted cod is still an important element
of traditional Portuguese cuisine, although nowadays they get
their fish from Norway. The fisheries were originally a closely-
guarded trade secret, but by the time Columbus made his
famous journey they were well-known - and since cod was
usually dried on racks onshore before being carried back to
Europe, Columbus and his crew were probably not the first
Europeans to make landfall in the Americas after the Viking
settlements had been abandoned.

Modern World History 97

Questions for Discussion

Why did historians tend to disbelieve stories of Viking
settlement in Vinland until recently?

Why were Europeans so interested in sailing across the
Atlantic to fish for cod?

Columbus’s promise to find a sea-route to Asia interested
European monarchs like Ferdinand and Isabella because land-
based trade routes to Asia were becoming more difficult and
expensive. The collapse of the Mongol Empire at the end of the
thirteenth century and the plagues of the fourteenth century
increased the perceived danger of overland travel. Columbus
had failed to interest Portugal in his proposal, because
Bartolomeu Dias had already discovered a route to Asia around
the bottom of Africa. On the other hand, Spain had recently
unified with the marriage of King Ferdinand of Aragon and
Queen Isabella of Castille, and the monarchs had just completed
the Reconquista and ejected Muslims from Granada, their last
kingdom on the Iberian peninsula.

It is worth considering that as they turned their interests
outward, the Spanish had been at war for nearly 800 years.
Their war on behalf of religion and glory would continue in

98 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

the New World. It’s also worth noting that the inventions that
sparked this new era of exploration and empire building, like
the sternpost rudder, the compass, gunpowder, and the printing
press, were all Chinese inventions that found their way to
Europe over an already-existing international trade network
dominated by Arab merchants, which was about to become
truly global with the European encounter of the Americas.

Columbus arrived in the Caribbean on October 12, 1492, and
explored until late December. His flagship, the Santa Maria,
ran aground on Hispaniola on December 25 and had to be
abandoned. With permission of the local chief, Columbus left
39 sailors behind in a settlement he named La Navidad. He
returned to Europe with two ships, a few captive Taino natives,
some gold, and specimens of New World species including
turkeys, pineapple, and tobacco. Arriving in Barcelona in mid-
March, Columbus was celebrated as a hero.

It is often mentioned that Columbus believed he had reached
Asia, and he did make that claim in his extravagant “Letter on
the First Voyage.” But this document was the explorer’s report
to his royal sponsors, and Columbus wanted very badly to be
sent back again. Columbus wrote “Hispaniola is a miracle...both
fertile and beautiful..the harbors are unbelievably good and
there are many wide rivers the majority of which contain gold.”
Whether or not Columbus understood he was reporting on
lands previously unknown to Europeans, he definitely got his
readers excited about the places he had visited.

Modern World History 99

ATLANTIC
OCEAN

PACING First voyage
:
OCEAN ‘Second voyag
o Third voyage
tga ants ourth voyage

When other European explorers reached America they were
equally amazed. People throughout Europe read exciting
traveler’s accounts like Amerigo Vespucci’s 1504 best-seller,
Mundus Novus, which actually coined the term New World
and made it clear for anyone who might still be confused, that
these lands were not Asia but a previously unknown continent.
Like Columbus, the explorers carried back to Europe not only
eyewitness accounts of wealthy civilizations, but samples of
native plants, animals, and captive people.

Columbus returned to the Caribbean in 1498 with 17 ships,
1,200 men, and according to his diaries, “seeds and cuttings
for the planting of wheat, chickpeas, melons, onions, radishes,
salad greens, grape vines, sugar cane, and fruit stones for the
founding of orchards.” Other old-world crops that thrived in the
Americas included coffee and bananas, originally cultivated in
Africa and Asia, which were brought from the Canary Islands
in 1516. The Spanish had introduced sugar cultivation to the
Canary Islands in the early fifteenth century, and transplanted
canes to the tropical paradise their explorers had discovered
across the Atlantic.

Cattle were delivered to Spanish conquistadors in Mexico in
1521. Most of the significant Eurasian species brought to the
Americas by European explorers and colonists were introduced
by the Spanish by the early 1500s, long before North American

100 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

settlement began. Even species like the wild horses of the
American West that would transform Plains Indian culture in
the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries were the descendants
of escapees from the herds of the conquistadors. The Americas
had very few large mammal species, and most could not be
domesticated. Nearly all the species humans have successfully
domesticated, the familiar residents of the modern farmyard,
originated in Europe and Asia. These include goats, sheep, cows,
horses, pigs and chickens.

The Spanish and Portuguese dominated the first century of
exploration, conquest and colonization in the Americas for
many reasons. Spain and Portugal had an eight-century long
tradition of warfare from fighting the Reconquista against the
Moors, and were prepared for further battle for glory and
religion. The Portuguese also had a maritime tradition, which
was how Columbus learned his trade. But the two Catholic
nations also had a papal charter. The Spanish and Portuguese
were granted a license by the Pope under the 1494 Treaty of
Tordesillas, which awarded all the territory east of the 47th
meridian to Portugal and everything west of it to Spain. The
Pope (Alexander VI) who made this deal was a Spaniard named
Rodrigo Borja - his reign was known for nepotism and
corruption, and, despite a pledge of clerical celibacy, he was
the father of the famous Italian political family known for
poisoning their enemies, the Borgias. The Portuguese received
the east, because they were already establishing colonies on the
east and west coasts of Africa. The Spanish were assigned the
unknown west, which turned out to be bigger than anyone had
expected. The Pope granted nothing to any other European
kingdom. This type of corruption at the Vatican helped
motivate reformers like Martin Luther toward what became the
Protestant Reformation.

Modern World History 101

e's

1502 map showing the line drawn by the Treaty of Tordesillas cutting through South
America.

Questions for Discussion

Why were the Spanish monarchs interested in financing
Columbus’ voyage but the Portuguese not?

What caused Europeans to get so excited about the newly-
discovered lands?

Why did the Spanish and Portuguese dominate early
colonization?

The Columbian Exchange

Historians call the transfer of plants and animals that began
with the encounter between Europe and the Americas after 1492
the Columbian Exchange. The directions of these biological
transfers and their effects on the environments and people of
Europe and the Americas shaped the modern world we live in.
American maize, potatoes, and cassava fed growing European,
African, and Asian populations, allowing the building of new
cities and industries. European animals such as pigs, sheep,
chickens, and cattle thrived in the Americas, enabling both
Native Americans and Europeans there to add and maintain
animal protein to their diets and eventually expand their
populations. But before most of the indigenous had a chance
to benefit from the new food sources introduced by Europeans,

102 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

they were struck down by the largely accidental transfer of
viruses and bacteria from Europe to America, which caused the
deaths of at least 90% of the native American population.

When prehistoric Eurasians began living in close contact with
the species they domesticated, the people were affected almost
as much as the animals they kept. Most of humanity’s major
diseases originated in animals and crossed from domesticated
species to their human keepers. Whooping cough and influenza
came from pigs; measles and smallpox from cattle; malaria and
avian flu from chickens. The people who domesticated these
species and lived with the animals for generations co-evolved
with them. Animal diseases became survivable when people
developed antibodies and immunity. Without the inherited
protection enjoyed by most Eurasians and Africans, even a
routine childhood disease such as chickenpox was initially
devastating for Native Americans, who did not have
domesticated animals and thus little acquired immunity to
these diseases.

The introduction of a disease into an area without inherited
immunity is called a virgin soil epidemic. Such epidemics had
happened in Eurasia, when the Romans spread smallpox into
the populations they conquered, and in Europe when the
expanding Mongols introduced bubonic plague, the Black
Death that killed probably half the population of Europe in
the fourteenth century, reducing world population by about
a hundred million. Virgin soil epidemics spread across the
Americas when explorers and colonists introduced Eurasian
diseases to the Native Americans. The Eurasian diseases that
attacked native populations included smallpox, measles,
chickenpox, influenza, typhus, cholera, typhoid, diphtheria,
bubonic plague, scarlet fever, whooping cough, and malaria.

Modern World History 103

The impact of these
Eurasian diseases on Native
Americans was one of human
history’s most abrupt and
severe population disasters.
Even the Black Death did not
kill as large a percentage of

Europeans, and when
diseases recurred in Europe,
1540 European depiction of Aztecs they generally killed their
suffering from smallpox. victims over a much longer

time-span due to the
inherited immunity of European populations. American native
populations had no such safeguards, and disease spread
virulently. For example, there were over a million people living
on the Caribbean island of Hispaniola in 1492 when Columbus
left his 39 sailors in La Navidad. By 1548, there were only 500
natives left alive. 999,500 people had disappeared in a little over
50 years.

The populations of other Caribbean islands like Cuba were
similarly wiped out. Whole societies disappeared, and this was
not only a tragedy for the cultures that vanished. The reduction
of native populations began a cycle of violence that became
central to the history of the Americas. Once there were no
natives left to work on European sugar plantations, enslaved
Africans—who had a similar acquired immunity as
Europeans—were considered crucial to the survival of the West
Indies sugar economy.

The greater population densities of Central and South
America enabled contagious diseases to spread more quickly
there. Heavily-traveled roads in central Mexico actually helped
spread disease beyond areas that had been reached by Spanish
explorers. Cities were wiped out that had never seen a white
man. The population of the Aztec heartland dropped from
about 25 million on the eve of the Spanish conquest in 1519
to just under 17 million a decade later. One out of every three
native people died in just ten years. After another decade the
Aztec population was reduced to about 6 million. Three out of
four people in the Aztec world disappeared in 20 years. Imagine

104 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

writing a list of your 10 closest friends and family, and then
randomly crossing off seven names. By 1580, the Aztec empire
had been hollowed out to less than 2 million people, from a
starting point of 25 million. Cross off two more — you're down
to one friend.

The depopulation of the
Americas is one of the Earth’s
most significant population
disasters, both in its human
toll and in the changes it
brought about. Over the
years, as you might expect,
there has been a lot of
controversy about what
happened. Critics of Spanish
colonialism (many of them
Spanish, like the priest 1524 Spanish map of Mexico City, built on
Bartolomé de las Casas) have 'P °f Tenoctitlan.
accused Spaniards of
atrocities in what has become known as “the Black Legend”. To
defend themselves, colonialists accused the Aztec and Inca
Empires with atrocities of their own and have emphasized the
support conquistadors received from indigenous rivals of these
empires. Textbooks often reflect some of these biases, one, for
example, mentions that “Allegedly, between 20,000 and 80,000
men, women, and children were slaughtered in a single
ceremony in 1487” as a sacrifice at a temple in the Aztec capital
of Tenochtitlan. This claim may or may not be true, but even if
it is, compare it to the deaths of over 20 million men, women,
and children that followed the Spanish invasion of the Aztec
lands of Central Mexico.

Questions for Discussion

Why were native populations so susceptible to European
diseases?

How did disease affect native societies’ ability to resist


Modern World History 105

European invaders?

Traditional
European or
Eurocentric
American
histories of
exploration often
present the

victory of the
1560 illustration shows Cortés meeting Spanish over the
Moctezuma forthe ist time with Malinin A 7tec as an

example of the
superiority of Europeans over the
savage Indians. The reality is far more
complex. When Cortés explored
central Mexico, he encountered a
region simmering with native conflict.
Far from being unified and content
under Aztec rule, many peoples in
Mexico resented the overlords of
Tenochtitlan and were ready to rebel.
Cortés was also aided by an enslaved Nahua woman, Malintzin
(also known as La Malinche or Dojia Marina, her Spanish name),
whom the natives of Tabasco gave him as a tribute slave. In
addition to speaking Nahua and Maya, Malintzin quickly
learned Spanish and translated for Cortés in his dealings with
Aztec emperor Moctezuma.

Malintzin also (willingly or under pressure) entered into a
physical relationship with Cortés. Their son, Martin, was one
of the first “mestizos” (persons of mixed indigenous American
and European descent) in Spanish America. Malintzin remains
a controversial figure in the history of the Atlantic World. Some

106 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

view her as a traitor because she helped Cortés conquer the
Aztecs, while others see her as a victim of European imperialism
whose choices were very limited. In either case, she
demonstrates one way in which native peoples responded to
the arrival of the Spanish. Without her, Cortés would not have
been able to communicate, and without the language bridge, he
surely would have been less successful in destabilizing the Aztec
Empire. By this and other means, native people helped shape
the conquest of the Americas.

The Inca Empire in the
Andes suffered the same fate.
90% of the South Americans
died, and they started dying
BEFORE the white invaders
arrived in 1582, which caused
confusion and dismay. When
Pizarro crossed the Andes
with eighty conquistadors, he
found social chaos. Huayna
Capac, the Inca leader who
had triumphantly extended
the empire into Chile and
Ecuador, had died of
smallpox in 1527. His two sons
fought a brutal civil war for
control of the empire, the
younger son Atahualpa finally
defeating and assassinating
his older brother Huascar.
Inca roads, the extent of the empire, and ‘The civil war exacerbated the
Inca cities taken over by the Spanish effects of epidemics, and the
weakness of the reduced Inca population gave Pizarro the
opportunity he needed to capture and kill Atahualpa in 1533,
beginning the end of the Inca empire.

Although the conquistadors focused much of their energy
on Central and South America, they brought disease to North
America as well. After helping Pizarro conquer the Inca,
Hernando De Soto landed an expedition in Florida in 1539 and
explored territory now in the states of Georgia, South Carolina,


Modern World History 107

North Carolina, Tennessee, Alabama, Mississippi, and
Oklahoma. Everywhere he went, the conquistador reported the
land was “thickly settled with large towns.”

De Soto didn’t stay long. He died of fever in Louisiana in
1542, and although the region was visited by a few missionaries,
it was not seriously considered again by Europeans until the
French aristocrat, La Salle, traveled down the Mississippi River
in 1670. Where De Soto had seen fortified towns, La Salle saw
none. The entire region had been emptied by the diseases which
accompanied De Soto and his men, and had returned to
wilderness. The French explorer reported traveling hundreds of
miles without passing a single village. Historians were actually
unaware until recently that the American South had once been
heavily populated before the arrival of contagious Spanish
explorers and missionaries.

Spanish invaders had not deliberately infected the natives
with all these diseases (Europeans still had no idea at this time
how viruses or bacteria worked), but they were quick to take
advantage of the opportunities provided by the social chaos and
military weakness of native societies in crisis. In both Mexico
and Peru, the conquistadors found allies among different
indigenous groups who often thought of themselves as the
victors, with Spanish help, rather than the other way around.
Still, within a few years, the Spaniards took over the capital
cities of the Inca and Aztec empires, inserting themselves into
the top positions in the pre-existing governments. Patterns of
tribute were maintained, as well as the labor draft of the Inca
mita—although now labor would be devoted to the silver mines
and not just road, irrigation, and building projects.

As they had been in Spain during the Reconquista,
conquistadors were rewarded for military service with
encomiendas. From a root word meaning “entrusting,”
encomiendas were grants of captured territory and the people
that lived on it, who the encomendero was theoretically
responsible for bringing into the Christian community. This
technique had been used in Spain to keep track of conquered
Muslims and make sure they did not backslide after their forced
conversions. In Spanish America, there was a much greater

108 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

emphasis on taxing and working the new peasants, rather than
leading them to religion.

Questions for Discussion

Was Malintzin a heroine or a villain in her collaboration with
Cortés?

How were regions far from the main points of European
contact affected? What do you imagine it was like for natives?

What tools did the colonizers use to organize native labor?

Europe

As previously mentioned, American staple crops were
successfully adopted by farmers in Europe, providing better
and more reliable nutrition which sparked a population boom.
New foods like potatoes were so important in preventing the
cyclical famines that regularly hit Europe, that they became a
key topic in Adam Smith’s classic, On the Wealth of Nations. Many
plant species developed by native Americans are still crucial to
the world economy, including not only maize, potatoes, and
cassava, but also tomatoes, sweet potatoes, cacao, chili peppers,
natural rubber, tobacco, and vanilla. Quinine, a medicine made
from the bark of the Peruvian cinchona tree, was effective
treating malaria and helped open the African and Asian tropics
to European colonization. Eurasian plants like sugar, soybeans,
oranges, bananas, and rice (which probably reached America
from Africa along with enslaved women who were experts
growing it) were also extensively cultivated in the Americas for
profitable shipment back to European markets. Exports of
native and transplanted crops helped feed growing cities and,
by the mid-18th century, freed agricultural workers to enter
Europe’s new industries. Without inexpensive and abundant
Native American foods, there might have been no Industrial
Revolution.

Modern World History 109

Like the Portuguese in their
exploration of Africa, the
Spanish were also interested
in finding sources of gold and
silver for the European
commerce. Although they
never found El Dorado, the
“golden man” that expanded
in legends to a city of gold,
Europeans did find a fair The first image of Potosi published in
amount of gold. And rents
they found even more silver. For
example, the Bolivian city of Potosi,
located in the Andes at an elevation of
18,420 feet (over 4,000 meters), still
has the largest population of any city
at that altitude. Potosi was established
by the Spanish in 1542 on the site of a
long-standing native mining village at
the foot of the Cerro Rico, which is a
literal mountain of silver. Potosi has a
current population of about 165,000,
almost identical to the city’s
population in 1660, when the high-
altitude mining center was larger than
Seville, Madrid, or Rome, and when
the combined population of ALL
European colonies in North America
was only about 75,000.


110 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Potosi today

Spanish silver coins called “pieces of eight” from the Cerro
Rico and from similar mines in Zacatecas, Mexico, were so
plentiful that they became the international currency of Europe
and much of Asia. Every year between 1566 and 1815, a treasure
fleet sailed from Acapulco to Manila laden with silver for the
trade in China and India. Another fleet carried not only
precious metals but spices and expensive Chinese ceramics
acquired in Asia from Veracruz to Spain.

Once again, products originating in the Americas were a spur
to the Industrial Revolution. Without the money minted from
Latin America’s silver and gold, there might have been no global
commercial boom to finance European industrialization. And
Potosi’s story is not over yet. Although most of the easily-
extractible silver was taken out of the mountain centuries ago,
the Cerro Rico is still being worked by Bolivian children whose
story is told in the award-winning documentary, The Devil’s
Miner, which you can view on the web if you're interested in
learning more.

Question for Discussion


Modern World History 111

What were the main economic effects of Spanish colonialism
in Europe?

Mestizos

Because most of the Spanish in the New World were male
soldiers in the first decades of the conquest, women were taken,
often forcibly, from native communities to be wives and
mistresses. One high-ranking Inca native named Felipe
Guaman Poma de Ayala wrote to the King of Spain around 1600,
complaining that Spaniards are taking all the Indian women of
childbearing age, so the place was being flooded with mestizos
who were not required to work as the Indians were. Worse, the
fathers were not supporting their illegitimate children, and “if a
Spaniard steals away four Indian women to make little mestizos,
he will bribe the judges and refuse to recognize his paternity,”
leaving their support up to the state. “Spaniards ought to live
like Christians,” Guaman argued, “marrying ladies of equal
status and leaving the poor Indian women alone so they can
have Indian children.”

Most of the countries of Latin America are built on mixed or
mestizo populations; so much so that in the 1700s, the colonists
tried to make distinctions between all the various types of
people they believed made up their societies, to “prove” to the
Spanish Crown that a logical caste system existed in the
colonies. Although these distinctions were somewhat arbitrary
and were often used to uphold the power of the group at the
top, in the long run many of these mixed Euro-American
populations have developed strong ethnic identities. A similar
process happened in New France-today’s Quebec in Canada.
There were only about twenty-five hundred French people in
the province by 1663. Most of them were voyageurs, fur traders
who went into the northern forests to make their fortunes.
Voyageurs frequently married local Indian women, and their
Canadian descendants are now recognized as a distinct ethno-
cultural group called Métis.

112 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Lobo «eg China A ne

Cope on cree Faron ae
SE Tas

"Casta" painting from colonial Spanish America, showing the variety of supposed
social divisions created by ethnic mixing.

The social caste system developed in Latin America was based
on both blood and origin. At the top were peninsulares, Spaniards
born in Spain (on the Iberian Peninsula), who were appointed
to nearly all of the important administrative positions in the
government and to the highest clerical offices (archbishops and
bishops). Next were criollos (creoles), Spaniards born in the

Modern World History 113

colonies. They made up the landed elite, often descendants of
the original encomenderos, and were the vast majority of the
merchant class and some of the higher clergy. Beneath them
were mestizos, people of mixed race, who worked as artisans
and in the lower clergy, or farmed their own small holdings or
the estates of criollo landowners. Indians were below mestizos,
and although they often managed their own communities
(under supervision of missionary priests), tribute and labor
obligations required them to work in the wage economy
managed by the Spanish. Later, when the colonists started
importing African slaves, new designations like mulatto and
zambo were developed to describe children of black-white and
black-Indian unions. These new “mixed” populations often
played the same role in the economy and society as mestizos,
although they were located closer to the sugar-growing regions
to which enslaved Africans were initially brought.

The Portuguese were initially more interested in dominating
trade routes in the Indian Ocean, so they mostly ignored their
new possession in Brazil until French Huguenots—protestant
Christians fleeing Catholic France—tried to establish a colony
near present-day Rio de Janeiro in the mid-1500s. By that time,
the Portuguese had watched the Spanish become successful
cultivating sugar cane in the Caribbean. Sugar, which the
Spanish and Portuguese had learned how to grow and process
in the Middle East during the Crusades, was already grown with
enslaved African labor on profitable plantations in Portugal’s
island colonies off the African coast. Portuguese entrepreneurs
brought cane and slaves to Brazil and set up plantations along
the northern coast. By this time, the Catholic Church had
prohibited the enslavement of Indians, but not of Africans.
Native Brazilians did not establish the complex societies found
in Mexico, Central America, and Andean South America, so it
was actually harder to “conquer” them, as they escaped deeper
into the interior jungles and forests. However, the Portuguese
already had established colonies and trade ties in Africa, which
soon supplied enslaved labor to the sugar plantations.

Questions for Discussion


114 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Why were the Spanish so interested in “pure blood” and the
various degrees of ethnicity in their colonies?

What were the four major caste status levels in colonial
society?

As described in the
previous chapter, slavery was
a traditional element in all
world societies, including
those of Africa, but
Europeans quickly grasped
the usefulness of having
enslaved Africans in
European communities
because it would be harder
for them to blend in with the
local population. The sugar
trade spurred the slave trade,
as well as European notions of
racial superiority to justify
the enslavement of people
1563 Portuguese illustration of Africa, with darker skins.
featuring their castle at Elmina. By the mid-1500s_ in

Europe, Spanish wealth began
to cause problems. Wealthy Spanish nobles married into
aristocratic families like the Austrian Hapsburgs. In 1519 (the
same year Cortés attacked Tenochtitlan and Magellan set out to
circle the Earth) the grandson of Ferdinand and Isabella, Charles
V, became Holy Roman Emperor. Charles was also King of
Spain and (by marriage) Portugal, which gave him legal control
of all the American colonies. When his wife Isabella died in 1555,
Charles was inconsolable. He abdicated in 1556 and retired to a
monastery, leaving his younger brother Ferdinand in charge of
the Holy Roman Empire in Europe and his son Philip II in
control of Spain, Portugal, and their possessions (including the
“Spanish Netherlands” on the European coast).


Modern World History 115

British montage of the events of 1588 including sea battle with the Spanish Armada
and Queen Elizabeth (on shore, at the left) rallying the troops,

Although Philip II was called “The Prudent,” and was also briefly
King of England while married to Queen (Bloody) Mary, after
she died in 1558, he lost control of the rebellious Protestant
Dutch Republic and Spain declared bankruptcy five times.
Spain’s financial troubles were partly due to debts Philip’s father
Charles V had accumulated as Holy Roman Emperor. After
Queen Mary’s death, Philip proposed to her successor, Elizabeth
I, who turned him down. Elizabeth’s father, King Henry VIII,
had separated the Church of England from Rome in the 1530s,
after a dispute with the Pope over the annulment of his
marriage to Catherine of Aragon, daughter of Ferdinand and
Isabella and aunt to Charles V. Philip supported the claim of
Mary Queen of Scots to the British throne, but when she was
executed in 1587, Philip decided to invade and return England to
Catholicism.

In 1588, the Spanish Armada organized by Philip was
hampered by bad weather on the English Channel and then
defeated by the British Royal Navy, which lost no ships while
Spain lost five before withdrawing. During the retreat, most of
the Spanish navy was destroyed by storms, leaving the British
in control of the Atlantic. Later that year an English fleet sailed
into the harbor at Cadiz, burned 200 Spanish ships and made
off with the annual silver shipment. It was the beginning of the
end of the Spanish Empire as a major European power.

116 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Another reason Spain did
not permanently dominate
the European economy was
that for centuries most of the
silver they shipped from Peru
and Mexico ended up in
China, where silver was the
basis of the earth’s largest
economy. Buoyed by China’s
economic dominance, the

Women of nineteenth-century Mexico,
wearing the “China Poblana” dress that was
Asian population increased originally contraband from China.

from 60% of the world’s

people to 67% between 1500 and 1800. In addition to the Mings
in China, the Mughals in India ruled an empire of 150 million
people, and they were very interested in expanding trade with
the West. India was also highly productive; between the two
empires, Asia produced 80% of all the world’s goods. Even
though we are concentrating in this chapter on the intricacies of
the Atlantic World and the intersection of Africa, Europe, and
the Americas, until the mid-1700s, it is important to remember
that China and India dominated world commerce and industry.

Chinese silks and Indian cotton were the world’s best quality
and lowest-cost textiles, and clothes made from them were
worn throughout the world - even in Spain’s colonies where
the law required people to trade only with the home country.
The national costume of Mexico is called the China Poblana;
it was originally a contraband silk dress worn by women of
the towns. The British were so intimidated by Asian textiles
that they imposed tariffs to try to protect their own weavers
from being driven out of the business. Mercantilism, in which
colonies served the home country as both a market and a source
of raw materials in a closed economy, was actually not a
primitive economic system that evolved into free market
capitalism - it was an attempt to shield British and European
merchants from an already-existing international free market
in which they were too often the losers to the dominant Asian
powers.

Modern World History 117

Questions for Discussion

How did dynastic politics in Europe affect the American
colonies?

Why was Asia so important to colonial America?

Primary Source Supplement #1: Leif Ericsson's Discovery of
America, from the Saga of Eric the Red, 1387.

Biarni Heriulfsson came out from Greenland on a visit to
Earl Eric, by whom he was well received. Biarni gave an
account of his travels [while lost at sea in a fog for several
days, he apparently landed in America] when he saw the
lands, and the people though that he had been lacking in
enterprise, since he had no report to give concerning these
countries; and the fact brought him reproach. Biarni was
appointed one of the Earl's men, and went out to Greenland
the following summer. There was now much talk about
voyages of discovery. Leif, the son of Eric the Red, of
Brattahlid, visited Biarni Heriulfsson and bought a ship of him,
and collected a crew, until they formed altogether a company
of thirty-five men. Leif invited his father, Eric, to become the
leader of the expedition, but Eric declined, saying that he was
then stricken in years, and adding that he was less able to
endure the exposure of sea life than he had been. Leif replied
that he would nevertheless be the one who would be most
apt to bring good luck and Eric yielded to Leifs solicitation,
and rode from home when they were ready to sail.

When he was but a short distance from the ship, the horse
which Eric was riding stumbled, and he was thrown from his
back and wounded his foot, whereupon he exclaimed, “It is
not designed for me to discover more lands than the one
in which we are now living, nor can we now continue longer
together.” Eric returned home to Brattahlid, and Leif pursued
his way to the ship with his companions, thirty-five men. One
of the company was a German, named Tyrker. They put the
ship in order; and, when they were ready, they sailed out to


118 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

sea, and found first that land which Biarni and his shipmates
found last. They sailed up to the land, and cast anchor, and
launched a boat, and went ashore, and saw no grass there.
Great ice mountains lay inland back from the sea, and it was
as a [tableland of] flat rock all the way from the sea to the
ice mountains; and the country seemed to them to be entirely
devoid of good qualities. Then said, Leif “It has not come to
pass with us in regard to this land as with Biarni, that we have
not gone upon it. To this country | will now give a name and
call it Helluland [the land of flat rocks)."

They returned to the ship, put out to sea, and found a
second land. They sailed again to the land, and came to
anchor, and launched the boat, and went ashore. This was a
level wooded land; and there were broad stretches of white
sand where they went, and the land was level by the sea. Then
said Leif, “This land shall have a name after its nature; and
we will call it Markland [land of forests].” They returned to the
ship forthwith, and sailed away upon the main with north-east
winds, and were out a full day before they sighted land. They
sailed toward this land and came to an island which lay to the
northward off the land. There they went ashore and looked
about them, the weather being fine, and they observed that
there was dew upon the grass, and it so happened that they
touched the dew with their hands, and touched their hands
to their mouths, and it seemed to them that they had never
before tasted anything so sweet as this. They went aboard
their ship again and sailed into a certain sound, which lay
between the island and a cape, which jutted out from the land
on the north, and they stood in westering past the cape. At
ebb-tide, there were broad reaches of shallow water there,
and they ran their ship aground there, and it was a long
distance from the ship to the ocean; yet were they so anxious
to go ashore that they could not wait until the tide should rise
under their ship, but hastened to the land, where a certain
river flows out from a lake. As soon as the tide rose beneath
their ship, however, they took the boat and rowed to the ship,
which they conveyed up the river, and so into the lake, where
they cast anchor and carried their hammocks ashore from the
ship and built themselves cabins there.

They afterward determined to establish themselves there


Modern World History 119

for the winter, and they accordingly built a large house. There
was no lack of salmon there either in the river or in the
lake, and larger salmon than they had ever seen before. The
country thereabouts seemed to be possessed of such good
qualities that cattle would need no fodder there during the
winters. There was no frost there in the winters, and the
grass withered but little. The days and nights there were of
more nearly equal length than in Greenland or Iceland. On
the shortest day of winter, the sun was up between 7:30
and 3:30 [suggesting a latitude of about 50°]. When they had
completed their house, Leif said to his companions, “I
propose now to divide our company into two groups, and to
set about an exploration of the country. One-half of our party
shall remain at home at the house, while the other half shall
investigate the land; and they must not go beyond a point
from which they can return home the same evening, and are
not to separate [from each other]. Thus they did for a time.
Leif, himself, by turns joined the exploring party, or remained
behind at the house. Leif was a large a powerful man, and of
a most imposing bearing; a man of sagacity, and a very just
man in all things.

Eric the Red also died that winter. There was now much
talk about Leifs Vinland journey; and his brother, Thorvald,
held that the country had not been sufficiently explored.
Thereupon Leif said to Thorval, “Ifit be thy will, brother, thou
mayest go to Vinland with my ship." And so it was done.

They were soon provided with an abundant and goodly
supply of food; for a whale of good size and quality was driven
ashore there, and they secured it, and flensed it, and had then
no lack of provisions. The cattle were turned out upon the
land, and the males soon became very restless and vicious:
they had brought a bull with them. Karlsefni caused trees to
be felled and to be hewed into timbers wherewith to load
his ship, and the wood was placed upon a cliff to dry. They
gathered somewhat of all of the valuable products of the
land: grapes, and all kinds of game and fish, and other good
things. In the summer succeeding the first winter Skrellings


120 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

were discovered. A great troop of men came forth from out
the woods. The cattle were hard by, and the bull began to
bellow and roar with a great noise, whereat the Skrellings
were frightened, and ran away with their packs, wherein were
gray furs, sables, and alll kinds of pelts. They fled towards
Karlsefni's dwelling and sought to effect an entrance into the
house; but Karlsefni caused the doors to be defended [against
them].

Source: American historical documents, 1000-1904: with
introductions and notes. New York: P.F. Collier, c1910. The
Harvard classics v. 43.

https://sourcebooks.fordham.edu/mod/1000Vinland.asp

Primary Source Supplement #2: An Aztec account of the
Spanish attack

This source aggregates a number of early written reports by
Aztec authors describing the destruction of Tenochtitlan at the
hands of a coalition of Spanish and Indian armies. This collection
of sources was assembled by Miguel Leon Portilla, a Mexican
anthropologist.

When Montezuma had given necklaces to each one, Cortés
asked him: "Are you Montezuma? Are you the king? Is it true
that you are the king Montezuma?”

And the king said: “Yes, |am Montezuma.” Then he stood up
to welcome Cortés; he came forward, bowed his head low and
addressed him in these words: “Our lord, you are weary. The
journey has tired you, but now you have arrived on the earth.
You have come to your city, Mexico. You have come here to
sit on your throne, to sit under its canopy.

“The kings who have gone before, your representatives,
guarded it and preserved it for your coming. The kings
Itzcoatl, Montezuma the Elder, Axayacatl, Tizoc and Ahuitzol


Modern World History 121

ruled for you in the City of Mexico. The people were protected
by their swords and sheltered by their shields.

“Do the kings know the destiny of those they left behind,
their posterity? If only they are watching! If only they can see
what | see!

No, it is not a dream. | am not walking in my sleep. | am
not seeing you in my dreams... | have seen you at last! | have
met you face to face! | was in agony for five days, for ten days,
with my eyes fixed on the Region of the Mystery. And now you
have come out of the clouds and mists to sit on your throne
again.

This was foretold by the kings who governed your city, and
now it has taken place. You have come back to us; you have
come down from the sky. Rest now, and take possession of
your royal houses. Welcome to your land, my lords!”

When Montezuma had finished, La Malinche translated his
address into Spanish so that the Captain could understand
it. Cortés replied in his strange and savage tongue, speaking
first to La Malinche: ‘Tell Montezuma that we are his friends.
There is nothing to fear. We have wanted to see him for a long
time, and now we have seen his face and heard his words. Tell
him that we love him well and that our hearts are contented.”

Then he said to Montezuma: “We have come to your house
in Mexico as friends. There is nothing to fear.”

La Malinche translated this speech and the Spaniards
grasped Montezuma's hands and patted his back to show
their affection for him....

During this time, the people asked Montezuma how they
should celebrate their god's fiesta. He said: "Dress him in all
his finery, in all his sacred ornaments.”

During this same time, The Sun commanded that
Montezuma and Itzcohuatzin, the military chief of Tlatelolco,
be made prisoners. The Spaniards hanged a chief from
Acolhuacan named Nezahualquentzin. They also murdered
the king of Nauhtla, Cohualpopocatzin, by wounding him with
arrows and then burning him alive.

For this reason, our warriors were on guard at the Eagle
Gate. The sentries from Tenochtitlan stood at one side of


122 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

the gate, and the sentries from Tlatelolco at the other. But
messengers came to tell them to dress the figure of
Huitzilopochtli, They left their posts and went to dress him in
his sacred finery: his ornaments and his paper clothing.

When this had been done, the celebrants began to sing
their songs. That is how they celebrated the first day of the
fiesta. On the second day they began to sing again, but
without warning they were all put to death. The dancers and
singers were completely unarmed. They brought only their
embroidered cloaks, their turquoises, their lip plugs, their
necklaces, their clusters of heron feathers, their trinkets
made of deer hooves. Those who played the drums, the old
men, had brought their gourds of snuff and their timbrels.

The Spaniards attacked the musicians first, slashing at their
hands and faces until they had killed all of them. The singers-
and even the spectators- were also killed. This slaughter in
the Sacred Patio went on for three hours. Then the Spaniards
burst into the rooms of the temple to kill the others: those
who were carrying water, or bringing fodder for the horses, or
grinding meal, or sweeping, or standing watch over this work.

The king Montezuma, who was accompanied by
Itzcohuatzin and by those who had brought food for the
Spaniards, protested: "Our lords, that is enough! What are you
doing? These people are not carrying shields or macanas. Our
lords, they are completely unarmed!”

The Sun had treacherously murdered our people on the
twentieth day after the captain left for the coast. We allowed
the Captain to return to the city in peace. But on the following
day we attacked him with all our might, and that was the
beginning of the war.

Miguel LeonPortilla, ed., The Broken Spears: The Aztec
Account of the Conquest of Mexico (Boston: Beacon Press,
1962), pp. 6466, 129131.

Available through the Internet History Sourcebooks Project.
and The American YAWP Reader

Modern World History 123

Primary Source Supplement #3: Bartolomé de Las Casas
Describes the Exploitation of Indigenous Peoples, 1542

Bartolomé de Las Casas, a Spanish Dominican priest, wrote
directly to the King of Spain hoping for new laws to prevent
the brutal exploitation of Native Americans. Las Casas's writings
quickly spread around Europe and were used as humanitarian
justification for other European nations to challenge Spain's
colonial empire with their own schemes of conquest and
colonization.

Now this infinite multitude of Men are by the Creation of
God innocently simple, altogether void of and averse to all
manner of Craft, Subtlety and Malice, and most Obedient
and Loyal Subjects to their Native Sovereigns; and behave
themselves very patiently, submissively and quietly towards
the Spaniards, to whom they are subservient and subject; so
that finally they live without the least thirst after revenge,
laying aside all litigiousness, Commotion and hatred...

The natives are capable of Morality or Goodness and very
apt to receive the principles of Catholic Religion; nor are they
averse to Civility and good Manners..., | myself have heard the
Spaniards themselves (who dare not assume the Confidence
to deny the good Nature in them) declare, that there was
nothing wanting in them for the acquisition of eternal
grace, but the sole Knowledge and Understanding of the
Deity...

The Spaniards first assaulted the innocent Sheep, so
qualified by the Almighty, like most cruel tigers, wolves, and
lions, hunger-starved, studying nothing, for the space of Forty
Years, after their first landing, but the Massacre of these
Wretches, whom they have so inhumanely and barbarously
butchered and harassed with several kinds of Torments,
never before known, or heard (of which you shall have some
account in the following Discourse) that of Three Millions of
Persons, which lived in Hispaniola itself, there is at present
but the inconsiderable remnant of scarce Three Hundred. Nay
the Isle of Cuba, which extends as far, as Valladolid in Spain
is distant from Rome, lies now uncultivated, like a Desert, and
entombed in its own Ruins. You may also find the Isles of St.


124 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

John, and Jamaica, both large and fruitful places, unpeopled
and desolate. The Lucayan Islands on the North Side, adjacent
to Hispaniola and Cuba, which are Sixty in number, or
thereabout, together with those, vulgarly known by the name
of the Gigantic Isles, and others, the most infertile whereof,
exceeds the Royal Garden of Seville in fruitfulness, a most
Healthful and pleasant Climate, is now laid waste and
uninhabited; and whereas, when the Spaniards first arrived
here, about Five Hundred Thousand Men dwelt in it, they are
now cut off, some by slaughter, and others ravished away by
Force and Violence, to work in the Mines of Hispaniola, which
was destitute of Native Inhabitants: For a certain Vessel,
sailing to this Isle, to the end, that the Harvest being over
(some good Christian, moved with Piety and Pity, undertook
this dangerous Voyage, to convert Souls to Christianity) the
remaining gleanings might be gathered up, there were only
found Eleven Persons, which | saw with my own Eyes. There
are other Islands Thirty in number, and upward bordering
upon the Isle of St. John, totally unpeopled; all which are
above Two Thousand miles in length, and yet remain without
Inhabitants, Native, or People.

As to the firm land, we are certainly satisfied, and assured,
that the Spaniards by their barbarous and execrable Actions
have absolutely depopulated Ten Kingdoms, of greater extent
than all Spain, together with the Kingdoms of Aragon and
Portugal, that is to say, above One Thousand Miles, which now
lye waste and desolate, and are absolutely ruined, when as
formerly no other Country whatsoever was more populous.
Nay we dare boldly affirm, that during the Forty Years space,
wherein they exercised their sanguinary and detestable
Tyranny in these Regions, above Twelve Millions (computing
Men, Women, and Children) have undeservedly perished; nor
do | conceive that | should deviate from the Truth by saying
that above Fifty Millions in all paid their last Debt to Nature.

Those that arrived at these Islands from the remotest parts
of Spain, and who pride themselves in the Name of Christians,
steered Two courses principally, in order to the Extirpation,
and Exterminating of this People from the face of the
Earth. The first whereof was raising an unjust, bloody, cruel
War. The other, by putting them to death, who hitherto,


Modern World History 125

thirsted after their Liberty, or designed (which the most
Potent, Strenuous and Magnanimous Spirits intended) to
recover their pristine Freedom, and shake off the Shackles of
so injurious a Captivity: For they being taken off in War, none
but Women and Children were permitted to enjoy the benefit
of that Country-Air...

Now the ultimate end and scope that incited the Spaniards
to endeavor the Extirpation and Desolation of this People,
was Gold only...

Finally, in one word, their Ambition and Avarice, than which
the heart of Man never entertained greater, and the vast
Wealth of those Regions; the Humility and Patience of the
Inhabitants (which made their approach to these Lands more
easy) did much promote the business: Whom they so
despicably contemned, that they treated them (| speak of
things which | was an Eye Witness of, without the least fallacy)
not as Beasts, which | cordially wished they would, but as
the most abject dung and filth of the Earth; and so solicitous
they were of their Life and Soul, that the above-mentioned
number of People died without understanding the true Faith
or Sacraments. And this also is as really true that the
_Spaniards_ never received any injury from the Indians, but
that they rather reverenced them as Persons descended from
Heaven, until that they were compelled to take up Arms,
provoked thereunto by repeated Injuries, violent Torments,
and unjust Butcheries.

Bartolomé de Las Casas, A Brief Account of the Destruction of
the Indies... (Project Gutenberg EBook: 2007), 9-16.

Available through the Internet Archive and The American
YAWP Reader

Media Attributions

* Landing_of_Columbus_(2) © John Vanderlyn is
licensed under a Public Domain license

126 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Picture2 © Dan Allosso is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

Chichen _Itza_8 © Daniel Schwen is licensed under a
CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
San_Lorenzo_Monument_8 © Maribel Ponce Ixba is
licensed under a CC BY (Attribution) license
Lake_Texcoco_c_1519 © Madman2001 is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Intikawan_Amantani © PjH is licensed under a Public
Domain license
MachuPicchu_Residential_(pixinn.net) © Christophe
Meneboeuf is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license

Skalholt-Karte © Sigurd Stefansson is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Old Greenland © Emanuel Bowen is licensed under a
Public Domain license

OLYMPUS DIGITAL CAMERA © Hans-Petter Fjeld is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

2880px-Viajes_de_colon_en.svg © Phirosiberia is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

CantinoPlanisphere © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license
FlorentineCodex_BK12_F54_smallpox © Bernardino
de Sahagun is licensed under a Public Domain license
Tenochtitlan_y_Golfo_de_Mexico_1524 © Fridericum
Peypus is licensed under a Public Domain license
1920px-Inca_roads-en.svg © Manco Capac is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

Capitulo-CIX © A.Skromnitsky is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Potosi_Mining_Photo_by_Sascha_Grabow © Sascha

Modern World History 127
Grabow is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license

Casta_painting_all © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

1920px-Lazaro_Luis_1563 © Alvesgaspar is licensed
under a Public Domain license

2880px-Senyeres-Invencible-Plymouth © Nicholas
Hilliard is licensed under a Public Domain license

Poblanas © Carl Nebel is licensed under a Public
Domain license

[4]

Early Globalization and Revolutions

1811 Map of Europe

128

Modern World History 129
The Development of Nation-States in Europe

As mentioned previously, by 1500, Western Europeans were
unable to pull themselves together into the type of extensive
land empire seen in Asia at the time - or to reconstruct the
unity that had been achieved in the Roman Empire. The
Hapsburg family continued to try to maintain an entity they
called the “Holy Roman Empire” but it was really an alliance
of German principalities, and had ceased to include Rome in
the 12th century. During the 1600s, religion, language, and local
culture began inspiring feelings of regional solidarity that grew
into the idea of separate nationalities. Some of these nations
organized themselves as absolute monarchies, while in others,
power was shared among different national groups.

The consolidation of nationalities happened over several
centuries. By 1500, Europe’s 80 million people were divided
into about 500 states and principalities. Three hundred years
later, Europe’s population had nearly doubled and 150 million
Europeans lived in just 30 nations. In many of these countries,
the ideas of divine monarchy and hereditary nobility had given
way to a sharing of constitutional power between rulers and
their subjects. Merchants gained influence and slowly acquired
legislative powers in bodies like Britain’s House of Commons.

The French Revolution, inspired in part by the revolt of
Britain’s North American colonies and the establishment of the
United States, would extend the experiment with democracy to
include the lower classes for the first time in European history.
France’s revolution, which will be presented in this chapter,
would end one of the most deeply-entrenched absolute
monarchies of Europe, while Napoleon’s armies ended
feudalism in most of continental Europe by 1815.

130 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

France developed into an
absolute monarchy under the
Bourbon dynasty. Louis XIII
(@. 1610-43) and his chief
minister, Cardinal Richelieu,
concentrated power in the
hands of the King. The King
stopped convening the
Estates General, an advisory
body made up of
representatives of the clergy,
the aristocracy, and the
working people, and ruled
absolutely.

The French monarchy was
able to hold back many of the _ Louis Xv, the “sun King"
democratic advances of
neighboring nations, like the Netherlands and Britain, because
of the centralized power and personal authority of the longest-
reigning king in European history, Louis XIV. Known as “the
Sun King,” Louis XIV occupied the French throne for 72 years,
from 1643 when he became emperor at age 4 after his father’s
passing, to his death in 1715. By the 1680s, Louis had greatly
improved France’s influence in the world and had increased the
power of the monarchy. In 1682, Louis moved the royal court to
Versailles, a country palace about thirteen miles from Paris,
requiring nobility to live in the palace where he could keep
them under his thumb. But he also modernized Paris, under the
direction of his finance minister, Jean-Baptiste Colbert.


Modern World History 131

Constitutional states like
Britain shared power between
hereditary monarchs and
legislative bodies that
represented (some of) the
people. In Britain’s case, the
legislature, called Parliament,
also controlled the
government's _ purse-strings.
Britain fought a Civil War
German illustration of the execution of between 1642 and 1649 when
King Charles | of England, January 30,1649. a Protestant religious sect

known as the Puritans and
their allies in Parliament led a revolt against absolute monarchy
championed by King Charles I. The Puritans had a much stricter
interpretation of the Christian Bible and wanted to “purify” the
Church of England, ridding it of remaining Catholic and
liturgical practices not described in scripture. A Puritan-
dominated Parliamentary army led by Oliver Cromwell beat
the Royalists on the battlefield and then executed Charles I in
1649. Unfortunately, Cromwell's ten-year experiment with a
republic, which he called the Commonwealth, degenerated into
a dictatorship. After Cromwell’s death in 1659 and the
restoration of the monarchy in 1660, Parliament held onto
enough power to depose Catholic-leaning James II in 1689 and
invite his daughter Mary (and her Protestant Dutch husband
Prince William of Orange) to take the throne in a peaceful
transfer of power that became known as the Glorious
Revolution.

Questions for Discussion

How did the French and British styles of government differ?
Why did England have a Civil War in the 1640s?

132 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

European Colonization of North America

The Spanish established the
first. permanent European
settlement on the North
American coast in St.
Augustine, Florida, in 1565.
The French followed two
decades later, building a fort
in 1604 at Port Royal in what
is now Nova Scotia and
establishing Quebec on the St.
Lawrence River in 1608. The 589 map of St. Augustine, showing the
English had tried settling _ privateer Sir Francis Drake's 1586 attack.
people on Roanoke Island, in
North Carolina, in 1588, but the colony had mysteriously
disappeared by the time resupply ships returned to the area a
few years later. The settlement may have been overrun by local
Indians, but it is also possible that the abandoned colonists went
to live with the natives when their food ran out and when help
failed to arrive from England. Throughout the early history of
English settlement in North America, colonial authorities
regularly tried to hush up reports of poor English colonists
choosing to live with the Indians. The English published
frightening tales of captivity and redemption, although in
reality poor people, especially women, were often better-treated
in Indian society than in the English colonies.

After losing both their people and their entire capital
investment at Roanoke, the English waited nearly 20 years
before they tried settling the Chesapeake Bay region again in
1607. The Virginia Company, a joint stock venture chartered by
King James I in 1606, sent expeditions to the explore the coast
of North America between the Spanish and French settlements,
one of which established Jamestown forty miles inland on the
James River as the first permanent English town in North
America. In 1620 a shipload of persecuted Puritans we know as
the “Pilgrims” fled England and its Anglican church and landed
on Cape Cod. Ten years later another group of Puritans received


Modern World History 133

a royal charter to establish the Massachusetts Bay Colony at

Boston.

1837 painting called The Trapper's Bride,
depicting a marriage between a voyageur
and a native woman.

British colonists in North
America focused on
establishing family farms for
raising crops and pasturing
animals like cattle and sheep,
and growing cash crops like
tobacco in the warmer
climate of the South. By
contrast, French efforts on the
continent centered on trade
with Indians for beaver pelts,
since the growing season was
much shorter in the region
between the St. Lawrence
River and Hudson Bay. Many
French voyageurs married
native women, creating the
mixed-ethnic community
known as métis today.

However, alliance with the Indians did not change the outcome
of the Seven Years War for France in 1763, as we will see in a bit.
The French still lost all their North American territory to the
British and Spanish (Napoleon later got the Louisiana Territory
back, then almost immediately sold it to Thomas Jefferson).

134 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The diseases of the
Columbian Exchange spread
more slowly in places where
Indian population density
was comparatively lower,
such as along the Atlantic
Coast of North America. But
once again, it worked to the
advantage of Europeans.
Native populations in the
coastal northeast were
devastated by an epidemic
that raged from 1617 to 1619
and killed 95 percent of the
Abenaki people and over 90
percent of the Massachusetts
tribe. This emptying of the
land was often seen by English settlers like the Pilgrims and the
Puritans as a gift of divine providence. Puritan leader John
Winthrop wrote about the favor God had shown to the colonists
by killing the natives and minister Cotton Mather wrote that
“The Indians of these parts had newly...been visited with such a
prodigious Pestilence; as carried away not a Tenth, but Nine
Parts of Ten (yea, ‘tis said Nineteen of Twenty) among them...So
that the Woods were almost cleared of those pernicious
Creatures, to make Room for better Growth” (Magnalia Christi
Americana, 1702). English colonists were quick to take advantage
of the empty village sites, open farmland, and social chaos
among the natives caused throughout the region by the ongoing
Columbian Exchange.

Puritan clergyman Cotton Mather
(1663-1728)

Modern World History 135,

Although many individual
settlers probably tried to deal
fairly with their Indian
neighbors, the differences
between European and native
ideas of ownership and the
rapid growth of the colonies
made conflict __ virtually
inevitable. Natives regularly
moved to new locations as the
seasons changed. They
gardened in shifting fields.
Colonists built houses and
permanent villages, and
fenced their fields. But
although they claimed
complete ownership of the
parcels they occupied, the
Illustration of Metacomet, son of colonists let their cattle and
Massasoit, by Paul Revere, 1771 pigs run loose over the

countryside. Since the natives
were not protecting their lands in ways the colonists recognized,
with fences, the Euro-Americans believed (or at least argued)
Indians had no idea of land ownership. The colonists were
unaware that native practices had been created for a world
without domestic livestock. When Indians treated European
livestock like wildlife and shot a wandering cow, or when they
killed pigs eating their un-fenced crops, the colonists demanded
compensation for the destruction of their property. And of
course, more colonists arrived every year. The Powhatan wars
in Virginia (1610-46), the Pequot War in Connecticut (1637), the
Dutch-Indian War in the Hudson Valley (1643), and the Beaver
‘Wars (1650) all ended badly for the natives. Even King Philip’s
‘War (1675), which is remembered as a disastrous, nearly-
successful uprising by Massasoit’s son Metacomet, who had
finally decided enough was enough, resulted in five times as
many native deaths as English. By the conclusion of the
worldwide Seven Years War between the French and British
empires (known as the French and Indian War in North


136 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

America) in 1763, northeastern natives were no longer
considered a threat to European colonies.

Questions for Discussion

How did English settlement differ from Spanish or French
colonialism?

How did the Columbian Exchange affect English settlement in
North America?

Why did English settlers believe God had intervened on their
behalf?

How did differences in land use lead to conflict between
natives and colonists?

Comparative Colonization: The Spanish, the British, the
Land, the Natives

The contrasts between Spanish and British colonization in the
Americas are stark, and help explain subsequent social and
economic development in the Hemisphere. The differences are
especially visible in four areas: who the settlers were, how they
were governed, how they worked the land, and the nature of
their relationship with the indigenous peoples.

Modern World History 137

As described in the
previous chapter, the Spanish
had just completed an
800-year “Reconquest” of
Iberia from Muslim rule in
1492, when Columbus first
sailed west. Spain applied the
same model of Iberian
conquest and colonization to
the Americas, granting
conquered land with all of its
inhabitants to the
encomenderos, who were
selected for their proven
loyalty to King and empire,
and to the Catholic Church.
Soldiers and clergy were also
pledged to Crown and
Church, as well as the
administrators, artisans and
Herndn Cortés, conqueror of the Aztecs other settlers who arrived in
and premier encomendero of New Spain. Spanish America with their
families. The Portuguese in Brazil followed the same rule.

The British, however, used their colonies in North America as
havens for religious dissenters, as a safety-valve to reduce the
numbers of the poor in England, and as dumping grounds for
other troublemakers. As mentioned above, Massachusetts was
settled by Puritans who had rejected the Church of England.
Ironically, these seekers of religious freedom were so strict and
dogmatic that anyone who disagreed even slightly was
unwelcome in their new “city upon a hill”. Advocates of further
reform soon left and settled Connecticut and Rhode Island,
which were open to settlers of all religions—except Catholics
who instead settled in Maryland. Another dissenting religious
group from England, the Quakers, colonized Pennsylvania,
while Georgia was partly settled by petty criminals
“transported” from Great Britain (Australia would serve this role
in the late 18th and early 19th century). As a result, settlers
of the Thirteen Colonies were less loyal to the British Crown


138 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

than the Spanish settlers of Central and South America were to
their monarch. Indeed, if the Spanish had followed the British
policy of shipping their undesirables to the New World, “Latin”
America might have become “Judeo-Islamic” America, a place
where Jews and Muslims who had refused to convert to
Catholicism were sent.

The Spanish and British
also governed their colonies
in very different ways. The
Spanish Crown wanted to

directly rule their American i f
empire, appointing trusted ——
men—the —_peninsulares—to x

serve as viceroys, judges,

governors, and mayors,

applying laws and regulations

made by the Council of the

Indies in Spain. British

colonists had already had

already a sense of self- ~
government through their
parliament, which checked
the power of the King and
controlled the treasury. Subsequently, in contrast to Spanish
settlers, the British colonists set up legislatures, held town-hall
meetings, often appointed their own governors, and made
many of their own laws rather than waiting for instructions
from London.

This difference in representative government, however, does
not mean that the Spanish colonists were completely
deferential. They often applied the concept of “obedezco, pero no
cumplo” (“I obey, but I do not comply”) to regulations made by
the Council of Indies that they believed did not consider local
realities in the Americas. Also, especially in the 1700s, artisans
and laborers initiated local riots and uprisings against unjust
taxes or changes in religious governance, where the crowds
shouted “Long live the king, and death to bad government!”

The extent of Spanish territory in the
Americas in the 18th century.

Modern World History 139

until the wrongs were righted. Similar protests in the Thirteen
Colonies would not occur until the 1770s.

Land arrangements were also very different between the
British and the Spanish. Both empires had sugar and other
plantations which depended on enslaved African labor (which
we will examine below). However, for other crops (especially
those for local consumption), the Spanish followed the tradition
of the encomendero (and, later, hacendero), in which a large
landowner employed indigenous and mestizo workers, while
the British settlers preferred the individual family farm. In the
long run, this economic difference affected attitudes about
entrepreneurship and ideas of personal liberty. The large
landowners in Spanish America did not want to disrupt a social
system which brought them wealth, while in the Thirteen
Colonies, even the lowliest indentured servant who had worked
without pay for seven years, looked forward to gaining their
own plot for themselves “out West.”

The fourth major difference between Spanish and British
America involves relationships with the indigenous peoples.
Basically, the Spanish had arrived and said, “This is our land,
obey us” while the British said, “This is our land, go somewhere
else.” The Spanish Empire included the indigenous in their
colonial project, partly because of the blood ties that connected
many of the Spanish with their mestizo descendants. Mestizos
and Indians were often protected or at least tolerated by Spanish
authorities in their own settlements as long as they paid tribute
and at least pretended to be Catholic. Just like their counterparts
in North America, the Indians in Latin America also faced the
problem of the Spanish allowing their pigs and cattle to destroy
native plantings—but as Spanish colonial records reveal, the
indigenous brought this injustice to local Spanish judges, who
often determined in favor of the Indians. Many natives felt
part of colonial society, and confidently challenged Spanish
landowners in court.

140 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

A panel from one of the many “Casta paintings” produced in Spanish America, 1770.

Still, the Spanish colonies were far from a utopia for the natives.
They did not have complete control over their lives and the
“protection” offered by Catholic clergy required abandoning
their own religion and many of their customs and practices. The
Spanish did not want to physically eliminate the indigenous,
but they did advocate a cultural genocide of sorts, which was
never complete due to native resistance. But this was, in the
long run, less successful than the destruction of native culture in
North America because despite the Columbian Exchange there
were more natives left. Native languages thrive in many parts
of Central and South America where they are preserved and
spoken by millions, while the tribal tongues of North America
struggle to stay relevant.

The social and economic differences between British and
Spanish America clearly have consequences even today, some
positive and others negative. The entrepreneurial spirit
common in the United States has resulted in a less rigid class
system than in Latin America, while the idea that the U.S. is a
“white man’s country” (in which African-Americans were also

Modern World History 141

excluded) has led to systemic racism which is still an enormous
problem, especially when compared to attitudes about race in
most of Latin America, where mestizos and mulattos abound.

Question for Discussion

How did racial mixing make Spanish-American society
different from Anglo-American?

Caribbean Islands and Sugar Cane

Map of Barbados from Richard Ligon’s True and Exact History, 1657. Note runaway
slaves being chased into the hills at the top of map.

In spite of the beginning of British settlement in North America,
Britain’s main focus in the 17th century was the Caribbean. We
tend to forget this, because this region did not join the North
American revolution in 1776 and become part of the United
States. But in the 1600s, Sugar Islands like Barbados and Jamaica
were the most profitable British colonies. Like the Spanish,
North American colonists in the New World expected and
hoped to find not only a place to build a new society, but also
a place where they could get rich. Even religious idealists such
as the Pilgrims looked forward to opportunities for wealth and

142 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

social mobility that had not been available to them in England.
And right from the start, European colonies in North America
were commercial. In addition to fishing, growing tobacco, and
trapping beaver, the North American colonies benefited from
the booming sugar economy of the Caribbean.

Islands such as Barbados that had once been self-sufficient
had begun by the mid-1600s to specialize in the profitable
commodity at the expense of all other crops, so sugar planters
looked to their neighbor colonies for food supplies and feed for
draft animals. John Winthrop, the Puritan leader who helped
establish Boston and who was Governor of the Massachusetts
Bay Colony four times before 1650, sent his second son Henry
to help establish Barbados in 1626. When Oliver Cromwell's
Civil War halted the flow of commercial shipping between
England and the ten-year-old Bay Colony in 1640, trade with
the West Indies saved Boston’s economy. Governor Winthrop’s
younger son Samuel joined the growing community of New
England merchants in the Caribbean sugar islands in 1647.

T PLAN OF LOWER DECK WITH THESTOWAGE OF 208 SLAVES, 7%
13007 THESE BLING STOWED UNDER THE SHELVES AB SNEWH I rcuRE® AncuRE

Heist

wn

Diagram of a slave ship, printed in 1788 for an abolitionist society brochure.

About 16 million Africans were captured and transported to
European slaveholding colonies during the entire period of
Atlantic slavery. Only 12 million arrived alive. A quarter of all

Modern World History 143

slaves taken died on the voyage across the Atlantic. Although
slavery reduced African population by over 26 million (10
million to the Islamic world and 16 million to the Atlantic),
American staples including corn and manioc created a
population boom that exceeded the losses to the slave trade.
However, if these 26 million people had been available to
contribute to African society, what social and cultural progress
might have been possible? Additionally, since African
nations-like other societies—tended to enslave captives in war,
conflicts among tribes and kingdoms created an unstable social
and political climate, which made sub-Saharan Africa ripe for
European imperialists in the late nineteenth century, well after
the slave trade with the Americas had ended.

Under the Treaty of

THE Tordesillas, Spain was not
ASSTEN T QO] allowed to purchase slaves in
OR Africa because it was part of
CON FRA C TE the territory granted to
FOR Portugal. So Spain had set up

Atgwipe ah ds of Gt Brita] “a monopoly contract for slave
into the Spanifh America, trading to Spanish America
Sign'd by the Caruouicx Kixg at Madrid, the|| Called the Asiento, which was
See eS Se initially granted to France. In
1714, Spain shifted the Asiento
to Britain and gave the South
Sea Company a 30-year
monopoly on selling slaves to
Spain. The Company set up
= ==all slave distribution “factories”
The Asiento, 1713 at Cartagena (Colombia),
Veracruz (Mexico), Portobello
(Panama), La Guaira (Venezuela), Buenos Aires (Argentina),
Havana, and Santiago de Cuba, as well as its own colonies of
Barbados and Jamaica. In 1720, a speculative investment
“bubble” burst, throwing the British economy into crisis. The
South Sea Company survived the burst of its bubble, mostly due
to revenues from selling slaves, and its slave sales peaked in 1725,
five years after the financial crisis.

‘BP bee palettes peat Commana,


144 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Conditions were so harsh
on sugar plantations that
slaves generally died after
about three years after their
arrival. Plantation owners
could have changed their
practices, but the reduced
profits would have exceeded painting of a sugar plantation on British
the replacement costs of the Antigua, 1823.
slaves, so planters chose to
work slaves to death quickly and buy more. The economic value
of local “increase” produced by enslaved women was recognized
in the 18th century in the North American colonies where
people like Thomas Jefferson wrote about the money that could
be made on these natural replacements. Additionally, raising
tobacco and other crops was less harsh than cultivating sugar
cane, creating better conditions for survival. Britain and the U.S.
ended the slave trade in 1807 and 1808 but slavery continued in
the U.S., where enslaved people in Mid-Atlantic states where
tobacco was being replaced with mechanized wheat-farming
were “sold down the river” to the increasingly important cotton
plantations in the Deep South, creating a major profit
opportunity for white Virginians.

Slaves often resisted their
captors. Sometimes they ran
away and formed
independent communities in
remote hinterlands called
Maroon colonies. Many of
these Maroon __ colonies
became stable _ societies,
populated by escaped slaves
and the descendants of

. The Battle of Palm Tree Hill, during the
Indians who had run away yaitian Revolution.

from the colonists’ earlier

attempts to enslave them and some even lasted into the
twentieth century in Central and South America.

Modern World History 145,

Other times, the slaves rebelled — usually unsuccessfully, but
not always. Traditional histories sometimes seem to not give
enough attention to slave resistance, but here’s a partial list
of some notable revolts (there were a dozen more in the 19th
century):

1526 San Miguel de Gualdape (Spanish Florida,
Victorious)

1570 Gaspar Yanga‘s Revolt (Veracruz, New Spain,
Victorious)

1712 New York Slave Revolt (British Province of New
York, Suppressed)

1730 First Maroon War (British Jamaica, Victorious)

1788 St. John Slave Revolt (Danish Saint John,
Suppressed)

1739 Stono Rebellion (British Province of South
Carolina, Suppressed)

1741 New York Conspiracy (Province of New York,
Suppressed)

1760 Tacky’s War (British Jamaica, Suppressed)

1787 Abaco Slave Revolt (British Bahamas, Suppressed)
1791 Mina Conspiracy (Louisiana (New Spain),
Suppressed)

1795 Pointe Coupée Conspiracy (Louisiana (New Spain),
Suppressed)

1791-1804 Haitian Revolution (French Saint-Domingue,
Victorious)

Questions for Discussion

+ Why would plantation owners choose to work slaves to death
rather than treat them better?

+ Why don't we read more about slave revolts in most history


146 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

books?

The New World and the Enlightenment: Independence of
the United States

The Enlightenment
encouraged a gradual shift
from an understanding of
political sovereignty as a gift
of God (the Divine Right of
Kings as expressed by
absolute monarchs like Louis
XIV) to ideas of popular
sovereignty and government
by consent of the governed or
through a “social contract”
between rulers and people.
The Enlightenment
blossomed when people
discovered new knowledge
Portrait of Thomas Paine painted in 1792, through both exploration and
shortly before his imprisonment during the. .
French Reign of Terror. science and began throwing

off what they considered the
superstitions of an earlier age, including the “divine right” of
kings. Philosophers like John Locke and Jean-Jacques Rousseau
began reimagining the relationship between individuals and
society, while popular writers like Thomas Paine began
translating these ideas into pamphlets like Common Sense and
into books like The Rights of Man and The Age of Reason that were
read not only by other philosophers but also by hundreds of
thousands of regular literate people.


Modern World History 147

Some of the first places
these Enlightenment political
ideas were tested were
Britain’s thirteen North
American colonies. The
Seven Years War (1756-63)
had been an expensive drain
on Britain's treasury and 14. poston tea Party, as depicted by
Parliament believed the Nathaniel Currier in 1846.

American colonists ought to

pay their fair share of the cost of their defense. Britain instituted
a number of taxes including the Sugar Act (1764), the Stamp Act
(1765), the Townshend Act (1767), and the Tea Act (1778).
Boycotts and protests by the colonists soon began, including the
famous Boston Tea Party in 1778, during which enraged patriots
boarded a British cargo ship and dumped tea from India into
Boston harbor, rather than pay the hated new tax.

Although the colonists found these taxes oppressive and
obnoxious, to a great extent they were luxury taxes or excises
on trade rather than direct taxes on personal income. Still,
imposing new taxes on the colonists was a miscalculation by
Parliament, because the merchants and the wealthy most
affected by the taxes had the means and the motivation to
organize a resistance movement.

American colonists also objected to the Quartering Act (1765)
that forced them to provide housing and food for British troops.
Again, this may have seemed fair to the legislators back in
London who had sent an army to defend the colonies against
the French and Indians in the recently-concluded war. But it
was a big expense for the Americans, and was an issue that cut
across class boundaries more than the luxury taxes and unified
opposition. Imagine being a poor farmer in New England and
having a red-coat from some random region of England living
with you and eating your food.


148 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Boundary between Mississippi River and
49th parallel uncertain due to misconception that
source of Mississippi River lay further north 1775

Another major cause of American resentment against the
British after the Seven Years War was the Royal Proclamation
of 1763 that established a western boundary to the colonies
roughly along the ridge-line of the Appalachian Mountains. The
support of Native Americans from the trans-Appalachian region
had been critically important to the British war effort in North
America. Tribes such as the Haudenosaunee (Iroquois
Confederacy) were powerful allies, and their leaders
complained about the increasing numbers of settlers leaving the
coastal colonies to make farms in places like upstate New York,

Modern World History 149

western Pennsylvania, and the Ohio River Valley. The British
created an Indian Reserve beyond the Appalachians, including
western Virginia and Pennsylvania west of Pittsburgh, which
had been a French fort captured in the war. This angered both
colonists who looked west for new lands to settle and land
speculators who had planned on getting rich buying and selling
the western territory.

In addition to the famous “all men are created equal” and
“consent of the governed” parts of the colonists’ Declaration
of Independence, the 1776 document included a laundry list of
complaints against the British Crown including the charge that
the king had “endeavoured to bring on the inhabitants of our
frontiers, the merciless Indian Savages whose known rule of
warfare, is an undistinguished destruction of all ages, sexes and
conditions.” The founders understood that independence would
mean taking land from “Savages”. Although the Declaration
echoed the Enlightenment ideals of contractual government
and representation, at the time these ideals only applied to
white male landowners.

Many Indians sided with Britain in the American Revolution,
because they saw a British victory as their only chance to
prevent the colonists from overrunning them. Many slaves also
ran away to join British forces, especially after they were offered
immediate emancipation by Lord Dunmore. Many fought their
former owners in Dunmore’s “Ethiopian Regiment” or secretly
sided with the British against colonial slaveholders.

150 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Nor did the Declaration
speak for all the white
colonists. New York City was
occupied by the British until
1783, well after the end of the
fighting, and the city was a
haven for supporters of the
British side. Historians have
estimated the number of
loyalists at 15-20% of the total
colonial population, or about
400,000 people. Most of
these loyalists stayed and
became U.S. citizens after the
war, but about 70,000 left for
other parts of the British Loyalists being chased out of town by their
empire. Many of those in the [mer neighbors.
north went to Canada and
settled New Brunswick while southerners went to Florida, which
had remained loyal under British rule, or to the British islands
in the Caribbean.

After the Revolution, poor Americans were often left
wondering what they had fought for. Taxes were high and
farmers couldn't pay them because the “Continental” currency
printed by the rebel government to pay the troops was
worthless. Western Massachusetts farmers who felt the new
government in Boston did not represent them revolted in 1786
in Shays’s Rebellion, which was put down by government
troops. This fight and others forced leaders of the Confederated
states to reconsider how a federal government should be
organized, and they called a Constitutional Convention to meet
in Philadelphia, with the Thirteen States sending
representatives.

The United States Constitution that formed the new
government began with the words “We the People” It
acknowledged the Enlightenment concept that political power
comes from the consent of the governed. The final document
was influenced by the framers’ studies of earlier republics and
by negotiations over various state constitutions that had favored


Modern World History 151

the idea of three branches of government, the legislative,
executive and judicial, along with a system of checks and
balances that made no one branch superior to the others. For
instance, the President could veto laws passed by Congress,
while Congress could, with a 2/3 majority, override the veto.
And the Supreme Court could interpret a law as being
unconstitutional, checking both the President and Congress.

In spite of these checks and balances, when the Constitutional
Convention sent the newly-drafted US Constitution to all the
states for ratification, many New England towns either rejected
the document outright or provisionally approved it with
modifications they sent back to the authorities. In most cases,
their provisional approvals were marked as simple YES votes
and the carefully worked-out modifications were “filed”. But
dissatisfaction with the original Constitution was so strong, in
spite of the series of promotional articles published about it
that have become known as the Federalist Papers, that the
convention was forced to write the first 10 Amendments (the Bill
of Rights) and issue them at the same time. Without the Bill of
Rights, the Constitution would be a much different document.

Questions for Discussion

Why did the British government consider the taxes they
imposed on the colonists reasonable?

Why did Indians and blacks side with the British during the
Revolution?

What prompted the writing of the Bill of Rights?

The French Revolution

Debt problems stemming from the Seven Years War and
French support for the independence of the United States
forced King Louis XVI to call the Estates-General in 1789, in
order to raise revenue. The Estates-General had not been called
since 1614, and its meeting was immediately seen as an
opportunity to create a new parliamentary monarchy.

152 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The three “estates, commoners, nobility, and clergy,
traditionally all had the same power; but it was not much
compared to the absolute monarch. In 1789, the commoners
were dominated by educated merchants and large landowners
who advocated for establishing a British-style parliament as a
check on the King’s power. The commoners had enough
support from sectors of the clergy and nobility to declare
themselves asthe National Assembly, which
set about forming a new government.

Dissatisfaction with the current government and excitement
over establishing a new one inspired the people of Paris to form
militia groups to defend the National Assembly from royalist
attacks. On July 14th, these militias dramatically took over the
Bastille, a royal prison which held political dissidents. In August
the National Assembly agreed to a Declaration of the Rights of
Man which claimed “Natural Law” as the basis
for equal rights for all and called for
liberty, property, security, and
resistance to oppression. Like the U.S.
Declaration of Independence and
Constitution, the Assembly declared
the the “nation” was sovereign, rather
than the king, and asserted the rights
Of freedom of speech, the press, religion, and assembly.

However, the French Revolution differed from the American
in that it was not a colonial independence movement, but a
rejection of an existing monarchy by the people of France.
There was a much greater degree of participation by poor
people in France in this process, and the social changes
attempted by the new government were much more significant
than simply replacing a British ruling class with an American
one as the revolution had done in the new United States.
Unfortunately, the power vacuum created by the complete
elimination of the prior government structure resulted in the
rise of a radical Jacobin Party led by Maximillian Robespierre.
By 1798, a Reign of Terror imprisoned 300,000 people and

Modern World History 153

executed 40,000, including King Louis XVI and his Queen,
Marie Antoinette.

One of the prisoners who just barely escaped with his life
was Thomas Paine, the author of Common Sense, who had been
welcomed as an honorary citizen of the new French Republic
and had even been given a seat in their new legislative assembly.
Although he had defended the French Revolution against
British criticism in his book The Rights of Man, Paine was
imprisoned for objecting to the execution of the French King
and Queen. Paine was scheduled for execution, but was passed
over in a lucky oversight. Other reformers like French feminist
Olympe de Gouges were not so fortunate, and were killed by the
revolution they had supported.

The Execution of Maximillian Robespierre in July 1794 effectively ended the Reign of
Terror.

The Reign of Terror led to a rejection of the Jacobin party
and the trial and execution of Robespierre in 1794. A more
conservative government, the Directory, was installed but it
failed to manage an orderly transition from the old regime to
a new style of republican government. The Directory’s failure
created an opening for an ambitious opportunist named
Napoleon Bonaparte, who as a general of the French Army had

154 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

defended the Directory and the new French Republic against
the neighboring monarchies, which had sent in troops to put
down the Revolution. Returning from an Egyptian campaign in
1799, Napoleon overthrew the Directory and like Julius Caesar
established a 3-man Consul style government—but unlike
Caesar he quickly became the sole leader. Napoleon crowned
himself Emperor in 1802.

Question for Discussion

How was the French Revolution different from the American?

One advantage Napoleon
had establishing his empire,
in addition to his effective use
of the French army, was that
he was able to reinstate many
members of the old nobility
who had been discredited or
even imprisoned by the
Revolution. He even allowed
aristocrats to reclaim some of
the property the
revolutionaries had taken
from them. Napoleon also
introduced a new Civil Code
in 1804 that completely
revamped the French legal
system and is still in use
today. The Code, designed by
a panel of four eminent
judges, replaced France’s old
feudal legal system and has been tremendously influential in
Europe and elsewhere in the world as nations developed
modern legal systems.

Ina series of wars between 1804 and 1807, Napoleon extended

1803 portrait of Napoleon

Modern World History 155

French control to much of Germany, Italy, Spain, and the duchy
of Warsaw, and built strong alliances with Austria and Prussia.
At its height, the French Empire ruled over 70 million subjects,
and to secure its most profitable colony Napoleon sent 40,000
troops across the Atlantic to Hispaniola to try to retake San
Dominique from an army of rebellious former slaves led by
Toussaint l’Ouverture, one of the most important leaders of the
revolutionary age.

Encouraged by the French Revolution, slaves on sugar
plantations on Hispaniola, which the French had renamed San
Dominique, rebelled in 1791 and overthrew the white
government of the island. Slavery in French colonies was then
abolished by the Jacobins in 1798 (one of the few things
Robespierre got right) and the army of former slaves fought a
British invasion to a standstill in a 5-year war ending in 1798.
But after declaring himself Emperor of the French, Napoleon
reinstituted slavery and sent troops to retake the island for
France.

156 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Napoleon’s army, which
outnumbered Haitian forces
two to one, captured
YOuverture in 1803 and
transported him to a French
prison where he died, but the
revolution continued under
lOverture’s lieutenant Jean-
Jacques Dessalines. |The
former slaves defeated the
French and established the
Republic of Haiti in 1804.
Although the Declaration of
Independence’s author
Thomas Jefferson was
President when Haiti became
the first ever nation created
by former slaves who gained
their freedom in armed
rebellion and only the second Toussaint Ouverture, possibly reading the

. . Haitian Declaration of Independence, ca.
American republic to free 49;
itself from. European
colonialism, the author of the Declaration refused to recognize
Haiti's independence. The slavery-supporting South actually
blocked recognition of Haiti by the U.S. government until the
Civil War, when a North-only Congress and President Lincoln
finally established diplomatic relations in 1862.

Another momentous act of Napoleon’s was his sale of 828,000
square miles of North America to the US in 1804. The expense
of the failed war to prevent Haitian independence and the
prospect of a new war with Britain convinced Napoleon to take
fifty million francs (about $11 million today) for the territory
it had just regained from Spain. President Thomas Jefferson
had originally been interested in buying only the city of New
Orleans at the mouth of the Mississippi River, which was an
important port where produce from the interior arrived via the
Mississippi. But the territory he acquired actually doubled the
size of the U.S. As you can see from this 1804 map, people
living on the east coast were aware how big North America was


Modern World History 157

between the Mississippi River and the Rocky Mountains, if they
were a bit hazy about what lay between the Rockies and the
Pacific.

is complicated. In the case of the United States and Haiti,
revolution led to the creation of new nations. In France,
revolution led to chaos and Napoleon’s attempt at empire-
building. Napoleon’s empire might have lasted a bit longer, if
he had not been so interested in expanding it to include not
only Europe and Haiti, but Russia. In a final example of bad
judgment, Napoleon invaded Russia and occupied Moscow in

158 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

September 1812. Russia’s fast-moving Cossack cavalry executed
a scorched-earth retreat before the advancing French army, so
Napoleon’s forces arrived in Moscow hungry, only to find that
the city’s quarter-million people had abandoned their homes
and taken everything they could carry. The French burned the
city (possibly by accident) and began a long retreat in early
October at the beginning of what turned out to be a brutal
winter. To make matters worse, Russian cavalry repeatedly cut
the French supply lines, and of an original force of over
600,000 men, only about 100,000 made it back to France alive.
Napoleon was able to build the army back up again, although
replacing the horses the troops had eaten during the retreat was
harder. But this crushing debacle proved to the world he wasn’t
the military genius many had believed him to be.

Napoleon’s enemies invaded France in 1814, forced him to
abdicate, and exiled him to Elba, a small island near his
boyhood home of Corsica. Napoleon escaped the
Mediterranean island and regained power briefly in 1815 before
being defeated at Waterloo and exiled to St. Helena in the South
Atlantic, where he died six years later at the age of 51.

Questiot Discussion

Modern World History 159

Why was Napoleon willing to sell Louisiana to Thomas
Jefferson?

What prevented the U.S. government from recognizing Haiti?

Independence of Latin America

Napoleon’s conquest of Europe inadvertently created the
conditions for additional revolutions and the creation of new
nations in the Americas. As described in the last chapter,
Spanish American society was based on a small aristocracy of
ethnic Spanish peninsulares (people born on the Iberian
peninsula) and creoles (people of Spanish descent born in the
colonies) ruling large populations of mestizo (mixed)
populations, Indians, and slaves. Like the leaders of the
American Revolution, many of these colonial aristocrats felt
the priorities of their rulers in Spain did not match their own.
Napoleon’s removal of the hereditary king and installation of
his brother Joseph Bonaparte on the Spanish throne in 1807
removed the last shred of doubt. Soon after Joseph Bonaparte
took the throne, representative juntas were established in
Caracas, Santiago, Buenos Aires, and Bogota to rule in the name
of the deposed Spanish king.

In 1810 a creole priest named Miguel Hidalgo y Costilla began
Mexico’s revolutionary movement, by giving a speech known
as the “Grito de Dolores” or simply El Grito, the Cry. Hidalgo
raised an army of 100,000 men, largely of landless peasants
anxious for social reform, but they were defeated in January
1811 by a professional army of about 6,000 Spanish troops.
Hidalgo was convicted of treason against Spain and executed.
Another (this time mestizo) priest named José Maria Morelos
took over the insurrection and convened a Congress in 1813 that
wrote a constitution for Mexico called the Decreto Constitucional
para la Libertad de la America Mexica which declared Mexico's
independence. Unlike later independence movements in South
America, Mexico’s demanded not just political but also social
change.

In 1815 Morelos was also captured and executed. His

160 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

lieutenant Vicente Guerrero continued the war for
independence. Guerrero would be elected president of Mexico
in 1829 and would be Mexico’s first black president. But it was a
long way to 1829.

King Ferdinand VII was the
Spanish monarch who had
been forced to abdicate in
1808 in favor of Joseph
Bonaparte. He regained the
throne in 1813, but quickly
became known as el Rey Felén,
the criminal king. Ferdinand
rejected the liberal 1812
Constitution that had been
adopted by Spain’s rebel
government during __ his
absence. Historians have
described him as “the basest
king in Spanish _ history.
Cowardly, selfish, grasping,
suspicious, and vengeful, [he]
seemed almost incapable of
any perception of the
commonwealth. He thought only in terms of his power and
security and was unmoved by the enormous sacrifices of
Spanish people to retain their independence and preserve his
throne.” Latin American juntas and the Mexican rebels decided
he did not deserve their allegiance and began fighting for their
independence from Spain.

The royal government sent a general named Agustin de
Iturbide against Guerrero’s forces in Mexico, but Guerrero beat
Iturbide on the battlefield and then convinced him to join the
revolution. In 182] the two allied under the Plan de Iguala, or
the “Plan of the Three Guarantees,” which proclaimed Mexico's
independence and declared that “All inhabitants . . . without
distinction of their European, African or Indian origins are
citizens . . . with full freedom to pursue their livelihoods
according to their merits and virtues.” When Iturbide declared

King Ferdinand VII of Spain, "El Rey Felon”

Modern World History 161

himself emperor of Mexico, Guerrero and his supporters
rebelled and although Iturbide defeated them in the field he
resigned when Antonio Lopez de Santa Anna also rebelled, and
went into exile. Mexican history is very complicated and
turbulent: suffice it to say that both Iturbide and Guerrero ended
up being executed in their turns.

‘The Abrazo, when Guerrero convinced Iturbide to join revolution.

In 1811 Venezuela and Paraguay both declared their
independence from Spain. In 1816 Argentina declared its
independence, followed quickly by Chile and Gran Colombia.
King Pedro of Portugal, whose father had fled to Brazil in 1807
to avoid being deposed by Napoleon, declared Brazil a
constitutional empire under his rule in 1822. In 1824, the
Venezuelan Simon Bolivar, who had led the liberation of Gran
Colombia, conclusively defeated the Spanish armies at Junin
and Sucre, and Peru gained its independence. A year later the
eastern portion of the old viceroyalty of Peru became a separate
country named after the liberator Bolivar: Bolivia.

162 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Gran Colombia was a
republic that includes
territory now part of
Colombia, Venezuela,
Ecuador, Panama, northern
Peru, western Guyana, and
northwest Brazil. Bolivar was
elected President of Gran
Colombia from 1819 to 1830.
He hoped Latin America
would follow the example of
the United States and create a
federal union of all the newly-
independent nations—or at
least a common economic
market. He convened a
Congress of the Americas in
Posthumous portrait of Simén Bolivar.ca. the summer of 1826, inviting
1860 all the nations of Latin

America and also the United
States. The U.S. President, John Quincy Adams, didn’t have a
very high opinion of Latin Americans but he was an opponent
of slavery and all of the new Spanish America republics had
immediately outlawed the slave trade and had either abolished
slavery or had initiated its gradual disappearance through
manumission. (The independent Brazilian Empire, on the other
hand, did not formally end enslavement of people of color until
1888, the last nation in the Americas to do so). Adams had been
instrumental in promulgating the Monroe Doctrine in 1823,
establishing the Western Hemisphere as a region under the
protection of the US and warning European nations, especially
Great Britain, to limit their activities in the Americas.

Britain, however, did attend the Congress of the Americas
as an observer and managed to gain several important trade
deals as a result. But blocked once again by the slaveholding
South, the U.S. government dragged its feet. Although the U.S.
ultimately decided to send a delegation, it arrived only after
the Congress had ended. Bolivar was unable to establish the
Pan-American commonwealth he had dreamed of or even hold


Modern World History 163

Gran Colombia together. He resigned the presidency in the
spring of 1830 and the republic dissolved into political chaos
and the three separate nations of Venezuela, Colombia, and
Ecuador. Bolivar died of tuberculosis at age 47 later that year.

Questions for Discussion

What was the significance of Mexico's 1821 Plan de /guala?

How do you think history would have been different if Bolivar
had been successful in his plans for a United States of South,
America?

Primary Source #1: U.S. Declaration of Independence
In Congress, July 4, 1776

The unanimous Declaration of the thirteen united
States of America, When in the Course of human events, it
becomes necessary for one people to dissolve the political
bands which have connected them with another, and to
assume among the powers of the earth, the separate and
equal station to which the Laws of Nature and of Nature's
God entitle them, a decent respect to the opinions of mankind
requires that they should declare the causes which impel
them to the separation.

We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are
created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with
certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty
and the pursuit of Happiness.-That to secure these rights,
Governments are instituted among Men, deriving their just
powers from the consent of the governed, -That whenever
any Form of Government becomes destructive of these ends,
it is the Right of the People to alter or to abolish it, and
to institute new Government, laying its foundation on such
principles and organizing its powers in such form, as to them
shall seem most likely to effect their Safety and Happiness.
Prudence, indeed, will dictate that Governments long


164 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

established should not be changed for light and transient
causes; and accordingly all experience hath shewn, that
mankind are more disposed to suffer, while evils are
sufferable, than to right themselves by abolishing the forms
to which they are accustomed. But when a long train of
abuses and usurpations, pursuing invariably the same Object
evinces a design to reduce them under absolute Despotism,
it is their right, it is their duty, to throw off such Government,
and to provide new Guards for their future security.-Such has
been the patient sufferance of these Colonies; and such is
now the necessity which constrains them to alter their former
Systems of Government. The history of the present King of
Great Britain is a history of repeated injuries and usurpations,
all having in direct object the establishment of an absolute
Tyranny over these States. To prove this, let Facts be
submitted to a candid world.

He has refused his Assent to Laws, the most wholesome
and necessary for the public good.

He has forbidden his Governors to pass Laws of immediate
and pressing importance, unless suspended in their
operation till his Assent should be obtained; and when so
suspended, he has utterly neglected to attend to them.

He has refused to pass other Laws for the accommodation
of large districts of people, unless those people would
relinquish the right of Representation in the Legislature, a
right inestimable to them and formidable to tyrants only.

He has called together legislative bodies at places unusual,
uncomfortable, and distant from the depository of their
public Records, for the sole purpose of fatiguing them into
compliance with his measures.

He has dissolved Representative Houses repeatedly, for
opposing with manly firmness his invasions on the rights of
the people.

He has refused for a long time, after such dissolutions, to
cause others to be elected; whereby the Legislative powers,
incapable of Annihilation, have returned to the People at large
for their exercise; the State remaining in the mean time
exposed to all the dangers of invasion from without, and
convulsions within.


Modern World History 165

He has endeavoured to prevent the population of these
States; for that purpose obstructing the Laws for
Naturalization of Foreigners; refusing to pass others to
encourage their migrations hither, and raising the conditions
of new Appropriations of Lands.

He has obstructed the Administration of Justice, by refusing
his Assent to Laws for establishing Judiciary powers.

He has made Judges dependent on his Will alone, for the
tenure of their offices, and the amount and payment of their
salaries.

He has erected a multitude of New Offices, and sent hither
swarms of Officers to harrass our people, and eat out their
substance.

He has kept among us, in times of peace, Standing Armies
without the Consent of our legislatures.

He has affected to render the Military independent of and
superior to the Civil power.

He has combined with others to subject us to a jurisdiction
foreign to our constitution, and unacknowledged by our laws;
giving his Assent to their Acts of pretended Legislation:

For Quartering large bodies of armed troops among us:

For protecting them, by a mock Trial, from punishment for
any Murders which they should commit on the Inhabitants of
these States:

For cutting off our Trade with all parts of the world:
For imposing Taxes on us without our Consent:
For depriving us in many cases, of the benefits of Trial by
Jury:

For transporting us beyond Seas to be tried for pretended
offences

For abolishing the free System of English Laws in a
neighbouring Province, establishing therein an Arbitrary
government, and enlarging its Boundaries so as to render it at
once an example and fit instrument for introducing the same
absolute rule into these Colonies:

For taking away our Charters, abolishing our most valuable


166 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Laws, and altering fundamentally the Forms of our
Governments:

For suspending our own Legislatures, and declaring
themselves invested with power to legislate for us in all cases
whatsoever.

He has abdicated Government here, by declaring us out of
his Protection and waging War against us.

He has plundered our seas, ravaged our Coasts, burnt our
towns, and destroyed the lives of our people.

He is at this time transporting large Armies of foreign
Mercenaries to compleat the works of death, desolation and
tyranny, already begun with circumstances of Cruelty &
perfidy scarcely paralleled in the most barbarous ages, and
totally unworthy the Head of a civilized nation.

He has constrained our fellow Citizens taken Captive on
the high Seas to bear Arms against their Country, to become
the executioners of their friends and Brethren, or to fall
themselves by their Hands.

He has excited domestic insurrections amongst us, and has
endeavoured to bring on the inhabitants of our frontiers, the
merciless Indian Savages, whose known rule of warfare, is an
undistinguished destruction of all ages, sexes and conditions.

In every stage of these Oppressions We have Petitioned for
Redress in the most humble terms: Our repeated Petitions
have been answered only by repeated injury. A Prince whose
character is thus marked by every act which may define a
Tyrant, is unfit to be the ruler of a free people.

Nor have We been wanting in attentions to our Brittish
brethren. We have warned them from time to time of
attempts by their legislature to extend an unwarrantable
jurisdiction over us. We have reminded them of the
circumstances of our emigration and settlement here. We
have appealed to their native justice and magnanimity, and
we have conjured them by the ties of our common kindred to
disavow these usurpations, which, would inevitably interrupt
our connections and correspondence. They too have been
deaf to the voice of justice and of consanguinity. We must,
therefore, acquiesce in the necessity, which denounces our

Modern World History 167

Separation, and hold them, as we hold the rest of mankind,
Enemies in War, in Peace Friends.

We, therefore, the Representatives of the united States of
America, in General Congress, Assembled, appealing to the
Supreme Judge of the world for the rectitude of our
intentions, do, in the Name, and by Authority of the good
People of these Colonies, solemnly publish and declare, That
these United Colonies are, and of Right ought to be Free
and Independent States; that they are Absolved from all
Allegiance to the British Crown, and that all political
connection between them and the State of Great Britain, is
and ought to be totally dissolved; and that as Free and
Independent States, they have full Power to levy War,
conclude Peace, contract Alliances, establish Commerce, and
to do all other Acts and Things which independent States may
of right do. And for the support of this Declaration, with a firm
reliance on the protection of divine Providence, we mutually
pledge to each other our Lives, our Fortunes and our sacred
Honor.

Primary Source Supplement #2: The Haitian
Declaration of Independence, 1804

The Commander in Chief to the People of Haiti
Citizens:

It is not enough to have expelled the barbarians who have
bloodied our land for two centuries; it is not enough to have
restrained those ever-evolving factions that one after another
mocked the specter of liberty that France dangled before
you. We must, with one last act of national authority, forever
assure the empire of liberty in the country of our birth; we
must take any hope of re-enslaving us away from the
inhuman government that for so long kept us in the most

168 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

humiliating torpor. In the end we must live independent or
die.

Independence or death... let these sacred words unite us
and be the signal of battle and of our reunion.

Citizens, my countrymen, on this solemn day | have brought
together those courageous soldiers who, as liberty lay dying,
spilled their blood to save it; these generals who have guided
your efforts against tyranny have not yet done enough for
your happiness; the French name still haunts our land.

Everything revives the memories of the cruelties of this
barbarous people: our laws, our habits, our towns, everything
still carries the stamp of the French. Indeed! There are still
French in our island, and you believe yourself free and
independent of that Republic which, it is true, has fought all
the nations, but which has never defeated those who wanted
to be free.

What! Victims of our [own] credulity and indulgence for 14
years; defeated not by French armies, but by the pathetic
eloquence of their agents’ proclamations; when will we tire
of breathing the air that they breathe? What do we have
in common with this nation of executioners? The difference
between its cruelty and our patient moderation, its color and
ours the great seas that separate us, our avenging climate, all
tell us plainly that they are not our brothers, that they never
will be, and that if they find refuge among us, they will plot
again to trouble and divide us.

Native citizens, men, women, girls, and children, let your
gaze extend on all parts of this island: look there for your
spouses, your husbands, your brothers, your sisters. Indeed!
Look there for your children, your suckling infants, what have
they become?... | shudder to say it ... the prey of these
vultures.

Instead of these dear victims, your alarmed gaze will see
only their assassins, these tigers still dripping with their blood,
whose terrible presence indicts your lack of feeling and your
guilty slowness in avenging them. What are you waiting for
before appeasing their spirits? Remember that you had
wanted your remains to rest next to those of your fathers,
after you defeated tyranny; will you descend into their tombs


Modern World History 169

without having avenged them? No! Their bones would reject
yours.

And you, precious men, intrepid generals, who, without
concern for your own pain, have revived liberty by shedding
all your blood, know that you have done nothing if you do not
give the nations a terrible, but just example of the vengeance
that must be wrought by a people proud to have recovered
its liberty and jealous to maintain it let us frighten all those
who would dare try to take it from us again; let us begin with
the French. Let them tremble when they approach our coast,
if not from the memory of those cruelties they perpetrated
here, then from the terrible resolution that we will have made
to put to death anyone born French whose profane foot soils
the land of liberty.

We have dared to be free, let us be thus by ourselves and
for ourselves. Let us imitate the grown child: his own weight
breaks the boundary that has become an obstacle to him.
What people fought for us? What people wanted to gather
the fruits of our labor? And what dishonorable absurdity to
conquer in order to be enslaved. Enslaved?... Let us leave this
description for the French; they have conquered but are no
longer free.

Let us walk down another path; let us imitate those people
who, extending their concern into the future, and dreading
to leave an example of cowardice for posterity, preferred to
be exterminated rather than lose their place as one of the
world’s free peoples.

Let us ensure, however, that a missionary spirit does not
destroy our work; let us allow our neighbors to breathe in
peace; may they live quietly under the laws that they have
made for themselves, and let us not, as revolutionary
firebrands, declare ourselves the lawgivers of the Caribbean,
nor let our glory consist in troubling the peace of the
neighboring islands. Unlike that which we inhabit, theirs has
not been drenched in the innocent blood of its inhabitants;
they have no vengeance to claim from the authority that
protects them.

Fortunate to have never known the ideals that have

170 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

destroyed us, they can only have good wishes for our
prosperity.

Peace to our neighbors; but let this be our cry: “Anathama
to the French name! Eternal hatred of France!"

Natives of Haiti! My happy fate was to be one day the
sentinel who would watch over the idol to which you sacrifice;
| have watched, sometimes fighting alone, and if | have been
so fortunate as to return to your hands the sacred trust you
confided to me, know that it is now your task to preserve it. In
fighting for your liberty, | was working for my own happiness.
Before consolidating it with laws that will guarantee your free
individuality, your leaders, who | have assembled here, and |,
owe you the final proof of our devotion.

Generals and you, leaders, collected here close to me for
the good of our land, the day has come, the day which must
make our glory, our independence, eternal.

If there could exist among us a lukewarm heart, let him
distance himself and tremble to take the oath which must
unite us. Let us vow to ourselves, to posterity, to the entire
universe, to forever renounce France, and to die rather than
live under its domination; to fight until our last breath for the
independence of our country.

And you, a people so long without good fortune, witness to
the oath we take, remember that | counted on your constancy
and courage when | threw myself into the career of liberty
to fight the despotism and tyranny you had struggled against
for 14 years. Remember that | sacrificed everything to rally to
your defense; family, children, fortune, and now | am rich only
with your liberty; my name has become a horror to all those
who want slavery. Despots and tyrants curse the day that |
was born. If ever you refused or grumbled while receiving
those laws that the spirit guarding your fate dictates to me for
your own good, you would deserve the fate of an ungrateful
people. But | reject that awful idea; you will sustain the liberty
that you cherish and support the leader who commands you.
Therefore vow before me to live free and independent, and
to prefer death to anything that will try to place you back
in chains. Swear, finally, to pursue forever the traitors and
enemies of your independence.


Modern World History 171

Done at the headquarters of Gonaives, the first day of
January 1804, the first year of independence.

A translation of the document by Laurent Dubois and John
Garrigus as published in “Slave Revolution in the Caribbean 1789
~ 1804: A Brief History with Documents.”

Primary Source Supplement #2: MAXIMILIAN
ROBESPIERRE, THE POLITICAL PHILOSOPHY OF TERROR,
FEBRUARY 5, 1794

Citizen-representatives of the people.

Some time ago we set forth the principles of our foreign
policy; today we come to expound the principles of our
internal policy.

After having proceeded haphazardly for a long time, swept
along by the movement of opposing factions, the
representatives of the French people have finally
demonstrated a character and a government. A sudden
change in the nation’s fortune announced to Europe the
regeneration that had been effected in the national
representation. But up to the very moment when | am
speaking, it must be agreed that we have been guided, amid
such stormy circumstances, by the love of good and by the
awareness of our country’s needs rather than by an exact
theory and by precise rules of conduct, which we did not have
even leisure enough to lay out.

It is time to mark clearly the goal of the revolution, and the
end we want to reach; it is time for us to take account both of
the obstacles that still keep us from it, and of the means we
ought to adopt to attain it: a simple and important idea which
seems never to have been noticed.

For ourselves, we come today to make the world privy to
your political secrets, so that all our country’s friends can


172 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

rally to the voice of reason and the public interest; so that
the French nation and its representatives will be respected in
all the countries of the world where the knowledge of their
real principles can penetrate; so that the intriguers who seek
always to replace other intriguers will be judged by sure and
easy rules.

We must take far-sighted precautions to return the destiny
of liberty into the hands of the truth, which is eternal, rather
than into those of men, who are transitory, so that if the
government forgets the interests of the people, or if it lapses
into the hands of the corrupt individuals, according to the
natural course of things, the light of recognized principles will
illuminate their treachery, and so that every new faction will
discover death in the mere thought of crime. . .

What is the goal toward which we are heading? The
peaceful enjoyment of liberty and equality; the reign of that
eternal justice whose laws have been inscribed, not in marble
and stone, but in the hearts of all men, even in that of the
slave who forgets them and in that of the tyrant who denies
them.

We seek an order of things in which all the base and cruel
passions are enchained, all the beneficent and generous
passions are awakened by the laws; where ambition becomes
the desire to merit glory and to serve our country; where
distinctions are born only of equality itself; where the citizen
is subject to the magistrate, the magistrate to the people, and
the people to justice; where our country assures the well-
being of each individual, and where each individual proudly
enjoys our country’s prosperity and glory; where every soul
grows greater through the continual flow of republican
sentiments, and by the need of deserving the esteem of a
great people; where the arts are the adornments of the liberty
which ennobles them and commerce the source of public
wealth rather than solely the monstrous opulence of a few
families.

In our land we want to substitute morality for egotism,
integrity for formal codes of honor, principles for customs, a
sense of duty for one of mere propriety, the rule of reason for
the tyranny of fashion, scorn of vice of scorn of the unlucky,


Modern World History 173

self-respect for insolence, grandeur of soul over vanity, love
of glory for the love of money, good people in place of good
society. We wish to substitute merit for intrigue, genius for
wit, truth for glamour, the charm of happiness for sensuous
boredom, the greatness of man for the pettiness of the great,
a people who are magnanimous, powerful, and happy, in
place of a kindly, frivolous, and miserable people - which is to
say all the virtues and all the miracles of the republic in place
of all the vices and all the absurdities of the monarchy.

We want, in a word, to fulfill natures's desires, accomplish
the destiny of humanity, keep the promises of philosophy,
absolve providence from the long reign of crime and tyranny.
Let France, formerly illustrious among the enslaved lands,
eclipsing the glory of all the free peoples who have existed,
become the model for the nations, the terror of oppressors,
the consolation of the oppressed the ornament of the world -
and let us, in sealing our work with our blood, see at least the
early dawn of the universal bliss -that is our ambition, that is
our goal.

What kind of government can realize these wonders? Only a
democratic or republican government - these two words are
synonyms, despite the abuses in common speech, because an
aristocracy is no closer than a monarchy to being a republic. .

Democracy is a state in which the sovereign people, guided
by laws which are of their own making, do for themselves all
that they can do well, and by their delegates do all that they
cannot do for themselves. ...

Now, what is the fundamental principle of popular or
democratic government, that is to say, the essential
mainspring which sustains it and makes it move? It is virtue.
| speak of the public virtue which worked so many wonders
in Greece and Rome and which ought to produce even more
astonishing things in republican France - that virtue which is
nothing other than the love of the nation and its law.

But as the essence of the republic or of democracy is
equality, it follows that love of country necessarily embraces
the love of equality. . .

But the French are the first people of the world who have


174 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

established real democracy, by calling all men to equality and
full rights of citizenship; and there, in my judgment, is the true
reason why all the tyrants in league against the Republic will
be vanquished.

There are important consequences to be drawn
immediately from the principles we have just explained.

Since the soul of the Republic is virtue, equality, and since
your goal is to found, to consolidate the Republic, it follows
that the first rule of your political conduct ought to be to
relate all your efforts to maintaining equality and developing
virtue; because the first care of the legislator ought to be to
fortify the principle of the government. This everything that
tends to excite love of country, to purify morals, to elevate
souls, to direct the passions of the human heart toward the
public interest, ought to be adopted or established by you.
Everything which tends to concentrate them in the abjection
of selfishness, to awaken enjoyment for petty things and
scorn for great ones, ought to be rejected or curbed by you.
Within the scheme of the French revolution, that which is
immoral is impolitic, that which is corrupting is counter-
revolutionary. Weakness, vice, and prejudices are the road to
royalty...

We deduce from all this a great truth - that the
characteristic of popular government is to be trustful towards
the people and severe towards itself.

Here the development of our theory would reach its limit, if
you had only to steer the ship of the Republic through calm
waters. But the tempest rages, and the state of the revolution
in which you find yourselves imposes upon you another task.

We must smother the internal and external enemies of the
Republic or perish with them. Now, in this situation, the first
maxim of your policy ought to be to lead the people by reason
and the people's enemies by terror.

If the mainspring of popular government in peacetime is
virtue, amid revolution it is at the same time [both] virtue
and terror: virtue, without which terror is fatal; terror, without
which virtue is impotent. Terror is nothing but prompt,
severe, inflexible justice; it is therefore an emanation of


Modern World History 175

virtue. It is less a special principle than a consequence of the
general principle of democracy applied to our country's most
pressing needs.

It has been said that terror was the mainspring of despotic
government. Does your government, then, resemble a
despotism? Yes, as the sword which glitters in the hands of
liberty’s heroes resembles the one with which tyranny’s
lackeys are armed. Let the despot govern his brutalized
subjects by terror; he is right to do this, as a despot. Subdue
liberty’s enemies by terror, and you will be right, as founders
of the Republic. The government of the revolution is the
despotism of liberty against tyranny. Is force made only to
protect crime? And is it not to strike the heads of the proud
that lightning is destined?

To punish the oppressors of humanity is clemency; to
pardon them is barbarity. The rigor of tyrants has only rigor
for a principle; the rigor of the republican government comes
from charity.

Therefore, woe to those who would dare to turn against the
people the terror which ought to be felt only by its enemies!
Woe to those who, confusing the inevitable errors of civic
conduct with the calculated errors of perfidy, or with
conspirators’ criminal attempts, leave the dangerous schemer
to pursue the peaceful citizen! Perish the scoundrel who
ventures to abuse the sacred name of liberty, or the
redoubtable arms which liberty has entrusted to him, in order
to bring mourning or death into patriots’ hearts! This abuse
has existed, one cannot doubt it. It has been exaggerated,
no doubt, by the aristocracy. But if in all the Republic there
existed only one virtuous man persecuted by the enemies
of liberty, the government's duty would be to seek him out
vigorously and give him a dazzling revenge. . .

How frivolous it would be to regard a few victories achieved
by patriotism as the end of all our dangers. Glance over our
true situation. You will become aware that vigilance and
energy are more necessary for you than ever. An
unresponding ill-will everywhere opposes the operations of
the government. The inevitable influence of foreign courts is
no less active for being more hidden, and no less baneful. One


176 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

senses that crime, frightened, has only covered its tracks with
greater skill. .

You could never have imagined some of the excesses
committed by hypocritical counter-revolutionaries in order to
blight the cause of the revolution. Would you believe that in
the regions where superstition has held the greatest sway,
the counter-revolutionaries are not content with burdening
religious observances under all the forms that could render
them odious, but have spread terror among the people by
sowing the rumor that all children under ten and all old men
over seventy are going to be killed? This rumor was spread
particularly through the former province of Brittany and in
the departments of the Rhine and the Moselle. It is one of the
crimes imputed to [Schneider] the former public prosecutor
of the criminal court of Strasbourg. That man’s tyrannical
follies make everything that has been said of Caligula and
Heliogabalus [cruel Roman emperors] credible; one can
scarcely believe it, despite the evidence. He pushed his
delirium to the point of commandeering women for his own
use - we are told that he even employed that method in
selecting a wife. Whence came this sudden swarm of
foreigners, priests, noble, intriguer of all kinds, which at the
same instant spread over the length and breadth of the
Republic, seeking to execute, in the name of philosophy, a
plan of counter-revolution which has only been stopped by
the force of public reason? Execrable conception, worthy of
the genius of foreign courts leagued against liberty, and of the
corruption of all the internal enemies of the Republic! .. .

In deceitful hands all the remedies for our ills turn into
poisons. Everything you can do, everything you can say, they
will turn against you, even the truths which we come here to
present this very day. ...

Such an internal situation ought to seem to you worthy of
all your attention, above all if you reflect that at the same time
you have the tyrants of Europe to combat, a million and two
hundred thousand men under arms to maintain, and that the
government is obliged continually to repair, with energy and
vigilance, all the injuries which the innumerable multitude of
our enemies has prepared for us during the course of five
years.


Modern World History 177

What is the remedy for all these evils? We know no other
than the development of that general motive force of the
Republic - virtue.

Democracy perishes by two kinds of excess: either the
aristocracy of those who govern, or else the popular scorn
for the authorities whom the people themselves have
established, scorn which makes each clique, each individual
take unto himself the public power and bring the people
through excessive disorders, to annihilation or to the power
of one man.

The double task of the moderates and the false
revolutionaries is to toss us back and forth perpetually
between these two perils.

But the people's representatives can avoid them both,
because government is always the master at being just and
wise; and, when it has that character, it is sure of the
confidence of the people.

It is indeed true that the goal of all our enemies is to
dissolve the Convention. It is true that the tyrant of Great
Britain and his allies promise their parliament and subjects
that they will deprive you of your energy and of the public
confidence which you have merited; that is the fist instruction
for all their agents. ...

We are beginning a solemn debate upon all the objects
of its [the Convention's] anxiety, and everything that can
influence the progress of the revolution. We adjure it not to
permit any particular hidden interest to usurp ascendancy
here over the general will of the assembly and the
indestructible power of reason.

Media Attributions
* 4863003 © Mathew Carey is licensed under a CC BY
(Attribution) license

* lossy-pagel-1920px-Description-de-l’entree-Du-Roy-
et-de-la-Reyne-Paris_MG_1114.tif © Abraham van
Diepenbeeck is licensed under a Public Domain license

178 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The_execution_of_King_Charles_I_from_NPG ©
Decoetzee is licensed under a Public Domain license

Mapstaug © Baptista Boazio is licensed under a Public
Domain license

The_Trapper’s_Bride © Alfred Jacob Miller is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Cotton_Mather © Peter Pelham is licensed under a
Public Domain license
Philip_King_of_Mount_Hope_by_Paul_Revere ©
Paul Revere is licensed under a Public Domain license
Hernan_Cortés_(Meister_von_Saldana) © Meister von
Saldana is licensed under a Public Domain license
Spanish_America_XVIII_Century_(Most_Expansion)
© Jluisrs is licensed under a Public Domain license
Mestiso_1770 © Cristébal Lozano is licensed under a
Public Domain license

download © Richard Ligon is licensed under a Public
Domain license

2880px-Slaveshipposter_(cropped) © Plymouth
Chapter of the Society for Effecting the Abolition of the
Slave Trade is licensed under a Public Domain license
1718_Asiento_contract © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

The_Mill_Yard_-
_Ten_Views_in_the_Island_of_Antigua_(1828),_ plate
_V_-_BL © William Clark is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Battle_for_Palm_Tree_Hill © January Suchodolski is
licensed under a Public Domain license
Portrait_of_Thomas_Paine © Laurent Dabos is
licensed under a Public Domain license
Boston_Tea_Party_Currier_colored © Nathaniel
Currier is licensed under a Public Domain license

1920px-Map_of_territorial_growth_1775.svg © Cg-

Modern World History 179

realms is licensed under a Public Domain license

Tory_Refugees_by_Howard_Pyle © Howard Pyle is
licensed under a Public Domain license

2880px-Execution_robespierre,_saint_just... ©
Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license

Jean_Auguste_Dominique_Ingres,_Portrait_de_Napol
é€on_Bonaparte_en_premier_consul © Jean Auguste
Dominique Ingres is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Géneral_Toussaint_Louverture © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license

2044px-Louisianal804a © Samuel Lewis is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Night_Bivouac_of_Great_Army © Vasily Vereshchagin
is licensed under a Public Domain license

Francisco_Goya_-
_Portrait_of_Ferdinand_VII_of_Spain_in_his_robes_
of_state_(1815)_-_Prado © Francisco Goya is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Abrazo_de_Acatempan © Ramon Sagredo is licensed
under a Public Domain license

1920px-
El_Libertador_(Bolivar_diplomatico)_1860_000 ©
Aita (pseudonym of Rita Matilde de la Pefuela) is
licensed under a Public Domain license

(5]

Troubled Nineteenth Century

The boundaries set in Europe by the Congress of Vienna, 1815.

180

Modern World History 181

Liberalism and the Revolutions of 1848

After the defeat of Napoleon a second time at Waterloo in 1815,
Europe breathed a sigh of relief. The British, who had led the
defense against his final invasion, chose St. Helena in the South
Atlantic as a permanent home for the exiled Emperor.
Napoleon was transported to the island, which was administered
by the East India Company, in 1815 and lived there for the rest
of his life. He died in 1821, at 51.

At the Congress of Vienna, which ran from November 1814
through June 1815, the old ruling families of Europe got together
to try to restore what they thought of as peace and order. To
a large extent their priority was trying to restore the status quo
ante: the borders that had existed before Napoleon’s conquests
and the types of social organization that had prevailed before
the French Revolution. The brother of the executed King, Louis
XVI, took the French throne as Louis XVIII (the XVIIth Louis
had been the dead king’s son, who had died in prison at the age
of 10 in 1795); the restored king agreed to return the territories
Napoleon had conquered to the nations that had held them
previously. As much as possible, the Congress of Vienna tried to
turn back the clock and forget that the Revolution and Napoleon
had ever happened, while setting up a balance of power to check

182 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

the possibility of a French imperial resurgence A European-
wide peace would hold until World War One began in 1914.

cuanTists! 1075,

Beginning in 1838, “Chartists” in Great Britain demanded an extension of suffrage to all
men over 21, along with other political reforms. Their protests were sometimes
suppressed violently by the police. In addition to throwing rocks, apparently the
Chartists also launched the occasional cat at the club-wielding bobbies.

But too much had changed to return to the past. Liberals tried
to distance themselves from the social leveling and economic
redistribution the Jacobins had attempted, identifying instead
with ideas like free trade and a limited franchise. But radicals
pushed for greater equality and more rights for regular people.
For instance, British workers agitated for the right to vote and
for a social contract called the People’s Charter in the 1830s
and 40s, but conservative Tories blocked the Chartists.
Enlightenment-inspired ideas about democracy, popular
sovereignty, and new ideas like socialism all came to a head in
Europe by 1848, which was known as the Year of Revolutions.

Question for Discussion

Why were European rulers so eager to return to the
conditions before the French Revolution?


Modern World History 183

Immigration to the United States

The Irish Famine, caused
by a blight that rendered
potatoes inedible, began in
1845. Potatoes had proved to
be an ideal crop for Ireland,
and it produced enough of
the crop for itself and most of
the rest of British
Isles—losing this important
food source was disastrous for
the Irish peasants. British
government aid proved
incompetent and ineffective,
revealing a scandalous level of
prejudice against the Catholic
Irish, the first colonized
people of the British Crown

An image of the Irish Famine published in .
1849 in the Illustrated London News. Over a million people in
Ireland died because of the

Famine, and a million more to emigrated to avoid
starvation—mostly to the U.S. The population of Ireland, which
had been more than 8 million in 1841, never recovered (and is
still only about 4.7 million today). Food shortages spread to
Scotland and central Europe, where the Czech potato harvest
was also reduced by half because of the blight.

In addition to rural famines, a lot of Britain and parts of
Europe had begun to industrialize, and poor urban workers
were dissatisfied with their wages and living conditions, which
will be described below. In 1848, rebels temporarily took
control of Vienna and forced the Austro-Hungarian Empire to
end serfdom. Southern Italians revolted against the French still
occupying their homeland. And a revolution in France ended
the monarchy once again and created the Second French
Republic. Although revolutionary movements in the German
states were unsuccessful in changing their governments, they

184 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

paved the way for change and resulted in massive German
immigration to the US.

LargestAncestry: 2000

Migration to the US had been slow between the end of the
American Revolution and the War of 1812, due to ongoing
tensions with Britain and the Napoleonic conflicts in Europe.
But beginning in the 1830s and 1840s, immigration from
Europe exploded, and the United States became a “safety valve”
for the underemployed, politically marginalized, and
persecuted of Europe. The Irish in the 1840s were followed by
Germans after 1848, who remain the largest single immigrant
group. Scandinavians began arriving after the Civil War, and
but by the 1890s, most new immigrants came from southern
Europe (especially Italians) and from eastern Europe—including
large numbers of persecuted Jews from the Russian Empire.

By the end of the 19th century, the majority of Americans
were of German ethnicity. Even today, 46 million Americans
are of German descent (light blue on the map). The rest of the
top five ethnicities are Black or African American (38 million,
magenta, Mexican (34 million, pink), Irish (83 million, dark
purple), English (24 million, light purple). This population count
is complicated by the region in the southeast, stretching from
the Appalachian Mountains to northern Texas, where the largest

Modern World History 185,

group calls itself “American” and people do not attribute their
origin to any foreign nation. These 22 million people are
probably mostly of English or Scotch-Irish descent, based on
the history of the region. Statewide, the German pluralities
range from 11% in Florida to 48% in North Dakota, which
explains why the capital is named after Prussian Chancellor
Otto von Bismarck.

Questions for Discussion

Why was the US considered a "safety valve” for excess
European population?

Could a large population of “hyphenated” Americans with
some connection to their original country pose a problem?

The Industrial Revolution

Social changes in Europe and America are a direct result of the
Industrial Revolution - as are many of the changes in the less
developed world we will discuss in a later chapter. So before
we look at the rest of the world, let’s look more closely at
industrialization.

The last two hundred years of human history is also the story
of the Industrial Revolution and its affects. The life of a peasant
living in France, Mexico, China, India, or Ethiopia in 100 CE
was not that different from that of a similar peasant living in
the same place 200 years earlier or later. But, because of
technology, industrialization, and urbanization, today’s world is
considerably different today than it was 200 years ago. In fact,
the change has accelerated: we live much differently than our
parents did when they were our age. Consider how many of you
may be reading this on a hand-held electronic device, which
were not all that common even ten years ago. The acceleration
of life in many aspects is just one of the results of the

186 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

unprecedented worldwide technological innovations of the last
two centuries.

Even today, there are five necessary inputs that are required
for industrialization: capital, technology, an energy source,
availability of labor, and consumers. By the late 1700s, Great
Britain had all of these and became the birthplace of the
industrial revolution. Continental Europe and the United States
soon followed.

But, why Great Britain?
Capital—wealth that is
invested to create more
wealth—was available to
merchants and others who
benefitted from world trade.
The British dominated the
slave trade and _ the
Textiles were the leading industry of the Corresponding cultivation of
Industrial Revolution, and mechanized sugar during the 18th century,
factories, powered by a central water wheel and those involved in the
or steam engine, were the new workplace.
trade accumulated great
wealth. Furthermore, the East India Company was also a source
of capital through their trade with South Asia in tea and textiles.
The Company also was the model for a successful joint-stock
company, in which individual investors purchased shares,
which spread ownership and limited financial liability, allowing
for greater risk-taking. Soon, factories would be following the
same joint-stock model in order to accumulate the necessary
capital for investment.

New technology also made mass production possible, which
first occurred in the British textile industry. The spinning jenny
and power looms increased the efficiency of spinning wool and
cotton, and then weaving the thread and yarn into cloth. From
this beginning, inventors began seeing the possibilities of
mechanical production in other areas such as processed foods,
clothing, paper, and household items. Even today, countries
usually begin on the path to industrialization through the textile
and processed food industries.

Great Britain also had abundant energy sources to power the


Modern World History 187

machines. Like flour mills, textile mills initially used the power
of rivers to spin water wheels and turbines connected to
spinning and weaving machines. Later, the development of an
efficient coal-fired steam engine by Scottish the engineer James
‘Watt made it possible to locate factories closer to cities,
transportation hubs, workers, and consumers. Both water and
coal are still important sources of energy throughout the world.

Agricultural improvements in the previous century and the
introduction of new staple crops like the potato, imported from
the Americas, produced more food using less labor. Improved
nutrition allowed Britain’s population to grow, increasing the
number of people available for work in the factories. With a
larger population involved in a wage economy, producing goods
for others and not for themselves, Great Britain also created
consumers for the textiles, foods, and other products
manufactured in new factories. Soon, British merchants were
selling industrial products to Continental Europe and to an
increasingly important market of consumers in Britain’s
colonies. The ability to sell manufactured goods to a “captive”
colonial market added to the rush for overseas empires by the
European powers, the United States, and Japan in the 19th and
early 20th centuries. Every nation wanted consumers for the
products of the “home country” and wanted to lock up the
valuable natural resources needed by the industries of the
empire.

Question for Discussion

What were Great Britain’s main advantages that allowed it to
dominate the early industrial revolution?


188 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The Industrial Revolution
saw a gradual transition from
handicrafts made in the home
or in small shops to
manufactures produced in
factories, which in _ itself
caused social and economic
disruption—and
improvement—among
Z ordinary workers and their
Hand:spinning yarn to make *homespun’_famnilies. In early America, for
clothing. example, a regular part of

women’s work was spinning
thread and yarn from wool, flax, or cotton at home, then
weaving cloth and making “homespun” clothing for their
families. This was hard, slow work, and took up a lot of women’s
time. As soon as they were able to buy cloth from textile mills,
women took advantage of the opportunity to devote much
more of their time to other tasks around the farmstead. Often,
they began market gardening or keeping an extra cow and
churning butter to earn “pin money.” Pins were an example of a
manufactured product farm families needed that could not be
made on the farm. Pins and other such necessities were usually
supplied by peddlers who walked across the countryside in the
days before easy access to stores, and then later by general
storekeepers.

The other side of handicraft
manufacture, though, was the
type of work done by the

Huguenot
weavers—descendants of
refugee French

Protestants—in East London.
This was a whole community
of people who specialized in
weaving using tools and {uddites breaking a jacquard loom.
techniques that were available

before the advent of large-scale textile mills. They were put out


Modern World History 189

of business by the more efficient manufacturing systems that
went along with the new technology, but they did not give up
without a fight. Many became “Luddites,” part of amovement of
handicraft workers that secretly entered factories and destroyed
machinery, blaming the fictional “Ned Ludd” for the acts of
sabotage (a word that refers to the wooden clogs workers wore in
France, which they would throw into the machinery to break it).
Governments were quick to crack down on Luddites - a couple
of executions quickly took the wind out of their sails.

As mentioned above, industrialization was possible because
farms were producing high yields in the early 19th century,
creating both an available workforce and a consumer market
for many of the products of early industry. In addition, nations
like Britain with colonies had another lucrative market for
manufactures. Even after the American Revolution and the War
of 1812, the United States remained a supplier of raw materials
like grain, timber, cotton, and salted pork to the former “home
country.” In return, Britain shipped its manufactured goods to
ports like New York, where they were carried inland on the Erie
Canal, and New Orleans, where they made their way up the
Mississippi River to the interior. Britain also cultivated trade
relationships with other new nations like those of Latin
America. British representatives like the envoy sent to Simon
Bolivar’s Congress of the Americas worked hard to convince
these new nations not to go to the expense of trying to develop
their own industries but instead to ship raw materials to Britain
in exchange for cheap consumer goods from British factories.

Questions for Discussion

Why might “Luddites” or others oppose industrialization?

What were the advantages of industrial production?


190 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The role of governments in
industrialization should not
be overlooked. Official British
trade missions argued the
benefits of “free trade” now
that Britain’s manufacturers
had gained the advantage in
producing low-cost goods.
But the devotion to free
markets championed by
Adam Smith and his disciples
was new-found. When
inexpensive cotton calicoes
from India in the 1720s had
begun to be preferred for

nina gf ta tah making English clothing, the
domestic wool industry had
Portrait of Adam Smith, 1790 pressured Parliament into

passing the Calico Acts to
prohibit their import. But later, when the British textile industry
began using technology that gave Britain an advantage in cotton
cloth production, the government did not consider the
complaints of the East London weavers, and even took steps to
protect trade secrets and prevent too rapid a technology transfer
to help British industry profit on its innovations. Britain began
producing cotton cloth even more inexpensively than
India—and suddenly the British began preaching about “free
trade” and pushing to erase any tariffs or regulations that might
prevent British textiles from dominating world markets.

The governments of Continental Europe and the United
States quickly tired of simply being a source of raw materials
for British factories and a market for British goods. To support
economic development, these governments began taxing
imports with tariffs to protect emerging industries from a flood
of British manufactured goods. Tariffs increased the price of
imports to consumers, encouraging them to buy the now-
competitive domestically-produced goods. Protection from
foreign competition has helped many fledgling industries get
off the ground in developing nations. However, if industries

Modern World History 191

remain protected, they may have less incentive to become
internationally competitive in price or quality. Governments
that choose to constantly raise tariffs run the risk of subsidizing
their industries’ inefficiencies and reducing the welfare of their
consumers as industrial improvements in other countries lower
the price of imported products.

Transportation, Steam Power, and Interchangeable Parts

Most histories begin the Industrial Revolution with steam
engines and many mention that by the 1820s steam-powered
looms had displaced the hand weavers in the cotton industry.
This description actually misses a whole generation of
innovation and growth when textile mills were powered by
water. The Scottish textile factories of New Lanark, for example,
were begun in 1786 by David Dale using water-power
technology developed by Richard Arkwright in the 1770s. New
Lanark was built on the Clyde River in Scotland, and all of
its machines were powered by the river until the mills closed
in 1968. The American textile mills in New England that
dominated the world market in the second half of the 19th
century also used water power. The men who started the Boston
Manufacturing Company, that built the cities of Lowell and
Lawrence in Massachusetts to take advantage of the water power
of the Merrimack River, visited New Lanark in 1811 to learn the
technology before they began their venture.

192 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The Clyde River and New Lanark in 2009

Robert Owen and his partners had bought the mills in 1799
from David Dale, Owen’s father-in-law. Sensitive to the negative
social changes that industrial growth had brought to other parts
of Britain, Owen built schools for the children of his workers
and social organizations for the families. He put an end to the
long-standing custom of forcing workers to buy only from the
company store and tried to make New Lanark a real, living
town. Owen’s partners had objected to his philanthropy,
claiming that healthy, happy, well-educated workers did not
really boost the bottom line. Rather than fight with them, Owen
simply bought his partners out.

Questions for Discussion

What are the pros and cons of tariffs?

Why would an industrialist like Robert Owen be concerned
about his workers’ social welfare?


Modern World History 193

Lake Onterio

i “Rochester
ae i rat

d
7

The present route of the Erie Canal, which is pretty close to its original route.

The initial expansion of transportation networks for mass-
production industries was also water-based. In industrializing
countries, canal-building became a craze from the 1820s
through the 1840s. Many local canals connected newly-
established towns and villages to markets all over the United
States, Great Britain, and continental Europe. The Erie Canal in
New York State, for instance, connected Buffalo, on Lake Erie,
to Albany, where the canal met the Hudson River, navigable
all the way to New York City. Over 350 miles (580 kilometers)
long when completed in 1825, the Erie Canal included thirty-six
locks to ease barges down a gradual decline of more than 550
feet (170 meters). As agricultural goods shipped down the Canal
eventually made their way to markets in industrializing East
Coast cities, pioneers established farms all along the Canal, and
the Erie Canal was key to the western settlement and expansion
of the United States, especially before 1865. Canal laborers were
frequently Irish immigrants, who often settled nearby, once the
canal was built.

Steam power soon became extremely important in
transportation, as well. Until steam engines were put on
riverboats, shipping had depended on either wind and river
currents or on human and animal power on canal towpaths.
Goods could easily be floated south from farms on America’s
rivers for example, but it was much more difficult and expensive
to ship products against the currents to the frontier. Flatboats
and rafts accumulated at downstream ports such as New Orleans
and were often broken down and burned as firewood. Steam
engines made it possible to sail upstream as easily and quickly as

194 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

down, causing an explosion of travel and shipping that radically
changed frontier life. Ocean-going steamships made travel and
shipping quicker and safer and allowed travelers and merchants
to keep to regular schedules.

Steam engines were a
product of early European
industrialism. The first steam
patent was granted to a
Spanish inventor named
Jeronimo Beaumont in 1606,
whose engine drove a pump
used to drain mines. The

“Consternation at the sight of Fulton's French scientist Papin built
monster,” from an 1870 story of the his steam piston in 1680 after
Clermont's first voyage up the Hudson was wes

River. visiting the Royal Society in

London and_ Englishman
James Watt’s 1781 engine was the first to produce rotary power
that could be adapted to drive mills, wheels, and propellers.
Robert Fulton, an American inventor who had previously
patented a canal-dredging machine, visited Paris and caught
steam fever. Fulton sailed an experimental steamboat model on
the Seine, and then returned home and launched the first
commercial American steamboat on the Hudson River in 1807.
The Clermont was able to sail upriver 150 miles from New York
City to Albany in 32 hours. In 1811, Fulton built the New Orleans
in Pittsburgh and began regular steamboat service on the
Mississippi.

The other transportation technology enabled by steam power,
of course, was the railroad, which was even more revolutionary
than the steamboat. In spite of their power and speed, steam-
powered riverboats depended on rivers or occasionally on
canals to run, but a railroad could be built almost anywhere.
Suddenly, the expansion of commerce was no longer limited by
the routes nature had provided into the frontier.

Modern World History 195,

Small railroads using horses
were already common in
mining operations in Great
Britain and Europe before the
advent of steam power. The
first railroads in the United
States had actually been built
on the East Coast before a
steam engine was available to
power them. Trains of cars
like stage-coaches on rails. gaitimore.

But after Englishman George

Stephenson’s locomotives began pulling passengers and freight
in northwestern England in the mid-1820s, Americans quickly
switched to steam. The first locomotive used to pull cars in the
United States was the Tom Thumb, built in 1830 for the
Baltimore and Ohio Railroad. Although Tom Thumb lost its
maiden race against a horse-drawn train, Baltimore and Ohio
owners were convinced by the demonstration of steam
technology and committed to developing steam locomotives.
The B&O railroad, which had been established in 1827 to
compete with the Erie Canal, already advertised itself as a faster
way to move people and freight from the interior to the coast.
Adding steam engines accelerated rail’s advantage over canal
and river shipping.

Questions for Discussion

Why were canals and steam power so transformative?

What was the advantage of railroads over steamships?

Factories housed machinery that was too large or too
expensive to be used in home production, or that used power
sources like steam or water power that weren't available to
small-scale producers. The machines themselves usually

196 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

displaced workers, like when the water-powered looms of New
Lanark destroyed the careers of hand-loom weavers by
producing large quantities of cloth at a low cost the weavers
couldn’t match. However, the new industries also created new
jobs. And often, although it took fewer people to weave a given
amount of cloth using the new technology, the new industries
were usually producing products for much larger (sometimes
even global) markets. So much cloth was made in the new
industrial textile centers like New Lanark in Scotland or Lowell
in America that there were often a lot of new jobs — sometimes
more than had previously been available in that region.

The new factory jobs required less skill than artisanal
craftwork, especially when the worker was making a larger
number of standardized products. Previously, a carpenter
needed to be a skilled craftsman to design and assemble a
custom-built chair, but with industrialization, a less-skilled lathe
operator could turn large quantities of legs that could be
assembled into any number of chairs of a standard pattern.
Workers doing lower-skilled jobs became as standardized as the
things they made, and could be employed at a much lower
cost. While more people might be working in a new factory
compared to an old-fashioned craft workshop, each worker's
wages would almost always be lower.

And starting a factory was not the same as starting a craft
workshop. It was no longer a slow organic process where an
apprentice became a master craftsman, developed a clientele,
opened his own business, then hired a few workers or
apprentices of his own. The people who started factories were
often not even experts at the process they were going to do
- they were capitalists and investors who had access to the
large sums of money needed to erect a factory and fill it with
technology and workers. A class of owners grew, who had little
or no connection to the workers they employed.

Modern World History 197

“First cotton gin’ from Harpers Weekly. 1869 illustration depicting the cotton gin’s first
use 70 years earlier.

American inventor Eli Whitney (1765-1825) is remembered for
the cotton gin, which removed the seeds from cotton fiber
much more quickly than they could be picked out by hand.
The cotton gin helped propel the American South into world
leadership in raw cotton. By the 1850s, American plantations
supplied 80 to 90% of the world cotton market. But Whitney's
most important contribution to industrialization was his
technique for using machine tools to produce interchangeable
parts for firearms. With Whitney’s standardized, machined
parts, it no longer took a skilled gunsmith to build a weapon.
Anybody with basic skills could assemble and also disassemble,
repair, and maintain a rifle or handgun. Weapons became more
reliable and the technique was quickly applied to other
industries. Of course, since most of the intelligence in the job
had been moved into the machine, the machine gradually
became more valuable and the machine operator less.
Whitney’s process made guns more reliable and less expensive,
but he turned not only the gun parts into interchangeable parts,
but also the factory employees themselves. The process
continues today: in the Tesla car factory, robots running

198 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

sophisticated software do most of the skilled tasks like welding,
while a smaller number of human workers spend most of their
time moving assemblies from place to place and programming
the robots.

Question for Discussion

How does technology affect workers and their jobs?

Socialism: Addressing the Negative Effects of Industrialization

Although it produced quality products at low prices for a
growing consumer market, industrialization disrupted the lives
of workers. Since jobs were in factory towns and cities, people
moved from rural areas to growing metropolitan areas. The
change was often very abrupt for those who migrated: they lost
the slower rhythms of agricultural life to the time clock and
subway schedules of the accelerated industrialized world.

Additionally, people were cut off from communities in which
they had lived for generations, and forced to find new social
relations—or fall into lonely and desperate lives. Although jobs
were the attraction for the new migrants, there was no guarantee
of permanent positions in the new economy. Financial cycles
of boom and bust affected urban workers the most. Families
were disrupted by unemployment, while traditional ideas of
masculinity and femininity could be challenged when the male
breadwinner was replaced by a spouse or daughter as the main
source of family income, leading to violence, alcoholism and
abandonment of the family by men.

Cities were often unprepared to receive so many people so
quickly. Inadequate housing, sanitation, and transportation
contributed to environment degradation and psychological
stress. In the following illustration of London in the 1840s,
consider life for people who grew up on farms now living under
these conditions, with no sign of plant life to be seen:

Modern World History 199

“Over London-by Rail”, from Gustave Doré’s 1872 book, London: A Pilgrimage.

Many intellectuals took up the challenge of rethinking how to
make society more just for industrial workers. While the U.S.
‘War of Independence had inspired discussion of governments
formed by “we, the people,’ and the French Revolution had
spread the idea of legal equality of all citizens under law, a
new understanding of capital and labor seemed to be needed.
Workers in the new industries provided all of the labor at low
wages and in dangerous conditions, while often absentee
owners and investors reaped the profits. A number of
industrialists such as Robert Owen tried to make their factories
more humane, embracing the cooperative movement and even
improving workers’ welfare with schools for their children and
social gatherings. However, many business owners did not see
their responsibility to workers extending beyond providing a
wage for the work they performed.

Karl Marx, a German philosopher, criticized the growth of
capitalism and industrialization, and brought a new analysis to
economic thinking. Marx saw industrialization as the last stage
of human development, a final struggle between two opposites

200 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

that would create something new. According to Marx, this last
battle was between the more numerous workers, whom he
called the proletariat and the industrial capitalists, the
bourgeoisie. Marx believed the proletariat would inevitably
defeat the bourgeoisie, seize the factories, and create a socialist
utopia.

After the final battle, Marx predicted a world where the
workers or their government controlled the “means of
production’, the factories and farms. Instead of religion, which
Marx said was “the opiate of the people”, workers would develop
a “class consciousness” that would help extend the worldwide
proletarian revolution. Marx imagined a global working class
that transcended nations, races, and ethnic groups—his vision
was for an international dictatorship of the proletariat, where all
workers would unite regardless of ethnicity, language, religion,
or any of the identities that had prevented European nations
from forming a lasting empire.

Modern World History 201

“Pyramid of Capitalist System’, published in 1911 by The International Publishing
Company, Cleveland OH.

Karl Marx and his associate, Friedrich Engels, published their
ideas in the Communist Manifesto in February, 1848, just as
Europe entered a year of attempted revolutions. Since these
upheavals did not bring the promised dictatorship of the
proletariat, Marx (who went into exile in London) continued
to publish his theories and predictions, and organized the first
Marxist socialist parties. He died in 1883, by which time various
socialist and social democratic parties had participated in

202 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

elections, but he did not live to see an actual “socialist”
revolution, which would finally occur in Russia in 1917.

Even so, by the time of Marx’s death, his ideas and other
forms of socialism were motivating labor organizers to form
unions in which workers could negotiate for better wages and
working conditions with owners, under threat of
striking—stopping work at a factory and preventing others from
replacing them at the machines. Socialism and communism,
and their influence in governments and labor relations, will be
examined more fully in later chapters.

Questions for Discussion

Why did many workers find industrial cities challenging to live
in?

Consider socialism's criticism of capitalism. Is it justified? Are
Marx's expectations realistic?

Fertilizer

As mentioned previously, industrialization depends on a stable
foundation of agriculture to provide enough food for workers
to increase the population and provide enough food for people
to eat. As farming becomes more efficient, not everyone needs
to focus on subsistence and workers are available to move to
cities and take jobs in factories. The remaining farms become
bigger and take on the responsibility of feeding the growing
urban populations.

Earlier agricultural societies in Europe had depended on crop
rotation to rebuild soils after periods of intensive planting. But
as farmers saw an opportunity to earn money in the market,
feeding urban industrial workers, some were unwilling to accept
the idea that a significant portion of their farms would be fallow
each year. They preferred to amend their soils rather than
waiting for fertility to regenerate naturally. But few farmers had

Modern World History 203

access to enough manure to supplement all their soil. Luckily,
there was an alternative.

The first commercial fertilizers were made from guano, the
droppings of seabirds living on islands off the western shores of
South America. Guano comes from the Quechua Indian word
Wanu, which means any excrement used as a soil additive.
Guano was dry, light, and highly concentrated. Natives of the
Andes have mined guano on the coast and islands for at least
1,500 years, and Spanish colonial records noted that Inca rulers
had considered protecting the cormorants that were the main
source of guano so important, that disturbing the birds’ nesting
areas a capital offense. Guano was carried from the coast up into
the Andes on the backs of llamas, for use on the terraced farms
surrounding highland cities like Machu Picchu.

Although surrounded — by
ocean, the islands off the
western coast of South
America are arid. Like the
deserts they face on the
mainland, some experience
no annual rainfall at all.
Seabirds such as cormorants
and pelicans have lived on
these islands by the millions,
for thousands of years. Over
that time, they've left literal
mountains of droppings,
which due to the lack of rain
have simply piled up. The
Workers mining guano on a Peruvian guano contains the ideal
island, 1860. percentages of nitrogen,

phosphorus, and potassium
to make it an excellent fertilizer without any mixing. It simply
needs to be chopped off the mountain, ground up, and spread
on fields.

The Prussian explorer Alexander von Humboldt visited the
islands around 1802, and publicized guano’s value as a fertilizer

204 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

throughout Europe. Seeing a lucrative business opportunity,
Europeans and Americans fell on the area in a guano rush,
and by the middle of the century several nations had enlisted
the work of Chinese peasants in a Pacific labor system that has
been compared with the slavery of the Atlantic world. Although
the Chinese workers were technically free, many were debtors
who had been tricked into labor contracts promising work in
California. Once they reached the guano islands and realized
they had been duped, there was no way off. Over a hundred
thousand Chinese workers were imported to the islands in the
second half of the nineteenth century.

Guano was so profitable that the U.S. Congress passed a Guano
Islands Act in 1856. The law provided an incentive for American
sailors to find and claim undefended islands for America by
giving the discoverer exclusive rights to the guano recovered.
Islands claimed under the Guano Islands Act include parts of
the Hawaiian chain, Midway Atoll, part of American Samoa,
and several islands still disputed with Colombia. The guano
islands off the western coast of South America were so valuable
that two wars were fought over them. Chile and Peru fought
Spain in the Chincha Islands War, 1864-66, and defeated the
Spanish Empire. Then, once Spain’s claim had been successfully
set aside, Chile took many of the guano islands from Peru, along
with the nitrate fields of the Atacama Desert, in the War of the
Pacific, 1879-83.

Modern World History 205

The Atacama Desert, now controlled by Chile, is the driest place on Earth.

After about 1870, guano was overtaken
as a source of nitrogen by nitrate-rich
desert soils called Caliche. These soils
were discovered in the Atacama desert,
a region regarded as the driest place
on earth that lay partly in Chile, partly
in Peru, and partly in Bolivia. When
all three nations rushed to extract and
process the Caliche, Chile challenged
its northern rivals for the nitrate fields.
Chile’s victory in the War of the Pacific
extended its border northwards to
encompass. the Atacama_ desert,
including all the coastal territory that
had belonged to Bolivia. Many ethnic
Bolivians living around the port city of
Arica still dream of throwing off the
Chilean yoke and_ winning their
country access to the Pacific again.

Defeating its northern neighbors in the War of the Pacific made
Chile the undisputed power on the west coast of the Americas

206 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

and generated an economic boom. The nitrate Chile
monopolized was valuable both as a fertilizer and as a key
ingredient in explosives and munitions. But mining and
processing nitrate from Chile’s desert soil required much more
capital than digging guano. Chile attracted British investors, and
soon joint ventures began shipping a million tons of nitrate
per year out of the South American desert. Production grew
steadily until 1914, when World War I created new incentives for
Britain’s enemies to find an alternative to Caliche nitrate. We
will discuss this shift to an economic form of imperialism, by
European nations, Britain, and even the United States, in the
next chapter.

Question for Discussion

Why did fertilizer become important enough to fight wars
over?

19th Century China and Japan

As described in Chapter Two, the origins of the modern world
begin in China and by 1500, under the Ming dynasty,
population, culture and technology was flourishing, and
Confucian-trained government officials administered the
empire. However, after tremendous successes including the
voyages of Zheng He, a degree of corruption and misrule crept
into Ming imperial rule by the next century, allowing the armies
of the Manchu, from north of the Great Wall, to instal a new
dynasty, the Qing (“Pure”).

The new Qing emperors reinvigorated the Confucian ruling
class, and China once again enjoyed a high degree of social
stability, economic prosperity, and international trade.
However, Qing society rested on the laurels of previous
accomplishments, regarded foreigners as ignorant barbarians,

Modern World History 207

and was not receptive to expanding European influence in the
region, led by the British.

By the mid-1700s, the British East India Company dominated
trade and the administration of India. British ships carried
Indian cloth and other products to the rest of the world; the
tea dumped in Boston Harbor in 1773 came from India. The
East India Company was very interested in opening up Chinese
markets to trade, but China was self-sufficient and uninterested
in anything the British had to offer. Chinese teas, jade, silks
and porcelain were in high demand in the West, but the only
payment China would accept was silver. For centuries the silver
of the New World had been making its way into the Chinese
economy, where it became the money supply of the world’s
largest economy. The East India Company’s supply of silver was
limited.

>

19th-century western illustration of Chinese opium smokers.

Luckily, India provided the Company with an alternative:
opium from poppies, harvested in India and Burma. Although
the Qing had outlawed opium imports in 1729, the East India
Company controlled a virtually unlimited supply. At the
beginning of the 19th century an annual average of 4,500 trunks
of opium were reaching smugglers on the South China coast.
The Company focused on importing opium into China, where

208 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

addicts were willing to pay in silver. By 1839, over 40,000
133-pound chests of opium were bought by Chinese drug
dealers. More than 1% of China’s 400 million people became
addicted - many of them rich bureaucrats. China rapidly
shifted from being a magnet for silver with a huge trade surplus
to a net importer whose treasuries were rapidly dwindling.

Some Chinese officials
wanted to legalize opium so
the empire could tax it, but
Confucian moralists won the
policy debate. In 1839, the
emperor sent one of China’s
most distinguished officials,
Lin Zexu, to the trading
settlement of Canton to
stamp out the opium trade.
Lin blockaded the European
trading district, raided and
searched the foreigners’
warehouses, confiscated
20,000 chests containing
1200 tons of opium, and
Commissioner Lin Zexu, dubbed “Lin of dumped it all into the ocean.
Clear Skies” for his moral integrity. The East India Company

complained about its losses in
London, and Queen Victoria sent a fleet including four steam-
powered battleships. Lightly-armored Chinese war junks,
designed to fight river pirates, were severely outgunned. The
limited range of Qing cannon compared to British artillery
allowed the invaders to pummel Chinese defenses from a safe
distance.

The Treaty of Nanking (called the “Unequal Treaty” by the
Chinese) opened five Chinese ports to European traders, gave
the British the island of Hong Kong, and required China to
establish diplomatic relations with Great Britain as an equal
power rather than continuing to treat all foreigners as
barbarians unworthy of official notice. The Chinese were also

Modern World History 209

compelled to pay Britain for the opium Lin had destroyed.
China’s embarrassing defeat by the British was followed by
another defeat in the Second Opium War (1856-60) that resulted
in another unequal treaty giving access to French and Russian
merchants. By the 1890s, 90 ports of call were available to more
than 300,000 European and American traders, diplomats, and
missionaries.

Armored, steam-powered British warships were able to easily destroy Chinese junks
built for coastal defense.

Questions for Discussion

Were the British justified in their response to China's demand
for silver in payment of their manufactures?

What was the social impact of opium addiction on China?

The weakness of the Qing empire against foreign aggression
was exacerbated by the ongoing opium crisis and by crumbling
infrastructure and famine in the countryside. Magistrates and
officials addicted to opium were ineffective and often diverted

210 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

money that should have been spent maintaining dams and
irrigation canals to their own uses. A series of peasant revolts
swept through south China in the 1850s and 1860s, most notably
the Taiping Rebellion which killed 30 million people over a
fifteen-year period. The leader of the rebellion was Hong
Xiuquan, a young man who had become unhinged after failing
the grueling civil service exam four times. Hong had a vision
and declared he was the little brother of Christ who had been
sent to China to rid the land of the Manchu foreigners and their
Confucianist culture. When Hong captured Nanjing and in 1853
made it the capital of the Taiping, he first killed all the Manchu
men and then marched the women outside the city and burned
them to death.

Hong’s brutality and his strange interpretation of Christianity
may have alienated some Europeans, but his ban on opium
use antagonized more. Europe and Britain threw their support
behind the Qing dynasty they had just defeated in the Opium
‘Wars. Hong and his allies were unable to avoid the temptation
to quarrel and plot against each other, which weakened their
leadership. Two Taiping attempts to take Shanghai in 1860 and
1862 were repelled with British and French assistance. In 1864,
the Qing and their European allies retook Nanjing and ended
the regime, but the resistance continued until 1871, when the last
Taiping army was completely wiped out by government forces.

Modern World History 211

Ascene of the Taiping Rebellion, 1850-1864

Elsewhere in Asia, Japan’s insular self-confidence was also
challenged by forced contact with foreigners in the 19th
century. The Japanese home islands have been united under
the same imperial dynasty since the 5th century CE; the current
emperor comes from the longest line of any monarch in the
world. As an independent island nation, the Japanese were able
to selectively accept or reject ideas and innovations from China,
the powerful empire to the west. Often they would modify
and incorporate aspects of Chinese culture, like writing and
Buddhism, to their own circumstances, Native Japanese Shinto
religion, for instance, embraces the teachings of Buddha.
Beginning in the late 1100s, the emperor ruled indirectly,
ceding power to Shoguns, who commanded an army of lesser
nobles known as samurai. The Shoguns held back invasions by
Mongol armies in the 1200s and maintained a large degree of
separation for the empire from outside religions and cultures.
This self-isolation ended in the mid-19th century, when the
United States, which had been largely shut out of European-
dominated China, decided to try and open trade with Japan.

212 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Commodore Matthew C. Perry's visit of Kanagawa, near the site of present-day
Yokohama on March 8, 1854.

American Commodore Matthew Perry sailed into Tokyo Bay
in July 1853 with a squadron of four warships and threatened
to open fire on the capital if the Japanese refused to negotiate.
To demonstrate, Perry destroyed several buildings around the
harbor. The American fleet withdrew to allow the Japanese to
consider their options and when they returned a year later, the
Japanese agreed to a “Treaty of Peace and Amity.” Three years
later a “Treaty of Amity and Commerce” was signed, offered
to the Japanese by American diplomats as a less-invasive
alternative to the aggressive colonialism of Britain and France
in China following the Opium War.

The Japanese decided, “if we take the initiative, we can
dominate; if we do not, we will be dominated.” Modernization
and the embrace of new technology went hand in hand with
reorganization of the national government in what became
known as the Meiji Restoration. The 15th Tokugawa shogun
resigned in November 1867 and direct control of government
was restored to the Emperor Meiji. The samurai class (which
numbered nearly 2 million) was slowly disbanded and a
nationwide universal military draft was instituted in 1873.
Disgruntled samurai rebelled in 1876, the Satsuma Rebellion

Modern World History 213

grew into a short civil war in which the newly-formed Imperial
Japanese Army won a decisive victory. The industrialization of
Japan accelerated, building the strong nation we will see taking
its place on the world stage in the next chapter.

cre

Satirical drawing in the magazine Punch ( September 1894), showing the victory of
“small” Japan over “large” China.

Meanwhile, in China, other rebellions such as the Nian
Rebellion (1853-68), the Panthay Rebellion (1855-73), and the
Dungan revolt (1862-77) continued to challenge the Qing
regime. In 1895, China lost its control of its tribute state Korea
to Japan in the first Sino-Japanese War. The humiliating defeat
for the Qing empire showed their efforts to modernize China’s
military had failed and was a catalyst for a series of political
actions led by revolutionaries like Sun Yat-sen. China ended the
nineteenth century under the control of European powers and
generally considered to be “the weak man of Asia.”


214 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Compare the Taiping Rebellion to the US Civil War, which
happened about the same time. How were the two conflicts
similar and different?

Why do you think Japan was more able to rapidly respond to
the challenge of western culture?

Primary Sources

LIN ZEXU, LETTER TO QUEEN VICTORIA (1839)

Looking over the public documents accompanying the
tribute sent (by your predecessors) on various occasions, we
find the following: “All the people of my country, arriving at
the Central Land for purposes of trade, have to feel grateful
to the great emperor for the most perfect justice, for the
kindest treatment,” and other words to that effect. Delighted
did we feel that the kings of your honorable nation so clearly
understood the great principles of propriety, and were so
deeply grateful for the heavenly goodness (of our
emperor):—therefore, it was that we of the heavenly dynasty
nourished and cherished your people from afar, and
bestowed upon them redoubled proofs of our urbanity and
kindness. It is merely from these circumstances, that your
country— deriving immense advantage from its commercial
intercourse with us, which has endured now two hundred
years—has become the rich and flourishing kingdom that it is
said to be!

But, during the commercial intercourse which has existed
so long, among the numerous foreign merchants resorting
hither, are wheat and tares, good and bad; and of these latter
are some, who, by means of introducing opium by stealth,
have seduced our Chinese people, and caused every province
of the land to overflow with that poison. These then know
merely to advantage themselves, they care not about injuring
others! This is a principle which heaven's Providence
repugnates; and which mankind conjointly look upon with
abhorrence! Moreover, the great emperor hearing of it,
actually quivered with indignation, and especially dispatched


Modern World History 215

me, the commissioner, to Canton, that in conjunction with the
viceroy and lieut.-governor of the province, means might be
taken for its suppression!

Every native of the Inner Land who sells opium, as also all
who smoke it, are alike adjudged to death. Were we then
to go back and take up the crimes of the foreigners, who,
by selling it for many years have induced dreadful calamity
and robbed us of enormous wealth, and punish them with
equal severity, our laws could not but award to them absolute
annihilation! But, considering that these said foreigners did
yet repent of their crime, and with a sincere heart beg for
mercy; that they took 20,283 chests of opium piled up in
their store-ships, and through Elliot, the superintendent of
the trade of your said country, petitioned that they might be
delivered up to us, when the same were all utterly destroyed,
of which we, the imperial commissioner and colleagues, made
a duly prepared memorial to his majesty;—considering these
circumstances, we have happily received a fresh proof of the
extraordinary goodness of the great emperor, inasmuch as
he who voluntarily comes forward, may yet be deemed a
fit subject for mercy, and his crimes be graciously remitted
him. But as for him who again knowingly violates the laws,
difficult indeed will it be thus to go on repeatedly pardoning!
He or they shall alike be doomed to the penalties of the
new statute. We presume that you, the sovereign of your
honorable nation, on pouring out your heart before the altar
of eternal justice, cannot but command all foreigners with the
deepest respect to reverence our laws! If we only lay clearly
before your eyes, what is profitable and what is destructive,
you will then know that the statutes of the heavenly dynasty
cannot but be obeyed with fear and trembling!

Your honorable nation takes away the products of our
central land, and not only do you thereby obtain food and
support for yourselves, but moreover, by re-selling these
products to other countries you reap a threefold profit. Now
if you would only not sell opium, this threefold profit would
be secured to you: how can you possibly consent to forgo it
for a drug that is hurtful to men, and an unbridled craving
after gain that seems to know no bounds! Let us suppose that


216 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

foreigners came from another country, and brought opium
into England, and seduced the people of your country to
smoke it, would not you, the sovereign of the said country,
look upon such a procedure with anger, and in your just
indignation endeavor to get rid of it? Now we have always
heard that your highness possesses a most kind and
benevolent heart, surely then you are incapable of doing or
causing to be done unto another, that which you should not
wish another to do unto you!

Our celestial empire rules over ten thousand kingdoms!
Most surely do we possess a measure of godlike majesty
which ye cannot fathom! Still we cannot bear to slay or
exterminate without previous warning, and it is for this
reason that we now clearly make known to you the fixed laws
of our land. If the foreign merchants of your said honorable
nation desire to continue their commercial intercourse, they
then must tremblingly obey our recorded statutes, they must
cut off for ever the source from which the opium flows, and
on no account make an experiment of our laws in their own
persons! Let then your highness punish those of your subjects
who may be criminal, do not endeavor to screen or conceal
them, and thus you will secure peace and quietness to your
possessions, thus will you more than ever display a proper
sense of respect and obedience, and thus may we unitedly
enjoy the common blessings of peace and happiness. What
greater joy! What more complete felicity than this!

Let your highness immediately, upon the receipt of this
communication, inform us promptly of the state of matters,
and of the measure you are pursuing utterly to put a stop to
the opium evil. Please let your reply be speedy. Do Do not on
any account make excuses or procrastinate. A most important
communication.


Modern World History 217

Quotes from Robert Owen

"To preserve permanent good health, the state of mind
must be taken into consideration." (The Book of the New Moral
World)

“Eight hours daily labour is enough for any human being,
and under proper arrangements sufficient to afford an ample
supply of food, raiment and shelter, or the necessaries and
comforts of life, and for the remainder of his time, every
person is entitled to education, recreation and sleep.”
(Foundation Axioms of Society for Promoting National
Regeneration’, 1833)

“ls it not the interest of the human race, that everyone
should be so taught and placed, that he would find his highest
enjoyment to arise from the continued practice of doing alll in
his power to promote the well-being, and happiness, of every
man, woman, and child, without regard to their class, sect,
party, country or color?” (17th of "20 Questions to the Human
Race”, 1841)

“As there are a very great variety of religious sects in the
world (and which are probably adapted to different
constitutions under different circumstances, seeing there are
many good and conscientious characters in each), it is
particularly recommended, as a means of uniting the
inhabitants of the village into one family, that while each
faithfully adheres to the principles which he most approves,
at the same time all shall think charitably of their neighbors
respecting their religious opinions, and not presumptuously
suppose that theirs alone are right.” (Rules and Regulations for
the Inhabitants of New Lanark)

"The working classes may be injuriously degraded and
oppressed in three ways:

‘1st — When they are neglected in infancy
2nd — When they are overworked by their employer, and are
thus rendered incompetent from

ignorance to make a good use of high wages when they can
procure them.

3rd — When they are paid low wages for their labour


218 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

(Two Memorials on
Behalf of the Working Classes)
"To train and educate the rising generation will at all times
be the first object of society, to which every other will be
subordinate." (The Social System)

"To preserve permanent good health, the state of mind

must be taken into consideration.” (The Book of the New Moral
World)

Manifesto of the Communist Party, Marx &
Engels, 1848

In proportion as the bourgeoisie, i.e., capital, is developed,
in the same proportion is the proletariat, the modern working
class, developed — a class of laborers, who live only so long as
they find work, and who find work only so long as their labour
increases capital. These laborers, who must sell themselves
piecemeal, are a commodity, like every other article of
commerce, and are consequently exposed to all the
vicissitudes of competition, to all the fluctuations of the
market.

Owing to the extensive use of machinery, and to the
division of labor, the work of the proletarians has lost all
individual character, and, consequently, all charm for the
workman. He becomes an appendage of the machine, and it
is only the most simple, most monotonous, and most easily
acquired knack, that is required of him. Hence, the cost of
production of a workman is restricted, almost entirely, to the
means of subsistence that he requires for maintenance, and
for the propagation of his race. But the price of a commodity,
and therefore also of labour, is equal to its cost of production.
In proportion, therefore, as the repulsiveness of the work
increases, the wage decreases. Nay more, in proportion as
the use of machinery and division of labour increases, in the


Modern World History 219

same proportion the burden of toil also increases, whether
by prolongation of the working hours, by the increase of the
work exacted in a given time or by increased speed of
machinery, etc.

Modern Industry has converted the little workshop of the
patriarchal master into the great factory of the industrial
capitalist. Masses of laborers, crowded into the factory, are
organized like soldiers. As privates of the industrial army they
are placed under the command of a perfect hierarchy of
officers and sergeants. Not only are they slaves of the
bourgeois class, and of the bourgeois State; they are daily
and hourly enslaved by the machine, by the overlooker, and,
above all, by the individual bourgeois manufacturer himself.
The more openly this despotism proclaims gain to be its end
and aim, the more petty, the more hateful and the more
embittering it is.

The less the skill and exertion of strength implied in manual
labour, in other words, the more modern industry becomes
developed, the more is the labour of men superseded by
that of women. Differences of age and sex have no longer
any distinctive social validity for the working class. All are
instruments of labour, more or less expensive to use,
according to their age and sex.

Media Attributions

* Europe_1815_map_en © Alexander Altenhof is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

* Napoleon_sainthelene © Frantisek Xaver Sandmann is
licensed under a Public Domain license

* ChartistRiot © Alfred Pearse is licensed under a Public

220 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Domain license

* Irish_potato_famine_Bridget_O’Donnel © Illustrated
London News is licensed under a Public Domain
license

* 2880px-Census-2000-Data-Top-US-Ancestries-by-
County.svg © US Census is licensed under a Public
Domain license

* Powerloom_weaving_in_1835 © T. Allom is licensed
under a Public Domain license

* Spinninginthecolonialkitchen © Joel Dorman Steele
and Esther Baker Steele is licensed under a Public
Domain license

* FrameBreaking-1812 © Chris Sunde is licensed under a
Public Domain license

* 1920px-AdamSmith1790b © John Kay is licensed under
a Public Domain license

* ErieCanal_MP © Rosemary Wardley is licensed under
a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

* Clermont_illustration_-_Robert_Fulton_-
_Project_Gutenberg_¢Text_15161 © G.F. and E.B.
Bensell is licensed under a Public Domain license

+ Steam_Engine_-
_an_ad_in_Matchetts_Baltimore_Director_1831 © RJ
Matchett is licensed under a Public Domain license

* Cotton_gin_harpers © William L. Sheppard is licensed
under a Public Domain license

* Dore_London © Gustave Doré is licensed under a
Public Domain license

* Anti-capitalism_color—_Restored © Nedeljkovich,
Brashich, and Kuharich is licensed under a Public
Domain license

* 0019165 Two poor Chinese opium smokers. Gouache

painting on rice-pap © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Modern World History 221

Commissioner_Lin_Zexu © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Destroying_Chinese_war_junks,_by_E._Duncan_(184
8) © Edward Duncan is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Regaining_the_Provincial_City_Anqing2 © Wu Youru
is licensed under a Public Domain license

Commodore-Perry-Visit-Kanagawa-1854 © Wilhelm
Heine is licensed under a Public Domain license

JapanPunch29September1894 © Japan Punch is
licensed under a Public Domain license

[6]

Imperialism

Britannia carrying a large white flag labeled “Civilization” with British soldiers and
colonists behind her, advancing on a horde of natives, one carrying a flag labeled
“Barbarism".

The 19th century and the turn of the 20th century are often
described as a period when the power of many land-based
empires diminished and nationalism became the most
important organizing principle for societies around the world.
Actually, powerful nations in Europe and America pursued
overseas empires and expanded into Africa and East Asia, until a
wave of “decolonization” after World War Two. And even then,

222

Modern World History 223

“empires” have remained as important as ever in the late 20th
and the 2lst century, although the power of the new empires
that have been successful has been largely economic rather than
political.

Consider the decline of the empires we've already become
familiar with in earlier chapters, in Asia, Europe, and the
Muslim world. They were territorial empires that had used
military conquest to impose political control over wide
expanses of land adjacent to their ancestral homelands. They
existed by providing a degree of civil and economic order, in
exchange for taxes on the agricultural produce of the agrarian
populations they conquered. These empires usually left their
citizens more or less alone to speak their own languages,
practice their own religions, and observe their own cultural
traditions. Occasionally they took captives from conquered
lands, like the janissaries of the Ottoman Empire.

224 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

: &
_ IMPERIOS ESPANOL Y PORTUGUES ~

IMPERIOS ESPANHOL E PORTUGUES
SPANISH AND PORTEGUESE EMPIRES i

61790

a)

América
espanol

América
portuguesa

The Portuguese and Spanish began establishing the first
European overseas empires in Azores and Canary Islands in
the late 1400s, extending their overseas imperial project into
the Americas after 1492. In the process, the Spanish defeated
several land-based indigenous empires such as the Aztecs, Inca,
and Maya, and replaced the native rulers with Spanish Viceroys.
The British, French, Dutch, and others soon followed the
Iberians into the Caribbean and North America. All the
European colonies in the Americas were controlled by their
respective “mother” countries, sending resources like silver and
gold and agricultural products (especially sugar) to Europe, and
often required to trade only with the “mother” economy. As we
will see, Europeans continued this model of overseas empires in

Modern World History 225

the 1800s as Africa and parts of Asia came to be dominated by
outside imperial powers.

However, the new project of economic “neo-imperialism” also
appeared in the 19th century, especially in the new republics of
Latin America. In this case, supposedly independent countries
that had recently won their independence from the Spanish
and Portuguese empires, were economically dominated by
European and U.S. investors, still providing raw materials for
the “Great Powers” in exchange for finished industrial goods. As
presented later, nearly all of these new nations became indebted
to European banks and faced the humiliation of “gunboat
diplomacy” in which U.S. and European powers took over
custom houses to force payment of loans.

Before World War One, the decline of land-based empires was
nearly complete, while overseas empires flourished.

Question for Discussion

Why would a shift from land-based to overseas empires be a
significant change? How would such a change affect history?

Declining Land-Based Empires

The land-based empires began a precipitous decline after the
Napoleonic wars, some sooner than others. The challenge of
nationalism some of these multi-ethnic empires. Members of
distinct cultural, religious, and linguistic groups began to
demand more autonomy within these empires, which
frequently led to the establishment of independent nation-
states. In other cases, empires that resisted change were
conquered by powerful nations expanding their overseas
empires. Often these factors combined to challenge land-based
empires.

226 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The Ottoman Empire
in 1683 AD

The Ottoman Empire declined very slowly during the 19th
century—when it was called “the Sick Man of Europe’—but
it was able to persist until World War I. The Sunni Muslim
Ottoman homeland was present-day Turkey, which bordered
on Orthodox Christian Russia to the north, the Catholic
Habsburg (Austro-Hungarian) Empire to the west, and the
Shiite Iranians who succeeded the Safavid Empire in Persia
to the east. The Russians aided the Orthodox Greeks, Serbs,
and Bulgarians in their successful struggles for independence.
The Ottoman capital, Istanbul, had been Constantinople, home
of the Byzantine Empire and of Greek Orthodox Christianity
before the Ottoman conquest of 1458; and the leaders of Russia
wanted to reestablish Christian rule there.

The Greeks were the first to successfully free themselves from
Ottoman rule in the 1820s. They found support not only from
Imperial Russia, but also from the British and French, who
sought more economic and political influence in the Eastern
Mediterranean. The struggle for Greek freedom, in the
birthplace of democracy and and home of classical literature
and art, fired the imagination of the artists and writers of the
“Romantic” movement then flourishing in Europe. English poet
Lord Byron lost his life in service to the Greek cause.

Modern World History 227

“Charge of the Light Brigade”, October 5, 1854, from the Russian perspective on the
high ground.

By the mid-19th century, disputes between European powers
over what would happen to Ottoman territory caused the
Crimean War (1853-1856), in which France, Great Britain, the
Italian Kingdom of Sardinia, and the Ottomans opposed an
expanding Russian Empire. The Crimean War was the first
major war of the Industrial Age, featuring the use of railways,
telegraphs, and modern ordnance like rifles and exploding
naval artillery. Disastrous mismatches between traditional
military tactics and the realities of modern war occurred, such
as the incident immortalized in Alfred Tennyson’s poem “The
Charge of the Light Brigade.” The poem describes a frontal
assault by a British light cavalry unit armed only with lances
and sabers against an artillery battery dug in on high ground
at the battle of Balaclava in 1855. Although Tennyson’s poem
praises the bravery of the cavalrymen who charged through
the so-called Valley of Death, events like these became symbols
of the logistical and tactical mismanagement of the war effort.
The conflict also revealed the weakness of the Russian Empire,
which fielded large armies but lagged in both tactics and
technology. In the treaty following the war, Russia was forced to
remove its naval fleet from the Black Sea.

228 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The Ottomans also faced an
ongoing dispute with the
Egyptians, who — gained
practical independence under
the Ottoman-appointed
governor Muhammad Ali
from 1805-1848. Ali
modernized Egypt in many
ways, while his son,
Muhammad Sa’id, granted a
land concession in 1854 to
French businessman
Ferdinand de Lesseps to dig a
canal from the
Mediterranean to the Red
Sea. The building of the Suez
Canal, completed in 1869, was
initially opposed by Great
Britain because they feared its
control by the French would
shift the balance of power in

Europe. The canal took
NASA image of the Suez Canal from space, . .
connecting the Mediterranean Sea with the ¢leven years to build, using
Red Sea. forced Egyptian _labor.

Although the Suez Canal
Company was an international corporation, its shares did not
sell well outside France and Egypt. But in 1875, Sa’id’s son Ismail
put Egypt’s shares up for sale and British Prime Minister
Benjamin Disraeli bought the shares with an unsecured
£4,000,000 loan from his close personal friend Baron Lionel de
Rothschild, head of the famous international bank. Although
France still owned more shares, Britain sent troops to protect
the canal during an Egyptian civil war in 1882 and in 1888 the
canal was declared a neutral zone under British protection.
Using the canal, British steamships were able to avoid sailing
around Africa and reach India in two weeks instead of two
months.

Inspired the example of the Greeks, and encouraged by the
Russians and others, Montenegro, Serbia, and Bulgaria achieved


Modern World History 229

nearly-complete independence from the Sultan in Istanbul by
1878. Although they belonged to distinct ethnic and linguistic
groups, the majority of people in these territories were
Orthodox Christians. However, as we will see in the next
chapter, these new countries had trouble resolving disputes over
borders and political control, since the different peoples lived
all over the region in villages and towns that were frequently
“majority-minority.””. Nationalism was the motivation for
independence, but the national community existed across many
frontiers—how should they be united? And what should be
done about the “other” living within one’s own country?

Questions for Discussion

Why were Englishmen like Lord Byron so supportive of Greek
independence?

What does the Charge of the Light Brigade tell us about the
changing nature of warfare?

Why is the Suez Canal so significant?


230 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

1873 painting depicting Russian serfs hearing of their emancipation in 1861.

When the Russian Empire’s ambitions were thwarted in the
Crimean War, Russians were forced to confront their military
incompetence and social backwardness. Serfdom tied peasants
and their families to the land, and although they were not
slaves, serfs were included in any property transaction among
the landed gentry. Tsar Alexander II declared an end to
serfdom in 1861, shortly before President Lincoln’s 1863
Emancipation Proclamation, during the United States Civil War.
Both countries were among the last in their respective regions to
formally end forced labor obligations and like the newly-“freed”
in the U.S., the liberty of many former Russian serfs existed
only on paper.

Russian industries expanded with investment from western
Europe: factories and rail networks soon appeared, especially in
the European part of Russia. However, the slowness of political
and social change led to frustration among potential reformers,
who instead turned to revolutionary action, often led by
anarchists. Anarchism is similar to socialism in its concept of
class struggle, but anarchists believe that all forms of top-down
control—governments, police, organized religion—should be
immediately eliminated, allowing the natural cooperativeness
of humanity to thrive in smaller consensus-based entities.
Russian anarchists succeeded in assassinating the reformist Tsar

Modern World History 231

Alexander II in 1881, on the day he had given approval for a
limited form of parliamentary government. His son, Alexander
IIL, rejected this political reform; he, in turn, was also murdered
by anarchists, in 1894. His son, Nicholas II, was not open to any
checks on his absolute power.

Dozens of ethnic and
religious groups lived in the
territories of the Russian

Empire; attempts at
“russification” were
inconclusive. The Poles,
Finns, Lithuanians,

Ukrainians, and Romanians,
among many others, chafed
under the autocratic rule of
the Tsars, and desired
independence—or simply
immigrated to the U.S. for

better economic
Ethnic map of European Russia before opportunities. Jewish
World War | Russians, many of whom

lived in territory taken from
Poland in the 1790s, were blamed for misfortunes like the deaths
of babies or cattle and attacked in violent “pogroms”. Jews from
these Russia and Eastern Europe also often chose a new life in
the United States rather than discrimination and persecution.
Later pogroms, such as one in Odessa in 1905 in which
hundreds of Jews lost their lives, received international
condemnation and were presented as proof of Tsarist Russia’s
backwardness.

In the late 19th century, the Tsarist autocracy encouraged
anti-Semitism: the idea that Jews were the cause of political,
economic, and social problems, and needed to be controlled
and occasionally “put in their place” in violent pogroms.
Although Jews had lived in the region for centuries, they were
always considered an “other” and the Tsars restricted their
ability to own land and to exercise certain professions. Local
and national leaders blamed the Jews for every assassination

232 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

and economic downturn in order to unite opposition groups
with the goals of the Tsars. Attacks on Jewish communities
and neighborhoods—pogroms—occurred with frightening
frequency from the 1880s until the eve of World War One. Jews
from these territories often chose immigration to the United
States to flee discrimination and persecution, while later
pogroms, such as the one in Odessa in 1905 in which hundreds
of Jews lost their lives, received international condemnation and
were presented as proof of Tsarist Russia’s backwardness.

estions for Discussion

Why was Tsar Nicholas II unwilling to consider any checks on
his absolute authority?
How did the large numbers of different ethnicities, languages,

and religions in the Russian Empire create difficulties for the
Tsarist government?

Growth of the Habsburg Empire from the red and pink center outward to the yellow
and green conquests of the 18th and 18th centuries.

The Habsburg dynasty had ruled Austria and its territories since

Modern World History 233

the late 1200s; through strategic marriages, the family also
controlled the Spanish Empire in the 1500s and 1600s,
including the Spanish-American colonies. The Spanish line
died out in 1700, but the Austrian House of Habsburg would
reign until 1918.

At the end of the Napoleonic period, the Habsburg Empire
dominated southeastern Europe, up to the frontiers of the
Ottoman and Russians. While the Tsars felt a special kinship
with Orthodox Christians under Turkish rule—Greeks, Serbs,
and Bulgarians—the Habsburg monarchs supported Catholics
of the Ottoman region, like the Croats. Until 1815, the Habsburgs
had been the Holy Roman Emperors; during the Protestant
Reformation, they fought to maintain Catholicism as the official
religion of their realm.

Although united by religion, the Habsburg empire was
divided by a growing sense of nationality. German-speaking
Austrian Habsburg emperors ruled Hungarians, Czechs,
Ukrainians, Poles, Slovaks, Romanians, Jews, Slovenes, Croats,
Serbs, and Albanians. By the middle of the nineteenth century,
many of these peoples wanted their own nations. The rebellions
and revolutions of 1848 came close to breaking up the Habsburg
territories in a wave of nationalist and socialist fervor. The
revolutionaries did not achieve all of their goals, but serfdom
was abolished, several regions gained a greater degree of
autonomy, and Emperor Ferdinand I abdicated in favor of his
nephew Franz Josef.

Unification of Italy in the
1860s and and Germany in
1870 allowed the Hungarians,
who became the most
numerous minority within
the realm, to achieve near-
complete independence. In
1867, the emperor agreed to
establish a “dual monarchy’,

the Austro-Hungarian
Empire. Administration was
divided between Austrian and

Ethnicities in the Austro-Hungarian Empire
in 1911.

234 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Hungarian parliaments, while the Austrian emperor managed
foreign policy. This compromise merely spread out the
nationalist problem for two kings instead of one: Romanians
demanded more autonomy from the Hungarian administration
in Budapest, while the Czechs asked for the same from the
Austrian government in Vienna.

Questions for Discussion

What was the main factor uniting the Austro-Hungarian
Empire?

What were the factors fracturing the unity?

A united Germany, achieved in 1870, brought together an
agricultural east with an industrialized west, creating an entirely
new “Great Power” in Europe to rival Great Britain and France.
The new nation called itself the German Empire (Deutsches
Reich); its ambition to take a place at the table of imperial powers
upset the post-Napoleonic European balance of power and,
eventually, became a cause of the two twentieth-century world
wars.

Modern World History 235

Otto von Bismarck, who
had become prime minister
of the Kingdom of Prussia in
1862, was the main architect
of the German Empire.
Although he was not among
the young Germans who had
dreamed of unification
during the revolutions of
1848, Bismarck gradually
came to the conclusion that to
counter Austria-Hungary,
which was over-extended in
Italy and in its ambitions in
the Balkans, Prussia had to
take the initiative and gather
the German states under the
Prussian king. Bismarck used war as a way to unite the German
principalities. First, in 1864, he started a brief war with Denmark
that brought together most of the northern German states as
allies of Prussia. A war with Austria in 1866 solidified these states
in a confederation with Prussian King Wilhelm I, while at the
same time, the newly unified Italy took advantage of a weakened
Austria to claim Italian-speaking Hapsburg territories.

To bring in the mostly Catholic southern German states (led
by Bavaria), Bismarck offended Napoleon III of France, making
territorial promises in the Austrian war that he did not keep
with the French emperor (among other transgressions). When
the nephew of Napoleon Bonaparte, who had been president
of France before declaring himself emperor, went to war with
Prussia in 1870, he counted on the neutrality of the other
German states and on Austrian help, neither of which
happened.

Prussia had one of the best-trained armies in Europe and
surprised the French with their rapid advance. Within weeks,
they had captured Napoleon III himself. A leaderless France
could not halt the united German advance and the capital, Paris,
was taken over by a socialist-inspired Commune. The French
agreed to territorial losses as they formed a Third Republic

Otto von Bismarck, painted when he was
Prime Minister of Prussia.

236 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

to replace Napoleon III. In early 1871, Bismarck initiated a
gathering of the German princes at the French royal palace
in Versailles, outside Paris, to join together as a new unified
national state, with the Prussian King Wilhelm I as emperor.

Wilhelm | proclaimed Emperor. The man in white is the Prussian chancellor Otto von
Bismarck, responsible for organizing the Empire. The whole ceremony is taking place at
the French royal Palace of Versailles after the French armies were defeated—versailles
will come up again in the next Chapter!

A German empire created a new dynamic in diplomatic
relations, based on French and German antagonism, forming
new alliances and altering previous arrangements. The Franco-
Prussian War was the first of three major conflicts between the
French and the Germans over the next 75 years in which
millions would die—but one can take heart in the idea that in
more recent decades, the two countries have become strong
allies, forming the primary economic and political relationship
of the current European Union. If the French and Germans
can set aside old conflicts and work together, perhaps Indians
and Pakistanis, Sunnis and Shi'ites, Israelis and Palestinians, and
other “enemies” can eventually do the same.

Question for Discussion

Modern World History 237

Was Germany justified in its desire to become a "Great
Power’ like Britain and France?

Rising Overseas Empires

Even though the British North American colonies achieved
independence and became the United States, Britain held on to
Canada and retained control of islands in the Caribbean, while
(as described below) London's bankers and British industry
would dominate the finance and trade in the new Latin

American republics.

Sir John A. Macdonald, first Prime Minister
of Canada (1878-1891).

Unlike the Thirteen
Colonies, Canada achieved its
independence from Britain
much more slowly, without a
revolution. Although the
French-speaking Quebecois
and the British in Ontario
could easily have been at each
other’s throats, anxiety over
an invasion from the United
States (which was tried
unsuccessfully in 1775 and
1812) held a fragile alliance
together. After two more
incursions by American
forces in the 1830s, the British
North America Act of 1867
created the Dominion of
Canada by combining

Quebec, Nova Scotia, Ontario, and New Brunswick. John A.
MacDonald became the nation’s first Prime Minister in 1867,

238 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

negotiated the purchase of the Northwest Territories from the
Hudson’s Bay company in 1869, and convinced Manitoba,
Prince Edward Island, and British Columbia to join the
Dominion. MacDonald knew that like the U.S., Canada’s eastern
and western coastal regions needed a transcontinental railroad
to bind them together. The Canadian Pacific Railroad was
completed in 1885. The C.P. Railroad operates mostly just north
of the border, although several lines connected to U.S. cities
such as Minneapolis, Milwaukee, Detroit, and Chicago. Even
today, 90% of Canada’s 36 million population live within 100
miles of the U.S. border.

Canadian-Pacific Rail Map

The British had also claimed Australia, which they settled in
the late 18th century with convicts. Most of the crimes were
petty or related to debt, while some were political, such as the
Irish condemned for protesting English rule. New Zealand was
settled in the early 19th century through a private company,
following the model established in the colonization of some
of the Thirteen Colonies. In both cases, the native peoples lost
land in much the same manner as in British North America.
In Australia, the vast continent allowed for the aborigines to
retreat, until environmental and other factors brought them
into increasing contact with the settlers and their descendants.
In New Zealand, relations between the native Maori and the
settlers followed a pattern similar to those of the western United
States: treaties made, treaties broken, wars fought and won by
the settlers, who took more land. However, respect and

Modern World History 239

celebration of Maori rights and culture have become integral to
New Zealand identity in recent decades.

India was the most important colony for the British,
determining much of its international diplomacy until after
World War Two. When the British East India Company began
its conquest of India in the 1700s, the Mughal Empire was
entering a long period of decline after its peak in the 16th and
17th centuries. The Company took advantage of the empire’s
weakness to expand its trading activities, and slowly took over
the regional principalities that split off from Mughal control.
By the 1700s, Indian tea had become an important part of the
British diet—even for their colonists in North America, who
dumped Indian tea into the Boston Harbor in protest against
taxes on the product in 1773. By the middle of the 19th century,
the Company controlled most of mainland India, Pakistan,
Burma, and Bangladesh, as well as Sri Lanka. The Company
shifted its policy away from simply trading, and began
reorganizing the Indian economy, clearing forests and
establishing widespread cultivation of tea, coffee, cotton, and
opium for use in China. By the time the Crown took over direct
control of the colony in 1858 after an uprising called the Sepoy
Mutiny, India was a producer of agricultural products and raw
materials for Britain’s growing industrial economy.

240 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

1909 Map of the British India, showing British India in two shades of pink and the
princely states in yellow.

By the mid-19th century, the British in India had established
an imperial model that had proved lucrative for investors: the
colony provided raw material and resources for the consumers
and industries of the “home country,’ while Indians purchased
mass-produced textiles and other goods from British factories
as a “captive market.” This closed economic system was
attractive to both older and newer European empires—setting
off, as we shall see, a scramble for colonies in Africa in the
late-19th century.

The British administration of India, however, also provided a
model for other European imperialists. Clearly, the tiny island
kingdom could not direct all of the affairs of their Indian
possession—trained locals needed to aid in governance. This
process began under the East India Company with the
formation of native army and police forces, commanded by
British officers, but soon included educated local administrators
who spoke English and understood and applied imperial laws
and edicts. By the 1850s, the British had founded their first
schools to instruct the local elite in English, engineering,

Modern World History 241

science, and British imperial law. This model proved so effective
in India that Indian immigrants often followed the British to
their new colonies in Africa, where Indians operated the
railways and postal service, and Indian carpenters and
bricklayers constructed government offices and private homes
for the new colonial political and commercial elites. Indian
shopkeepers played an enormous role in the local economies
of these new colonies well into the 20th century. Indians even
migrated to Great Britain’s territories in the Caribbean as
indentured servants—in Guyana, in northern South America,
over 40% of the population is of “India-Indian” descent.

The story of Mahatma
Gandhi, who later helped lead
India to independence, is an
example of a native trained to
manage the Empire. After an
education in a British school
in India, Gandhi went to
London and studied law. On
graduating he went to South
Africa to serve the British
Empire as a lawyer for
twenty-five years before
beginning a new career
advocating for Indian
independence. This, too, was
a pattern duplicated in other
European empires:
eventually, educated local elites and professionals would begin
to demand greater autonomy, if not outright independence,
since they were already administering the colonies for the
“mother country.” Ho Chi Minh, who would fight with and then
against U.S. forces for the independence of Vietnam, applied for
admission to the French academy in Marseilles that trained
imperial administrators. If the school had accepted him, history
might have been quite different.

Photograph of Mahatma Gandhi in 1909,
when he was a lawyer in South Africa.

242 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Questions for Discussion

How did the British shift their imperial goals after losing much
of North America in the U.S. Revolutionary War?

+ Why were natives trained as an administrative class in the
colonies a problem in the long run for imperialists?

The United States: Slavery, Expansion, and Civil War

Some of the slaveowners among the Founders of the United
States thought that slavery would not be a permanent institution
in the new country. At the constitutional convention in 1787,
they agreed to abolish the slave trade in the U.S. starting in
1808. Many seem to have expected that slavery would gradually
disappear. Even the slaveowner Thomas Jefferson idealized the
independent, self-sufficient yeoman farmer rather than the
Southern planter as the hope of American democracy.

However, Eli Whitney’s
invention of the cotton gin
gave new life to the institution
of slavery. Issues such as the
infamous “three-fifths
compromise” of the U.S.
Constitution, in which
enslaved people counted as 3/

A time-lapse map of the expansion of
slavery in the United States between 1789 5 of a person for purposes of

and 1861. taxation and representation,
became more divisive rather
than gradually disappearing. And €Ve€N in the “free”
North, the United States was generally
considered a “white man’s country”.
Free men of African descent were only

allowed to vote in a handful of states

Modern World History 243

by 1860 and were subject to
discrimination in jobs, housing, and
movement — everywhere. inally,
although many whites opposed the
extension of slavery into the western
territories and even advocated for
abolition, they also supported schemes
for sending freed blacks “back to
Africa”. Liberia, on west coast of Africa,
was “founded” by white abolitionists
and free people from the United States
in 1820—incongruously naming their
capital “Monrovia” for the US.
president at the time, James Monroe,
who was a slaveholder.

Whitney’s invention caused
an explosion of cotton
planting, which led not only
to an expansion of slavery but
to a hunger for new land. As
had happened in the Thirteen
Colonies, white-led
settlement came at the
expense of the Native
Americans. The five “civilized A map of the process of Indian Removal,
tribes” of the south, the 1830-1838. Oklahoma is depicted in light
Cherokee, Creek, Choctaw, yellow-green,

Chickasaw, and Seminole, were Indians who had embraced
Christianity and Anglo-American institutions. They established
their own farms and even plantations, published a bilingual
newspaper, governed themselves in a bicameral legislature, and
even owned black slaves. Nevertheless, they were cast out of the
southern states by the Indian Removal Act of 1880, forced to
leave ancestral lands and relocate in Oklahoma, west of the
Mississippi River. The “Trail of Tears” for these displaced people
was well-named: thousands died in the forced march across the
South and during their settlement in a completely different


244 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

environment. Despite treaties, similar processes also occurred
in the Louisiana Territory and beyond.

The territories of
independent Mexico north of
the Rio Grande River had
been only lightly settled by
the Spanish. Santa Fe was
established nearly one
hundred years after the
conquest of the Aztecs, and
the religious missions in
California only appeared in
the 1700s. The new Mexican
government allowed for
“Anglo” settlement from the
United States into Texas,
which bordered the new state

General Antonio Lopez de Santa Anna, of Louisiana, as a way to begin
former President of Mexico, led Mexican populating this region. While
troops into Texas in 1836. He returned to .
the Presidency during the the Mexican government
Mexican-American War, but couldn't allowed the “Tejanos” a
prevent his nation’s defeat. degree of self-government,
they insisted that Mexican
laws be obeyed, including the abolition of slavery. The new
settlers rebelled, and achieved independence after a brief war in
1836, and immediately brought enslaved people to work on
cotton plantations.

Although Mexico’s treaty with independent Texas included
a pledge that the new republic would not become a state of
the United States, Texas did join the union in 1845 and a war
ensued. Not only did the U.S. government send troops south
to defend Texas, they sent enough to defeat Mexico decisively.
Many Americans argued that the United States had a “Manifest
Destiny” that required it to become a continental nation. The
U.S. Army eventually occupied Mexico City in 1848 and
conquered all of the territory to the Pacific Ocean. In defeat, the
Mexicans signed the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo and ceded
all of their territory north of the Rio Grande River. Mexico lost

Modern World History 245,

over half its land area, and the United States acquired California,
Arizona, New Mexico, Nevada, Colorado, Utah, and part of
Wyoming. At the same time, the U.S. government negotiated a
treaty with Great Britain to establish a border in the disputed
Oregon territory. By 1849, the United States had completed its
advance across the continent.

(uras | GULPOP MEXIOY

Parc OCEAN

TLANCALA TERRITORY PEXDI VE LHUISL\TION AND THE FEDERAL
DISTRICT W ASCH ‘NOVEMBER 1b

Map of Mexico and the United States in 1824, before the Texas Secession and the
Mexican-American War.

Almost immediately after the Mexicans were defeated, gold was
discovered by a U.S. settler in northern California. “Forty-
niners” joined the Gold Rush from the eastern states and from
as far away as Chile and China. California became a U.S. state
the next year. Again, rapid settlement came at the expense of
Native Americans. Chinese laborers were soon restricted in
their movements. The United States was a “white man’s
country”, and they became the first ethnic group explicitly
barred from immigrating to the U.S. in the Chinese Exclusion
Act of 1882. And finally, the rapid expansion of territory and
establishment of new states upended the careful balance
between slave and free states that had prevented armed conflict.
An escalation of violence in Kansas and increasing political

246 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

polarization led to the formation of a new political party (the
Republicans), election of a president from this party (former
Illinois Congressman Abraham Lincoln), and the secession of
most of the Southern slave states.

Questions for Discussion

+ How did technological progress impact the politics of slavery?

+ How do you think the idea of Manifest Destiny held by people
in the United States affected our history?

The Civil War, like the Crimean a few
years earlier, was one of the first
modern wars that brought new
technology to the battlefield. Railroads
and steamboats made troop
transportation quicker and more
efficient, while the electric telegraph
not only improved military
communication, but also made war
news more immediately available to
the newspaper-reading public in the
U.S. and abroad. The industrialized
northern states benefitted the most
from the new technologies, since they
could produce more war materiel and

et troops to the front more quickl
than the South, which lagged in bot
industry and railroads.

Southern hopes of maintaining an independent Confederacy
depended on support from Europe. Southern cotton supplied
the textile mills of Great Britain and France, enriching those
countries, and Confederate planters expected these business ties

Modern World History 247

to influence government decisions. Great Britain hesitated to
recognize the independence of the Confederacy, but in the end
declined when the Union began racking up victories in 1863. At
the same time, Emperor Napoleon IJJ—nephew of the man who
had sold Louisiana to Jefferson—pursued an imperial scheme to
create a pro-French monarchy in Mexico which would support
the Confederates. Napoleon’s plan failed when Mexican troops
unexpectedly defeated the French army at the Battle of Puebla
on May 5, 1862. Although Maximilian, brother of the Emperor,
would briefly rule Mexico, the project was a disaster for
Napoleon. After the Union victory in the U.S., French troops
left Mexico and Maximilian was executed by firing squad in
1867 as Mexican liberals, led by Benito Juarez, reestablished
Mexican independence. The date of the Battle of Puebla is still
celebrated as Cinco de Mayo by Mexican-Americans throughout
the United States.

Because some U.S. publishers are interested in selling their
textbooks to school boards in the former Confederate States,
they often soft-pedal the Civil War in a way that creates
confusion. So, let’s be very clear: it is absurd to claim that
supporting slavery was legitimately based on the “sanctity of
private property rights” espoused by the U.S. Founding Fathers
as part of their Enlightenment values. It is not reasonable to
argue that property is a human right, but only for some
humans, and that other humans can be property, rather than
having property rights. Furthermore, the U.S. Civil War was
about slavery, NOT about “states’ rights.” Although the
Confederacy made this claim after they lost, when they seceded
and while they thought they were winning, the South very
clearly stated it was leaving the Union to preserve the institution
of slavery.

Question for Discussion

What motivates people to argue that the Civil War was fought
over something other than slavery?


248 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford
Neo-Imperialism in Latin America

As described in Chapter 4, Latin America achieved
independence from Spain and Portugal in the first decades of
the 1800s. Great Britain was particularly interested in an
independent Latin America as a source of markets for its
industrial products, while English and Irish mercenaries,
available after the Napoleonic Wars, joined the fight for
freedom alongside Bolivar and others in Latin America. The
Spanish and Portuguese became the first Europeans to begin
losing their overseas empires, nearly 150 years before the
British, French, and others would go through the same process.
The new countries of Latin America suffered through a long
period of struggle to establish stable governments and thriving
economies—which, depending on the country, included civil
wars, dictatorships, social and political reforms, and economic
dependence on a handful of exports and their international
price.

The new countries also
were the first to experience
neo-imperialism—a new
imperialism that technically
respected national
sovereignty, but in reality
forced governments to bend
to foreign influence. In the
1820s and 1880s, the new
governments of Latin
America quickly became
indebted to British banks, which had arranged large loans in
anticipation that independence would bring rapid economic
development as it had in the United States. Meanwhile, local
artisans could not compete with British textiles and other
manufactured goods that flooded the markets of the new
republics. Many countries became dependent on the
international price of a handful—or even a single—export such
as copper and nitrates in Chile, coffee in Brazil, beef and grain
in Argentina, sugar in Cuba, and bananas in Central America.

Gauchos relaxing in the Argentine Pampas,
as a side of beef cooks over the fire.

Modern World History 249

British investors in Latin America were followed by French and
US. businesses. This neo-imperialism continues for much Latin
America well into the 2lst century, while the model was
extended to new countries formed in Africa and Asia from the
declining European empires after World War Two.

Some Latin America countries had more success than others
boosting their economies with world trade. Brazilian
plantations still produce more coffee beans than any other
country, but in the 19th century, more than half of all coffee
came from Brazil. But the country’s economy was extremely
sensitive to the world price and rate of consumption; and when
the occasional frost in southern Brazil damaged the coffee
bushes, planters could go bankrupt.

Brazilian coffee also
i affected politics and human
cd rights. Brazil was the last
country in the hemisphere to

4 i
‘De inn abolish slavery, but it
Pl a1 Saree achieved this change without

¢ a bloody Civil War. In the 18th
century, enslaved labor was

| ra a shifted from declining sugar
cane plantations in northern

Brazil to silver mining

districts in the south. As the

mines were beginning to

deplete in the late 18th

- century, planters discovered

The Lei Aurea (Golden Act) that ended that coffee grew well in the

slavery in Brazil. By then ithad imported an highlands of southern Brazil,
estimated 4,000,000 slaves from Africa, or ,

40% of all slaves shipped to the Americas. and again, the large
landowners used enslaved

labor to cultivate the bean. The bloody War of the Triple
Alliance, in which Argentina, Uruguay, and Brazil fought
Paraguay over borders from 1866 to 1870, contributed to the end
of slavery. Desperate for soldiers, the Brazilian government
offered freedom to enslaved men if they served in the army.
Impressed with the ability and dedication of these soldiers,

250 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

many army officers began to feel that slavery should end in their
country. The institution was gradually fading anyway, because
coffee cultivation used less labor than either sugar plantations
or mines. By 1880, nearly three quarters of all people of color in
Brazil were free. King Pedro II finally abolished the institution
in 1888; a year later, he abdicated and the military organized a
republic.

As noted in the last chapter, Chile controlled over 80% of the
world’s nitrates in the 1880s, making it a serious power in the
Pacific. After the War of the Pacific, the Chilean Navy controlled
the west coast of South America, Central America, and was even
a threat to US. interests. In 1885, when a rebellion broke out
in the Colombian province of Panama, the U.S. government
sent ships and troops to both sides of the isthmus to protect
the railroad owned by North American investors. The Chilean
government send its British-built armored cruiser Esmeralda
(the fastest ship in the world when launched the year before)
to the Pacific side of Panama, to send a message that it would
prevent any annexation of the isthmus by the U.S. Whatever its
intentions, the U.S. government withdrew its navy and troops
after the rebellion had calmed, as U.S. naval observers opined
that the mighty Esmeralda could sink every ship in the U.S.
navy at the time. The incident contributed to the building of
a more effective U.S. navy in the ensuing years. The sense of
vulnerability also intensified U.S. interest in a canal through the
isthmus of Panama, which had been begun in 1881 by a French
consortium led by Ferdinand de Lesseps (the man behind the
Suez Canal).

Questions for Discussion

How is neo-imperialism different from the previous types?

Why was the U.S. concerned about Chile’s naval dominance
in the Pacific?


Modern World History 251

U.S. Imperialism

After the Latin American
independence wars in 1830,
the Spanish Crown still
maintained control over
Cuba and Puerto Rico in the
Caribbean and the Philippine
Islands in the Pacific. With
the end of slavery,
independence inspired
Cubans, including a few from
the planter class. José Marti, a
Cuban intellectual and poet,
organized funds and support
in the United States for a new
push to liberate —_his__ Statue of José Marti on horseback in New
homeland, and a new Ys Central Park
rebellion began in 1895. Marti
died in his first battle, but the independence army continued
with guerrilla tactics in their fight against the Spanish. The
Spanish set up concentration camps for non-combatants,
assuming that anyone who did not submit was an independence
sympathizer. Thousands died in terrible conditions in these
camps.

Major newspapers soon engaged in sensationalist reporting
on Spain’s crimes in Cuba in order to increase circulation.
Media magnates William Randolph Hearst and Joseph Pulitzer
used what became known as yellow journalism to agitate for
war. Yellow journalism, named after a popular cartoon
character, “Yellow Kid”, is the technique of using inflammatory
headlines backed by little or no factual reporting to stir up
public emotion, a combination of the click-bait and fake news
that is common on the Internet today. It’s ironic that Pulitzer
is now best known for the prize for journalistic excellence he
established in his will.

At the beginning of 1898, public opinion in the US was divided
over entering the Cuban war for independence. Still, the
McKinley administration was alarmed enough about instability


252 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

on the island that it sent the battleship Maine to Havana in order
to protect U.S. interests. These were plentiful: U.S. investors and
buyers controlled the all-important sugar industry, they built
and owned much of the communications and transportation
infrastructure, and U.S. smokers were the main consumers of
Cuban cigars. The Maine mysteriously blew up in Havana
harbor, killing scores of U.S. soldiers. The Spanish were
immediately blamed by the sensationalist U.S. press (decades
later, investigations showed that the explosion came from the
inside and was an accident: the munitions room was located
alongside the engine room!). President McKinley asked for and
the U.S. Congress granted a declaration of war on Spain. The
conflict quickly eliminated the Spanish Empire’s control of
Cuba and Puerto Rico. Theodore Roosevelt, Secretary of the
Navy at the time, formed his own army unit he called the Rough
Riders so that he would not miss out on the “splendid little war”
in Cuba. However, Black troops from the regular army had to
save him and his men at the Battle of San Juan Hill.

Modern World History 253

William H. West's Big Minstrel Jubilee was one of several traveling shows to
memorialize the dramatic “Charge of San Juan Hill", adding to Theodore Roosevelt's,
fame.

The most important fighting of the ten-week war was really
at sea. The U.S. navy sank the Spanish fleet in the Caribbean
and in the Philippines, denying any possibility of the arrival
of reinforcements and war materiel from Spain. At the end of
1898, the Spanish Crown agreed to Cuban independence and
handed over Puerto Rico, Guam, and the Philippines to the
U.S. Cuba Libre (“Free Cuba”) was shouted for years by Cuban
nationalists. Appropriately, it became the name for the classic
bar drink “rum-and-coke” in Spanish-speaking countries: the
combination of U.S. Coca Cola and Cuban rum. However, Cuba
was far from “free” after the war, since the U.S. government
demanded the right to intercede in the internal affairs of the
island for any reason. The infamous “Platt Amendment” was
forced into the constitution of the new Cuban republic, and
U.S. Marines were indeed sent in periodically to change
governments or put down rebellions, real or imagined. U.S.
investors were particularly leery of increased Afro-Cuban
participation in politics, projecting their own racism onto the
affairs of the island.

254 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Meanwhile, the US.
annexed Puerto Rico and
Guam, which are still U.S.
territories, as well as the
Philippines. Filipinos had
already been fighting a war
for independence since 1892,
so they objected to becoming
a possession of the U.S.
Emilio Aguinaldo, the
Filipino leader, had been
promised the US would
recognize the independence
of the Philippine Republic,
but when the time came,

President McKinley issued a
Emilio Aguinaldo (1869-1964), first .
president of the Philippines, photographed Proclamation of “benevolent
about 1919. assimilation.” Rudyard

Kipling’s famous 1899 poem,
“The White Man’s Burden,” was written in support of the U.S.
effort to subdue the ungrateful brown people of the Philippines.
The U.S. Navy destroyed the city of Iloilo to suppress the
independence movement, and Aguinaldo called for a strategy of
guerrilla warfare. 4,200 American soldiers were killed in the
conflict and about 250,000 Filipino soldiers and civilians. In
1901, Aguinaldo was captured and forced to surrender.
Resistance continued until 1918, but by 1902 most of the
guerrillas had been pushed way from major cities. The
Philippines finally achieved independence in 1946, after World
‘War Two (which included wartime occupation by Imperial
Japan).


Modern World History 255,

Editorial cartoon “The White Man's Burden” shows John Bull (Great Britain) and Uncle
Sam (U.S.) delivering ungrateful colored peoples of the world to civilization.

The Spanish-American War also highlighted the military
importance of building a canal in Panama. The U.S. Pacific Fleet,
after defeating the Spanish in the Philippines, had to sail around
South America to engage Spain in the Caribbean. The California
Gold Rush had brought the Colombian province of Panama to
the attention of investors. Steamships from East Coast ports
brought passengers to Panama, who, by 1855, could take a U.S.-
built and -owned railway to the Pacific side, embarking onto
other steamers for the trip up to California. In 1902 the U.S.
government bought the French canal company’s land for $40
million. Although the French project managed to do some of
the most difficult digging, they had abandoned the project
several years earlier. Ferdinand De Lessups had planned a sea-
level canal, like the Suez in Egypt, but the hilly topography
made locks more practical, while the tropical jungles meant
malaria for canal workers.

256 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Colombia was ending yet
another civil war in 1902, and
although the Colombian
government signed a treaty
handing over a canal zone
and other rights to the U.S.,
the Colombian senate
hesitated to approve the 1903 New York Times political cartoon,

commenting on the U.S. interests driving
agreement. Panamanians the “liberation” of Panama from Colombia.
were upset at the delay, and it
did not take much for the U.S. to help engineer the
independence of Panama, sending a naval destroyer to
discourage the Colombian government from sending troops.
Almost immediately, the new government of Panama signed the
Canal Zone over to the U.S. The Canal, opened in 1914, was an
impressive engineering feat, shortening the trip for cargo
between the oceans. The U.S. medical service, with the help of
Cuban researchers, also made the connection between
mosquitoes and malaria, and were able to check the spread of
both while building the canal. The U.S. withdrew from the Canal
Zone and the canal became Panamanian property on Dec. 31,
1999. The canal was expanded in 2016 to accommodate
Panamax container ships, and currently about 13,000 ships pass
through the canal annually carrying over 330 million tons of
cargo.

Questions for Discussion

How did “fake news’ contribute to history in the early 20th
century?
Can the United States approach to regions like the

Philippines and Panama be considered a new expression of
Manifest Destiny?

Bananas began as a major Central American industry when
a Cape Cod sea captain named Lorenzo Dow Baker bought

Modern World History 257

160 bunches in Jamaica in 1870 and resold them in Jersey City.
The delicious fruit quickly caught on with U.S. consumers. In
1873 Minor C. Keith began planting banana trees alongside his
railroad in Costa Rica. The government had defaulted on some
payments to Keith, but instead gave him 800,000 acres of tax-
free land along the rail line. When the railroad failed to pay for
itself in the 1890s, Keith concentrated on bananas. He merged
with Baker’s Boston Fruit Company, which was growing
bananas on about 10,000 acres in Jamaica. The United Fruit
Company was the result, established in 1899. U.F.C. quickly
bought up several competitors and gained control of 80% of the
bananas reaching the U.S.

In 1901, American author O.
Henry coined the term
“banana republic” in his book
Cabbages and Kings, inspired
by a visit to Honduras in 1897.
His point was that companies
like the U.F.C. didn’t limit
themselves to bananas. In
1900 the company began a
travel service to Central
America on its steamers and
produced an illustrated travel
guide called The Golden
Caribbean. In 1901 _ the
government of Guatemala
contracted with U.F.C. to run

the nation’s postal service. In
Caribbean, 1900. Tropical Radio and Telegraph

Company, and by 1980 U.F.C.
was worth over $200 million and was the largest employer in
Central America. The company owned over 3.5 million acres of
land, making it the largest landowner in Guatemala. In 1928
when a strike at U.F.C. plantations in Colombia was portrayed
by the company as a potential communist insurrection, the U.S.
Marines threatened to invade Colombia if the government did
not defend the U.F.C. Colombian soldiers massacred workers


258 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

striking for an 8-hour day and a six-day work week. Hundreds
were killed, including dozens gathered in a town plaza in
support of the strike. This 1928 Banana Massacre was described
by Gabriel Garcia Marquez in his 1967 novel One Hundred Years
of Solitude.

In 1933, Sam Zemurray (founder of the rival Cuyamel Fruit
Company) acquired U.F.C. in a hostile takeover. Zemurray had
gotten into the business in 1895 by buying overripe bananas
from U.F.C. and selling them cheaply in New Orleans. In 1910
Zemurray bought 15,000 acres in Honduras and the following
year he conspired with a former president of Honduras and an
American mercenary general to depose the elected government
and install a military regime friendlier to foreign business,
especially his. Zemurray had objected to a deal made by the
previous government that had granted the U.F.C. a monopoly
on Honduran bananas in exchange for U.F.C. brokering U.S.
Government loans to Honduras. The general who led the coup
became commander of the Honduran Army and was later
appointed U.S. Consul to Honduras.

In 1934 members of the banana workers union in Costa Rica
began a national strike that spread to thirty other unions. The
UFC. tried to divide workers and their salaries based on
professional or ethnic differences, and even deported foreign
workers. The unions and the U.F.C. came to an agreement after
about a month, but the U.F.C. did not follow through on its
agreements. Instead, the company began a public relations
campaign depicting the unions as communist revolutionaries,
with the backing of Costa Rica’s government. When the union
went back on strike, its leaders were arrested.

These interventions by U.S.
banana companies in the
internal affairs of the “banana
republics” mimicked the U.S.
Marine occupations of several
other countries in the
Caribbean. Unrest ~— and
instability in the region
threatened shipping lanes
and the building and
maintenance of the Panama
Canal, so between 1903 and
1933, the U.S. government
sent troops to quell disorders
in Nicaragua, the Dominican
Republic and Haiti. By the
end of the period, the
Marines had trained national
police forces, whose leaders
then took over their

own governments.

Modern World History 259

With the poem “La United Fruit Co.", Nobel
Prize-winning Chilean poet Pablo Neruda
denounced the corporate subjugation of
Latin America.

The Trujillo

dictatorship lasted until 1960 in the Dominican Republic, while
the Somoza family ruled Nicaragua until 1979. On a lighter note,
the Marines also introduced baseball into the countries they
occupied; it is still the national sport of Cubans, Nicaraguans,

and Dominicans.

Question for Discussion

Why did U.S. corporations feel they could do what they
pleased in Latin America and the Caribbean?

The European “Scramble for Africa”

The European scramble for Africa at the end of the 19th century
was motivated by international rivalry and by the fact that

260 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Africa south of the Sahara remained the last part of the world
“unexplored” by Europeans. South Asia was part of the British
Empire, East Asia and Oceania were divvied up, and the
Americas were either already colonized or had established
republics whose existence was accepted by Europeans and the
U.S. The rivalries among the Europeans were based on the
desire to create captive consumer markets for their
manufactures and to secure resources like copper, tin, cotton,
rubber, palm oil, tea, cocoa, and coffee upon which their
industries depended.

Comparison of Africa in the years 1880 and 1913, showing how the Scramble for Africa
affected the continent.

After the British began enforcing an end to the Atlantic slave
trade in 1808, European contact with most of sub-Saharan
Africa consisted of trade for ivory and other goods at a handful
of trading posts. Belgian King Leopold and the new German
Empire began the scramble in the 1870s, sending explorers to
claim African territory, much like the Spanish in the Americas
350 years before. The Portuguese in Africa defended their pre-
existing arrangements, while the British and French began to
rush deeper into the continent. The Europeans made
agreements with many local kings and chieftains and went to
war with others, always seeking a pledge of loyalty to their
particular empire.

Modern World History 261

To bring order to the
“scramble”, German
Chancellor Otto von
Bismarck in 1884 organized a
conference to delineate
claims. The Berlin
Conference was attended by
representatives from 138
European powers plus the
The conference of Berlin, where Europeans United States. No African
divided up Africa In 1884-5, countries were represented

except for the Ottoman
provinces along the Mediterranean. Administrative boundaries
deliberately cut across existing political and ethnic boundaries,
in some cases forcing warring groups to live and work together,
in others dividing tribes and their allies. This weakened
resistance in the short run, but, as will be examined in a later
chapter, became a source of civil unrest, separatist movements,
and boundary disputes among the new African countries
formed in the 1950s and 60s.


262 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Along with the usual
proposal of “civilizing” the
non-European peoples of
their empires, the
imperialists also claimed that
they were committed to
ending the internal slave
trade. However, European
treatment of African laborers
often included whipping,
torture, and other
punishments, alongside debt
peonage. It was standard
practice in the so-called
“Congo Free State” (really the
personal fiefdom of King
Leopold of Belgium) to cut off A photo of mutilated Congolese children,
the hands of African workers {0M "King Leopold's Soliloquy: A Defense

. __ of His Congo Rule’, published by Mark
who did not meet their twainin 1905.
rubber collection quotas. The
international outcry over such practices forced the Belgian
government to finally take over Leopold’s holdings in 1908, after
thirty years of brutal rule.

South Africa was a special case in European imperialism: the
Dutch made it into a “settler colony” beginning in the
mid-1600s, rather than merely establishing a trading post. They
were interesting in forming a community of farmers that could
supply the fleets rounding the Cape of Good Hope on their way
to the East Indies. Thousands of Dutch and other Europeans
were attracted by the relatively cooler climate of southern
Africa and plentiful arable land; and like the British and the
United States in North America, they were more interested in
removing the natives rather than subjugating them.

The British took control of the territory from the Dutch
during the Napoleonic period. In the 1830s, the imperial
government began abolishing slavery and requiring English in
schools and in legal transactions. In reaction, many Dutch

Modern World History 263

settlers moved farther inland in the “Great Trek”, taking more
land from the natives and establishing two republics, Transvaal
and the Orange Free State. At the same time, the descendants of
unions between Europeans, Africans, and natives of the Dutch
East Indies brought in as laborers (collectively known as
“coloured”) occasionally established their own autonomous
regions.

The British also faced the
Zulus, who, led by their
extraordinary leader Shaka
Zulu and his well-trained
army, had established an
independent kingdom in
eastern South Africa in the
1820s. When local British
commanders decided to
attack a growing military
threat from the Zulus in 1879,
the imperial regiments were
defeated by Zulu troops in a
series of major battles. A
second invasion of Zululand
was successful, but the British

Sketch of King Shaka (1781-1828) from . ‘
1824, continued to recognize Zulu

autonomy in much of their

territory.

The descendants of the Dutch settlers called themselves
“Boers” (the Dutch word for “farmer”) and successfully repelled
a British invasion in 1881. They were defeated in the Second
Boer War (1899-1902), after a bloody conflict that included a
wide guerrilla war and concentration camps for Boer civilians.
A young Winston Churchill, the future Prime Minister of Great
Britain, went to South Africa as a journalist to report on the war,
and instead was captured by the Boers. Churchill escaped and
his story of heroism helped launch his career in British politics.
The Germans, who held territory bordering South Africa,
supported the Boers in the conflict, adding to the accumulating

264 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

disagreements between the governments of Great Britain and
Germany on the eve of World War One.

Soon after, in 1910, the British organized the Union of South
Africa, including the Boers as equal citizens, while continuing
to deny such equality to the coloured and native groups (nearly
85% of the population). This new Union was effectively an
autonomous dominion within the British Empire, much like
Canada.

Cecil John Rhodes is now
probably most remembered
for the scholarship he
endowed in his will in 1902
that funds study at Oxford for
US. college graduates.
Rhodes Scholars include Bill
Clinton, Rachel Maddow,
Bobby Jindal, and Kris
Kristofferson. Rhodes
Scholarships do a lot for the
memory of Cecil Rhodes, just
as the Nobel Prize does a lot
for the memory of Alfred
Nobel, the inventor of
dynamite whose company “The Rhodes Colossus’ cartoon, published

ae after Rhodes announced plans for a
operated over 90 munitions telegraph tine from Cape Town to Cairo in
factories during his lifetime. _ 1892.

Rhodes endowed __ the
scholarship at Oxford because the British University was his
alma mater. The son of a well-connected Anglican minister,
Rhodes joined his brother in 1871 in South Africa at age 18, to
recuperate from tuberculosis. He dabbled in farming and then,
financed by the Rothschild bank that had helped Britain buy the
Suez Canal, began buying diamond mines. Rhodes returned to
England to attend Oxford, but left after a year to resume his
diamond business, eventually founding the De Beers Company
in 1888. A year later, Rhodes controlled 90% of the world’s
diamond production. De Beers currently operates in 35
countries and held onto its monopoly until the start of the


Modern World History 265,

2lst century. The company still sells about 35% of the world’s
diamonds.

During his year at Oxford, Rhodes absorbed the philosophy of
imperialism. He attended a lecture by professor John Ruskin
that became a famous justification for empire, called “Imperial
Duty.” Ruling the world, Ruskin said, “is a destiny now possible
to us—the highest ever set before a nation to be accepted or
refused.” Rhodes took this idea back to Africa, and once declared
“We are the finest race in the world and the more of the world
we inhabit the better it is for the human race” As noted, the
British were not the only people who believed themselves to
be superior to the people they conquered. Europeans and the
Americans also believed it was their job to help “civilize” the
rest of the world. The “White Man’s Burden” and the “Civilizing
Mission” of imperialism were big themes — we still call countries
in what was once described as the “third world” as “ developing
nations,” as if the goal of all the nations in the world is to become
like Europe and the United States, who have a responsibility to
help them do just that.

Questions for Discussion

What caused Europeans to believe they could meet in Berlin
and divide Africa between themselves?

Did the actions of Europeans in Africa support the argument
that their mission was to “civilize” the African people?


266 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

In reality, the superiority
the British, French, and
Americans had over the
people of “less developed”
nations was mostly in
military technology. Britain
demonstrated the
effectiveness of armored
steamships during the Opium
Wars. They sailed up the
Yangzi River and threatened
the Grand Canal and Beijing,
forcing the Chinese to

J surrender and agree to the
~~ unequal treaty. In the 1870s
Patent drawing for R.J. Gatling’ “battery the British began _ using
gun’, 1865. .

Gatling hand-cranked
machine guns against the Zulu in Africa and the Bedouin in the
Middle East. The Royal Navy used them against the Egyptians
in 1882 during Egypt’s civil war. The US used them to support
American troops during the Battle of San Juan Hill when Teddy
Roosevelt and his Rough Riders made their famous charge.

Later the British switched to the Maxim gun, which was the
first recoil-operated machine gun and was able to fire 600
rounds per minute. They used it in the 1890s to conquer the
Ndebele kingdom in Rhodesia (now Zimbabwe). Cecil Rhodes,
who was by this time Prime Minister of the Cape Colony, had
about 750 South Africa Company Police against 80,000 tribal
spearmen and 20,000 riflemen. But they had Maxim Guns. In
one battle, the British used Maxim Guns to “fight off” 5,000
attacking Zulu warriors. In 1898 the British were able to kill
20,000 Sudanese warriors with four Maxim Guns in a few hours
without taking many casualties. This was the beginning of a
period of asymmetrical warfare based on technology that
continues to the present - and forced people who could not
stand up to the imperialists’ superior weapons to find other ways
to resist.

In addition to weapons and transportation, Europeans and
Americans had the added advantage of communications.

? Ze

NA Gastige te
Batters tan

Modern World History 267

Telegraphs using Morse code became widespread in the U.S.,
Britain, and Europe during the 1850s, but undersea cables were
required to connect the colonies. Before telegraphy, a letter
from London took about two weeks to reach New York or
Alexandria Egypt, a month to reach Bombay on the west coast
of India, six weeks to reach Singapore or Calcutta on the East
side of India, two months to get to Shanghai and ten weeks
to arrive in Sidney Australia. A successful undersea cable line
between Britain and the US was completed in 1866, and Britain
and India were connected in 1870. Australia was linked to the
system in 1872 and a trans-Pacific cable was completed in 1903
linking the U.S. with Hawaii, Guam, and the Philippines.
Although telegraphy had been pioneered by Americans like
Samuel Morse, the British dominated undersea cable. At the
end of the 19th century, Britain owned 24 of the world’s 30
cable-laying ships and the British owned and operated 2/3 of
the world’s cable. During World War I, British telegraph
communications were almost completely uninterrupted while
Britain was very successful cutting German cables, forcing the
Germans to rely on wireless (radio) transmissions that were easy
to listen and decipher.

268 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

EASTERN TELEGRAPH C?? SYSTEM AND ITS GRWERAL CONNECTIONS.

Chart of submarine telegraph cable routes, showing the global reach of
telecommunications at the beginning of the 20th century.

Europeans treated their military success over colonized people
as proof of their cultural superiority. They developed theories
of scientific racism and Social Darwinism to justify their choice
to treat conquered peoples as less than fully human. They also
took advantage of previous African customs and tribal
animosities to divide the conquered Africans, or created new
ones based on their own prejudices. In Rwanda, the Belgians
noted the existence of separate castes that lived side-by-side for
generations under the same rule. However, the Belgians decided
to put the cattle-raising Tutsis, ten percent of the population,
over the Hutu farmers. Because of more access to animal
protein, the Tutsis seemed taller and better-looking to the
Europeans and were deemed to be naturally superior to the
Hutus. After independence, the Hutus took control and
subjected the Tutsis to periodic pogroms. In 1994, nearly a
million Tutsis were killed by their neighbors in a government-
orchestrated genocide, until a largely Tutsi-led guerrilla
insurgency took over the government. Both groups speak the
same language, and the distinctions fostered by the Belgians

Modern World History 269

have officially disappeared. However, in the aftermath up to 2
million Hutu refugees fled Rwanda for the Congo, exacerbating
the humanitarian crisis and destabilizing central Africa even
further.

Oil was first drilled by a
Russian engineer on the
Apsheron Peninsula on the
west side of the Caspian Sea
near Baku, Azerbaijan in 1848.
Edwin Drake’s famous well in
Titusville, Pennsylvania, was
drilled 11 years later in 1859.
Oil wells in Baku, Azerbaijan. illustration Although Russian fields and
from a 1909 book is captioned, "Where it refineries in Azerbaijan were
Rains Petroleum”. industry pioneers, the U.S.

took an early lead and by 1880
the Bradford Field in Pennsylvania produced 77% of the world’s
oil supply. But by the end of the 19th century the Russian
Empire had taken back the lead in production. By the first
decade of the 20th century, commercial oil production was
underway in Sumatra, Persia, Peru, Venezuela, and Mexico, as
well as Texas, California, and Ohio. In the early twentieth
century, the corporations dominating the global oil business
were Standard Oil (later Exxon, est. 1870), The Anglo-Persian Oil
Company (later British Petroleum, est. 1909), and Royal Dutch
Shell (est. 1907).

Oil initially played a fairly simple role in the Industrial
Revolution as a machine lubricant. However, by the late 19th
century, internal combustion engines, which relied on firing
cylinders using gasoline or heavy oil (diesel) as fuel, were
quickly becoming more efficient, replacing steam-power in
transportation. Diesel-fired ship and train engines, for instance,
carried less fuel than needed for coal-fired steam engines, while
the  gasoline-powered automobile quickly became
commonplace by the second decade of the twentieth century.


270 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Map of countries
with proven ol reserves

2017 map of world oil reserves. The greatest reserves are in Saudi Arabia and
Venezuela.

As oil became increasingly central to powering industry and
transportation, oil companies became more powerful and were
able to project their economic influence to shape the politics of
the countries they operated in. This became especially true in
the Arabian Peninsula, which until the discovery of oil had been
a sparsely-populated desert. Today, about 80% of the world’s
readily-accessible oil reserves are located in the Middle East.
Saudi Arabia, Russia, and the U.S. are the three largest

producers.

Questions for Discussion

How did technology widen the gap between imperial powers
and those they conquered?

How does the division of the world into “developed” and “less-
developed” regions influence international relations today?


Modern World History 271
China and Japan

Finally, as we always do,
let's look at what was
happening in the world’s
biggest nation. The Chinese
Empire continued its decline,
as Europeans continued their
presence in assigned trading
ports, divvying up Chinese
territory into “spheres of
influence” in which
commerce and Christian
missionary activity was
controlled by a_ particular
European power. By the
1890s, however, China also
faced the rapidly
industrializing Japanese

"China - the cake of kings and...of
emperors”, a French political cartoon from
1898 depicting the Great Powers cuttingup Empire. In less than thirty

the Chinese cake. years, the Japanese
reconstructed their

government, initiated industrial activity, and built up their
military through conscription and the latest weapons and ship
technology. However, the Japanese home islands lacked deposits
of key industrial inputs, chiefly coal, iron ore, and oil. To acquire
guaranteed resources and markets, the Japanese government
began to play the imperial game, following the rules established
by the Europeans. Like the British in India and China, Japanese
commerce laid claim to their own “sphere of influence” in
Chinese territory, and claimed sovereignty over tributary states.
The brief Sino-Japanese War in 1895 ended with the Qing
Empire granting the Ryukyu Islands and Taiwan to Japan, and
ceding trading rights in Korea and Manchuria.

At the end of the 19th century, a final conflict with the West
would pave the way for radical change and the end of the Qing
Empire in China. The Boxer Rebellion (1899-1901) was an anti-
colonial, anti-Christian revolt led by martial artists who called
themselves the Righteous Fists, or “Boxers” by Westerners. The

272 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Boxers, believing they were impervious to foreign weapons,
marched into Beijing intending to help the imperial
government exterminate the foreigners. An eight-nation
alliance, which included European nations, the U.S., and Japan,
sent 20,000 troops to fight the Boxers. The foreign soldiers
freed the legations besieged in the capital, but they also looted
Beijing and the surrounding countryside and summarily
executed anyone suspected of being a Boxer. The Qing
government agreed to pay an indemnity of 450 million taels of
silver to the allies (worth about $10 billion today).

ater

In another political cartoon from 1899, Uncle Sam clutches a “Trade Treaty with China”
and says: “Gentleman, you may cut up this map as much as you like, but remember
that I'm here to stay, and that you can't divide me up into spheres of influence”.

The abject state of the Qing dynasty and the increasing regional
power of Japan set the scene for China to become a battlefield
for territorial conflicts between Russia, Japan, and the United
States. The United States acquired the Philippine Islands from
Spain after the 1898 war, and immediately began projecting its
own political and commercial power into East Asia. Coming
late to the imperial game in China, the United States sought to
limit the existing “spheres of influence” and prevent new ones
from being imposed by either Russia or Japan. U.S. diplomats

Modern World History 273

advocated an “Open Door Policy” in China, in which the Qing
Empire would not limit any commercial activity by outside
powers.

In 1900, Russia occupied Manchuria and came into conflict
with Japanese interests on the Korean peninsula, leading to the
Russo-Japanese War of 1904-5. After the Japanese navy sank the
main battleships of Russia’s Pacific fleet in the Battle of Port
Arthur and held off the Russian army, the world realized the
power of an organized and industrialized Japan; forcing the
Europeans and Americans to consider the Japanese Empire as
an equal, while inspiring non-European colonized peoples that
the Europeans were not always invincible in war.

From the Russian side,
however, defeat by the
Japanese on the battlefield
and on the seas was not only
humiliating, but highlighted
the ineffectiveness of the
Tsarist regime. At the Winter
Palace in St. Petersburg in
January 1905, a major protest
against the inept government
ended when the Palace guard
fired upon the peaceful
demonstration, killing
hundreds. This “Bloody
Sunday” increased demands
for reform, including Crowd of petitioners, led by Orthodox
widespread support for a_ Priest Father Gapon, near Narva Gate, St.

. Petersburg, january 22, 1905.

parliamentary monarch. In

the meantime, the Tsar sent most of the Russian Baltic Fleet to
retake Port Arthur from the Japanese. Two thirds of the ships
were sunk by the Japanese Combined Fleet in the Battle of
Tsushima in May 1905. In October 1905, Tsar Nicolas II
acquiesced to the formation of an elected parliament, the
Duma, and the establishment of a constitutional monarchy.
However, he soon reneged granting full oversight powers to this


274 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

new legislature, preferring to maintain himself as an absolute
monarch.

However, the Tsar also
agreed to end the unpopular
war with Imperial Japan.
Peace between the Russians
and Japanese was negotiated
in Portsmouth, Maine, in the
United States, highlighting
the increasing importance of

+ US. interests in East Asia.

President Theodore

Roosevelt was awarded the

1906 Nobel Peace Prize for

5a _______—.. his role in ending the war.

Peace Treaty between Russia and Japan, Japan took over Russia s
signed September 1905 in Portsmouth, sphere of influence” on
New Hampshire China’s Liaotung Peninsula

and was recognized as the
sole power in Korea, which became part of the Japanese Empire
in 1910.

The Russo-Japanese War also once again highlighted the
extent to which the Qing government in China was hardly
considered a factor in international relations. Even though the
war concerned Chinese territory, Chinese armies were not
seriously involved in the fighting; nor were Chinese negotiators
present at the Treaty of Portsmouth. By that time, the Qing
empire was devolving into a series of warlord-controlled
regions. Palace intrigues in the royal “Forbidden City” in Beijing
had led to effective power being wielded by the Empress
Dowager Cixi for nearly five decades until her death in 1908.
Although she at times embraced gradual reform of her
government and military and periodically protested European
and Japanese incursions, she was realistic enough to understand
her limits. More conservative forces took over in the palace
in 1908, installing the five-year-old Prince Puyi as Emperor. It
was not long before modernizing forces soon overthrew the
decadent imperial system.

The most inspirational
leader of the modernizers was
Sun Yat-sen. Born in 1866, he

moved to the  then-
independent Kingdom of
Hawaii, where an_ older

brother owned a farm, to
complete is secondary
education at a U.S. missionary
school. Sun went on to study
medicine in Hong Kong and
began advocating for the end
of the Qing dynasty and the
establishment of a Chinese
republic. Because of his
opposition to the Qing, Sun
lived in exile in Hawaii, Japan,
and Malaysia, from where he

Modern World History 275

Portrait of Sun Yat-Sen, 1911.

formed the alliance which would end the Qing regime in the

Xinhai Revolution in 1911.

Questions for Discussion

What were the main factors leading to China's inability to
modernize and resist European imperialism?

What was the role of the United States in Asia in the early

20th century?


276 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Primary Sources

“The White Man's Burden: The United States and the
Philippine Islands” (1899), by Rudyard Kipling

Take up the White Man’s burden—
Send forth the best ye breed—
Go bind your sons to exile
To serve your captives’ need;
To wait in heavy harness
On fluttered folk and wild—
Your new-caught, sullen peoples,
Half devil and half child.Take up the White Man’s burden—
In patience to abide,
To veil the threat of terror
‘And check the show of pride;
By open speech and simple,
‘An hundred times made plain
To seek another's profit,
And work another's gain.Take up the White Man's burden—
The savage wars of peace—
Fill full the mouth of Famine
And bid the sickness cease;
And when your goal is nearest
The end for others sought,
Watch Sloth and heathen Folly
Bring all your hopes to nought.
Take up the White Man's burden—
No tawdry rule of kings,
But toil of serf and sweeper—
The tale of common things.
The ports ye shall not enter,
The roads ye shall not tread,
Go make them with your living,
‘And mark them with your dead!

Take up the White Man's burden—
And reap his old reward:
The blame of those ye better,
The hate of those ye guard—
The cry of hosts ye humour
(Ah, slowly!) toward the light:-—


Modern World History 277

“Why brought ye us from bondage,
Our loved Egyptian night?”

Take up the White Man's burden—
Ye dare not stoop to less—

Nor call too loud on Freedom

To cloak your weariness;

By all ye cry or whisper,

By all ye leave or do,

The silent, sullen peoples

Shall weigh your Gods and you.

Take up the White Man's burden—
Have done with childish days—

The lightly proffered laurel,

The easy, ungrudged praise.

Comes now, to search your manhood
Through all the thankless years,
Cold-edged with dear-bought wisdom,
The judgment of your peers!

Cecil Rhodes, “Confession of Faith”, 1877

It often strikes a man to inquire
what is the chief good in life; to
one the thought comes that it is a
happy marriage, to another great
wealth, and as each seizes on his
idea, for that he more or less
works for the rest of his existence.
To myself thinking over the same
question the wish came to render
myself useful to my country. | then
asked myself how could | and after
reviewing the various methods |


278 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

have felt that at the present day we
are actually limiting our children
and perhaps bringing into the
world half the human beings we
might owing to the lack of country
for them to inhabit that if we had
retained America there would at
this moment be millions more of
English living. | contend that we
are the finest race in the world and
that the more of the world we
inhabit the better it is for the
human race. Just fancy those parts
that are at present inhabited by the
most despicable specimens of
human beings what an alteration
there would be if they were
brought under Anglo-Saxon
influence, look again at the extra
employment a new country added
to our dominions gives. | contend
that every acre added to our
territory means in the future birth to
some more of the English race
who otherwise would not be
brought into existence. Added to
this the absorption of the greater
portion of the world under our rule
simply means the end of all wars,
at this moment had we not lost
America | believe we could have
stopped the Russian-Turkish war
by merely refusing money and
supplies. Having these ideas what
scheme could we think of to

Modern World History 279

forward this object. | look into
history and | read the story of the
Jesuits | see what they were able
to do in a bad cause and | might
say under bad leaders.

At the present day | become a
member of the Masonic order | see
the wealth and power they
possess the influence they hold
and | think over their ceremonies
and | wonder that a large body of
men can devote themselves to
what at times appear the most
ridiculous and absurd rites without
an object and without an end.

The idea gleaming and dancing
before ones eyes like a will-of-the-
wisp at last frames itself into a
plan. Why should we not forma
secret society with but one object
the furtherance of the British
Empire and the bringing of the
whole uncivilised world under
British rule for the recovery of the
United States for the making the
Anglo-Saxon race but one Empire.
What a dream, but yet it is
probable. itis possible. | once

eard it argued by a fellow in my
own college, | am sorry to own it
by an Englishman, that it was good
thing for us that we have lost the
United States. There are some
subjects on which there can be no


280 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

arguments, and to an Englishman
this is one of them, but even from
an American’s point of view just
picture what they have lost, look at
heir government, are not the
frauds that yearly come before the
public view a disgrace to an
country and especially their’s
which is the finest in the world.
Would they have occurred had
they remained under English rule
great as they have become how
infinitely greater they would have
been with the softening and
elevating influences of English
rule, think of those countless 000’s
of Englishmen that during the last
100 years would have crossed the
Atlantic and settled and populated
the United States. Would they
have not made without an
prejudice a finer country of it than
the low class Irish and German
emigrants? All this we have lost
and that country loses owing to
whom? Owing to two or three
ignorant pig-headed statesmen of
the last century, at their door lies
the blame. Do you ever feel mad?
do you ever feel murderous. | think
| do with those men. | bring facts to
prove my assertion. Does an |
nglish father when his sons wish
to emigrate ever think of
suggesting emigration to a country

Modern World History 281

under another flag, never—it would
seem a disgrace to suggest such a
thing | think that we all think that
poverty is better under our own

jag than wealth under a foreign
one.

Put your mind into another train
of thought. Fancy Australia
discovered and colonised under
the French flag, what would it
mean merely several millions of
English unborn that at present
exist we learn from the past and to
form our future. We learn from
having lost to cling to what we
possess. We know the size of the
world we know the total extent.
Africa is still lying ready for us it is
our duty to take it. It is our duty to
seize every opportunity of
acquiring more territory and we
should keep this one idea steadily
before our eyes that more territory
simply means more of the Anglo-
Saxon race more of the best the
most human, most honourable
race the world possesses.

To forward such a scheme what a
splendid help a secret society
would be a society not openly
acknowledged but who would work
in secret for such an object.

282 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Take one more case of the
younger son with high thoughts,

igh aspirations, endowed by
nature with all the faculties to
make a great man, and with the
sole wish in life to serve his
Country but he lacks two things the
means and the opportunity, ever
troubled by a sort of inward deity
urging him on to high and noble
deeds, he is compelled to pass his
time in some occupation which
furnishes him with mere existence,
he lives unhappily and dies
miserably. Such men as these the
Society should search out and use
for the furtherance of their object.

For fear that death might cut me
off before the time for attempting
its development | leave all my
worldly goods in trust to S. G.
Shippard and the Secretary for the
Colonies at the time of my death to
try to form such a Society with
such an object.

Media Attributions

* service-pnp-ppmsca-25600-25696v © Keppler, Udo J.
is licensed under a Public Domain license

Modern World History 283

2560px-Imperios_Espariol_y_Portugués_1790.svg ©
Nagihuin is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license

2880px-OttomanEmpireMain © Chamboz is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
William_Simpson_-
_Charge_of_the_light_cavalry_brigade,_25th_Oct._18
54,_under_Major_General_the_Earl_of_Cardigan ©
William Simpson is licensed under a Public Domain
license

SuezCanal-EO © NASA is licensed under a Public
Domain license
Grigoriy_Myasoyedov_Reading_of_the_1861_Manifes
to_1873 © Grigoriy Myasoyedov is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Russia_ethnic © Atlas Général Vidal-Lablache is
licensed under a Public Domain license
Growth_of_Habsburg_territories © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license
2880px-Austria_Hungary_ethnic.svg © Andrein is
licensed under a Public Domain license
Otto+von+bismarck © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Wernerprokla © Anton von Werner is licensed under a
Public Domain license

JaMAC © Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Canadian _Pacific_System_Railmap © Central Data
Bank is licensed under a CC BY (Attribution) license
LEAD Technologies Inc. V1.01 © J. G. Bartholomew and
Sons is licensed under a Public Domain license

File written by Adobe Photoshop? 5.0 © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license

US_Slave_Free_1789-1861 © Golbez is licensed under a

284 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

CC BY (Attribution) license

« Trails_of_Tears_en © Nikater is licensed under a
Public Domain license

* Antonio_Lopez_de_Santa_Anna_1852 © Craig H.
Roell is licensed under a Public Domain license

* Mexico_1824_(equirectangular_projection) © Giggette
is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

* Gauchos_mateando © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

* lossy-pagel-2560px-Lei_Aurea_(Golden_Law).tif ©
Arquivo Nacional is licensed under a Public Domain
license

* JoseMartiStatue-CentralParkNY © RyanFreisling is
licensed under a Public Domain license

* West_minstrel_jubilee_rough_riders © William H.
West is licensed under a Public Domain license

* 2560px-Emilio_Aguinaldo_ca._1919_(Restored) ©
Harris & Ewing Photo Studio is licensed under a Public
Domain license

* _The_White_Man’s_Burden__Judge_1899 © Victor
Gillam is licensed under a Public Domain license

« Panama_canal_cartooon_1903 © New York Times is
licensed under a Public Domain license

* Screen Shot 2020-09-27 at 11.21.19 AM © Lee and
Shepard is licensed under a Public Domain license

* Pablo_Neruda © Revista argentina is licensed under a
Public Domain license

* Scramble-for-Africa-1880-1913-v2 © Somebody500 is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

* Kongokonferenz © Adalbert von R6Bler is licensed
under a Public Domain license

* MutilatedChildrenFromCongo © Alice Harris, Daniel

Modern World History 285

Danielson, others is licensed under a Public Domain
license

KingShaka © James King is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Punch_Rhodes_Colossus © Edward Linley Sambourne
is licensed under a Public Domain license

GatlingGunDrawing © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

1901_Eastern_Telegraph_cables © Eastern Telegraph
Co is licensed under a Public Domain license

lossless-pagel-2880px-
Oil_wells_in_Baku,_Azerbaijan_b10154140_016_tif_t4
35gf27m.tiff © Philip, James Charles is licensed under a
Public Domain license
2880px-Map-of-countries-by-proven-oil-reserves-(in-
millions-of-barrels)—2017—US-EIA—Jo-Di-graphics ©
Jo Di Graphics is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license
2560px-China_imperialism_cartoon © Henri Meyer is
licensed under a Public Domain license

Putting_his_foot_down © J.S. Pughe is licensed under
a Public Domain license

Gapon_crowd_1905 © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license
Japan_Russia_Treaty_of_Peace_5_September_1905 ©
World Imaging is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license
Sun_Yat_Sen_portrait_2 © K.T. Thompson is licensed
under a Public Domain license

[7]

The Great War

Australian soldier firing a periscope rifle from a trench at Gallipoli, 1915.

In 1914, Europe had been officially “at peace” for nearly a

286

Modern World History 287

century. However, the official peace covered a growing tension
that was beginning to flare up into military conflict. Unification
of Germany in 1870, after the Prussian-led victory over the
French, had created a new nation with imperial aspirations in
the middle of Europe. Bismarck’s new nation competed with
neighboring countries in industry, agriculture, and overseas
empire-building. The existence of a strong, united Germany
ended the careful balance of power created by the Congress
of Vienna in its effort to reset the clock and redraw the map
after the Napoleonic Wars in 1815. France and Germany were
enemies and sought alliances against each other. By 1914, most
governments in Europe were preparing for an eventual war
between these groups of allied nations, although no one knew
what incident would bring the continent to battle. But, as early
as 1888, German Chancellor Otto von Bismarck had predicted
that “some damned foolish thing in the Balkans” could initiate
a widespread European conflict. He was proven correct on the
streets of Sarajevo on June 28, 1914.

During World War One, the
principal members of each of
these alliances were the
“Central Powers”, consisting
of Germany, Austria-
Hungary, and the Ottoman
Empire against the “Allied
Rival military coalitions in 1914: Allied Powers’, which at the
Powers (Triple Entente) in green, Central beginning of the war was
Powers (Triple Alliance) in brown. called the “Triple Entente”

after the original allies,
France, Great Britain, and Russia. Russia left the war in 1918,
Italy joined the allies in 1915, and Japan was an additional ally on
the French side. The United States entered the war to support
the allies in 1917.

The underlying causes of World War One were nationalism,
opposition to foreign rule, and simmering rivalries between
the Great Powers that were exacerbated by treaties requiring
allies to enter a war once it began. Previously, potential world
conflicts had been avoided through negotiation among the


288 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Powers. Africa was divided among the European empires at the
Berlin Conference in 1885, while “Spheres of Influence” were
established in China in order to regulate trade. However, such a
“Concert of Nations” did not succeed in the Balkans.

The unification of Germany upset the balance of Europe. Not
only did the Deutsches Reich aspire to become an imperial power
like Britain, France, and Russia, it had rapidly built up its
military and industrial power. By the first two decades of the
twentieth century, Germany surpassed Britain to become the
largest economy in Europe and second in the world. German
scientists won more Nobel Prizes than any other nation beside
the United States. And Germany’s navy was racing to surpass
Britain’s.

In 1888, Kaiser Wilhelm II
took the imperial throne
when both his grandfather
and father died in rapid
succession. Wilhelm I, the
King of Prussia whom
Bismarck had made an
emperor, ruled until he was
90. His grandson took the
throne at 29. Due to the
elaborate intermarriages of
the European ruling families,
Wilhelm II was also the eldest
grandson of Queen Victoria
of England. Perhaps taking
inspiration from the British
Empire, Wilhelm II launched
Germany on a “New Course”
toward overseas imperialism. The Kaiser ordered his military
leaders to read Alfred Thayer Mahan’s book, The Influence of Sea
Power upon History, which had also impressed Theodore
Roosevelt in America. By 1914, the German navy was second
only to the British Royal Navy. The new emperor also dismissed
Bismarck as Chancellor in 1890 and began looking for ways to
make Germany a colonial empire, through a much more

Portrait of Kaiser Wilhelm II, 1902.

Modern World History 289

aggressive foreign policy than that envisioned by his chief
advisor.

The eighty-four-year old
Austro-Hungarian Emperor
Franz Josef had been reigning
since 1848. His nephew,
Archduke Franz Ferdinand
(age 50) was the Crown Prince
and expected to soon become
the next Emperor. In the area
of western Europe between
the Mediterranean and the
Black Sea called the Balkan
Peninsula, the Austro-
Hungarian, the Russian, and
the Ottoman empires each

PEEP TEL claimed control. As described

“The boiling point’, a cartoon published in in the previous chapter, the

Punch in October 1912. Ottomans had gradually been

losing power in Europe since

the 1700s. By the end of the nineteenth century, newly-

independent nations of Greece, Bulgaria, Romania, Montenegro

and Serbia separated the Muslim Ottomans from the Catholic

Austro-Hungarians. The Orthodox Russians dreamed of

reestablishing Constantinople in Istanbul, and felt a kinship
with their fellow Orthodox Slavs, the Serbs and Bulgarians.

The Balkan conflict Bismarck had predicted began in 1908
with the Austro-Hungarian takeover of Bosnia from the
Ottoman Empire. Many Serbs lived in Bosnia, so Serbian
nationalists wanted it to be part of Serbia. The Serbs and
Bulgarians deepened their alliance with the Russians, who also
wanted to check the expanding influence of the Austrians in the
Balkans.

The independent nations of the Balkans fell into war in
1912-1918, first with the Ottomans, resulting in an independent
Albania, and then with each other as ethnic and religious
boundaries were contested. These were bloody conflicts that
included attacks on civilian populations in waves of ethnic


290 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

cleansing—people living in this region would experience
similar massacres in the 1990s after the end of the Cold
‘War. The Balkan armies on both sides dug into trenches as new
arms and technology limited the movement of troops.

In an effort to strengthen
Bosnian ties to Austria, Crown.
Prince Franz Ferdinand and
his wife made an official visit
to the regional capital of
Sarajevo on June 30, 1914. A
secretive Serbian nationalist
group, that had been
encouraged and supported by
Serbian military officers,
plotted the assassination of
the royal couple as their
motorcade made its way
through the city. After some
initial bungling, one of the Newspaper illustration of Gavrilo Princip
conspirators, nineteen-year- killing Archduke Franz Ferdinand and his

wife in Sarajevo.
old Gavrilo Princip, shot and
killed the Archduke and his pregnant wife.

The Austro-Hungarian government made a series of demands
for restitution from the Serbian government. When Serbia
refused, Austria decided to invade. Germany was bound by its
treaty obligations to support any action taken by its ally Austria-
Hungary. Austria’s invasion of Serbia activated the European
alliance system: Russia sided with the Serbs, France supported
Russia, and Great Britain was allied with France.

estions for Discussion

What were the main causes of the world war? Was it
inevitable?

Did the tangled relationships of European rulers contribute
to stability or instability?


Modern World History 291

London and Paris On the Day That War Was Declared

Gy CALLED TO THE COLES AND GATHERED AT TH

THE YOUNGEST CLASS OF FRING LADS ONLY YEAREOF 4

Many Europeans celebrated the start of the war, believing it would bring glory and
improve the standing of their nations.

All of Europe’s armies had been preparing for a continent-
wide conflict since the unification of Germany in 1870. Most
nations required some form of military service from all young

292 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

men, so that thousands of trained reserve soldiers could be
quickly called up. All war plans relied on the quick mobilization
of troops, and the extensive European railway network built in
the nineteenth century moved regiments more rapidly than in
any previous war. This rapid deployment meant that as soon as
one side mobilized, the opposing side also had to mobilize in
defense. Less time was available for calm decision-making as
every nation rushed to arms. In July 1914, when Austria declared
war and shelled the Serbian capital, Belgrade, Russia mobilized
its military. Germany mobilized against Russia. Russia was
allied with France, so France mobilized. Great Britain was allied
with France, so Great Britain mobilized. The Ottomans sided
with Germany as a counter to Russia. Italy, which had
a defensive alliance with Germany and Austria-Hungary, sat out
of the first months of war, until its government decided to side
with France, Great Britain, and Russia in early 1915.

Because of the French-
Russian alliance, the Germans
knew that they would face a
two-front war in any
European-wide
conflict. Expecting to face
enemies on Germany's
eastern and western borders,
the German generals had

German soldiers in a railway supply train t
on the way to the front in 1914. Earlyinthe been planning for years to

war, all sides expected the conflict tobe initially fight a defensive war

shortone. with Russia in the east and an

offensive war with France in
the west; holding off invading Russian armies while focusing on
defeating the French first.

In the first months of the war, the Germans were successful
in carrying out their strategy. The German army on the eastern
front was able to stop and even defeat the advancing
Russians. On the western front, the German government asked
permission of neutral Belgium to pass through on their way
to a surprise attack on France. When the Belgians rejected the
request, German troops invaded and occupied Belgium in

Modern World History 293

August 1914. The Germans advanced rapidly into France, but
were halted by combined French and British forces, miles from
Paris. Both sides dug in, creating a network of opposing
trenches that ultimately extended from the North Sea to the
Swiss border. Armies on both sides would be frustrated in their
attempts to break through on this “western front” for the next
four years.

Advances in military ae)
technology caused the
stalemate. The wars of the
nineteenth century had been
mobile, with generals
coordinating the movements
of infantry  foot-soldiers,
horse cavalry, and artillery
cannons on the _ battle
landscape. However, conflicts
like the Crimean War and the
US. Civil War had begun
introducing better, more
deadly weapons. The Charge
of the Light Brigade had
proven that cavalry was
ineffective against dug-in jcc, Regiment fighting from a trench, on
artillery. And in the last the western Front, 1916.
decades of the nineteenth
century, Europeans had perfected the use of machine guns,
practicing on native populations in their colonies. By 1914 the
armies of Europe had better weapons and better defenses: long-
range artillery, machine guns, trenches, and barbed wire. And
they were ready to use these on each other, rather than just on
the so-called “barbarians” their empires ruled over.

Since neither cavalry nor infantry could stand against
machine guns, attacks in trench warfare began with massive
artillery barrages to “soften” the other side before troops were
sent out of their trenches, “over the top” into the no-man’s
land between their trenches and those of the enemy, with fixed
bayonets to overwhelm any enemy soldiers who had survived

German soldiers of the 11th Reserve

294 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

the shelling. When their artillery had not “softened up” the
opposing forces enough, attackers would be met with enough
machine gun fire to slow down any effective advance. During
four long years of war, millions would either be severely
wounded or killed in the “no-man’s-land” that separated the
opposing armies.

Aerial view of opposing trench lines between Loos and Hulluch, July 1917. German
trenches at the right and bottom, British at the top-left.

Modern World History 295,

Questions for Discussion

Why did Europeans on the western front become trapped in
the trenches for four years?

Imagine being ordered “over the top” in a charge against the
enemy trench. How would you react?

Frustrated with the
stalemate of trench warfare,
the opposing sides on the
western front tried new
technologies and strategies in
search of a decisive
First Serbian armed airplane, 1915. victory. Airplanes, first

developed by the Wright
Brothers in 1908, proved their value in reconnaissance and later
in strafing trenches with machine guns and dropping small
bombs. Early radios allowed aviators to coordinate with ground
controllers. And in the spring of 1915, the Germans first
experimented using poison gas on the battlefield. Within
months, all sides would develop different varieties of poison gas,
while racing to improve the designs of their gas masks. Poison
gases added another devastating weapon to trench warfare,
while achieving no significant advantage. At least 1.3 million
people were killed by gas attacks. Chlorine and mustard gas
were two of the most common chemical weapons used by both
sides in the war. In the case of mustard gas poisoning, the effects
took 24 hours to begin and it could take four to five weeks to die.

German development of poisonous chlorine gas and its first
use were supervised by Fritz Haber, a scientist who won the
Nobel Prize for co-inventing the Haber-Bosch process for
synthesizing nitrogen from the atmosphere. After 67,000 troops
were killed and wounded by the gas in its first use in April
1915, Haber’s wife, the scientist Clara Immerwahr, killed herself
with his service revolver in protest. Poison gases were heavier
than air, so they settled into low areas like trenches, but also


296 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

sometimes rolled into low-lying towns, killing and injuring
civilians.

British emplacement after German gas attack, 1916.

Airplanes and poison gas, alongside machine guns and massive
artillery, simply became more cogs in the war’s increasingly-
effective killing machines. More people were killed, but without
any change in the outcome of the war. Enormous battles raged
for months at a time at Verdun and the Somme in 1916, resulting
in millions of casualties but hardly any territorial changes.

The conflict on the Eastern
Front, where the Germans
and Austro-Hungarians faced
the Russians, was more
mobile. In 1916, as the
months-long Battle of Verdun
seemed to be going against
the French, the Russian Army
overwhelmed Austrian forces in the Brusilov Offensive, the
largest and most deadly of the war. Hundreds of thousands died
on both sides as the Russian army advanced, forcing the
Germans to divert their forces from the Western Front. Austro-
Hungarian offensive capabilities were largely destroyed, but

Russian cavalry on the eastern front, 1916

Modern World History 297

Russian soldiers were also disillusioned and began to seriously
question the competence and decisions of their officers and
commanders, including the Tsar himself.

Even before the entry of the

United States in 1918, the war
had become truly global.
Japan was eager to be counted
as a world power, and
Japanese leaders seized upon
the opportunity the war
provided to improve their japanese troops landing during the Battle
status in Asia. After taking  °f Tsingtao, where they captured the
control of German colonies in S°™2" Postion
China and the Pacific in 1914,
Japan sent the Chinese government a list of 21 Demands. The
Chinese believed that giving in to Japan’s demands would have
basically resulted in China becoming a colony of the Japanese
Empire. The Chinese government agreed to some of the
demands, but leaked the list to British diplomats, who
intervened to prevent a complete shift in the balance of power
in Asia.

In Africa, Germany lost its colonies in the fighting. The
German commander in East Africa, led a largely native African
force in guerrilla tactics against Allied troops for most of the
war. In eastern Africa, disrupted crop cultivation and led to
hundreds of thousands of deaths by starvation and disease.

The Ottoman Empire
controlled territory on either
side of Bosporus _ straits,
which connect the Black Sea
with the Mediterranean. In
1915, the Allies landed troops
at Gallipoli, a peninsula on
the European side of the
Bosporus, about 200 miles
Australian troops charging an Ottoman (820 km) from the Ottoman
trench during the Anzac attack at Gallipol, capital in Istanbul The plan

. was to take Istanbul, knock


298 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

the Ottoman Empire out of the war and open a third front
against Austria-Hungary and Germany through the
Balkans. However, the Turks held the high ground above the
landing site chosen for the mostly colonial troops. Australian
and New Zealand Army Corps (ANZAC) troops were decimated,
in a battle that marks the beginning of a sense of nationality
in those countries. The anniversary of the Gallipoli landing,
April 25th, is still celebrated as ANZAC Day. The disastrous plan
nearly ended the political career of the British First Lord of the
Admiralty, Winston Churchill.

U.S. Ambassador Henry Morgenthau's caption: “Those who fell by the wayside. Scenes
like this were common all over the Armenian provinces in the spring and summer
months of 1915. Death in its several forms—massacre, starvation,
exhaustion—destroyed the larger part of the refugees. The Turkish policy was that of
extermination under the guise of deportation’.

The eleven month-long Gallipoli invasion was even more
important for the Turks. The hard-fought victory was led by
General Mustafa Kemal, who soon became a national hero and
would go on to found the modern Turkish Republic and serve
as its first president after the war. However, at nearly the same
time as the Gallipoli landings, the Ottoman government also
decided to take action against the Christian minority in
Armenia. Armenians had suffered from periodic pogroms in

Modern World History 299

the decades preceding World War One. The Armenians were
loyal subjects (many were serving in the army when the
persecution began), but after an unsuccessful Russian attempt
to invade Turkey from the east, some military leaders in the
Turkish government accused the Armenians of collaborating
with the Russian troops and decided to eliminate the Armenian
population. Men were executed, while women and children
were force-marched across the desert to Mesopotamia. Nearly
one million died in what was the worst genocide of the 20th
century before the Holocaust of World War Two.

The imperial powers
drafted soldiers from their
colonies into the fight. Many
of the 18 million people killed
in battle and 23 million
wounded, were people ruled
by the empires. The French
brought in African troops
from Senegal and Morocco,
who fought and died in the  jg.an bicycle troops at a crossroads at the
trenches of Western Front Battle of the Somme, France.
alongside other Allied
soldiers. British imperial subjects like the Canadians,
Australians, and New Zealanders fought beside their English
cousins. Over 700,000 Indians fought for Britain against the
Ottomans in Mesopotamia. Indian divisions were also sent to
Gallipoli, Egypt, German East Africa, and Europe. At least
74,000 Indians died in World War One.

Despite all of the efforts for a breakthrough on the battlefields
of France and Eastern Europe, the most effective strategy
against Germany was the British-led naval blockade, which cut
off grain and other food supplies from overseas. The Germans,
who had developed the most effective submarines and
torpedoes, tried to blockade Great Britain and France by sinking
incoming supply ships. This German naval strategy, however,
risked bringing the United States into the war. After the sinking
of the passenger ship Lusitania in May 1915, when a hundred
U.S. citizens were drowned a few miles from the Irish coast,


300 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

some American public opinion began to shift in favor of
entering the conflict. The German government quickly backed
away from unrestricted submarine warfare against supply ships
bound for the Great Britain and France.

estions for Discussion

How did new technologies change the way war is fought?

Why did the Gallipoli invasion almost destroy Winston
Churchill's political career?

What motivated the Armenian genocide?

The United States had a
long tradition of trying to
avoid being drawn into the
“Great Powers” conflicts of
Europe. American attitudes
toward international affairs
reflected the advice given by
President George Washington
Jane Addams and other American activists. in his 1796 Farewell Address,
attending a peace conference in the to avoid “entangling alliances”
Netherlands, 1915.

with the Europeans. The
Monroe Doctrine of 1823 had gone further to establish the
‘Western Hemisphere as the United States’ area of interest,
implying that the U.S. did not intend to intrude in the affairs of
Europe. However, although the U.S. did not participate in
international diplomatic alliances, American businesses and
consumers benefited from the trade generated by nearly a
century of European peace and the expansion of the
transatlantic economy.

Additionally, by the 1880s and 1890s, millions of Europeans
emigrated to the United States to work in factories and mines,
or to establish farms in the West. More Irish and Germans
arrived, and also Swedes, Norwegians, Finns, Poles, Ukrainians,
Italians, and Jews from Eastern Europe. The U.S. needed and


Modern World History 301

(largely) welcomed the newcomers, while America served as
a “safety valve” for European nations with an excess of poor
landless peasants. The diversity among the immigrants in this
American “melting pot” helped bolster the case for U.S.
neutrality in European affairs even as the war began.

A foreign policy of
neutrality also reflected
America’s focus on the
building of its new powerful
industrial economy, financed
largely with loans and
investments from Europe and
especially London. However,
U.S. dependency on foreign
capital began to change
during the war, when
American bankers began
making substantial loans to
Britain and France. John
Pierpont Morgan's successor,
J.P. Morgan Jr., who had spent
the early years of his career
managing the family’s bank
in London, leveraged a _ jack Morgan walking alongside his father J.
friendship with British P. Morgan in the last known photograph of
Ambassador Cecil Spring the to together (ca. 1913),

Rice to have the Morgan bank

designated as the sole-source U.S. purchasing agent for both
Britain and France. J.P. Morgan and Company managed the
Allies’ purchases of munitions, food, steel, chemicals, and
cotton; receiving a 1% commission on all sales. Morgan led a
consortium of over 2,000 banks and managed loans to the Allies
that exceeded $500 million (nearly $18 billion in today’s
dollars). Woodrow Wilson's Secretary of State, the populist-
leaning William Jennings Bryan, objected to the loans and
argued that by denying financing to any of the belligerents, the
U.S. could hasten the end of the war. But a quick end to the war
was not the bankers’ goal.


302 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

J.P. Morgan and Company’s Managing Director, Thomas
Lamont, presented his views in a 1915 speech to the American
Academy of Political and Social Science. Lamont observed that
the war offered the United States a unique opportunity to shift
from being a debtor nation, dependent on loans from Europe
and Britain, to becoming a global creditor. “We are piling up
a prodigious export trade [with] war orders,” he said, “running
into the hundreds of millions of dollars.” America was poised,
Lamont concluded, to become the trade and finance center
of the world, and the U.S. dollar to replace the British pound
sterling as the world’s currency. But this would only happen,
he warned, “if the war goes on long enough” A quick end to
hostilities would allow Germany to rapidly regain its
competitive position. The best result for America would be a
long war that ended in German defeat and left the winners
deeply in debt to the United States.

Lamont’s prediction came true. Wall Street, in New York City,
became and remains the financial capital of world, with
international debt denominated in U.S. dollars, largely because
of the loans made to the European Allies during World War
One. U.S. agriculture also benefitted from the war raging in
Europe. Armies needed calories, but the sons of farmers (and
their horses) in the wheat fields of France and elsewhere were
being drafted into the conflict. Soon grain from the Great Plains
of the United States was feeding British and French troops on
the Western Front, bringing wealth to Midwestern agricultural
communities. Farmers were soon purchasing new equipment
and buying or renting additional land to produce more.

Modern World History 303

Anti-war protesters at the US Capitol in April 1917.

Despite Wall Street bankers’ interest in profiting on the
European conflict, the U.S. federal government faced strong
public opinion against entering what Americans saw as a fight
they had no stake in. Scandinavians and German immigrants
(the largest immigrant group in America) declared both their
neutrality and their general impression that Germany’s culture
was superior to that of its European rivals. The Irish, who had
no love of England, were a powerful force in the Democratic
Party, dominating the big-city political “machines” in the North
and Midwest. Business leaders and social activists like Andrew
Carnegie, Henry Ford, and Jane Addams were pacifists. Poor
southerners reminded America that “a rich man’s war meant
a poor man’s fight”. Samuel Gompers, head of the American
Federation of Labor, denounced the war in 1914 as “unnatural,
unjustified, and unholy.” And socialist pamphlets argued that “a
bayonet was a weapon with a worker at each end.” Woodrow
Wilson ran for re-election in 1916 on the slogan, “He kept us out
of war.” But only a month after his second inauguration, Wilson
asked Congress to declare war on Germany in April 1917.


304 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Why did many Americans wish to stay out of the war?

Why did other Americans want the war to last as long as
possible?

The European powers had
been building up _ their
military capabilities for
nearly a generation before
the outbreak of war, and it
was unclear whether the
United States could mobilize
Pancho Villa and members of the Division rapidly. In late 1916, border
of the North. troubles in Mexico served as

an important field test for
modern American military forces and the National Guard.
Revolution and chaos threatened American business interests
when Mexican reformer Francisco Madero challenged Porfirio
Diaz’s corrupt and unpopular conservative regime. Madero was
jailed, fled to San Antonio, and planned the Mexican
Revolution. Although Diaz was quickly overthrown and Madero
became president, the Revolution unleashed forces that
demanded more social change, especially in land reform, that
the new liberal government was capable of delivering. New
uprisings, led by Pancho Villa and Emilio Zapata, broke out in
rural Mexico. Reactionaries assassinated President Madero in
Mexico City in early 1913, with the encouragement of the
European and U.S. ambassadors, and a military regime was
installed—but social upheaval and a guerrilla war continued.


Modern World History 305

In April 1914, President
Wilson ordered Marines to
accompany a naval escort to
Veracruz on the eastern coast
of Mexico. The Wilson
administration had officially
withdrawn its support of the
new military government and
watched warily as the
revolution devolved into
assassinations and chaos. In
1916, provoked by American
support for his rivals, Pancho
Villa raided Columbus, New

Pancho Villa and John Pershing posed for a
Mexico. His troops killed photo together in August, 1914, six months

seventeen Americans and_ before Pershing would chase Villa through

northern Mexico.
burned down the town center.

President Wilson commissioned General John “Black Jack”
Pershing to capture Villa and disperse his rebels and used the
powers of the new National Defense Act to mobilize over one
hundred thousand National Guard soldiers from across the
country as an invasion force in northern Mexico. Although
these troops failed to capture Villa, they gained experience in
the field and developed into a more professional fighting force,
which would form the basis of the U.S. army when war was
declared against the Central Powers a few months later.

In November 1916, Woodrow Wilson was re-elected President.
the people rallied around the slogan, “He kept us out of war.” By
the spring of 1917, President Wilson believed a German victory
would drastically and dangerously alter the balance of power in
Europe. But he had promised to keep the U. S. out of the war.
Submarine warfare had been a problem earlier in the conflict,
when the Lusitania was sunk in 1915. In 1917, the German general
staff decided that a new push for victory on the Western Front
needed to be combined with renewal of U-boat attacks in an
effort to starve the British and French. The Germans realized
that such a policy would draw the U.S. into the conflict on
the side of the Allies, but calculated that the military
unpreparedness of the United States would give them time to

306 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

break through the trench lines in France and end the war before
the Americans arrived.

In January 1917, a document
called the Zimmerman
Telegram surfaced. When
decoded it was found to
contain a suggestion from an
official of the German foreign
office to the German
ambassador in Mexico that if
the U. S. entered the war,
Mexico should be encouraged
to invade America to regain
the territory taken in the
Mexican-American ‘War.
Many Americans doubted the
authenticity of the telegram,
especially because it was
delivered by British
intelligence officers to the secretary of the U. S. Embassy in
London. However, Zimmerman soon acknowledged its
authenticity, claiming he had only been suggesting a Mexican
invasion if the United States had already entered the war. The
Mexican government, for its part, announced they had never
seriously considered the German suggestion—after all, they
were occupied with their own revolution. With American public
opinion finally behind him, President Wilson went to Congress
in February, 1917 to announce that diplomatic relations with
Germany had been severed. On April 2, Wilson returned with a
“War Message” that included the argument that “The present
German submarine warfare against commerce is a warfare
against mankind.” Congress declared war on Germany on April
4, 1917.

President Woodrow Wilson, 1916.

Modern World History 307

Wilson’s request for a fd
declaration of war followed
just a few days after Russia’s
withdrawal from the conflict.
The third year of the war saw
a major change in German
military prospects when the
Romanov Dynasty of Tsar
Nicholas II collapsed in
March 1917. The trouble had
begun in late February with a
strike by women factory
workers in St. Petersburg.
90,000 women took to the
streets shouting “Bread!”,
“Down with the autocracy!”,
and “Stop the war!” The
following day, over 150,000
men and women marched
and a general strike began.
Within a few days the army had sided with the revolutionaries
and Nicholas II was forced to abdicate.

Liberal reformers soon established a republic, which actually
made it easier for U.S. President Wilson to proclaim that the
war was to “make the world safe for democracy,” since a major
ally was no longer ruled by an absolute monarch. However, the
democratic reformers in Russia were not as well organized as
socialist revolutionaries led by Vladimir Lenin, who saw the end
of tsarist rule as an opportunity to also defeat capitalism and
creating a “dictatorship of the proletariat”. The revolutionaries
and the soldier and sailors who supported them wanted to end
Russian participation in the war.

waa

Russian troops in trenches, awaiting a
German attack.

308 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

By the fall, the socialist

revolutionaries, called
Bolsheviks, established
workers’ and soldiers’

councils—“soviets’—in the
major cities. In November
1917, overthrew the fledging
republic to establish a
revolutionary socialist state
under the leadership of Lenin
and the Bolsheviks, who
began to call themselves the
Communist Party. Lenin,

Tos. JleHvH OUNLL AET confident that his revolution
3eMMIO OT HeYHCTH would soon inspire oppressed

workers everywhere to
Bolshevik political poster showing Lenin OVerthrow capitalism, quickly
sweeping away monarchs, clergy, and negotiated a peace with
capitalists; the caption reads, “Comrade Germany in March 1918,
Lenin Cleanses the Earth of Filth” . .

ceding much of Russia's
western territories, including Finland, Estonia, Latvia,
Lithuania, Poland, Belarus, and Ukraine, losing 34% of the
former Russian Empire’s population and most of the industrial
base. The treaty also called for territories claimed by the
Ottoman Empire to be handed over to Germany’s ally, but
Armenia, Azerbaijan, and Georgia declared their independence
instead. Russia also agreed to pay 6 billion marks to compensate
Germany for its losses.

The Russian revolution soon became a civil war between the
“Workers’ and Peasants’ Red Army”, formed by the Bolshevik
leader Leon Trotsky, and the armies of the “White Russians”
under several leaders, dedicated to restoring the Tsarist
monarchy. To prevent the return of the Romanovs to power,
the revolutionaries had the entire family killed in July, 1918.
The revolutionaries also waged war on uncooperative peasants
called Kulaks, whom they accused of withholding grain from
the Bolshevik government. Many of the Kulaks were Ukrainian,
which contributed to an ongoing aggression toward the Ukraine
by the new Soviet Union.


Modern World History 309

Even after World War One
ended, the Allies, including
the United States, supported
the White Russians against
the Bolsheviks, sending
thousands of troops to
support the
counterrevolutionaries in
Siberia between 1918 and _ American, British, and Japanese Troops
1920. Years later Josef Stalin, P2fade through Vladivostok on the way to
who fought on the Soviet side te armed supporto the white
in the civil war, would
remember this fact while negotiating with Britain and the U.S.
during World War II.

Questions for Discussion

How did the Russian Revolution relate to the United States’
entry into the war?

Why did the U.S. support the tsarist “White Russian’
counterrevolution?

As soon as the war began, governments on both sides moved
quickly to portray the war effort as a success and to eliminate
any sign of dissent. Britain censored mail sent by soldiers at
the front to their families, instituting standardized postcards
that allowed men in the trenches to choose from a menu of
statements but not to write anything specific about their
experiences. Society became completely focused on the war
effort, and governments reorganized the economy around war
production. The state also rationed food and strictly controlled
the media (which at the time meant the press) to silence dissent
and present news of the war that boosted the morale and resolve
of the population. Although British author George Orwell was
still in school in England during the war, he lived through the

310 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

period and later served as a military police officer in Burma.
The “Orwellian” censorship and propaganda in works
like 1984 probably reflect his experience during the first World
‘War.

Socialist Presidential candidate Eugene V. Debs speaking against the draft in Canton,
Ohio in 1918. He was arrested for sedition shortly thereafter.

To stifle dissent in the U.S. , the government passed the
Espionage Act in June, 1917. Woodrow Wilson declared the act
was designed to prosecute those who had “poured the poison of
disloyalty into the very arteries of our national life..to debase
our politics to the uses of foreign intrigue.” Although Wilson
implied that the people he intended to target were “born under
other flags,” most of the people prosecuted, like labor leader
and Socialist Party presidential candidate Eugene V. Debs, were
American citizens. Wilson also suggested that labor unions’
actions to defend worker rights during wartime would be
considered an attack on America. The law was expanded with
the Sedition Act of 1918, which prohibited any forms of speech
that could be considered “disloyal, profane, scurrilous, or
abusive language about the form of government of the United

Modern World History 311

States.” As the Russian Revolution was taken over by the
Bolsheviks, U.S. concern shifted from draft resistance to
socialism and a “Red Scare” gripped America. Hundreds were
arrested, deported, and jailed under the Espionage and Sedition
Acts. By 1919 even the authorities realized they had gone too far,
and the U.S. Attorney General convinced President Wilson to
commute the sentences of 200 prisoners convicted under the
acts.

Women on all sides served as nurses and medics, and worked
in agriculture and industry to keep the economy going while
men were away fighting. Many governments promised equal
pay, although most did not make good on their promise. But
women gained political influence, and achieved the right to vote
in the U.S. and many European countries almost immediately
after the war's end as a result of their contributions to the war
effort.

Questions for Discussion

What did it take for the American people to support US entry
into the war?

How did the ongoing Russian Revolution and the growing
prominence of the Bolsheviks influence U.S. government
policy?


312 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

| WANT YOU
FOR U.S. ARMY

NEAREST RECRUITING STATION

The
European powers struggled to adapt to the brutality of modern
war, with its advanced artillery, machine guns, poison gas, and
submarines. Until the spring of 1917, the Allies possessed few
effective defensive measures against German submarine attacks,
which had sunk more than a thousand ships by the time the
United States entered the war. The rapid addition of American
naval escorts to the British surface fleet and the establishment
of a convoy system countered much of the effect of German
submarines. Shipping and military losses declined rapidly, just
as the American army arrived in Europe in large numbers.
Although many of the supplies still needed to make the
transatlantic passage, the physical presence of the army proved
to be a fatal blow to German plans to dominate the Western
Front.

Modern World History 313

In March 1918, Germany

tried to take advantage of the
withdrawal of Russia and its
new single-front war before
the Americans arrived, with
the Kaiserschlacht (Spring
Offensive), a series of five
major attacks. By the middle -
of July 1918, each and every the kaiser inspecting a communications
one had failed to break trench onthe western front, 1918.
through the Western Front.
Then, on August 8, 1918, two million men of the American
Expeditionary Forces joined the British and French armies in a
series of successful counteroffensives that pushed the
disintegrating German lines back across France. The gamble of
the Spring Offensive had exhausted Germany’s military, making
defeat inevitable. Kaiser Wilhelm II abdicated at the request of
the German military leaders and a new democratic government
agreed to an armistice on November 11, 1918, hoping that by
embracing Wilson’s call for democracy, Germany would be
treated more fairly in the peace talks. German military forces
withdrew from France and Belgium and returned to a Germany
teetering on the brink of chaos.November 11 is still
commemorated by the Allies as Armistice Day (called Veterans’
Day in the United States).

In all between 16 and 19 million soldiers died in World War
I along with 7 to 8 million civilians (before the influenza
pandemic of 1919). Some of the worst battles were:

+ Verdun: 976,000 casualties (Feb.-Dec. 1916)

* Brusilov Offensive: Nearly 2,000,000 casualties (June-Sept.
1916)

* Somme: 1,219,201 casualties (July-Nov. 1916)

* Passchendaele: 848,614 casualties (July-Nov. 1917)

* Spring Offensive: 1,539,715 casualties (March 1918)

* 100 Days Offensive: 1,855,369 casualties (Aug.-Nov. 1918)

Civilian populations were also targeted. While bombing cities

314 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

from airplanes was much more common in World War II, naval
blockades were also an effective way of putting pressure on
civilians. Even if a nation was relatively self-sufficient in food
production under normal circumstances, war was not a normal
circumstance. The British blockade of Germany prevented not
only war supplies but food from reaching the German people,
resulting in a half million civilian deaths. For the Europeans,
World War One was a “Total War” involving every level of
society.

By the end of the war, more than 4.7 million American men
had served in all branches of the military. The United States lost
over one hundred thousand men, fifty-three thousand dying
in battle and even more from disease. Their terrible sacrifice,
however, paled before the European death toll. After four years
of stalemate and brutal trench warfare, France had suffered
almost a million and a half military dead and Germany even
more. Both nations lost about 4 percent of their populations to
the war. And death was not nearly done.

Questions for Discussion

What effects do you think the trenches and poison gas
attacks had on European soldiers and civilians?

Why did Germany throw so much into the Spring Offensive?


Modern World History 315,

Soldiers from Fort Riley, Kansas, ill with "Spanish flu" at an emergency hospital ward at
Camp Funston in 1918.

Even as war raged on the Western Front, an even deadlier threat
loomed. In the spring of 1918, a new strain (HINI) of the
influenza virus appeared in the farm country of Kansas and hit
nearby Camp Funston, one of the largest army training camps
in the nation. The virus spread like wildfire. Between March
and May 1918, fourteen of the largest American military training
camps reported outbreaks of influenza. Some of the infected
soldiers carried the virus on troop transports to France. By
September 1918, influenza had spread to all training camps in
the United States.

316 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The second wave of the virus was even deadlier than the first.
Unlike most flu viruses, the HINI strain struck down those in the
prime of their lives rather than old people and young children.
A disproportionate number of influenza victims were between
ages eighteen and thirty-five. In Europe, influenza hit
troops and civilians on both sides of the Western Front. The
disease was misnamed “Spanish Influenza,” due to accounts of
the disease that first appeared in the uncensored newspapers of
neutral Spain while the warring nations tried to suppress the
news of disease for propaganda purposes.

The “Spanish Flu” infected about 500 million people
worldwide and resulted in the deaths of between fifty and a
hundred million people; possibly more. World population in
1918 was about 1.8 billion; influenza infected nearly a third and
killed between 5% and 10%. Reports from the surgeon general
of the army revealed that while 227,000 American soldiers had
been hospitalized from wounds received in battle, almost half a
million suffered from influenza. The worst part of the wartime
epidemic struck during the height of the Meuse-Argonne
Offensive in the fall of 1918 and weakened the combat
capabilities of both the American and German armies. During
the war, more soldiers died from influenza than combat. But the

Modern World History 317

pandemic continued to spread after the armistice, with a death
toll of nearly 20% of those infected, as opposed to about 0.1% in
regular flu epidemics. Four waves of worldwide infection spread
before cases and deaths finally began fading in the early 1920s.
No cure was ever found.

Question for Discussion

Compare the “Spanish Flu’ with the current COVID-19
pandemic. What can we learn from the past?

On December 4, 1918,
President Wilson became the
first American president to
travel overseas while in office.
Wilson went to Europe to end
“the war to end wars”, and he
intended to shape the peace.
The war brought an abrupt
end to four great European
imperial powers. The
German, Russian, Austrian-
Hungarian, and Ottoman
Empires each evaporated and
the map of Europe was
redrawn to accommodate
new independent nations. As Woodrow Wilson traveling from Versailles
part of the armistice, Allied Peace Conference, 1919.
forces occupied territories in
the Rhineland separating Germany and France, to prevent
conflicts there from reigniting war. A new German government
disarmed while Wilson and other Allied leaders gathered in
France at Versailles to dictate the terms of a settlement to the
war. After months of deliberation, the Treaty of Versailles
officially ended the war.

In January 1918, before American troops had even arrived in


318 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Europe, President Wilson had offered an ambitious statement
of war aims and peace terms known as the Fourteen Points
to a joint session of Congress. The plan not only addressed
territorial issues but offered principles on which Wilson
believed a long-term peace could be built. The president called
for reductions in armaments, freedom of the seas, adjustment
of colonial claims, and the abolition of the types of secret
treaties that had led to the war. Some members of the
international community welcomed Wilson’s idealism, but in
January 1918, Germany still anticipated a favorable verdict on
the battlefield and did not seriously consider accepting the
terms of the Fourteen Points. Even the Allies were dismissive.
French prime minister Georges Clemenceau remarked, “The
good Lord only had ten [commandments].”

President Wilson continued to promote his vision of the
postwar world. The United States entered the fray, Wilson
proclaimed, “to make the world safe for democracy.” At the
center of the plan was a new international organization, the
League of Nations. It would be charged with keeping a
worldwide peace, “affording mutual guarantees of political
independence and territorial integrity to great and small states
alike.” This promise of collective security, that an attack on one
sovereign member would be viewed as an attack on all, was a key
component of the Fourteen Points. Wilson’s Fourteen Points
speech was translated into many languages, and was even sent
to Germany to encourage negotiation.


Modern World History 319

4 LEAGUE oF NATIONS
BRIDCE

THE GAP IN THE BRIDGE.

But while President Wilson was celebrated in Europe as a
“God of Peace,’ many of his fellow statesmen were less
enthusiastic about his plans for postwar Europe. Former U.S.
president Theodore Roosevelt called the Fourteen Points “high-
sounding and meaningless” and said they could be interpreted
to mean “anything or nothing.” And America’s closest allies had
little interest in the League of Nations. Allied leaders focused
instead on guaranteeing the future safety of their own nations.
Unlike the United States, safe across the Atlantic, the Allies had
endured the horrors of the war firsthand. They refused to
sacrifice further. Negotiations made it clear that British prime
minister David Lloyd-George was more interested in preserving
Britain’s imperial domain, while French prime minister
Clemenceau wanted severe financial reparations and limits on
Germany’s future ability to wage war. The fight for a League
of Nations was therefore largely on the shoulders of President
Wilson.

320 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Despite the Allies’ lack of
agreement with the Fourteen
Points, the key role of U.S.
troops and U.S. dollars in the
outcome gave the Americans
an influential seat at the
negotiating table at Versailles.
Woodrow Wilson was seen as
an international hero, and his
appointee Thomas Lamont
became a central figure in the
negotiations that ended the
war and set guidelines for
German reparations that
ultimately bankrupted the
Thomas W. Lamont, partner atJ.P. Morgan. nation and led to World War
and Company and peace negotiator at IL Wilson’s Fourteen Points
Versailles . .

have received more attention
from historians, but Britain and France were successful getting
the punitive items they wanted into the final treaty. Lamont
went along because shifting the financial burden to Germany
guaranteed that the Allied nations that owed J.P. Morgan and
Company so much money would be able to pay it back.

By June 1920, the final version of the treaty was signed and
President Wilson was able to return home. The treaty was a
compromise that included demands for German reparations,
provisions for the League of Nations, and the promise of
collective security. Wilson did not get everything he wanted,
but Lamont did. According to historian Ferdinand Lundberg,
the “total wartime expenditure of the United States government
from April 6, 1917, to October 31, 1919, when the last contingent
of troops returned from Europe, was $35,413,000,000. Net
corporation profits for the period January 1, 1916, to July, 1921,
when wartime industrial activity was finally liquidated, were
$38,000,000,000.” In the years after the war, J.P. Morgan and
Company would earn additional millions loaning Germany the
money the treaty required it to pay to the allies so they could
pay the bankers.


Modern World History 321

Questions for Discussion

Do you see any difficulty with the idea that Woodrow Wilson
is typically seen by historians as an idealist, but his chief
negotiator at Versailles was Thomas Lamont?

Were Europeans right or wrong to put their national
concerns first?

In your opinion, what was the point of the League of Nations?
As Wilson had imagined it, who did it benefit?

Was the United States right or wrong to stay out of the
League?

The Great War transformed the world. The Middle East,
especially, was drastically changed. Before the war, the region
east of the Mediterranean had three main centers of power: the
Ottoman Empire, British-controlled Egypt, and Iran. President
Wilson’s call for self-determination in the Fourteen Points
appealed to many under Ottoman rule, especially the Arabs.
In the aftermath of the war, Wilson sent a commission to
determine the conditions and aspirations of the people. The
King-Crane Commission found that most favored an
independent state free of European control. However, the
people’s wishes were largely ignored and the lands of the former
Ottoman Empire were divided into several nations created by
Great Britain and France with little regard to ethnic
realities. The British in particular wanted to continue to control
the Suez Canal which was their route to India, and to
monopolize the oil of the Persian Gulf to fuel the diesel engines
of their navy and merchant marine.

322 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Map of Sykes-Picot Agreement showing areas of control and influence agreed between
the British and the French. Signed by Mark Sykes and Francois Georges-Picot, 8 May
1916.

The Arab provinces of the Ottomans were to be ruled by Britain
and France as “mandates” and a new nation of Turkey emerged
in the former Ottoman heartland in Anatolia. According to the
League of Nations, mandates were necessary in regions that
“were inhabited by peoples not yet able to stand by themselves
under the strenuous conditions of the modern world.” Though
supposedly established for the benefit of the Middle Eastern
people, the mandate system was essentially a reimagined form
of nineteenth-century imperialism. France received Syria;
Britain took control of Iraq, Palestine, and Transjordan (Jordan).
The United States was asked to become a mandate power but
declined.

Modern World History 323

To consolidate their power

over the Arabs, the British
supported Hussein Ibn Ali
(related distantly to the
Prophet Muhammad) as king
of Hejaz on the Arabian
Peninsula, including the holy
sites of Mecca and Medina, in
1916. His sons Abdullah and
Faisal were chosen to be kings
of Transjordan and of Syria,
where Faisal was rejected and
so instead became the king of
Iraq. The Iraqi dynasty ended
in violence with the murder
of Faisal’s grandson in 1958,
but Abdullah’s dynasty still
rules Jordan, under Abdullah ton sau (right) and Iraqi King Faisal (left) in
Il and Queen Rania. In Hejaz,
Hussein Ibn Ali was overthrown in 1925 by Ibn Saud, a tribal
leader from eastern Arabia. Through strategic marriages with
other tribes, Ibn Saud established Saudi Arabia. He had so many
children that the current king is still one of his many sons.

The disposition of the Middle East was complicated by the
increasing importance of its oil resources. Oil had been
discovered in Iran in 1908, and during the period when
petroleum was becoming the most important commodity of the
twentieth century it was also becoming clear that some of the
world’s largest reserves were located in the Middle East. The
Anglo-Persian Oil Company (now known as BP) was established
in 1908 to control production in Iran. After the war, British-
controlled businesses that had been licensed by the Ottomans to
develop oil discovered in Mesopotamia spurred British interest
in creating the new Kingdom of Iraq under British mandate
in 1920. The British-controlled multinational, TPC (Turkish
Petroleum Company, established in 1912), received a 75-year
concession to develop Iraq's oil.

However, in 1933 when enormous deposits of oil were
discovered in eastern Arabia, Ibn Saud turned to the Americans


324 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

rather than the British to exploit these oil deposits, fearing
renewed British meddling in his country. U.S. oil companies
have been there ever since.

The movement to establish
"3 a Jewish

4 Homeland—Zionism—was

begun in the 1890s by Jewish
‘\

Austrian journalist Theodor
Herzl. Shocked by how Jews
were being persecuted
throughout Europe, even in
liberal France, Herzl
concluded that Jews would
never be fully accepted as
citizens anywhere and that
they needed to establish a
separate Jewish
homeland. After some

Theodor Herzl on board a vessel reaching .
the shores of Palestine, 1898, debate, his | movement

decided to begin buying land
in Palestine, the site of the ancient Hebrew kingdom. Originally,
most Jews around the world, especially more religious Jews,
rejected the movement because they believed that Jews were not
to return to Israel until the Messiah came. Zionists in Palestine

often had problems with their Arab neighbors, who looked
upon these new arrivals as Europeans trying to take over their
country.

In the heat of the war, in 1917, the British Foreign Secretary
Lord Balfour promised that Palestine would be recognized as
a “Jewish homeland,” in an attempt to gain support of Jews
among the belligerents—not realizing that Zionism was hardly
the majority view at that time within Judaism. Of course, the
British also promised to respect Arab sovereignty in Palestine;
setting the stage for conflict in the region that has continued to
today.

Question for Discussion


Modern World History 325

How did the negotiations between European powers set the
scene for the conflicts of the following century?

The charred corpse of Will Brown, victim of Omaha, Nebraska lynching, September
1919.

At home, the United States grappled with harsh postwar
realities. Racial tensions exploded in the “Red Summer” of 1919
when violence broke out in at least twenty-five American cities,
including Chicago and Washington, D.C. Industrial war
production and massive wartime service had created vast labor
shortages, and thousands of black southerners had traveled to
the North and Midwest to work in factories. But the Great
Migration of Black people escaping the traps of southern
poverty and Jim Crow sparked new racial conflict when white
northerners and returning veterans fought to reclaim the jobs
and the neighborhoods they believed were theirs alone.

Many Black Americans who had fled white supremacy in the

326 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

South or had traveled halfway around the world to fight for
the United States would not so easily accept postwar racism.
The overseas experience of Black Americans and their return
triggered a dramatic change in their home communities. W.E.B.
Du Bois, a black scholar and author who had encouraged blacks
to enlist, highlighted African American soldiers’ combat
experience when he wrote of returning troops, “We return. We
return from fighting. We return fighting. Make way for
Democracy!” But white Americans just wanted a return to the
status quo, a world that did not include social, political, or
economic equality for black people. And they were alarmed
and frightened by the thought of fearless, capable black men
who had learned to handle weapons and defend themselves on
foreign battlefields.

Family leaving damaged home after 1919 Chicago race riot.

In 1919, racist riots erupted across the country from April until
October. The bloodshed included thousands of injuries,
hundreds of deaths, and vast destruction of private and public
property across the nation. The weeklong Chicago Riot, from
July 27 to August 3, 1919, considered the summer’s worst,
included mob violence, murder, and arson. Race riots had
rocked the nation before, but the Red Summer was something
new. Recently empowered black Americans actively defended
their families and homes from hostile white rioters, often with

Modern World History 327

militant force. This behavior galvanized many in black
communities, but it also shocked white Americans who
interpreted black self-defense as a prelude to total revolution.
In the riots’ aftermath, James Weldon Johnson wrote, “Can't
they understand that the more Negroes they outrage, the more
determined the whole race becomes to secure the full rights
and privileges of freemen?” In the fall, an organization called
the African Blood Brotherhood formed in northern cities as
a permanent “armed resistance” movement. The socialist
orientation of its members rapidly led to an affiliation with the
Communist Party of America. But the Russian-led Communist
International (Comintern) had no interest in semi-independent
groups like the ABB with their Afro-Marxist ideas. The
Brotherhood’s members found their way to other organizations
like the Workers Party of America and the American Negro
Labor Congress.

The wave of widespread lynching and riots against African-
Americans lasted into the early 1920s. One of the most
prosperous Black communities in the United States, the
Greenwood neighborhood in Tulsa, Oklahoma, was burned to
the ground and over a hundred people were killed by a white
supremacist attack that included aerial bombing in June 1921.
Many white Americans felt threatened by African-American
success and increased social mobility. The early 1920s also saw
a resurgence of the white supremacist Ku Klux Klan, which now
added immigrant Jews and Catholics to the list of those who
would destroy “traditional” white Protestant America. These
ideas culminated in the Immigration Act of 1924, which lowered
overall immigration to a small fraction of what it was before
World War One, while setting up a quota system based on the
ethnic makeup in the U.S. in 1890, a time before many Jewish
and Catholic immigrants arrived from southern and eastern
Europe.

328 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Panorama of the Greenwood neighborhood after the riot, 1921.

The desire to rid the United States of what the majority
perceived as evil is also seen in the 18th Amendment to the
U.S. Constitution, which prohibited the production and sale
of alcoholic beverages in the U.S. Liquor had ruined many
American families, and women in particular had suffered as
abused spouses. The Women’s Christian Temperance Union
and similar prohibitionist organizations were prominent in the
Progressive movement, pushing for a federal graduated income
tax to replace the lucrative tax on liquor. The war made
prohibition even more patriotic, since the beer industry was
dominated by immigrant Germans, and the amendment was
ratified shortly after the end of the war.

The success of the Russian SAVE Snetg 2a 7
i ~ SACGO « ml
Revolution and the ei am lane it

Communist victory in the
Russian Civil War enflamed
American fears of
communism. The executions
of Nicola Sacco and
Bartolomeo Vanzetti, two
Italian-born anarchists, Postcard of a protest for Sacco and
epitomized the new Yarettiin London, 1921.

American Red Scare. Arrested

on suspicion of armed robbery and murder, their trial focused
not on the defendants’ guilt or innocence, but on their anarchist
political affiliations. Sacco and Vanzetti were quickly convicted
and sentenced to death, setting off a series of appeals and
motions for mistrial. In 1925, while the two men sat on death
row, another man confessed to the crime and provided details
that made his confession credible. The judge, however, refused
a petition for a new trial, later remarking to a Massachusetts

TE
VICTORIA. STE J
VALnaN CAPPM ES


Modern World History 329

lawyer, “Did you see what I did with those anarchistic bastards
the other day?”

People all over the world demonstrated their sympathy with
the accused. Albert Einstein, George Bernard Shaw, and H.G.
Wells signed petitions. Demonstrations were held in London,
Paris, Geneva, Amsterdam, and Tokyo. Famous authors wrote
about the case, such as John Dos Passos’s Facing the Chair,
Maxwell  Anderson’sGods of the —_Lightning or Upton
Sinclair’s Boston. The Industrial Workers of the World (IWW)
labor union called a three-day national walkout to protest the
executions. Sacco and Vanzetti were executed just after
midnight on August 28, 1927. The Sacco-Vanzetti case
demonstrated an American paranoia about immigrants and the
potential spread of radical ideas, especially those related to
international communism. On the 50th anniversary of the
executions, Massachusetts Governor Michael Dukakis issued a
proclamation that Sacco and Vanzetti had been unfairly tried
and convicted and that “any disgrace should be forever removed
from their names”.

Questions for Discussion

What did the extension of racial conflict into the North after
the war suggest about American attitudes regarding race?

Was the anxiety of the Red Scare justified? Why were
Americans so afraid of communism in the early 1920s?

Media Attributions

* Periscope_rifle_Gallipoli_1915 © Ernest Brooks is
licensed under a Public Domain license

* 2880px-Map_Europe_alliances_1914-en.svg ©

historicair is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license

330 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

1920px-Kaiser_Wilhelm_II_of_Germany_-_1902 © T.
H. Voigt is licensed under a Public Domain license

Balkan_troublesl © Leonard Raven-Hill is licensed
under a Public Domain license

DC-1914-27-d-Sarajevo-cropped © Achille Beltrame is
licensed under a Public Domain license

1920px-The_War_of_the_Nations_WW1_337 © O
Suave Gigante is licensed under a CCO (Creative
Commons Zero) license
German_soldiers_in_a_railroad_car_on_the_way_to
_the_front_during_early_World_War_l,_taken_in_19
14._Taken_from_greatwar.nl_site © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license

Bundesarchiv_Bild_186-B0560,_Frankreich,_Kavalleri
sten_im_Schutzengraben © Oscar Tellgmann is
licensed under a Public Domain license

Aerial_view_Loos-Hulluch_trench_system_July_1917
© Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license

FirstSerbianArmedPlanel915 © Museum of Yugoslav
Aviation is licensed under a Public Domain license

Nach_Gasangriff_1917 © Hermann Rex is licensed
under a Public Domain license

B_araxy!_(1916) © urra6c-xanmran is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Battle_of_Tsingtao_Japanese_Landing © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license
lossy-pagel-2880px-
Scene_just_before_the_evacuation_at_Anzac._Austral
ian_troops_charging_near_a_Turkish_trench._When
_they_got_there_the..._-_NARA_-_533108.tif ©
Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license

2880px-Ambassador_Morgenthau’s_Story_p3l4 ©
Henry Morgenthau is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Indian_bicycle_troops_Somme_1916_IWM_Q_ 3983

Modern World History 331

© John Warwick Brooke is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Noordam-delegates-1915 © Unknown is licensed under
a Public Domain license
J-P._Morgan_and_J.P._Morgan_Jr © Moody's
Magazine is licensed under a Public Domain license

Pacifists_at_Capitol_LOC_16992358889 © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license

Pancho_and_his_followers

Gen_Obregon,_Villa,_Pershing_at_Ft_Bliss_1914 ©
Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license

1920px-Woodrow _Wilson-H&E © Harris & Ewing is
licensed under a Public Domain license

Russian_Troops_NGM-v31-p379 © George H. Mewes is
licensed under a Public Domain license
Tov_lenin_ochishchaet © Viktor Deni is licensed
under a Public Domain license
IntervencionInternacionalEnVladivostok-throughrussi
anreOOwilluoft © Albert Rhys Williams is licensed
under a Public Domain license
Debs_Canton_1918_large © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license
Uncle_sam_propaganda_in_wwl © James
Montgomery Flagg is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Western_front_Kaiser_in_trench_1918-04-04 ©
Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license
2880px-
Emergency_hospital_during_Influenza_epidemic,_Ca
mp_Funston,_Kansas_-_NCP_1603 © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license
Spanish_flu_death_chart © Unknown is licensed under
a Public Domain license

Woodrow_Wilson_returning_from_the_Versailles_Pe

332 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

ace_Conference_(1919) © Associated Press is licensed
under a Public Domain license

* The_Gap_in_the_Bridge © Leonard Raven-Hill is
licensed under a Public Domain license

* ThomasWLamont-1929Timemagazine © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license

+ 2560px-
MPK1-426_Sykes_Picot_Agreement_Map_signed_8_
May_1916 © Royal Geographical Society is licensed
under a Public Domain license

* King_Faisal_I_of_Syria_with_King_Abdul-
Aziz_of_Saudi_Arabia_in_the_mid-1920s © Unknown
is licensed under a Public Domain license

¢ PikiWiki_Israel_7188_Herzl_on_board_reaching_the_
shores_of_Palestine © v7» px is licensed under a Public
Domain license

* Omaha_courthouse_lynching © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license

* ChicagoRaceRiot_1919_wagon © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license

* Panorama_of_the_ruined_area_tulsa_race_riots_(ret
ouched)

* Save_Sacco_and_Vanzetti © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license

[8]

Modern Crisis

The horror of World War I
was a shock to the self-
satisfaction of Europeans who
had believed themselves to be
the pinnacle of world
civilization. Intellectuals had
shared in the celebration
when war had been declared,
parading in the streets of
many national capitals. It is
unclear exactly what they
“ | were expecting from the war,
but their experience was quite
different. No one exposed to
the misery of trench warfare
could hang onto illusions of
the heroism and nobility of
the struggle they were
engaged in. The cold, the
Ernest Hemingway in uniform in Milan, mud, and the terror of
1918. He drove ambulances for two pointless charges over the top
months until he was wounded.

ordered by commanders who
had no clue what they were doing and who rarely led their men

333

334 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

into the slaughter — all these factors were captured by journalists
and then by novelists like the American Ernest Hemingway (4
Farewell to Arms, 1929), the German Erich Maria Remarque (All
Quiet on the Western Front, 1929), and the British Ford Madox
Ford (The Good Soldier, 1915, and Parades End, 1925) and Robert
Graves (Goodbye to All That, 1929). The absurdity of Western
culture was on display in what has come to be known as the
modern crisis. The trenches had also been an unusual
opportunity for the classes to mix. Some upper-class British
officers such as Ford developed a new understanding of people
they probably would never have met in their normal lives at
home. Other novels dealing with these themes include German
author Thomas Mann’s Magic Mountain (1924), Rebecca West's
The Return of the Soldier (published in England as the war was
ending in 1918), and even Virginia Woolf’s most famous book,
Mrs. Dalloway, where one of the main characters, Septimus
Smith, is a war veteran suffering hallucinations caused by what
we might now call Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder
(PTSD)—what was then called “shell-shock.” Smith avoids being
committed to a mental institution by jumping out a window to
his death.

Dmitry Mendeleev's “Natural system of the elements’, 1870

Alongside the novelists and intellectuals questioning the value
of culture and social traditions that had led to the disastrous
war, scientists were beginning to question the assumptions that
formed the basis of our understanding of the universe. Since
Newton, science had been pretty certain of the fundamental

Modern World History 335

nature of reality. The atoms that were assumed to be the basic
building blocks were imagined to function like little billiard
balls, obeying all the laws of motion that scientists had studied
in the “macro” world of regular experience. By the late 19th
century scientists had discovered nearly 70 elements out of the
90 or so that occur naturally on earth. Russian scientist Dmitri
Mendeleyev had explored the chemical nature of the elements
and developed the periodic table that expresses their chemical
relationships. On the other end of the spectrum, at the
astronomical scale, the universe was believed to be made up of
an eternal field of stars that spread in all directions.

This idea was challenged by
Edwin Hubble’s discovery
around 1925 that the
Andromeda nebula, a fuzzy
patch on the star maps, and
other “spiral nebulae” were
actually distant galaxies and
that all the visible stars were
just nearby members of our Photograph of the “Great Andromeda
own, Milky Way galaxy. Nebula”, 1899.

Hubble discovered more

galaxies, and then used measurements of their Doppler shifts in
light wavelengths to deduce that the universe was not steady and
eternal, but expanding. Albert Einstein’s theories of special and
general relativity suggested there were no static cosmological
solutions, which led to the formulation of the Big Bang Theory
(originally called the hypothesis of the primeval atom) by
Belgian Catholic priest Georges Lemaitre.

Atoms had been thought of as tiny billiard balls, obeying the
basic laws of motion suggested by classical physics. Einstein
challenged these ideas with his work on electromagnetics, and
then Werner Heisenberg, Niels Bohr, Louis De Broglie, and
Erwin Schrédinger smashed the classical model entirely with
their development of quantum mechanics. Heisenberg’s
uncertainty principle alerted the public that things were not
what they appeared—that it was impossible to measure the
position and velocity of a particle at the same time, and that the


336 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

act of observation changes the process being observed. Others
picked up on this idea, which became a metaphor for the
intrusion of explorers and experimenters into the things they
were exploring.

Scientists at the 1927 Solvay Conference in Brussels included Marie Curie, Erwin
Schrédinger, Wolfgang Pauli, Werner Heisenberg, Louis de Broglie, Niels Bohr, Max
Plank, and Albert Einstein.

Even sociologists and anthropologists were influenced by the
uncertainty principle, and began wondering how their arrival
in people’s lives to gather data about their cultures actually
altered those cultures. Psychologists Sigmund Freud and Carl
Jung complicated matters even more when they suggested that
there was a whole lot going on in the human subconscious
over which we do not have control or even direct knowledge.
The solid, rational basis of the western world was beginning to
look like a house of cards or a shared hallucination that might
evaporate at any moment.

Modern World History 337

The destruction of World
‘War One, and the new ideas
in science, sociology, and
psychology led artists,
architects, and filmmakers to
reconsider “reality” as well.
Already in the 19th century,
the challenge and promise of
industrialization, liberalism.
and nationalism had changed
the themes _ traditionally
considered by artists, while
the attempt to get at the
essence of a scene inspired
painters to record their first edyard Munch's The Scream”
“impression” of a_ scene,
highlighting color and light over form. Even before World War
One, the experimentation of the mainly French impressionists
and post-impressionists (like Claude Monet, Pierre-Auguste
Renoir, Vincent Van Gogh, and Paul Gauguin) inspired artists
like the Norwegian Edvard Munch towards
expressionism—using the impressionist style to express interior
emotions. Munch’s “The Scream” from 1893 perhaps best sums
up the “shock of the new” experienced not just by the artists but
by much of society in the new industrializing world.

Abstract expressionism.
after the war reverted to
forms and shapes to reveal
interior thoughts and
feelings, such as in Wassily
Kandinsky’s “Yellow-Red-
Blue” and Paul Klee’s “Ancient
Sound”, both painted in 1925.
The surrealist and Dadaist
movements of the 1920s
especially pointed to the absurdity of societal conventions,
exploded in the carnage of World War One. The surrealists also

Yellow-Red-Blue, Wassily Kandinsky, 1925,

338 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

focused on imagery inspired by Freud’s theories about dreams,
such as René Magritte’s “The Menaced Assassin” from 1927.

Film-making had
progressed quickly from
simple experimental images
in the late 1890s to more
complex stories in the years
leading up to the war, with
directors like Charlie Chaplin
and DW. Griffith taking the
camera out of the theatre and
introducing camera angles,
close-ups, and moving
carriages following the action,
with editing to combine
scenes into longer narratives.
After the war, German
expressionists produced the
horror film The Cabinet of Dr.
Caligari (1920), using abstract
sets to tell a story to criticize
the insane authoritarianism
they believed had directed
society during the recent
conflict. Other German
directors like FW. Murnau
(Nosferatu, 1922 and Sunrise,
1927) and Fritz Lang
(Metropolis, 1927 and M, 1931)
also explored challenging
themes in their films, while

Poster for the 1927 German film
Metropolis depicting the
Maschinenmensch (Machine-person) in
front of a dystopian city of the future.

the Russian Sergei Eisenstein used metaphoric images and
camera angles to tell stories of the workers’ struggle in The
Battleship Potemkin and Strike (both released in 1925).

Modern World History 339

Questions for Discussion

Why were artists and authors thrown into a “modern crisis"
after the Great War?

How did science contribute to undercutting the sense of self-
satisfaction felt by people before the “crisis”?

Hyperinflation

Peace began in Europe with the hope that the new nation-
states that replaced the German, Russian, and Austro-Hungarian
Empires in Central Europe would deliver social justice and
prosperity through new democratic constitutions. Not
everybody was willing to wait patiently for life to get better after
the war and pandemic, however. And the new Soviet Union,
which had survived attempts by the allies and the U.S. to defeat
the Bolsheviks during the Russian Civil War, felt justified in
trying to export their “workers revolution” to the rest of Europe.
Attempts at violent communist-inspired revolution led to
violent reactions. Revolutionaries found support among the
workers of many nations. Many believed the bloodbath in the
trenches had to have meant something more than just gaining
the right to vote—perhaps it was to birth a new socialist utopia,
replacing the not just the monarchs who started the war, but the
capitalists who profited from it.

340 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

In Germany, liberals and
social democrats had
declared a republic when
Kaiser Wilhelm abdicated in
the final days of World War
One, with the hope that they
could negotiate a peace as
equals with the
democratically-elected
governments of Great Britain,
France, and the United States.
However, just weeks later, Bolshevik-inspired revolutionary
actions like the Spartacist Revolt in Berlin were brutally
suppressed by the new German government with the help of the
paramilitary Freikorps—troops returning from the front who,
having just fought for their nation, did not want Germany taken
over by a “foreign” socialist revolution.

Although the new government was not treated as an equal by
the Allies at Versailles, delegates elected from all over Germany
met at Weimar, the cultural capital of Germany, at the same
time to write the most representative constitution in the world,
which was adopted in August 1919. The Weimar Republic
included an elected president and parliament, the Reichstag, as
well as a chancellor who organized a cabinet of government
ministers. Elections were based on proportional representation,
which almost always results in a multi-party government. The
spectrum of political parties included pro-Republic social
democrats, liberals, and Christian democrats in the middle, with
anti-democratic nationalists, monarchists and fascists on the
right, and revolutionary socialists and communists on the left.
This wide range of political orientations was typical in most
European democracies between the world wars.

All the countries of Europe, both old and new, faced massive
unemployment and inflation after the war as their economies
readjusted and veterans returned to the workforce. However,
these problems were magnified in Germany because on top
of everything else, under the Versailles Treaty, the new
government had to pay reparations to the Allies in the form
of gold, coal and timber. By 1923, the Germans were unable

Spartacist rebels holding a street in Berlin,
1919.

Modern World History 341

to keep up with coal deliveries (any of the richest coal fields
of Imperial Germany were now part of the new country of
Poland); so French and Belgian troops moved in to occupy the
northwestern Ruhr Valley, location of much of German
industry. The German government encouraged a widespread
strike to protest the occupation, which it funded funded by
printing more paper money. Like nearly all of the world’s
currencies, the German Deutschmark had originally been backed
by gold, but the Kaiser had taken the country off the gold
standard at the beginning of the war. Germany had expected to
capture territory that would pay for its war expenses, but defeat
and reparations changed the situation drastically. Printing more
Deutschmarks decreased the value of each one, until ultimately
they were not worth the paper they were printed on.

Pha

Piles of new Notgeld banknotes awaiting distribution at the Reichsbank during the
hyperinflation.

The 1923 Weimar German inflation became a textbook case of
hyperinflation. At the end of World War One, 170 Deutschmarks
bought an ounce of gold; by January 1928, at the start of the
occupation of the Ruhr, the same ounce of gold was worth
372,477 marks. With the strike and increased printing of paper
money, Germans needed nearly 270 million marks to purchase
an ounce of gold by September, and the inflation rapidly got

342 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

worse. By the end of November, 87 trillion marks would buy an
ounce of gold. And of course, gold was not the only commodity
that was becoming unaffordable in terms of marks. Stories
circulated of people taking wheelbarrows full of Deutschmarks to
the marked to buy a loaf of bread.

The disruption to the German economy was severe. As
typically happens with hyperinflation, when workers received
their pay they would rush to markets and immediately buy
everything they could before the currency was worth any less.
Workers demanded higher wages to keep up with higher prices,
which only added more worthless currency to the money
supply and created more inflation. The savings of middle-class
families, set aside for a house, a car, or for retirement, were
wiped out to purchase food for a week. Adding to the financial
chaos, previous debts were quickly paid off with the now-
worthless marks.

USS. bankers, led by Charles
G. Dawes, sat down with
financial representatives of
the other Allied powers to
renegotiate German
reparations. Dawes had
helped secure the $500
million Anglo-French Loan
and had then served as a
General during the war.
American financiers
understood that a chaotically
unstable German economy
would never be able to pay
indemnities to the British,
French, and others, which charles G. Dawes
made it more difficult for
these Allies to cover their own debts to Wall Street. The solution
Dawes negotiated was to have U.S. banks lend Germany the
money it needed to keep up payments to the European Allies,
who could then pay the Americans, who in turn could lend
more to Germany. The arrangement brought economic and


Modern World History 343

political stability to the Weimar Republic, and Dawes was
awarded a Nobel Peace Prize for his work and became Calvin
Coolidge’s Vice President in 1925. The cycle of payments
continued until the American banks were forced to stop lending
at the beginning of the Great Depression, which we will discuss
shortly.

Questions for Discussion

Why does printing excessive money affect prices?

Why was it important to American bankers to save the
German economy?

The Soviet Union

After its victory over the counterrevolutionary White Army, the
Communists began establishing their version of the workers’
state envisioned by Marx in the new Soviet Union. A successful
socialist revolution in Russia inspired dedicated Marxists
around the world, prompting general strikes and attempted
workers’ uprisings in Europe and even in the United States.
However, Lenin’s tactics divided the revolutionaries from the
reformers in the international socialist movement. Marx had
predicted that the first step towards the socialist state was the
establishment of a liberal democracy and an_ industrial
economy filled with wage-workers (the proletariat). Russia had
barely begun moving toward democracy and had very few
industries when Lenin and Bolsheviks overthrew the
government. Did this mean that in more developed
democracies, dedicated socialists should embrace communism
and foment an immediate revolution? Many believed Russia
was an exception, and even Lenin struggled to fit events in the
new Soviet Union into the outline of future history that Marx
had provided. Part of the Communists’ focus on fomenting
revolution in Germany was based on a belief that industrialized

344 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

nations were more natural settings for these types of advances
in the cause of a worldwide workers’ paradise.

Furthermore, Lenin was
less than democratic within
his own new nation. Russia
became a one-party state
dominated by a trained cadre
who would follow the orders
of Communist Party
leadership, rather than a
multi-party democracy with
full and open discussion of
issues. The Bolsheviks were
able to take over the Russian
government in 1917 because
they were more organized
and aggressive than any of
their political rivals. Lenin
and the communists declared
themselves the true
representatives of Marx’s
ideas and argued that their
model should be followed by communist parties in other
countries. Others who also called themselves socialists disagreed
with Lenin’s interpretation of Marx (or even with Marx himself),
and many were more interested in reform than in revolution.
Debates over both doctrine and actions split the international
movement into revolutionary communists and reform
socialists, with Lenin setting up his own “Communist
International” (the Comintern) to oppose the older Socialist
International of social democratic political parties. Until the
mid-1930s, Soviet communists often spent more energy
struggling against social democrats and other parties on the left
in an attempt to be the only force representing the working
class, rather than fighting right-wing reactionaries and fascists.

Meanwhile, debates over policy and leadership in the Soviet
Union itself had both domestic and international consequences.
One important problem was how to organize the agricultural

Lenin

Modern World History 345

sector. Marx had focused his analysis on an industrial society
where workers would own the means of production rather than
the bourgeoisie—so Lenin and other Soviet leaders took over
Russia’s factories and embarked on further industrializing their
country. But Marx had not considered agriculture in as much
detail. The Red Army broke up the large landholdings of the
old Russian nobility, distributing the land to those who worked
it. But it was unclear to Marxists (and it became very important
to the Communist Party to believe it was fulfilling the ideas
and predictions of Karl Marx) whether leaving small landowners
alone in the countryside might create a class of small property-
owners who might form their own bourgeoisie to rival the
proletariat. Already during the war and the civil war, distrust
had grown against the Kulaks, small farmers living mainly in
the Ukraine. Lenin had denounced them as “wreckers” when
it seemed they were withholding their grain from government
collectors. These debates were still continuing when Lenin
suffered a stroke and died in 1923.

One of the main dangers of
a cadre party is deciding on
changes of leadership.
Factions dividing the Soviet
Communists formed around
Leon Trotsky, Lenin’s close
ally during the revolution and
the successful commander of
the Red Army, and Joseph
Stalin, an extremely capable
organizer who controlled
much of the Party machinery.
Trotsky argued in favor of a

“permanent revolution,” stalin confers with an ailing Lenin in
constantly perfecting the September 1922.
workers’ state, which

including eliminating private property in the countryside and
collectivizing the agricultural sector. Stalin insisted that Lenin
had already established a precedent by allowing a degree of
market orientation in farming and that it seemed to be working

346 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

well. Stalin won the argument and became the new leader of
the Soviet Union. Trotsky went into exile, where he and his
followers founded yet another Trotskyist International of like-
minded revolutionaries. He was assassinated in 1940 in Mexico
City, by a Soviet agent.

Stalin, in the meantime, announced the first in a series of
Five-Year plans to industrialize the Soviet Union even more
rapidly. In his second plan, he embraced the forced
collectivization of agriculture. Stalin essentially came around to
Trotsky’s view that small land-holders would become bourgeois
anti-revolutionaries. Stalin was becoming increasingly paranoid
of any social sector or group of leaders that he thought
threatened his own authority, including his hold over the
Communist cadre, the Comintern, and the apparatus of the
Soviet bureaucracy. The forced collectivization of agriculture in
the early 1930s led to death by starvation of nearly three million
Ukrainians. Peasants resisted the loss of their land by planting
and harvesting fewer crops and by killing their livestock before
they could be seized. Many peasants were punished by the
authorities, who confiscated everything they had and left them
to starve. By 1931 when Stalin announced to the world that the
wildly successful five-year plan had been completed ahead of
schedule, at least 3 million peasants had died. The famine is
known in Ukraine as Holodomor, or the Ukranian Genocide.

Modern World History 347
é |

¢

Sia ES,

ULL all 0
=

Starved peasants on a street in Kharkiv, in northeast Ukraine, 1933.

As the claims made by Stalin diverged more and more from
reality, dissenters had to be dealt with. Stalin began sending
critics to Gulag concentration camps in Siberia, or simply
having them executed by his secret police. In the late 1930s,
about 1.7 million suspected dissenters were arrested and 724,000
people were shot in the back of the head by Russian secret
police. Among these were hundreds from the Red Army officer
corps, who Stalin suspected were sympathetic to the ideas of
Trotsky. Stalin had published a book about Lenin that outlined
a “Correct” view of Marxist-Leninist ideology leading to himself
and excluding Trotsky. When Leningrad party leader Sergei
Kirov was murdered in 1934, Stalin launched what became
known as the Great Purge. Thousands of party members,
including many leaders who had worked closely with Lenin,
were targeted. A series of show-trials in Moscow featured
shocking scenes of senior Party officials confessing to counter-
revolutionary crimes and begging for execution. Among the
people accused of treason and shot was Mikhail Tukhachevsky,
Russia’s most brilliant military commander who had been
awarded the highest rank in the country, Marshall of the Soviet
Union. Stalin wiped out an entire generation of seasoned

348 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

military leaders who had helped the Bolsheviks achieve their
power. Both the purge and the famine in Ukraine would make it
easier for Hitler to invade the Soviet Union in 1941: the Germans
found willing collaborators among the Ukrainians, while they
rapidly chased the ill-led Soviet army all the way to the gates of
Moscow itself.

There is considerable
debate about the number of
people killed under Stalin’s
rule. At the time, most of the
world’s communists either
refused to believe or tried to
justify Stalin’s excesses, and
his regime certainly did not
advertise its deeds. The low
estimates are 10 to 15 million
killed and the high estimates
of non-war-related deaths
reach 60 to 65 million. One of
the advocates for the 60
million number was
Alexander Solzhenitsyn, a
Russian dissident author who had been sent to Siberia when
accused of writing anti-Soviet propaganda in 1945 (while an
officer in the Red Army), and who won the Nobel Prize for his
writing in 1970.

Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn in 1974.

Questions for Discussion

Why was it important for the Communist Party that it was
remaining true to Karl Marx's ideology?

How do you think the Soviets were able to maintain power in
light of all the people they were killing?


Modern World History 349

Rise of Fascism

Like other European
countries, Italy was disrupted
by labor and __ socialist
agitation after World War
One. Strikes in the industrial
north and agitation by
landless peasants in the
agrarian south were
suppressed only with great
difficulty by the government, fm 1925, Mussolini styled himself ! Duce
a multi-party parliamentary (the leader)
democracy with a figurehead king. Since the 1870s, constant
shifting of political coalitions, cabinets, and prime ministers had
resulted in governments that were barely ready for war—the
Italians had little to show for the nearly 750,000 dead soldiers
who fought the Austro-Hungarians to a draw in the Alps. The
government was even less prepared for what seemed to be an
imminent Red revolution. In October 1922, in the midst of yet
another general strike, the Fascist Party, led by Benito
Mussolini, marched on Rome. To prevent civil war, the King
asked Mussolini to form a government. He would remain prime
minister for the next twenty years.

Mussolini had begun his political career as a revolutionary
socialist before World War I. However, he despised the pacifism
of Italian socialism and became a convinced nationalist. He
served in the war; like Germany’s Adolf Hitler, reaching the rank
of corporal. Shortly after the war's conclusion, he reentered
politics, trading his previous socialism for a militarist
nationalism in a new Fascist Party.


350 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Blackshirts with Benito Mussolini during the March on Rome, 28 October 1922.

In addition to being anti-socialist, Fascism was anti-liberal and
anti-democratic. Mussolini and his followers believed that
parliaments were ineffective talk-fests of corrupt politicians that
should be replaced by strong authoritarian leaders. Although
fascists in Italy and the rest of Europe participated in elections,
they did so with a high level of organized street violence by
their own paramilitary units against political opponents,
especially socialists and communists. Mussolini’s black-shirted
squadristi were imitated by the Nazi brownshirts in Germany
and the Falangist blue-shirts in Spain, among many others in
the rest of Europe and the Americas. Not only did they break up
rival political meetings, they also brutally attacked strikers and
labor organizers.

By 1925, Mussolini had outlawed all other political parties and
declared himself the supreme leader: Il Duce, in Italian. He went
on to impose “totalitarianism”, his word for state control over
the entire social and economic life of the nation. Claiming that
they were protecting private property against socialism, fascists
actually created a form of state corporatism that was every bit
as autocratic as Stalin’s system but retained the appearance of
private ownership. “Corporations” in this case means not only
industrial companies, but also “corporate groups” of citizens
based on their occupations, guilds, and associations. The leaders

Modern World History 351

of these corporate groups represented their members in the
national government, under “coordination” by the dictator. The
establishment of corporate groups supported the claim that a
wide array of political parties was no longer necessary; but in
reality, the selection of leaders was limited to members of the
official state party.

Mussolini and other fascists
wanted to impose upon their
countries military discipline
and unquestioning loyalty to
the leader. Imperial
expansion became a priority
and war was encouraged to
bring grandeur to the nation
and strengthen its people.
Eritrean children vow allegiance to the Fascists promoted a mythic
National Fascist Party in Italy's African ‘|
colonies, 1922. past of glorious conquest to

inspire a warrior culture.
Mussolini wanted to build a large army and navy to dominate
the Mediterranean and to expand the Italian Empire—all to
“make Italy great again.”

Fascism gained ground more slowly in most other countries
in the 1920s, until the onset of the Great Depression. Italy did
not seem to suffer as acutely from the social, labor and political
unrest that came with the unexpected international economic
crisis because the Italian opposition had been eliminated or
jailed years before. For property-owners and capitalists, fascism
was a defense against revolutionary communism, while even for
some in the working class, it seemed to provide a degree of
social and political stability that democracy was struggling to
retain. This impression, even if it was not entirely accurate, did
a lot to interest Italy’s neighbors in a political system that “made
the trains run on time.”

Question for Discussion


352 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Why were people in Europe and America not more alarmed
by Italian Fascism?

The Great Depression

The exact causes of the Great Depression are still being argued
by historians and economists. An ongoing agricultural recession
in the United States and abroad during the 1920s was an
important element, as was a Wall Street stock market bubble
caused by excessive use of margin to buy company shares.
Investors were able to buy the shares of companies for pennies
on the dollar by borrowing 90% to 97% of the purchase price.
This allowed them to buy ten to twenty times the number of
shares they could actually afford, with lenders putting up the
rest. This system works very well as long as prices continue to
rise, and the extreme demand for stocks powered by margin-
buying drove the prices ever higher. Insider trading was also
quite common, with secret “pools” of investors buying up stocks
to inflate prices, waiting for others to join in the game, and
then selling when the price reached a profitable new height.
During the 1920s, the value of the stock market doubled without
a corresponding increase in corporation assets or earnings. The
market grew at a rate of over 20% per year while the economy
shrank. Most stock prices rose to levels that could not be
explained by their assets or earnings, since industry was
actually starting to feel the pinch of the agricultural recession.
Stock prices typically reflect the underlying value of the
company; in the bubble they mostly reflected the buying frenzy.
When credit became a bit tighter and people began receiving
margin calls and trying to sell more of these inflated shares than
there were new buyers for, the bubble burst.

Modern World History 353

Black Thursday was i iy |
October 24, 1929. But it was yo eu
only the beginning of a series
of economic calamities. The
Dow Jones Industrial Average
(the most popular average of
the value of America’s largest
stocks) had fallen nearly 5%
the day before, and opened
Black Thursday at 305. As
soon as the opening bell
rang, the market began
dropping fast on volume
three times greater than
normal. The three major
banks, Morgan, Chase, and
National City, began buying a solemn crowd gathered outside the Stock
heavily to try to stabilize the Exchange after the crash. 1929. The
recovered a bit, ending the headquarters of. Morgan and co.

day at 299. On Friday, the

market closed a bit higher, but the following Monday the
average dropped to 260 which triggered another round of
heavy panic selling on Black Tuesday, when the Dow dropped
to 280. After this weeklong crash, the market continued sliding
for the next three years. The Dow average finally bottomed out
at 41. The market lost 90% of its pre-Crash value, and would not
reach the levels it had seen in September 1929 for another 25
years until 1954.

The sudden evaporation of the market, even though the
prices of stocks had been ridiculously inflated, resulted in a
collapse of lending. Loan amounts had been based on these
inflated asset values; the values had disappeared but the debt
remained. Companies stopped producing products and laid off
workers. Families lost their life savings and their jobs at the
same time. After foreclosing on bankrupt farmers, rural banks
were stuck with farms whose worth continued to drop. Rural
banks began to fail: they had lent the money of their depositors
to farmers who could not pay them back. “Runs” on banks


354 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

everywhere became more frequent as anxious depositors
rushed to take out their cash. Smaller banks had also borrowed
from larger banks, affecting the entire financial system. Wall
Street stopped lending money to Germany to pay its
reparations to the Allies.

Worldwide, the cost of food and industrial goods dropped
considerably as businesses sought to lessen the effect of losses.
But unemployment was so staggering that few farmers and
workers had enough to pay for anything, even at rock-bottom
prices. Governments embraced protectionist high tariffs in a
last-ditch effort to stimulate domestic industry; however, this
led to a collapse of global free trade which hurt the world
economy even more.

In their desperation, people everywhere began to question
the effectiveness of capitalism and liberal democracy to resolve
the crisis—indeed, many began to blame liberalism and market
capitalism for their sudden impoverishment. Many saw the
Soviet Union as a new model for economic stability, especially
because Stalin was claiming the success of his Five Year Plans
and no one knew what was going on behind the scenes. There
seemed to be no unemployment under the Communists. Some
who felt threatened by revolutionary communism embraced
fascism. Although labor unrest and mass protests broke out all
over, Mussolini seemed to be maintaining order in Italy. Also,
fascists did not seek to end capitalism and private property
like the communists promised to do. Many in the middle class
supported new fascist-inspired governments as a_ better
guarantee of their livelihoods than the liberal democracy that
seemed to have failed them. This is essentially the story of
how a minor political figure, Adolf Hitler, was able to become
Chancellor of Germany in January 1938, as we will see below.

Modern World History 355

Shacks that members of the Bonus Army erected on the Anacostia Flats, across the
Potomac from the Capitol, burning after its confrontation with the army.

In the United States, bread lines became common, although
Republican President Herbert Hoover, elected in 1928, insisted
things weren't as bad as they appeared. Shanty-towns and tent
villages began appearing all over the country and were
ironically nicknamed Hoovervilles. The American Legion,
formed in 1919 by World War I veterans, agitated for the early
payment of military bonuses that had been awarded after the
Great War but could not be redeemed until 1945. A “Bonus
Army” formed and marched on Washington to demonstrate,
setting up a Hooverville in Washington and camping on the
lawn outside the Capitol Building. Hoover ordered his Secretary
of War to disperse the protestors, and in July 1932 U.S. troops
armed with tanks and machine guns attacked and burned the
bonus camp, killing a few of their former comrades in the
process. Hoover lost the 1982 election to the Democrat Franklin
Roosevelt, who issued an executive order enrolling 25,000
veterans in the Civilian Conservation Corps. In 19386 Congress
authorized the early payment of $2 billion in World War I
bonuses.

To make matters worse, a drought in Great Plains in the early

356 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

1930s created an agricultural disaster. The Russian Revolution
and World War | had reduced European farm production and
had driven up the price of American grain in international
markets. Marginal high plains grazing lands in western Kansas
and Nebraska, Oklahoma and northwestern Texas were put
under the plow. Cropland in this region doubled between 1900
and 1920, and then tripled again between 1925 and 1930. As
European agriculture recovered, grain prices began to drop, so
USS. farmers planted more to try and earn the same amount.

Afarmer and his two sons during a dust storm in Cimarron County, Oklahoma, April
1936.

Plowing fields for annual corn and wheat planting is such a
common farming practice, it seemed normal to continue the
practice as farmers expanded westward. However, on the high
plains, perennial grasses had evolved to find water deep in the
soil and hold onto it. Plowing exposed the soil to the sun and

Modern World History 357

wind, and cut the roots that trapped moisture and bound the
soil together. The western edge of the prairie was actually a
completely different ecosystem from the eastern edge by the
Great Lakes, but the change in climate was very gradual.
Although many farmers moving west to convert the high plains
rangeland to cultivation failed to notice it, rainfall was scarcer
and the wind blew harder. Those who did notice were reassured
by experts that “rain followed the plow.” But of course, that was
just boosterism and wishful thinking: rain did not follow the
plow. Between 1933 and 1935, drought struck the area. Over half
a million people were left homeless when the topsoil blew away.

Ina single storm, beginning
on November 11, 1938, topsoil
from Oklahoma was blown all
the way to Chicago, where
over 12 million pounds of it
fell on the city like snow. On
Black Sunday, April 14, 1935,
A dust storm approaches Stratford, Texas, dust storms were reported
in 1935. from the Canadian border to

Texas. Newspaper reporters
throughout the affected area wrote that they could not see five
feet through the blowing dust. The agricultural disaster that
became known as the Dust Bowl caused an exodus from the
high plains region. But the disaster was not just agricultural. Of
116,000 refugee families surveyed on their entrance into
California, only four out of ten were farmer families. A full third
of the heads of families who fled Oklahoma, Kansas, Nebraska,
and Texas were white collar professionals. When the farms blew
away the whole regional economy was wiped out.

358 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

In the United States, there
were some who saw
communism or fascism as a
solution. However, US.
democracy proved _ stable
enough that the voters simply
changed the party in power in
the 1982 elections, from the
Republicans to the
Democrats. Franklin D.
Roosevelt was inaugurated
president a few weeks after
Hitler took power in
Germany. Roosevelt was
neither a communist nor a jerbert Hoover and Franklin D. Roosevelt
fascist, although he did accept _ on inauguration Day, 1933.

a degree of government
intervention in the economy to alleviate the worst effects of the
crisis.

Franklin Roosevelt, born into an old, wealthy New York
family, actually surprised many by embracing government
intervention and regulation to address the ongoing Depression,
and by spending government money to put people back to
work. However, most people believed Roosevelt was “saving
capitalism” rather than “imposing socialism.” Many New Deal
agencies and programs are still with us today.

Roosevelt saw the role that Wall Street had in the crisis, and
wanted to restore confidence in the banking system. The
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) is insurance,
paid for by banks, which guarantees that depositors will receive
their savings (nowadays up to $250,000), in case of a bank
failure. FDIC helped bring an end to “runs on banks” by
increasing people’s confidence in the banking system. The
Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) was a new agency
that would oversee Wall Street. New regulations put an end to
“pooling” and other forms of stock manipulation and insider
trading, in order to restore confidence in the stock exchange.
Borrowing money “on margin” to invest in stocks is still closely
regulated. Finally, the Glass-Steagall Act prevented banks from


Modern World History 359

dabbling in the securities and insurance industries—its repeal
in the 1990s is seen as one of the causes of the 2008 Financial
Crisis.

In agriculture, the Roosevelt
Administration began paying farmers
not to over-plant and stabilized farm
prices with the Agricultural
Adjustment Act. Agricultural
Extension programs also taught new
farming methods to prevent a future
Dust Bowl.

Public Works Administration construction of the Bonneville Dam on the Columbia River
between Oregon and Washington.

Federal government programs also put people back to work.
The Works Progress Administration (WPA) included large
building projects like the Hoover Dam and the Golden Gate
Bridge, but also many smaller local projects like sidewalks, post
offices and schools. The Civilian Conservation Corps (CCC)
attracted unemployed young men to mainly work on

360 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

reforesting projects and improvements to national and state
parks. When you see long straight lines of 85-year-old trees
in the United States, you're seeing the work of the CCC. The
Tennessee Valley Authority (TVA) focused on developing an
entire region. TVA dams controlled the flow of rivers to prevent
flooding and to provide electricity to factories and rural homes.
Since it ran a multi-state project, TVA was a federal agency.
Governments throughout the world sent representatives to see
how it worked.

MORE SECURITY FOR
THE AMERICAN FAMILY

THE WIDOW OF A QUALIFIED
WORKER/WILL RECEIVE MONTHLY
BENEFITS AT AGE 6S. IN CERTAIN
CASES, {AN AGED DEPENDENT
PARENT. MAY GET BENEFITS.

FOR INFORMATION WRITE OR CALL AT THE NEAREST

SOCIAL SECURITY BOARD
t ~The

Social Security System was established in 1935 to support
widows and their children and to provide the elderly with a
government pension so they would be able to retire without
burdening their children. This opened jobs to younger workers,
who could then afford a government-backed mortgage through
the Federal Housing Administration (FHA). The Roosevelt
Administration also encouraged labor union organizing under


Modern World History 361

the Wagner Act. Instead of the government siding with industry
and sending troops to put down strikes as in it had in the (recent)
past, the Wagner Act legalized unions and strikes, and set up the
National Labor Relations Board (NLRB) to arbitrate between
industry and labor in contract disputes. Organized labor
became an important political ally of Roosevelt and the
Democratic Party as a result.

Questions for Discussion

What is margin buying and how did it contribute to the Crash
of 1929?

What caused the Dust Bowl and how did it exacerbate the
Great Depression?

Do you think President Roosevelt went too far with his New
Deal policies?

The Nazis

In the 1920s, Germans had elected moderate, social democratic
governments. The disruption caused by the collapse of Wall
Street and world trade especially affected German industry.
Loans and markets dried up, and millions of employees lost
their jobs. Hyperinflation wiped out people’s life savings.
Previously, communists and (especially) National Socialists
(Nazis—German fascists) had been fringe parties, easily ignored.
But as Germans became increasingly desperate, they looked
for easy solutions, or at least someone to blame for the crisis
of world capitalism. Political conflicts took to the streets, with
social democrats fighting communists and both groups fighting
Nazis. Government instability led to frequent elections; the
moderates coalesced around chancellor Heinrich Bruning, a
conservative of the Catholic Center Party, who was positively
Hooverish in his tight-fisted social and economic policies. In
the 1932 elections, no party won a clear majority (which was

362 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

not unusual), but for the first time, most German voters backed
either the Communists or the Nazis.

Adolf Hitler, at the window of the Reich Chancellery, greets cheering crowds on the
evening of his inauguration as chancellor, 30 January 1933,

Meanwhile, intrigues began swirling around President Otto von
Hindenberg, who (like a king in a parliamentary monarchy)
was responsible for choosing a politician to take the role of
Chancellor and form a government. The octogenarian
Hindenburg took the advice of aristocratic nationalists in
January 1938 to call upon Adolf Hitler, leader of the Nazi Party,
to form a government. The aristocrats believed Hitler could be
controlled; he had other ideas.

Modern World History 363

Hitler and the Nazis were
like the Italian Fascists in their
anti-liberal, anti-democratic,
hyper-nationalist ideology,
and support of the totalitarian
ideal for ruling their nation.
They even had their own
paramilitary force with
uniforms and insignia, and a
powerful symbol in the
swastika. The Nazis also
appealed to many voters
because of their consistent
opposition to the Versailles
Treaty, which nearly all
Germans blamed for their
economic distress. For the

In 1934, Hitler became Germany’s head of

Nazis, the Versailles peace was
a national humiliation and
the real reason that Germans

state with the title of Fuhrer und
Reichskanzler (leader and chancellor of the
Reich).

were unemployed. They
blamed the liberals and social democrats who had signed the
treaty for having “stabbed Germany in the back.”

As Hitler took control, new elections were called for March
1933. During the campaign, the Reichstag building was burned
down by a disgruntled communist; Hitler used this incident to
arrest Communist politicians. Although once again the Nazis
failed to win a majority in the election, Hitler was granted near-
dictatorial powers. He outlawed the Communist Party and then
the Social Democratic Party. By the end of the year, all other
parties were outlawed or dissolved; by mid-1934, Hitler purged
his own party of “left-Nazis,’ eliminating all organized
opposition. He was declared the leader (Fiihrer) of Germany.
Hindenberg’s death the following year allowed Hitler to
combine the offices of President and Chancellor, so that the
democratic Weimar constitution was a completely dead letter.

This was a remarkable achievement for Hitler, who until
World War I had been a frustrated Austrian artist living in
Vienna, absorbing extremist German nationalist and anti-

364 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Semitic ideologies. He had joined the German army at the
beginning of the war; after the armistice, he was assigned by the
army to observe and report on the various political groups that
were appearing in Munich. Instead, he joined one of them, the
National Socialist German Workers Party, and quickly became
an effective speaker and leader. In 1920, he adopted the ancient
Hindu swastika symbol in his design for the party’s flag. After
an attempted coup failed in Munich, Hitler was imprisoned in
1923. While in prison, he wrote Mein Kampf (My Struggle) an
outline of his plan for the domination of the pure German
“Aryan race” over Europe. Hitler's anti-Semitism blended with
his hatred of “foreign” Bolshevism, and he imagined German
“Aryans” as Europe's defense against Jews and socialism. Nazi
focus on racial hatred set them apart from the Fascists in Italy,
although anti-Semitic ideas were shared by other nationalists
and fascists in Europe.

Hitler and the Nazis, like
the Fascists in Italy, built their
power by appealing to
people’s worst prejudices and
to their _ feelings of
resentment that their
problems were someone
else’s fault. Jews were always a
convenient scapegoat. As a
group, they were perceived as
being more successful in
academia, the professions,
and business than their
Christian counterparts. Close
study of scripture was
respected and encouraged,
and these habits were quickly
applied to careers in law,
Benito Mussolini with Hitler on 25 October medicine and science once
onan ais between talyand Jews were liberated from the

ghettos. Although they
continued to face discrimination, Jews seemed to have


Modern World History 365

benefitted more from industrialization and “modernity” than
most of the working-class and lower-middle class farmers,
factory-workers, and displaced white-collar workers who would
become the base for the Nazis and other fascist parties. It was
easy to blame Jews for the economic and social problems facing
Europe in the 1930s, especially since they were believed by
many to not fully be part of the “nation,” but rather a separate
international community that divided their loyalty away from
the fatherland. Incongruently, the Nazis claimed that Jews were
behind both Communism and the international banking and
financial system that Communists wanted to destroy-a Jewish
cabal was supposedly fomenting every crisis in a complex (and
nonsensical) conspiracy theory.

Still, in the mid-1930s,
Hitler’s popularity in
Germany was not initially
based on Nazi racism.
Instead, Germans appreciated
the political, social, and
economic stability the regime
brought, and the ways Hitler
was thumbing his nose at the
Versailles Treaty. The Nazis
suppressed labor unions, but
work projects like building
the Autobahn superhighway
put men back to work. Hitler
called for an affordable
“people’s car”, and in 1937 his adolf Hitler laying the foundation stone of
government built a state- the Volkswagen factory near Fallersleben

(Wolfsburg) on 26 May 1938. Ferdinand

owned factory 10 porsche at far right.

manufacture a design created

by race-car designer, Ferdinand Porsche. The original Volksauto
(renamed Volkswagen) would be available to German citizens
for $396 through a government-sponsored savings plan.
Rebuilding the military also provided jobs and opportunities.
Hitler expanded the army well beyond the 100,000-man limit
set by the treaty, and added air and submarine forces in further


366 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

violation. In early 1936, when he moved troops to the French
border, the Allies did not respond militarily; much to the
surprise of many German generals. Berlin successfully hosted
the Olympics in July 1936, showcasing the regime to the world
while also starting the tradition of lighting an Olympic flame
brought from Greece by relay runners. Germans felt pride that
Hitler had “made them great again.”

German Jews, however, suffered under the regime. Almost
immediately after Hitler became chancellor, the Nazis called for
a boycott of Jewish-owned businesses and Jews were fired from
government positions. The 1985 Nuremberg Laws prohibited
marriage with Jews and defined Jewishness based on ancestors.
Many Nazified German towns “encouraged” Jews to leave so that
they could put up signs declaring that they were “Jew-free”. A
trickle of German Jews were able to emigrate: artists, actors, and
film directors moved to Hollywood, while academics like Albert
Einstein found positions in U.S. universities. But most of Europe
and the world did not accept Jewish immigrants. Anti-Semitism
was an international problem: although it was not as violent and
discriminatory as the Nazi regime, even in the United States
Jews were subjected to quotas at universities, were not allowed
to buy houses in certain neighborhoods, were denied service at
hotels and resorts, and were not accepted in many private clubs
and associations.

China, Japan, India

Modern World History 367

In 1911, Sun Yat-sen and his
Xinhai_ Revolution finally
overthrew the empire that
had ruled China for over two
thousand years, but the
revolutionaries were not
strong enough to install an
effective government
throughout China. Warlords
(army generals and minor
regional nobility) quickly
organized troops to bring
order to the countryside.
However, they were not
interested in respecting or
The Kuomintang reveres its founder, Sun Supporting the new republic,
Yat-sen, as the "Father of the Nation” which was seen as a European

novelty. In the power struggle
between Sun Yat-sen and General Yuan Shih-kai, the head of the
Imperial Army, Yuan won. Instead of Sun Yat-Sen, a warlord
became president of the republic under the new constitution. In
the chaos of the republic’s early years, remote imperial
provinces were able to establish their own nations, separate
from China. Mongolia is still independent, while Tibet was
reconquered by Mao Zedong in the 1950s and is still seeking
independence.

After Yuan’s death in 1916, cliques and civil conflict broke
out between the republic and the warlords. Yuan had declared
himself emperor in 1915, and additional provinces had broken
away in protest. Sun and the nationalists experienced a
resurgence on May 4, 1919, when students revolted in Beijing
against the Versailles Treaty, in which Japan received the
German protectorates in Shandong province, rather than
China. These demonstrations marked an important
modernizing moment for the new Republic. Later that year,
Sun Yat-sen formed the Kuomintang (Nationalist) Party,
inspired by the May 4th Movement. By 1921, Sun had
reestablished the republic in Canton. Meanwhile, western-
educated intellectuals had begun organizing the Chinese


368 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Communist Party (CCP) in Shanghai, supporting Sun and the
Kuomintang against the warlords.

As the struggle continued
against the northern
warlords, Sun died of cancer
in 1925, and his protege,
General Chiang Kai-shek took
over the Kuomintang. Chiang
was a capable leader who was
able to unite the government.
In 1927, Chiang married U.S.-
educated Soong Mei-ling, the
sister of Sun’s widow Soong
Ching-ling. By 1927, the
“Northern Expedition”
against the warlords was
successful, led by Chiang with
CCP and Soviet support.

A few months later, Sun Yat-sen (seated on right) and Chiang
however, a new civil war “*shek
began in China. Chiang
turned against his communist allies, who he feared were
strengthening their support in the cities. Chiang purged CCP-
members from the Kuomintang, and beginning in the
commercial and financial capital in Shanghai, began rounding
up and executing many Communist leaders, while imprisoning
others. In 1981, the Japanese military invaded Manchuria and
created the puppet Kingdom of Manchukuo, installing the heir
to the Qing dynasty, Pu Yi, as the monarch. The Chinese
Republic, in the midst of a new civil war, was not in a position to
fight the Japanese.


Modern World History 369

With so many communists
imprisoned or executed, Mao
Zedong, a charismatic leader
of peasant origin, rose to
prominence in the Chinese
Communist Party by the
early 1930s. The Nationalist
armies reconquered parts of
Zhou Enlai (left) and Mao Zedong (middle) China’s interior + under
in Yan’an in 1937, shortly after the Long Communist control,
March surrounding the communists
in the Jiangxi Province in October 1934. The CCP forces broke
out of the trap and began what became known as the Long
March. In 370 days, the communists covered 5,600 miles
including some of the most rugged terrain in china. Mao
Zedong gradually emerged as a leader of the CCP, along with
Red Army leader Zhou Enlai. Zhou would become the first
Premier of the Peoples Republic of China and Mao would
become the Chairman of the CCP.

As seen in previous chapters, by embracing western
technology and government, Japan went in the opposite
direction of China in the late 19th and early 20th century. By
1910 the Japanese Empire had extended its territory to include
the Ryuku Islands and Taiwan, had defeated the Russians in
the 1905 war, and had taken control of the Korean peninsula.
Japanese industrial goods, especially textiles, found markets in
the U.S. and other parts of the world. And as part of the
victorious Allied coalition in the Great War, the Japanese were
awarded the Marshall Islands and Shandong peninsula from
Germany, although their proposal to condemn racism was not
approved by the Allied diplomats in Paris.

Japan enjoyed a parliamentary monarchy, with political
parties, trade unions, a parliament, and a “divine” emperor. In
international affairs, the civilian government joined the World
War I allies in an effort to decrease the militarization of the
Pacific and East Asia and agreed to maintaining a smaller navy
in the Pacific than either the U.S. or Great Britain in the 1922
‘Washington Naval Treaty. Increasingly ultra-nationalist officers
in the army and navy were upset with the civilian government


370 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

for negotiating the treaty. They advocated a Japan that would
dominate East Asia, eventually replacing European rule and
influence. “Asia for the Asians” was a motto they would use
as they turned their attention to more regions that needed
“liberating”.

As the reign of the new
Emperor Hirohito began in
1926, the nationalist
resurgence continued in the
military, taking over Japanese
foreign policy at the
beginning of the Great
Depression. The
protectionism of many
countries in the wake of the
international financial crisis
harmed. the export-
dependent Japanese
economy. Ultra-nationalists
in the military began
Showa Emperor (Hirohito) at his advocating an extension of
enthronement in 1928. .

the Japanese Empire,

following the example of the
British in India. In 19381, an “incident” was staged by Japanese
forces in Manchuria, giving Japan an excuse to take the region
Manchuria from China. The civilian Japanese government was
not in a position to reverse the conquest of Manchuria by their
own military. Japanese diplomats ended up defending the
takeover at the League of Nations.


Modern World History 371

In the following years, the
nationalists gradually took
control of the Japanese
government, using the same
anti-democratic, anti-
Bolshevik rhetoric as the
European fascists. In late
1936, Japan united with
Germany in an_ Anti-
Comintern Treaty in
opposition to the Soviet
Union and communism. The
ideology of Japanese
militarists similar to the Nazis
in its racism: they believed
that it was the destiny of the
“Yamato” people to dominate

1935 poster of Manchukuo promoting

East Asia and replace the
Europeans, just as Hitler
claimed a similar mantle for
his pure “Aryans” in Europe.

harmony between Japanese, Chinese, and
Manchu. The caption, written from right to
left, says: "With the help of Japan, China,
and Manchukuo, the world can be in

peace.”

The Japanese Empire would

bring order and prosperity to an Asia, “for the Asians” through
the Greater East Asian Co-Prosperity Sphere. Japanese
imperialism seemed like an attractive proposition to some in
East Asia who wanted to rid themselves of European imperial
rule.

As mentioned previously, the British trained and educated
locals in India as soldiers, police, government administrators,
and professionals in the nineteenth century in order to run the
Empire, claiming they were preparing India for eventual self-
rule. When the promised self-rule would begin became a source
of debate and conflict between the colonizers and the colonized.
In 1885, British-educated Indian reformers organized the Indian
Congress Party to protest unfair treatment of Indians by British.
They believed they were already administering the country and
no longer needed British bureaucrats to tell them what to do.
In 1909, British reforms provided for Indian representation in
provincial legislatures, and as seen in the last chapter, Indian

372 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

soldiers took part in many of the British campaigns during
the Great War, especially in Africa and the Ottoman Empire.
After the war, this service inspired increased agitation for
independence.

The politics of the Congress
Party was greatly influenced
by Mohandas Gandhi and his
tactic of non-violent civil
disobedience. Gandhi was a
perfect example of the
colonial serving the Empire:
after being educated as a
lawyer in England, he had
lived in South Africa for
twenty-five years, serving the

growing Indian community

in there. However, reacting to

} racial discrimination, he

Studio photograph of Mohandas K. Gandhi, began to organize on behalf

London, 1931. of non-whites. Gandhi was

already famous for his actions

in South Africa when he returned to India in 1915, joined the

Congress Party, and embraced asceticism and simplicity as a

way of life. The following year, the mostly-Hindu Congress

Party united with Mohammed Ali Jinnah’s Muslim League in a

sincere attempt to create a party that represented all of British
India.

Popular calls for complete independence from Britain were
accelerated by the horrific Amritsar Massacre in 1919, in which
the British army killed hundreds of unarmed civilians.
Increasing protests against British rule had led to oppressive
measures, including the prohibition of public gatherings. In
Amritsar, a religious celebration was interpreted as a political
demonstration by the local British administrator, and he
ordered his troops to open fire.

In the 1920s, the Congress Party organized the Non-
Cooperation Movement, encouraging a boycott of British
goods. Indian raw cotton was exported to Great Britain, where


Modern World History 373

it was made into textiles that were sold back to the Indians.
The Congress Party argued that factories could easily be built in
India to serve the local market. By 1930, Congress Party leader
Jawaharlal Nehru openly called for complete independence.
The following year, Gandhi led his famous Salt March protest
against the British salt monopoly. The British controlled the
production and sale of salt, so Gandhi led a massive march
to the sea to illegally make salt from the ocean. Non-violently
disobeying an absurd law effectively highlighted the futility of
Britain’s position in India.

374 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Gandhi at Dandi, South Gujarat, picking salt on the beach at the end of the Salt March,
5 April 1930. Behind him is his second son Manilal Gandhi.

The British Parliament responded with the Government of
India Act in 1935, which established regional legislatures. Voting
was arranged by religious and social categories, applying a
“divide and conquer” method that the British had been using
since the nineteenth century. Focusing Indians on their

Modern World History 375,

religious differences would have disastrous long-term results,
down to today. Nevertheless, the more inclusive Congress Party
started winning regional elections in 1937.

It is important to consider that at a time when totalitarian
fascism and communism were on the rise in throughout much
of the world, Gandhi and the All-India Congress Party
presented the option of effective non-violent civil disobedience
to achieve social goals. They were radically in favor of
independence, but also encouraged democracy. The asceticism
and simplicity of Gandhi was an example to be emulated, not
a way of life imposed from above. Indian ideas and techniques
would become an example for other struggles by colonized
peoples and oppressed minorities, directly influencing the
course of decolonization and the struggle for civil rights by
African-Americans in the United States after World War Two.

Questions for Discussion

Why do you think the Long March is such an important
element of the Chinese Communist Party's history?

Why did some Asians welcome Japan's expanding empire?

What elements of Gandhi's approach to politics do you think
were the most effective and memorable?

Media Attributions
+ EH 2723P © Ermeni Studios is licensed under a Public
Domain license

+ Dmitry_Mendeleyev_Osnovy_Khimii_1869-1871_first
_periodic_table © Dmitry Ivanovich Mendeleyev is
licensed under a Public Domain license

* Pic_irobertsl © Isaac Roberts is licensed under a Public
Domain license

376 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Solvay_conference_1927 © Benjamin Couprie is
licensed under a Public Domain license

2560px-
Edvard_Munch,_1893,_The_Scream,_oil,_tempera_a
nd_pastel_on_cardboard,_91_x_73_cm,_National_Ga
llery_of_Norway © Edvard Munch is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Kandinsky _-_Jaune_Rouge_Bleu © Wassily Kandinsky
is licensed under a Public Domain license
Metropolis_(German_three-sheet_poster) © Unkinown
is licensed under a Public Domain license
2880px-AlzadosEspartaquistas.

Berlin, Reichsbank, Geldauflieferungsstelle ©
Bundesarchiv is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

Chas_G_Dawes-H&E © Harris & Ewing is licensed
under a Public Domain license
Bundesarchiv_Bild_183-71043-0003,_Wladimir_Iljitsc
h_Lenin © Pavel Semyonovich Zhukov is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Lenin_and_stalin_crop © Maria Ilyinichna Ulyanova is
licensed under a Public Domain license

GolodomorKharkiv © Alexander Wienerberger is
licensed under a Public Domain license

Aleksandr_Solzhenitsyn_1974crop is licensed under a
CCO (Creative Commons Zero) license

Benito_Mussolini_Roman_Salute © Daily Galaxy is
licensed under a Public Domain license

March_on_Rome_1922_-_Mussolini © Illustrazione
Italiana is licensed under a Public Domain license

Eritrean_Balilla © Unknown is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Crowd_outside_nyse © US Gov is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Modern World History 377

Evictbonusarmy © Signal Corps Photographer is
licensed under a Public Domain license

Farmer_walking_in_dust_storm_Cimarron_County_
Oklahoma? © Arthur Rothstein is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Dust-storm-Texas-1935 © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

FDR_Inauguration_1933 © Architect of the Capitol is
licensed under a Public Domain license

PWAPBD_restored © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

SocialSecurityposterl © US Gov is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Macht,bernahme Hitlers © Bundesarchiv is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Adolf Hitler © Bundesarchiv is licensed under a CC BY-
SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Hitlermusso2_edit © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Grundsteinlegung fiir Werk des KdF-Wagens ©
Bundesarchiv is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

Dr._Sun_in_London © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Sun_Yat-sen_and_Chiang_ Kai-shek © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license
1937_Mao_Zhou_Qin_in_Yan’an © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license
Emperor_Showa © #/\4(Imperial Household Agency)
is licensed under a Public Domain license
Manchukuo011 © Manchukuo State Council of
Emperor Kang-de Puyi is licensed under a Public
Domain license

2560px-Mahatma-Gandhi,_studio,_1931 © Elliott &

378 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Fry is licensed under a Public Domain license

* Salt_March © Unkown is licensed under a Public
Domain license

[9]
World War II

U.S. Marines of the Second Battalion, Twenty-Seventh Regiment, wait to move inland
on Iwo Jima, soon after going ashore on 19 February 1945.

In many ways World War Two was a continuation of World
‘War One, especially in Europe. Germans supported Hitler and
the Nazis because they promised to overcome the humiliation
of Germany at the Versailles peace conference in 1919: being
forced to admit “war guilt,” to pay massive reparations, and

379

380 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

to limit the size and quality of their armed forces. The Nazi
regime promised to reverse all of it, and place a powerful new
German Empire as the dominant force on the continent—and
perhaps the world.

However, World War Two was also a result of the worldwide
reaction to the Great Depression, which was seen by many as
not only a failure of capitalism, but also a failure of democracy.
Fascism and communism seemed to some to offer the only
plausible reactions to the crisis—remember that although
neither the Nazi nor the Communist parties in the German
‘Weimar Republic ever won a majority in a contested election,
by 1932 most German voters opted for one or the other, and
essentially voting against liberal democracy. Germany was not
alone in abandoning democracy and embracing
authoritarianism—the same happened all over Eastern and
Central Europe, Latin America, and, most importantly, Japan.
The last chapter presented how the Japanese military, taking
the initiative against the weak objections of Japan’s elected
government, initiated the conflict that would become World
‘War Two by invading and occupying the northern Chinese
province of Manchuria in 1931. Again, it is striking how similar
the racial beliefs in the Japanese military were to those of the
Nazis: the “Yamato” people of Japan had a special mission to
dominate East Asia in the same way that the “Aryans” of
Germany were destined to rule all of Europe.

Modern World History 381

The Road to War in Europe

The belief that their
nation’s greatness lay in war — wT.
and conquest was T I ME)
fundamental to fascist The Weekly Newsmagazine
ideology in both Italy and
Germany. While Hitler was
still consolidating the Nazi
regime and _ rebuilding
German armed forces in
violation of the Versailles
Treaty, Mussolini decided to
act. In October 1935 Italy
invaded independent
Ethiopia from its colonies in
Eritrea and Somalia. The
Italians had been defeated by _ Ethiopian King Haile Selassie on cover of
the Ethiopians in 1896; this Te magazine, November 1930
time was different. Using air
power and poison gas, Mussolini’s military swept through
Ethiopia. By the end of 1936, most pockets of Ethiopian
resistance were defeated. In April 1936, Ethiopian King Haile
Selassie went to the League of Nations to ask for help, but the
League had no army to attack Mussolini's.

Emboldened by the ineffectiveness of world opinion, the
Italian occupation of Ethiopia was brutal. In February 1937,
in response to an attempted assassination on the new Italian
viceroy in the capital city, Addis Ababa, Italians went on a three-
day killing spree to exact vengeance on the Ethiopians. At least
20,000 were murdered, including Ethiopian intellectuals who
had already been imprisoned in wretched conditions. As we'll
see, such atrocities were typical of the racism inherent in fascist
regimes, who thought that using such terror was the only way to
“teach a lesson” to “inferior” conquered peoples.


382 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Review of Soviet armored fighting vehicles used to equip the Republican People's Army
during the Spanish Civil War.

After losing most of its Latin American colonies in the early
nineteenth century, Spain fell into decades of civil wars. By the
time Spain lost the Philippines, Cuba and Puerto Rico to the
United States in 1898, the Spanish empire was less stable and
poorer than several of its former territories such as Argentina
and Chile. In the early years of the new century, Spanish
workers were inspired by socialism and anarchism, the belief
that taking down all forms of repression would liberate the
natural socialist and communal tendencies of humanity. Many
found fault with the Catholic Church, which received
government funds to educate and provide welfare for the poor,
but was seen as ineffective and hypocritically enjoying its own
riches by the starving, illiterate, and landless peasants and
proletarians.

By 1931, even the middle class had had enough of Spain’s
backwardness. The king abdicated—another victim of the crisis
of the Great Depression—and a Spanish Republic was
established. A new Spanish constitution formed a presidential-
parliamentary government with proportional representation,
much like the Weimar Republic in Germany. Agrarian reform
and limiting the temporal power of the Catholic Church divided
the Spanish people and the liberals and socialists lost control of
the government in 1933, when conservatives won the national

Modern World History 383

elections. Rebellions by radical miners in northern Spain in
1934 led to repression and the imprisonment of thousands,
leading to the formation of a “Popular Front” government in
February 1936 after very close elections.

Soviet leader Joseph Stalin
ordered the world’s
communist parties to join
anti-fascist Popular Front
coalitions. The
Spanish Popular
Front
government was a

coalition of
socialist,
anarchist, and
workers _ parties
seeking to

’ preserve _ and

Francisco Franco in 1930 extend liberal
reforms.

However, when the new government
rolled out agrarian reforms and began
suppressing the Church, street fighting
and assassinations led to a fascist-
supported military coup orchestrated
by General Francisco Franco in July,
1986. Although the “nationalists” took
control of northern and western Spain,
the fascists were stopped in the region
around Madrid and Barcelona by
socialist and anarchist workers who
had been armed by the Republican
government. A bloody civil war
commenced.

384 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Hitler and Mussolini immediately
sent weapons, troops and air support
to Franco, while Stalin supported the
Republic. The leading European
democracies—Great Britain and
France—declared neutrality while the
United States chose once again to try
to stay out of Europe’s disputes.
Individual British, rench, and
American volunteers arrived to fight
for the Republic, hoping to make
Spain “the graveyard of fascism”.

owever, even before Franco and the
nationalists finally defeated the

Republic in April 1939, Stalin had
pulled Soviet advisors out of Spain and
abandoned the Popular Front
strategy. Francisco Franco remained
the authoritarian dictator of Spain
until his death in 1975.

Guernica, by Pablo Picasso, 1937.

Questions for Discussion

Modern World History 385

What were the main causes of World War II?

How did racism play an early role in fascist expansionism?

Why did Stalin support the Spanish Popular Front?

Why this reaction from the
victors of World War One?
By the 1930s, and the Great
Depression, the French,
British, and Americans were
wondering what “winning”
the Great War had really
meant. The deaths of
millions and the wounding of
millions more did not seem
worth repeating. The
Germans, on the other hand,
had been humiliated by the
peace and were now led by a
man, and a party, that
claimed that they could have
won if they had not been
“stabbed in the back” by
liberals, social democrats, and
Jews. And _ unfortunately,
many fascist sympathizers in
the democracies agreed with

Adolf Hitler greeting UK Prime Minister
Neville Chamberlain at the beginning of the
meeting in September 1938, where Hitler
demanded annexation of Czech border
areas.

this assessment: that corrupt politicians and capitalists, as part
of a Jewish-led cabal, had been the only ones to benefit from
leading their countries into a useless war. There was truth in the
observation that bankers and capitalists had profited from the
war, but there was no evidence of a conspiracy. The fact that
public opinion descended into fantastic conspiracy theories is a
testament to the psychological effect of the worldwide
economic crisis on a fearful humanity.

Hitler’s foreign policy, which he had announced to the world

386 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

in his book Mein Kampf in 1923, was based on the idea of
absorbing regions with German-speaking populations into his
Greater Reich. Lebensraum, living space, for Aryans would be
taken from the Slavic peoples of eastern Europe. In March
1938, Germany annexed Austria, its ally in the previous war
and homeland of Hitler, with the support of most Austrians
(the Trapp family of Sound of Music fame were the exception,
not the rule). Once again, Great Britain and France failed to
respond. Hitler set his sights on the Sudetenland, an ethnically
German region of Czechoslovakia. In October 1938, the British
and French leaders, alarmed but still anxious to avoid war,
attended a diplomatic conference in Munich where they agreed
that Hitler could annex the Sudetenland in return for a promise
to stop all future German aggression. They were desperate to
believe the Fiihrer could be appeased, but in March 1939,
German troops rolled into the rest of Czechoslovakia. The
Czechoslovak government had not even been invited to the
conference in Munich; despite being the only democracy
standing in Central Europe by 1938, they were betrayed by the
appeasement policy of their fellow democracies.

Cheering crowds greet the Nazis in Vienna a few days after the Anschluss, March, 1938.

Nor were the democracies moved by Nazi excesses against the

Modern World History 387

Jews in Germany. In November 1938, after a German diplomat
was assassinated by an exiled German Jew in France, the Nazi
government allowed a massive outpouring of violence against
Jews and Jewish-owned businesses. German mobs murdered
dozens of Jews, publicly humiliated thousands, and burned
businesses and synagogues. The Nazi-sponsored violence
became known as Kristallnacht, “the Night of Broken Glass.”
Many people in the democracies were outraged, thinking that
such a pogrom was only impossible in a civilized nation like
Germany. However, no government took action against Hitler,
nor did any country accept Jewish refugees—anti-Semitism was
all too common in most “civilized” countries.

All of this was happening as
Stalin was still supporting the
Spanish Republic, hoping
that the democracies would
join in a struggle against
rising fascism. When they
instead appeased Hitler,
Stalin concluded that the
capitalists perceived Hitler as
a bulwark against the
communist Soviet Union
rather than as a threat to their
own territories and interests.
The Soviet Premier changed
his diplomatic strategy and
Stalin and German Foreign Minister on August 28, 1939 signed a
Ribbentrop shaking hands after the signing Non-Ageression Pact with
of the non-aggression pact in the Kremlin. 4

Germany. By that time,
Hitler had set his sights on “liberating” the German-speaking
population in Poland and their territory. German troops poured
across the border on September 1, 1939. The world learned of
the secret agreement to divide Poland included in the Nazi-
Soviet Pact when the Stalin sent his armies into eastern Poland
three weeks later.


388 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Questions for Discussion

Why did the European democracies try to appease Hitler?

Was Stalin wrong to sign a non-aggression pact with
Germany?

The Road to War in East Asia

As described in the previous chapter, the government ruling
in the name of Japanese Emperor Hirohito also shifted toward
fascism after the invasion of Manchuria in 1931 and the
establishment of the puppet state Manchukuo in northeast
China and Inner Mongolia. Manchukuo provided Japan with
the benefits of an imperial colony: raw materials for Japanese
industries that were not available on the islands of Japan and a
captive market for Japanese goods. The Japanese military also
justified their conquests by claiming they were liberating Asia
from European colonialism. Not all the Asian territories they
invaded, however, were happy to become part of the Japanese
“Greater East Asian Co-Prosperity Sphere.”

Modern World History 389

Japanese-controlled territory after invasion, 1939.

China was still in the midst of a civil war between the
Kuomintang and the Chinese Communist Party, and the
Kuomintang leader and President of the Republic, Chiang Kai-
shek, ignored the Japanese threat in northern China until it was
too late. Chiang appealed to the League of Nations for assistance
against Japan. The United States supported the Chinese protest,
and after a six-month investigation, the League found Japan
guilty and demanded the return of Manchuria to China. The
diplomats of the League had no way to enforce their ruling, of
course. Japan ignored the demand and simply withdrew from
the League of Nations. Japanese diplomatic isolation further
empowered radical military leaders who could point to
Japanese military success in Manchuria and compare it to the
diplomatic failures of the civilian government. The military
took over Japanese policy. In the military's eyes, the conquest
of China would not only provide for Japan’s industrial needs, it
would secure Japanese supremacy in East Asia.

390 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Japan launched a full-scale
invasion of China on July 7,
1987, and routed the forces of
the Chinese National
Revolutionary Army led by
Chiang Kai-shek. The broken
Chinese army gave up Beijing
to the Japanese on August 8,
Shanghai on November 26,
and the Nationalist capital,
Nanjing, on December 13. In
the first six weeks after
~ capturing the capital,
» Japanese troops killed half of
' the city’s. population of
A Chinese POW about to be beheaded by a 600,000. They began by
Japanese officer. executing 90,000 Chinese

Army deserters who they
despised for surrendering, and then moved on to civilians.
Japanese troops raped up to 100,000 women and girls and then
shot or bayonetted most of them in what is now recognized as
one of the worst atrocities of World War II. To pacify the rest,
the Japanese distributed opium and heroin to the captive
population. Like the Italian fascists in Ethiopia and the German
Nazis in occupied Europe, the Japanese military felt themselves
to be superior to the conquered peoples, and believed that only
terror could subdue the civilian population.

Hoping to halt the invading enemy, Chiang Kai-shek adopted
a scorched-earth strategy of “trading space for time.” His
Nationalist government retreated inland, burning villages and
destroying dams; in the process killing more Chinese peasants
than the Japanese had killed in the atrocities in Nanjing. Chiang
established a new capital deep in the interior at the Yangtze
River port of Chungking. Although the Nationalists’ scorched-
earth policy hurt the Japanese military effort, it alienated
Chinese civilians and became a potent propaganda tool of the
emerging Chinese Communist Party.


Modern World History 391

ee ee ed coma eo:

RHR SS>oO

RATHI R ACSA

REAGRBCR ARES AU Re at Ck SO He

AOS RAREPNCESESSHEES SHS REEZR SSE

“Sew aoewes

a
cS
pf
8
#
®

BAOIO-—00-#3

|

Beer

An article on the “Contest to kill 100 people using a sword” published in the Tokyo Nichi
Nichi Shimbun. The headline reads, “Incredible Record’ (in the Contest to Cut Down 100
People) - Mukai 106-105 Noda - Both 2nd Lieutenants Go into Extra Innings”.

When news of the “Rape of Nanjing” first reached the West,
many were skeptical because the violence was so extreme.
However, U.S. missionaries and European businessmen had
established an “International Safety Zone” in Nanjing during
the atrocities, which saved 200,000 Chinese civilians and
documented the Japanese actions. Curiously, the effort was led
by the German businessman John Rabe, at the time a card-
carrying member of the Nazi Party. Eyewitness accounts
written by Westerners were published in American newspapers,
along with photographic evidence, and the brutality of Japanese
imperialism began to sink in. However, no one was going to
declare war on Japan to save the Chinese.

392 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The United States lacked
both the will and the military
power to oppose the Japanese
invasion, and even continued
to sell oil and scrap iron to
Japan. The Japanese army was
a technologically advanced
force consisting of 4,100,000
men and 900,000 Chinese
collaborators armed with
modern rifles, artillery,
armor, and aircraft. By 1940,
the Japanese navy was the
third-largest and among the
most technologically Madame Chiang kaiShek and Eleanor
advanced in the world. Still, Roosevelt on the White House lawn.
Chinese Nationalists lobbied Washington for aid. Chiang Kai-
shek’s popular wife, U.S.-educated Soong May-ling, known to
Americans as Madame Chiang, led the effort. In contrast to her
gruff husband, Madame Chiang was charming and able to use
her knowledge of American culture and values to garner
support for Chiang and his government. But although the
United States denounced Japanese aggression, it took no action.

As the Nationalists fought for survival, the Chinese
Communist Party was busy accumulating supporters and
supplies in the northwestern Shaanxi Province. Mao Zedong
recognized the power of the Chinese peasant population and
began recruiting from the local peasantry, capitalizing on the
outrage caused by both the Nationalist failure to prevent
Japanese invasion and its scorched-earth retreat. Mao gradually
built his force from a meager seven thousand survivors at the
end of the Long March in 1935 to a robust 1.2 million members
by the end of the World War Two.

Questions for Discussion

What would you say to Japanese leaders today who claim the

Modern World History 393

Rape of Nanjing never happened?

Do you think Chiang Kai-Shek was an effective leader of the
Kuomintang?

1940-1942: Axis Conquests in Europe and Asia

German column of panzers and mechanised infantry advancing through Ukraine, June
1942, typifying fast-moving advances of Blitzkrieg.

Two days after the German Wehrmacht invaded Poland on
September 1, 1939, Britain and France declared war and began
mobilizing their armies. The war planners hoped the Poles
would be able to hold out for three to four months, enough
time for the Allies to intervene. Poland fell in three weeks, partly
due to the Russian invasion in the east and partly due to a
new form of warfare. The German army, anxious to avoid the
rigid, grinding war of attrition in the trenches of World War I,
had built its new army for speed and maneuverability. German
strategy emphasized the use of tanks, planes, and motorized
infantry to concentrate forces, smash front lines, and wreak
havoc behind the enemy’s defenses. It was called Blitzkrieg,
“lightning war.”

394 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

After conquering eastern
Poland, Stalin’s armies shifted
focus to occupying the Baltic
States, Latvia, Lithuania, and
Estonia, and to invading
Finland. The Soviet leader
was planning to reestablish
the borders of the former
A group of Finnish soldiers in snowsuits Tsarist. Russian Empire.
manning aheavy machine gun inafoxhole. i owever, the invasion of

Finland met stubborn
resistance and winter—the conflict ended with the Finns losing
only a bit of territory on their southeastern borders.

Meanwhile, after the fall of Poland, France and Britain braced
for the inevitable German attack. In April 1940, the Germans
quickly conquered Denmark and Norway in an effort to prevent
the British naval blockade which had been so key to the German
defeat in World War One. The following month, Hitler
launched his blitzkrieg into Western Europe through the
Netherlands and Belgium to avoid well-prepared French
defenses along the French-German border. Poland had fallen
in three weeks; France lasted only a few weeks more. By June,
Hitler was posing for photographs in front of the Eiffel Tower.
In another propaganda victory, Hitler made the French
diplomats sign their surrender in the same railroad car used for
the German surrender in the First World War.

SSE

Germany split France in
half, occupying the north and
allowing a collaborationist
government to form in Vichy
to govern the south and the
French colonies. Led by the
“Hero of Verdun,’ Marshal
Philippe Petain, the Vichy
regime sought to reorganize Philippe Pétain meeting Hitler in October
France along authoritarian '°
fascist lines. —_ Significant
support for Germany by the French right was one of the reasons


Modern World History 395,

for their defeat in June 1940. Many in France had also
abandoned democracy and welcomed the demise of the Third
Republic. If the future held a German-dominated Europe, they
reasoned, then it would be better for France to collaborate as
partners rather than as subjects in a new Nazi empire. Although
this rationalization fit into the scheme proposed by German
propaganda, Hitler would never allow a full partnership with
any of the conquered peoples.

With France under control, Hitler turned to Britain.
Operation Sea Lion, the German invasion of the British Isles,
required air superiority over the English Channel. From June
until October 1940, the German Luftwaffe fought the Royal Air
Force for control of the skies. Despite having fewer planes,
British pilots won the so-called Battle of Britain, saving the
islands from invasion and prompting the new prime minister,
Winston Churchill, to declare, “Never before in the field of
human conflict has so much been owed by so many to so few.”

Four 264 Squadron Defiants (PS-V was later shot down on 28 August 1940 over Kent by
Bf 109s.)

But if Britain was safe from invasion, it was not immune from
ongoing air attacks. Frustrated by losing the Battle of Britain,
Hitler began a bombing campaign against cities and civilians.
The Blitz, as the British came to know the nightly bombing raids

396 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

on London, killed at least 40,000 civilians. Population centers
like Bristol, Cardiff, Portsmouth, Plymouth, Southampton and
industrial cities like Swansea, Belfast, Birmingham, Coventry,
Glasgow, Manchester, and Sheffield were also targeted for heavy
bombing. The Royal Air Force defended the cities as well as they
could, and British industrial production which had been moved
out of major cities was unaffected by the air attacks. The British
people, encouraged by Churchill, kept calm and carried on.

In anger, Hitler and his Vice
Chancellor Herman Géring
began a policy of hitting
London every day to try to
break the will of their enemy.
Beginning on September 7
1940, London was bombed
every night for 56 days,
including a large daylight
attack on September 15.
British morale failed to break,
and Germany _ eventually
shifted to targeting Atlantic
shipping and bombing port
cities in an attempt to starve
the enemy. When the port of
Clydebank in Scotland was
Original 1939 poster bombed in March, 1941, only

7 of 12,000 houses escaped
damage. But the Germans failed to gain complete air
superiority, partly due to the deployment of RADAR (Radio
Detection and Ranging) by the British. The technology had
been developed in the 1930s and was advanced and finally
perfected by Britain in the early 1940s. It would be offered to
the Americans in exchange for financial and industrial support
as the two nations strengthened ties to “defend democracy”
even before U.S. involvement in the war.

Nazi ideology considered the English as racial equals, and
Hitler hoped that Great Britain would eventually join a crusade
against Bolshevism. However, Nazi doctrine focused on


Modern World History 397

establishing German lebensraum in Eastern Europe, enslaving
the lesser Slavic peoples to work for the Aryans. Hitler had
always planned on breaking his 1989 nonaggression pact with
Stalin and invading the Soviet Union. First, German armies
invaded the Balkans and set up puppet regimes in Hungary and
Romania, giving them a wider front for attacking the Soviets.
This action was a bit unplanned and chaotic. Mussolini, playing
catch-up with his Axis partner, had sent his troops to conquer
Greece from Albania, which Italy had acquired in April 1939.
The Greeks not only defended themselves, but pushed the
Italians back into Albania; Hitler had to bail out Mussolini and
invade, sending his armies into Yugoslavia and Greece.

In June 1941, German forces crossed into the Soviet Union ina
massive surprise attack. “Operation Barbarossa” was the largest
land invasion in history. France and Poland had fallen in weeks,
and Germany hoped to use the same Blitzkrieg tactics to break
Russia before the winter. The German military caught the Red
Army and Stalin unprepared and quickly conquered enormous
swaths of land and captured nearly three million prisoners. But
Russia was too big. After recovering from the initial shock of the
German invasion, Stalin moved his factories east of the Urals,
out of range of the Luftwaffe. He ordered his retreating army
to adopt a scorched earth policy, destroying food, rails, and
shelters to slow the advancing German army.

398 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Masha Bruskina, a nurse with the Soviet resistance, before her execution by hanging,
The placard reads “We are the partisans who shot German troops", Minsk, October 26,
1941

The German army split into three forces and reached the gates
of Moscow and Leningrad, but their supply lines stretched
thousands of miles. Soviet infrastructure had been destroyed,
partisans harried German lines, and the brutal Russian winter
arrived. Germany had won massive gains but the winter found
German troops exhausted and overextended. In the north, the
German army starved a million and a half people in Leningrad
to death during an 827-day siege that has been called a genocide.
In the center, on the outskirts of Moscow, the German army
faltered and fell back after a three-month battle that killed a
million people.

Questions for Discussion

How was Hitler able to surprise Stalin with Operation
Barbarossa?

Why was the Blitzkrieg strategy that had worked so well in
Europe less successful in Russia?


Modern World History 399

While Hitler marched across Europe, the Japanese continued
their war in the Pacific. In 1939 the United States dissolved its
trade treaties with Japan and the following year America cut
off supplies of war materials by embargoing oil, steel, rubber,
and other vital goods. Instead of being starved into submission,
Japan's resource-challenged military accelerated invasions
across East Asia to sustain its war effort. The Japanese took
control of French Indochina from the Vichy Regime, and began
threatening the Dutch East Indies (now Indonesia) after the
Netherlands was occupied by Germany. Diplomatic relations
between Japan and the United States collapsed. The United
States demanded that Japan withdraw from China and the
French and Dutch territories; Japan considered the oil embargo
a de facto declaration of war.

Photograph taken from a Japanese plane during the torpedo attack on ships moored
on both sides of Ford Island shortly after the beginning of the Pear! Harbor attack. View
looks about east, with the supply depot, submarine base and fuel tank farm in the right
center distance. A torpedo has just hit USS West Virginia on the far side of Ford Island
(center).

Japanese military planners, believing that American
intervention was inevitable, planned a coordinated Pacific

400 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

offensive to neutralize the United States and other European
powers and provide time for Japan to complete its conquests
and fortify its positions. On the morning of December 7, 1941,
the Japanese launched a surprise air attack from their carriers
on the American naval base at Pearl Harbor, Hawaii. Japanese
military planners hoped to destroy enough battleships and
aircraft carriers to cripple American naval power for years. The
Japanese destroyed or seriously damaged eight battleships (four
sank), three cruisers, three destroyers, and 180 aircraft, and
killed 2,403 American servicemen and wounding a thousand.
353 Japanese bombers, fighters, and torpedo planes wiped out
nearly the entire US Pacific Fleet at Pearl Harbor. Luckily for
the U.S. Navy, its aircraft carriers were out on maneuvers and
not at port during the attack.
American isolationism fell
at Pearl Harbor. Japan also }

Here highly resolve that 1
U not hace died in

assaulted Hong Kong, the
Philippines, and American
holdings throughout the
Pacific, but it was the attack
on Hawaii that threw the
United States into a global
conflict. Franklin Roosevelt
called December 7 “a date
which will live in infamy” and
called for a declaration of war,
which Congress approved
within hours. Germany and
Waly declared war on the US “Remember December 71", by Allen

on December lth. Within a saaiburg, poster issued in 1942 by the
week of Pearl Harbor the united States Office of War Information.
United States was at war with

the entire Axis, turning two previously separate conflicts into a
true world war.

After Pearl Harbor, Japan conquered the American-controlled
Philippine archipelago. After running out of ammunition and
supplies, the garrison of American and Filipino soldiers
surrendered. The prisoners were marched eighty miles to a


Modern World History 401

Japanese prisoner-of-war camp without food, water, or rest. Ten
thousand died on the Bataan Death March.

Although Japan hoped the United States would be unable to
respond quickly, four months after Japan’s surprise attack on
Hawaii, in April 1942, the US Army Air Force bombed Tokyo
using sixteen B-25 medium range bombers launched from an
aircraft carrier in the Pacific. The man who planned and led the
raid, Lt. Col. Jimmy Doolittle, said of the plan, “The Japanese
people had been told they were invulnerable...An attack on the
Japanese homeland would cause confusion in the minds of the
Japanese people and sow doubt about the reliability of their
leaders.” Doolittle added, “There was a second and equally
important psychological reason for this attack: Americans badly
needed a morale boost.”

Take off from the deck of the USS HORNET of an Army B-25 on its way to take part in
first U.S. air raid on Japan, the Doolittle Raid, April 1942.

However, Franklin Roosevelt and Winston Churchill
understood that Germany was a more immediate threat. In
1940 and 1941, the United States had already begun providing
financial and material support to Great Britain and to Russia,
as it had previously in World War I. Britain had stood alone

402 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

militarily in Western Europe, but the British people refused to
be conquered and American supplies bolstered their resistance.
Roosevelt and Churchill met in April 1941 and declared the
Atlantic Charter—a pledge to defend freedom and democracy
from fascism.

After the U.S. officially
entered the war, Hitler
unleashed U-boat “wolf
packs” into the Atlantic Ocean
with orders to sink anything
carrying aid to Britain. After
losing thousands of merchant
ships in 1942 and early 1943,

British and U.S. tactics and
A complete and working replica of the technology won the Battle of
computer Turing invented to break the
Enigma cypher, called a "Bombe", at the the Atlantic. British code
British National Museum of Computing at —_ breakers at Bletchley Park led
Bletchley Park. by Alan Turing cracked

Germany’s | Enigma radio
cryptography. The surge of intelligence, dubbed Ultra, coupled
with naval convoys escorted by destroyers armed with sonar
and depth charges and air support, gave the advantage to the
Allies. By mid-1948, Hitler's navy was losing ships faster than
they could be built. Soon the wolf pack was sheltering in a
defensive crouch in the harbors of occupied Europe.

Questions for Discussion

Did Japan make a strategic error, attacking the United States?

Reflect. on the technological developments that were
accelerated by the war.


Modern World History 403
Allied Victories

When Hitler renewed his invasion of the Soviet Union in the
summer of 1942, he focused on conquering the bread basket
and oil fields of southern Russia. The Blitzkrieg again brought
rapid success, but again got too far ahead of its supply lines.
Although the strategy included sophisticated tanks, armored
troop carriers, and dive bombers, the Germans still used horse-
drawn wagons to bring up food, ammunition and spare parts
to the advancing armies. As the advance slowed, Axis armies
arrived at the new industrial city on the Volga River, Stalingrad.
Hitler badly wanted to conquer and wipe out Stalin’s namesake
city, and the Soviet Premier was just as determined to defend
it. In late 1942, the two armies bled themselves to death in the
destroyed city; fighting house to house in a five-month battle
that killed nearly two million people on both sides. Stalin placed
his trust in General Georgy Zhukov, who planned a brilliant
Soviet pincer move, cutting off the German 6th army in
Stalingrad. When his army was forced to surrender in February
1948, Hitler was apoplectic in his anger and his generals began to
doubt that he any longer had the strategic brilliance he showed
in the previous years.

The Germans planned to
follow up with renewed
attacks to get at Soviet oil, but
their battle with the Red
Army at Kursk turned the
course of the war definitively
to the Soviets. Zhukov
correctly guessed the German
strategy, and fortified Kursk
while massing armies to the
north and south. After the
greatest tank battle in world
history, Zhukov unleashed
another pincer move, and the
Germans retreated — from 1944 portrait photograph of Georgy
battle as quickly as they Zhukov.


404 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

could. The Red Army began rolling westward, putting the
Germans permanently on the defensive for the remainder of
the war. More than any other Ally, the Soviet Union was most
responsible for defeating Hitler, but at great sacrifice. Twenty-
five million Soviet soldiers and civilians died in what Russians
call the Great Patriotic War, and roughly 80 percent of all
German casualties during the war came on the Eastern Front.

Allied victories in North Africa in 1942 also reversed Axis
gains. The Germans and Italians had been threatening British
Egypt since late 1940, and led by the capable General Erwin
Rommel, seemed to be on the brink of victory in the spring of
1942. Hitler's decision to invade southern Russia was based on
the expectation that the Middle East would soon fall into Axis
hands. In November, the first American combat troops entered
the European war, landing in French Morocco, where French
Vichy forces switched sides and joined the struggle to defeat the
Axis. The Americans pushed the Germans and Italians eastward
while the British, after defeating Rommel at El Alamein in
Egypt, began rolling the Axis armies back to the west. By early
1948, the Allies had pushed Axis forces into Tunisia and then out
of Africa.

Modern World History 405,

Douglas “Devastator” aboard USS Enterprise being prepared for takeoff during the
battle of Midway, June 4, 1942.

Meanwhile, the Americans gradually stopped Japanese
expansion in the Pacific. In the summer of 1942, American
naval victories at the Battle of the Coral Sea and the aircraft
carrier duel at the Battle of Midway crippled Japan’s Pacific
naval operations. The battles were the first time two naval fleets
engaged one another by air and not by sea. At Coral Sea, the
U.S. Navy blocked the Japanese threat to Australia; Midway
eliminated Japan’s advance toward Hawaii, while sinking three
Japanese aircraft carriers which were irreplaceable, as Japan did
not have the industrial capacity to replenish its fleet. The U.S.,
in contrast, was producing ships almost by the day.

406 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

To dislodge Japan’s hold
over the Pacific, the U.S.
began attacking island after
island, bypassing the
strongest but seizing those
capable of holding airfields to
continue pushing Japan out of
the region. Combat was
vicious. At Guadalcanal
Japanese soldiers launched
suicidal charges rather than
surrender. Many Japanese soldiers refused to be taken prisoner
or to take prisoners themselves. Such tactics, coupled with
American racial prejudice, turned the Pacific Theater into a
much more brutal and barbarous conflict than battle in the
European Theater.

In January 1943, President Roosevelt and Prime Minister
Churchill met at Casablanca to discuss the next step of the
European war. The meeting leaders also declared that they
expected nothing short of unconditional surrender from the
Germans—to assure Stalin, who still did not trust the Allies to
keep their word. At Casablanca, Churchill convinced Roosevelt
to chase the Axis up the Italian peninsula, into the “soft
underbelly” of Europe. Stalin preferred a cross-Channel
invasion of France, but the British and Americans were not yet
prepared in 1948. In July, Allied forces led by General Dwight
Eisenhower crossed the Mediterranean and landed in Sicily.
The Italian King dismissed and arrested Mussolini, who escaped
with Germany’s help and established a fascist government in
northern Italy. The south, however, switched sides and fought
alongside the Allies for the rest of the war. However, the advance
northward toward Europe’s “soft underbelly” turned out to be
much tougher than Churchill had imagined. Italy’s narrow,
mountainous terrain and Mussolini’s newly-formed fascist state
gave the defending Axis the advantage. Movement up the
peninsula was slow, and in some battles, conditions returned to
the trench-like warfare of World War I as the German armies
fell back to new defensive positions, exhausting Allied forces in
one battle after another. It would take nearly a year to capture

Marines rest in the field on Guadalcanal

Modern World History 407

Rome, and northern Italy was not liberated until the last weeks
of the war in 1945.

Dresden after the bombing raid, February 1945.

Meanwhile, the U.S. Army Air Force (USAAF) sent thousands
of bombers to England and North Africa in preparation for
a massive strategic bombing campaign against
Germany—another move to assure Stalin the Allies were
opening a “second front” against Germany. The Allies’ plan was
to bomb German cities around the clock. Initially, U.S. bombers
focused on destroying German ball-bearing factories, rail yards,
oil fields, and manufacturing centers during the day because
the U.S. was reluctant to target civilians in terror bombings.
However, after the London Blitz, the British felt no
compunction against retaliating in kind, and carpet-bombed
German cities at night. By the end of 1944, the Americans
joined the British in the same strategy, bombing urban
industrial targets despite massive civilian casualties. The joint
RAF-USAAF bombing of the industrial city, Dresden, in
February 1945, dropped 3,900 tons of high explosives on the
city, causing a firestorm that killed 25,000 civilians.

408 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Flying in formation, the air
squadrons initially — flew
unescorted, since many
believed that “flying fortress”
bombers equipped with
defensive firepower flew too
high and too fast to be
attacked. However, advanced
German technology allowed
fighters to easily shoot down 8-29 “Super-fortress" in flight during World
the lumbering bombers. 2"!

German fighter planes shot

down almost half of American and British aircraft until long-
range escort fighters were developed that allowed the bombers
hit their targets while fighters confronted opposing German
aircraft.

Historians still debate the effectiveness of the Allied bombing
campaign against both Germany and Japan, and the overall
usefulness of bombing civilians in World War II. The Germans
actually increased production of war materiel during the war,
relocating factories and streamlining production. German and
Japanese civilians, like the Londoners in 1940, learned to live
with aerial attacks instead of rising up to overthrow their own
governments and sue for peace. Critics of terror-bombing argue
that targeting civilians rarely results in surrender, and instead
often stiffens a country’s resolve to fight on and inflict the same
terror on its foe.


Modern World History 409

The "Big Three”: From left to right: Joseph Stalin, Franklin D. Roosevelt, and Winston
Churchill on the portico of the Russian Embassy during the Tehran Conference to
discuss the European Theatre in 1943.

In the wake of the Soviet victory at Stalingrad, Roosevelt,
Churchill, and Stalin met in Tehran in November 1943.
Dismissing Africa and Italy as a sideshow, Stalin demanded that
Britain and the United States invade France to support the
Soviet advance on the Eastern Front. Churchill was hesitant,
but Roosevelt was eager. The invasion was tentatively scheduled
for May 1944. The leaders also began post-war planning,
considering the best ways to prevent another world war and
Great Depression. The Allies had already begun calling
themselves the “United Nations,” especially as Latin American
republics and other countries began joining the fight against
the Axis. In April 1945, diplomats gathered in San Francisco to
design a way for the United Nations to address world problems
in a post-war world.

To avoid another Great Depression and to reconstruct war-
torn nations, in 1944 the Allies also sent representatives to the
Bretton Woods resort in New Hampshire to forge new
international financial, trade, and developmental relationships.

410 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The results of both conferences will be discussed below, but it is
important to notice that both international meetings were held
in the United States. Americans had become convinced that
isolationism was not longer a practical foreign policy, and the
world recognized that the U.S. was going to be instrumental in a
post-war effort to keep the peace.

Questions for Discussion

How did the different wartime experiences of the Allies
influence the goals of the “Big Three" leaders, Stalin, Churchill,
and Roosevelt?

If terror-bombing civilian populations is ineffective, why did
everyone continue doing it?

The Conclusion

The photograph “Into the Jaws of Death” shows American troops, part of the U.S. 1st
Infantry Division, leaving a Higgins Boat on Omaha Beach.

On the same day the American army entered Rome, American,
British and Canadian forces launched Operation Overlord, the
long-awaited invasion of France. D-Day, as it became known,

Modern World History 411

was the largest amphibious assault in history. American general
Dwight Eisenhower was uncertain enough of the attack’s
chances that the night before the invasion he wrote two
speeches: one for success and one for failure. Using over 5,000
landing and assault craft, about 160,000 men crossed the
English Channel on D-Day. The Allied landings at Normandy
were successful, and by the end of the month 875,000 Allied
troops had arrived in France. Paris was liberated in late August.

Allied bombing sorties intensified, continuing to level
German cities and reduce Axis industrial capacity. The Royal
Air Force estimated that the Allies destroyed more than half
of the “built up areas” in seven of the ten German cities with
more than 500,000 residents. The RAF’s goal, similar to that of
Germany during the Blitz, was for bombing to be “focused on
the morale of the enemy civil population and in particular of
the industrial workers.” The USAAF flew over 750,000 bomber
sorties and dropped nearly a million and a half tons of bombs.
Up to five hundred thousand German civilians were killed by
allied bombing.

British Sherman “Firefly” tank in Namur on the Meuse River, December 1944

412 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The Nazi armies were crumbling on both fronts. Hitler tried to
turn the war in his favor in the west. The Battle of the Bulge in
December 1944 and January 1945 was the largest and deadliest
single battle fought by U.S. troops in the war. The desperate
Germans failed to drive the Allies back from the Ardennes
forests to the English Channel, but the delay cost the western-
front Allies the winter. The invasion of Germany would have
to wait, while the Soviet Union continued its relentless push
from the east, ravaging German populations in retribution for
German war crimes. German counterattacks failed to prevent
the Soviet advance and 1945 dawned with the end of European
war in sight.

The Big Three met at Yalta in February 1945 to discuss their joint occupation of
Germany and plans for postwar Europe.

In February 1945, Roosevelt, Churchill, and Stalin met again
at Yalta, located on the Crimean Peninsula in the Black Sea.
Roosevelt and Churchill were anxious for Soviet help in
defeating Japan; the atom bomb was months away from being
tested and no one knew whether it would work. Stalin agreed to

Modern World History 413

join the fight in Asia against Japan three months after peace was
declared in Europe.

The three leaders discussed their own long-range strategic
interests at Yalta. Stalin, whose country had sacrificed the most
in the war, insisted on defending the Soviet Union from future
invasion by occupying Eastern Europe. Remembering British
and U.S. support of the White Russians in the Civil War he
had fought in the 1920s, Stalin distrusted his temporary allies
against Germany. Partly to destabilize the capitalist nations he
distrusted, and partly because he was still a dedicated
revolutionary, Stalin also wanted to continue to promote
communism around the world.

Churchill, for his part, continued to believe that the colonial
European empires in Africa and Asia should continue as before
(the French also supported this position). Roosevelt’s main
interest was maintaining the economic boom that had pulled
the United States out of the Great Depression through free
international trade. The war had put people back to work and
the nation was at near full employment. Since U.S. was not
bombed, American industry was in a position to supply the
world and American firms to dominate world markets.
Although the three nations shared the victory in World War
Two, in the long run, the United States “defeated” its allies.
The European empires Churchill hoped to save were ended by
the 1960s with the independence of Asian and African colonies
and Stalin’s Soviet Union and domination of Eastern Europe
dramatically collapsed in 1989-1991. Roosevelt’s position was
the most successful in the long run. Free trade exists throughout
the world, and is currently embraced by industrially-developing
nations as a means for economic growth. However, nothing lasts
forever: the United States is beginning to lose its position as the
leader of the capitalist world—we will discuss this change in a
later chapter.

414 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

In an arranged photo commemorating the
meeting of the Soviet and American
armies, 2nd Lt. William Robertson (U.S.
Army) and Lt. Alexander Silvashko (Red
Army) stand facing one another with hands
clasped and arms around each other's

Soviet troops reached
Germany in January 1945, and
the Americans crossed the
Rhine in March. In late April,
American and Soviet troops
met at the Elbe River while
the Soviets pushed
relentlessly to reach Berlin
first and took the capital city
in May. A few days before
their arrival, Hitler and his
high command committed
suicide in a city bunker.

shoulders.

Germany was conquered and
the European war was over.

A changed set of Allied leaders met again at Potsdam,
Germany. Of the “Big Three” who had met at Yalta, only Stalin
was at Potsdam for the whole conference. Roosevelt had died
of natural causes in early April and Churchill was replaced by
new Prime Minister Clement Atlee in the early days of the
meeting when his Conservative Party was defeated at the polls
by the Labour Party. The leaders agreed that Germany would
be divided into pieces according to current Allied occupation,
with Berlin likewise divided.

Questions for Discussion

D-Day is an iconic moment for Americans. What do you think
similar moments would be for Britain and the Soviet Union?

Why did the U.S. and U.S.S.R. race to reach Berlin?

The Holocaust

We have already seen the application of fascist ideology in
murderous atrocities against “inferior people” by the Italians in
Ethiopia and the Japanese in China in the early years of World
‘War Two. Nazi anti-Semitism had revealed its violent aspects in

Modern World History 415,

Kristallnacht in 1938, but was even more viciously applied once
German armies began conquering Eastern Europe. Ten percent
of Poland’s pre-war population was Jewish, about 3 million
people, who had been subjected to discrimination by the
authoritarian Polish government in the 1930s. However, under
German occupation, Jews were forced into overcrowded
ghettoes in certain Polish cities. The areas captured by the
Wehrmacht in the western Soviet Union during Operation
Barbarossa added millions of Jews to Nazi-occupied Europe.
While Hitler and his government had briefly considered
sending Jews to far-off exile outside of Europe, ultimately the
Fiihrer decided that their physical elimination was necessary—a
“Final Solution” to the “Jewish Problem.” Mass shootings by
specialized troops called Einsatzgruppen accompanied the
invasion of the Soviet Union. In October 1941, outside of the
Ukrainian capital of Kiev, Jewish men were forced to dig mass
pits in the Babi Yar ravine into which they and their families
were herded naked and shot by Einsatzgruppen and Ukrainian
collaborators. Babi Yar was among the largest mass shootings of
the war.

Officer executes those who survived the initial shooting, October 1942.

During Operation Barbarossa, the Germans also captured
millions of Soviet troops, who they herded into prisoner-of-war

416 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

camps and basically starved to death. At least two million Soviet
soldiers died this way. Non-Russians in these camps, Balts and
Ukrainians, were given the option to join special guard units
and collaborate with the Germans. As the mass shootings took
their psychological toll on German soldiers and guardsmen,
these non-Germans were called upon to murder Jewish civilians
and patrol the ghettoes and concentration camps.

Even before the war began,
“mercy killing” had become a
Nazi policy in German
psychiatric and mental
institutions, where those with
physical and mental
disabilities were denied care
and murdered. Shortly after
defeating Poland, Hitler
ordered the elimination of all
“defectives”. The staffs of
these hospitals experimented
with mass killing through
carbon monoxide _ being
pumped into buses and
discovered a new use for a

Poster published by Neues Volk ("New
rodent repellent called people’), a magazine published monthly by

“Zyklon B? These methods th Pffice of Racial Policy of the Nazi Party.

lied The poster says: “60,000 RM is what this
were = soon applet at person suffering from hereditary illness

specially-built extermination costs the community in his lifetime. Fellow
camps in the Eastern Europe, _“ttzen, that is your money too."

the first opening in early

1942. Jews were packed into railroad cattle-cars and taken to
these camps, where they were told that they were going to
“showers,” but instead were sealed in and gassed. “Work Jews”
were assigned to cremate the remains, until they too were
exterminated.

Modern World History 417

With the establishment of
the extermination camps, the
Germans began “relocating”
Jews from France and other
occupied areas in Western
Europe by rail to the East. In
all countries of occupied
A page from Anne Frank's first diary, 1942. Europe, some Jews were

saved by their Christian
neighbors, hidden in attics, barns, and even in churches and
monasteries until the end of the war. But even then, they were
not always safe. The German-Jewish Frank family had moved
to the Netherlands to escape the Nazi regime in late 1933. They
had hoped that Holland would be a safe haven in a new
European war since it had remained neutral in World War One.
However, the Germans occupied the country along with
Belgium and France in 1940, and by 1942, were sending Dutch
Jews in transports to the East. The Frank family was able to hide
in an annex with others, supplied with food and news of the war
by a group of Dutch friends active in the underground
resistance. However, they were discovered by German
authorities in August 1944, and sent off to the camps. Young
Anne Frank had kept a diary during their two years in hiding,
and her father, who survived the war, published it in 1947.
Although Anne Frank’s diary has become one of the most
important records of the Holocaust, the Germans themselves
were good at keeping records of their actions against Jews and
others. New details emerge frequently of the extent and reach
of the Holocaust, concentration camps, and slave labor. Despite
the efforts of some to deny the Holocaust, there is no doubt: it
really happened.

However, during the war itself, it was difficult for the Allies
to believe rumors and reports they were receiving of atrocities,
mass executions, and death camps in Nazi-occupied Europe.
Polish resistance fighter Jan Karski was smuggled into the
‘Warsaw ghetto and a transit camp in order to witness how the
Jews were treated. He saw teenage Hitler Youth members
walking into the ghetto to casually murder a Jew or two and
Jewish families destined for extermination packed into rail cars.


418 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

It was difficult for Roosevelt, Churchill and others to believe
his report, given in-person in Washington and London. When
Karski described what he had seen to U.S. Supreme Court
Justice Felix Frankfurter, a Jewish-American, Frankfurter
replied, “I know you are telling the truth, but I don’t believe
you”; expressing the world’s incredulity that the Germans could
perpetrate such atrocities.

Fritz klein, the camp doctor, standing in a mass grave at Bergen-Belsen after the
camp's liberation by the British 11th Armoured Division, April 1945,

As the Allies pushed into Germany and Poland, they uncovered
the full extent of Hitler’s genocidal policies. The Allies liberated
elaborate camp systems set up for the imprisonment, forced
labor, and extermination of the Jews and other “undesirables”
including Roma (“gypsies”), political prisoners, members of the
resistance, individuals from the LGBT community, and

Modern World History 419

pacifists. Allied officers often forced German civilians to visit
the camps in their towns and regions in order to witness the
consequences of Nazi and fascist ideology that the “other” must
be eliminated. Since then, Germany has been forced to come
to terms with this history, and most Germans have tried to
confront their past honestly. This effort has been unusual: not
only have the Turks, Japanese, and others not addressed their
actions, white treatment of non-white populations has often
been passed over. Europeans intentionally mass murdering
other Europeans, and using industrial methods, was
unacceptable. The atrocities of Europeans against colonized
peoples in Africa, Asia, and the American West seemed more
acceptable, and were rarely addressed, due to a legacy of
institutionalized racism. But the violence was very real to the
Congolese, Native Americans, Indians, and U.S. Blacks.

The attempted elimination of the entire Jewish population
in Europe has had other geopolitical effects. The Holocaust
seemed to prove the Zionist thesis correct: that the Jews would
never be safe unless they established their own homeland. This
was achieved in Israel three years after the war ended in Europe;
but not, as we shall see, without long-term consequences for
the Palestinian Arabs and the rest of the Middle East. News of
the death of six million Jews was especially difficult for Jewish-
Americans, who suddenly realized that they were nearly the last
surviving remnant of an ancient people after their relatives and
loved ones were murdered in Hitler’s camps. Previously Jewish
life had been centered in Poland and the Ukraine; now it was in
the United States and Israel.

Questions for Discussion

Why was the German killing of 11 million people in the
Holocaust so difficult for people to believe?

What do you think motivates people who insist the Holocaust
didn’t happen?

420 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford
Pacific War

As the Allies, especially the
Americans, celebrated V-E
(Victory in Europe) Day, they
redirected their full attention
to the still-raging Pacific War.
In 1944 and 1945, the
Japanese military continue to
fight tenaciously in defeat
after defeat. Few battles were
as one-sided as the Battle of
the Philippine Sea in June
1944, a Japanese counterattack
that the Americans called the
Great Marianas Turkey Shoot
for the number of planes and
vessels that they sank. At Iwo
Jima, an eight-square-mile
island of volcanic rock upon US. postage stamp, 1945 issue,
which the Americans wanted Co™™emorating the Battle of Iwo Jima.
to build an airfield from
which to attack Japan, seventeen thousand Japanese soldiers
held the island against seventy thousand Marines for over a
month. At the cost of nearly their entire force, they inflicted
almost thirty thousand casualties before the island was lost in
early 1945.

By that time, American heavy bombers were in range of the
Japanese homeland. Bombers hit Japan’s industrial facilities but
suffered high casualties. To spare bomber crews from dangerous
daylight raids and to achieve maximum effect against Japanese
morale, American bombers began night raids, dropping
incendiary weapons that created massive firestorms consuming
the wood-and-paper houses of the residential neighborhoods.
Over sixty Japanese cities were fire-bombed; one hundred
thousand civilians in Tokyo died in a single attack in March
1945.


Modern World History 421

In June 1945, after eighty
days of fighting and tens of
thousands of casualties, the
Americans captured the
island of Okinawa. The
homeland of Japan was open
before them. Okinawa was a
viable base from which to
launch a full invasion of the
Japanese homeland and end
the war. Estimates varied, but
given the tenacity of Japanese
soldiers fighting on islands far
from their home, some
officials expected that an
invasion of the Japanese

The Imperial Japanese Army mobilized
1,780 middle school boys aged 14-17 years mainland could cost half a

into frontline-service. They were named ynillion American casualties

Tekketsu Kinndtai, “Iron and Blood Imperial

Corps". and kill millions of Japanese

civilians.

Historians debate the many motivations that drove the
Americans to use atomic weapons against Japan and many
American officials criticized the decision at the time.
Government leaders and military officials cited the casualty
estimates of an invasion to justify their use. Early in the war,
fearing that German scientists might develop an atomic bomb,
the German-Hungarian-American physicist Led Szilard had
written a letter to Franklin Roosevelt which Albert Einstein
signed, warning of a nuclear-armed Hitler. After some debate,
other American physicists acknowledged the possibility. The
US. government responded in 1942 with the Manhattan Project,
a hugely expensive, ambitious program to create a single
weapon capable of leveling an entire city. Three years later,
the Americans successfully exploded the world’s first nuclear
device, Trinity, in New Mexico in July 1945 while Allied leaders
were meeting in Potsdam. Physicist J. Robert Oppenheimer, the
director of the Los Alamos Laboratory where the bomb was
designed, later recalled that the event reminded him of a line

422 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

from Hindu scripture: “Now I am become death, the destroyer
of worlds.”

Nagasaki before and after the bombing and the fires.

Two more bombs, Little Boy and Fat Man, were quickly built
and detonated over two Japanese cities in August. The
Hiroshima bomb was dropped at 8:15 on the morning of August
6. Over one hundred thousand civilians were killed. On August
9, the second bomb, Fat Man, was scheduled to be dropped on
the castle town of Kokura. But the town was obscured by clouds,
so the mission proceeded to the secondary target, Nagasaki,
an important port city on the southern island, Kyushu, with
a population of about a quarter-million people. The Fat Man

Modern World History 423

bomb detonated over the Mitsubishi munitions factory and the
city arsenal. About eighty thousand civilians were killed.

In addition to the American atom bomb attacks, on August
9th, Soviet forces invaded Manchuria and overthrew the
Japanese puppet state of Manchukuo. On August 10th, Japanese
cabinet ministers agreed to the Allied terms for surrender.
Emperor Hirohito endorsed their decision on August 15 and
announced the surrender of Japan. On September 2, aboard
the battleship USS Missouri, delegates from the Japanese
government formally signed their surrender. World War II was
finally over.

Questions for Discussion

How was the Pacific war different from the European war?

Was the U.S. justified in dropping atomic bombs on Japan?

U.S. Industry and the “Home Front”

424 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Assembly plant of the Bell Aircraft Corporation at Wheatfield, New York (directly East of
Niagara Falls).

Economies win wars as much as militaries. The war effort
converted American factories to wartime production, restored
America’s economy to full employment, armed the Allies and
American forces, pulled America out of the Great Depression,
and ushered in an era of unparalleled economic prosperity.
Roosevelt's New Deal had ameliorated the worst of the
Depression, but the economy was still limping its way forward.
When Europe fell into war, Americans were glad to sell the
Allies arms and supplies. And then Pearl Harbor changed
everything. The United States drafted the economy into war
service. The “sleeping giant” mobilized its unrivaled economic
capacity to wage worldwide war. Government agencies such as
the War Production Board and the Office of War Mobilization
and Reconversion managed production for the war effort and
economic output exploded. An economy that had been unable
to provide work for a quarter of the workforce less than a
decade earlier now struggled to fill vacant positions.

Although Franklin Roosevelt had already embraced the ideas
of economist John Maynard Keynes on using deficit spending

Modern World History 425

to jump-start the economy, the war wiped away any resistance
among conservatives. Government spending during the four
years of war doubled all federal spending in all of American
history up to that point. The federal budget deficit soared, but,
just as Keynes had predicted, the government’s massive
intervention annihilated unemployment and propelled growth.
The economy that came out of the war looked nothing like the
one that had begun it.

Military production came
at the expense of the civilian

consumer economy.
Appliance and automobile
manufacturers converted

their plants to produce
RATIONING MEANS A FAIR weapons and vehicles.
SHARE FOR ALL OF US Consumer choice —_— was
Wap Sl sacrificed to patriotic duty.
3 Every American received
rationing cards and goods
such as gasoline, coffee, meat,
cheese, butter, processed
food, firewood, and sugar
n hoard fs could not be purchased
World War Il. building was shut down and
cities became overcrowded.
But the wartime economy boomed. The Roosevelt
administration urged citizens to save their earnings or buy war
bonds to prevent inflation. Bond drives headlined by
Hollywood celebrities were hugely successful. They not only
funded much of the war effort, they helped tame inflation as
well. So too did high tax rates. The federal government raised
income taxes and boosted the top marginal tax rate to 94
percent.
President Roosevelt and his administration encouraged all able-
bodied American men and women to help the war effort. He
considered the role of women in the war critical for American
victory, and the public expected women to free men for active
military service. While most women opted to remain at home


426 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

or volunteer with charitable organizations, many went to work
or put on a military uniform. World War II brought
unprecedented labor opportunities for American women.
Industrial labor, normally dominated by men, shifted to women
for the duration of wartime mobilization. Women got jobs in
new munitions factories. The image of Rosie the Riveter
inscribed with the phrase “We Can Do It!” encouraged female
factory labor during the war. And over a million administrative
jobs at the local, state, and national levels were transferred from
men to women for the duration of the war; often permanently.

Modern World History 427

WAR PRODUCTION CO-ORDINATING COMMITTEE

"We Can Do It!” by J. Howard Miller was made as an inspirational image to boost worker
morale.

For women who chose not to work in factories or government
service, many volunteer opportunities presented themselves.
The American Red Cross, the largest charitable organization
in the nation, encouraged women to volunteer with local city
chapters. Millions of women organized community social
events for families, packed and shipped almost half a million
tons of medical supplies, and prepared twenty-seven million
care packages for American and other Allied prisoners of war.

428 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The American Red Cross required all female volunteers to
certify as nurse’s aides, providing an extra benefit and work
opportunity for hospital staffs that suffered severe personnel
losses.

Military service was

another option for women
who wanted to join the war
effort. Over 350,000 women
served in several all-female
units of the military branches.
The Army and Navy Nurse
Corps Reserves, the Women’s
Army Auxiliary Corps, the
Navy’s Women Accepted for
Volunteer Emergency
Service, the Coast Guard’s
SPARs (named for the Coast
Guard
motto, Semper Paratus,
“Always Ready”), and Marine
Corps units gave women the
opportunity to serve as either
commissioned officers or enlisted members at military bases at
home and abroad. The Nurse Corps Reserves commissioned
105,000 army and navy nurses recruited by the American Red
Cross. Military nurses worked at base hospitals, mobile medical
units, and onboard hospital ships.
However, despite all the wartime and postwar celebration of
Rosie the Riveter, when the war ended men returned home and
most women lost their jobs. Many former military women faced
difficulty obtaining veteran's benefits during their transition to
civilian life. The nation that called for assistance to millions
of women during the four-year crisis seemed unprepared to
accommodate their postwar needs and demands. But many
women who had answered the call refused to step back into the
shadows and pushed forward, igniting a struggle that eventually
became the Women’s Movement.

Arecruiting poster of the SPARS during
World War Il

Modern World History 429

In early 1941, months
before the Japanese attack on
Pearl Harbor, A. Philip
Randolph, president of the
Brotherhood of Sleeping Car
Porters, the largest black
trade union in the nation, had
made headlines by
threatening President
Roosevelt with a march on
Washington, D.C. In this
“crisis of democracy,”
Randolph said, defense
industries refused to hire
African Americans and the
armed forces _ remained
segregated. In exchange for Randolph calling off the march,
Roosevelt issued Executive Order 8802, banning racial and
religious discrimination in defense industries and establishing
the Fair Employment Practice Committee to monitor defense
industry hiring practices. While the armed forces remained
segregated throughout the war, the order showed that the
federal government could stand against discrimination. The
black workforce in defense industries rose from 3 percent in
1942 to 9 percent in 1945.

A. Phillip Randolph in 1942.

More than one million African Americans fought in the war.
Most blacks served in segregated, noncombat units led by white
officers. Some gains were made, however. The number of black
officers increased from five in 1940 to over seven thousand in
1945. And all-black fighter and bomber squadrons, known as
the Tuskegee Airmen, completed more than 1,500 missions and
earned several hundred merits and medals. Black pilots of the
3832nd Fighter Group painted the tails of their P-47
Thunderbolts red and many bomber crews specifically
requested the “Red Tail Angels” as escorts. Near the end of the
war, the army and navy began integrating some of their units
and facilities, before the U.S. government finally ordered the full
integration of its armed forces in 1948.

430 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

While some black
Americans served in the
armed forces, others on the
home front became riveters
and welders, rationed food
and gasoline, and bought
victory bonds. Many black
Americans saw the war as an
opportunity not only to serve
their country but to improve
it. The Pittsburgh Courier, a
leading black newspaper,
spearheaded the “Double V”
campaign. It called on African
Americans to fight and win three african-American workers complete
two wars: the war against the pilot's compartment of an aircraft,
Nazism and fascism abroad 194%
and the war against racial
inequality at home. To achieve double victory and “real
democracy,’ the Courier encouraged its readers to enlist in the
armed forces or volunteer on the home front, and fight against
racial segregation and discrimination. During the war,
membership in the NAACP jumped tenfold, from fifty thousand
to five hundred thousand. The Congress of Racial Equality,
formed in 1942, proposed nonviolent direct action to achieve
desegregation. Between 1940 and 1950, 1.5 million southern
blacks also demonstrated their opposition to racism and
violence by migrating out of the Jim Crow South to the North.
But transitions were not easy. Racial tensions erupted in 1943 in
a series of riots in cities such as Mobile, Beaumont, and Harlem.
The bloodiest race riot occurred in Detroit and resulted in the
death of twenty-five blacks and nine whites. Still, the war ignited
in African Americans an urgency for equality that they would
carry with them into the subsequent years.

Questions for Discussion


Modern World History 431

How were the experiences of women and African Americans
during the war similar?

How were they different?

Many Americans had to navigate American prejudice, and
America’s entry into the war left foreign nationals from the
enemy nations in a precarious position. The Federal Bureau
of Investigation targeted many on suspicions of disloyalty for
detainment, hearings, and internment under the Alien Enemy
Act. Those sentenced to internment were sent to government
camps surrounded by barbed wire and armed guards. Early
internments were based on determinations of probable cause.
Then, on February 19, 1942, President Roosevelt signed
Executive Order 9066, authorizing the removal of any persons
from “exclusion zones” which ultimately covered nearly a third
of the country at the discretion of military commanders.
Thirty thousand Japanese
Americans fought for the
United States in World War II,
but wartime anti-Japanese
sentiment built on long-
standing prejudices. Under
Roosevelt’s order, both
immigrants and American
citizens of Japanese descent
were rounded up and placed
in prison camps under the
custody of the War

1942 propaganda cartoon in the New York
newspaper PM by Dr. Seuss depicting
Japanese Americans in California, Oregon,

and Washington-states with the largest
population of Japanese Americans-as
prepared to conduct sabotage against the
U.S.

Relocation Authority. They
lost their jobs and homes.
Over ten thousand German
nationals and a_ smaller

number of Italian nationals were interned at various times in
the United States during World War II, but American policies
disproportionately targeted Japanese-descended populations,
and individuals did not receive personalized reviews prior to

432 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

their internment. This policy of mass exclusion and detention
affected over 110,000 Japanese and Japanese-descended
individuals. Seventy thousand were American citizens. Ina
1982 report, a congressional
commission concluded that the causes
of Japanese internment had been “race
prejudice, war hysteria, and a failure
of political leadership.” Although the
exclusion orders were found to have
been__ constitutionally permissible
based on claims of national security,
they were later judged unjust, even by
the military and Judicial leaders. In
1988, President Reagan signed an Act
that formall apologized _ for
internment and provided reparations
to surviving internees.

But if actions taken during war would be regretted, so would
inactions. As the Allies pushed into Germany and Poland, they
uncovered the full extent of Hitler’s genocidal policies. The
Allies discovered massive camp systems set up for the
imprisonment, forced labor, and extermination of all those
Untermenschen (literally under-people) deemed racially,
ideologically, or biologically “unfit” to live in a Nazi-ruled
Europe. As Russian and American troops liberated
concentration and death camps, they discovered the Holocaust,
the Nazi state’s systematic murder of eleven million civilians,
including six million Jews. But, like the Rape of Nanjing, the
Holocaust was not a secret from those who chose to face facts.
By the end of the war it had been under way for years. How did
America respond?

Initially, American officials had expressed little official concern
for Nazi persecutions. As the first signs of trouble became clear
in the late 1930s, the State Department and most U.S. embassies
did little to aid European Jews. President Roosevelt publicly
spoke out against persecution and even withdrew the U.S.
ambassador to Germany after Kristallnacht, the pogrom against

Modern World History 433

German Jews in 1938 that had caused even former German
Kaiser Wilhelm II to say “For the first time, I am ashamed to
be German.” Roosevelt pushed for the 1988 Evian Conference in
France, where international leaders discussed the Jewish refugee
problem and worked to expand Jewish immigration quotas. But
the conference came to nothing, and the United States turned
away countless Jewish refugees who requested asylum in the
United States. In 1939, the German ship St. Louis, carrying over
nine hundred Jewish refugees, could not find a country that
would take them. Passengers were not granted visas under the
U.S. quota system. The ship cabled Roosevelt for special
permission, but the president said nothing. The St. Louis was
forced to return to Europe. Hundreds of its passengers would
perish in the Holocaust.

*Selection” of Hungarian Jews on the ramp at Auschwitz II-Birkenau in
German-occupied Poland, around May 1944, Jews were sent either to work or to the
gas chamber.

Anti-Semitism still permeated the United States. Even if
Roosevelt wanted to do more, he decided the political price for
increasing immigration quotas as too high. After Kristallnacht, in
1939, Congress debated a bill to allow twenty thousand German-
Jewish children into the United States. First lady Eleanor
Roosevelt endorsed the measure, but the president remained
publicly silent. The bipartisan bill was introduced by a

434 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Democratic senator and a Republican representative and
supported by religious and labor groups, but was opposed by
nationalist organizations. It never came to a vote in the Senate
because it was blocked by a North Carolina Democrat whose
support Roosevelt needed on military spending bills. The
president, anxious to protect the New Deal and his rearmament
programs, was unwilling to expend political capital to save
foreign children that even leaders of his own party had little
interest in protecting.

Question for Discussion

How did racism and prejudice affect the U.S. response to the
Jewish refugee problem and Japanese internment?

World War I! Deaths

xis Mita

&

miitary deaths (mons) mM Total deaths (mlions
mGuiian deatns(milions) Jota deatne 2% a 1929 eapulaton

The US was lucky that none of the war was fought on American
soil, but 419,400 US servicemen died in the conflict. World War
Il was the deadliest war in history. Military deaths were over
25 million, including 5 million prisoners of war who died in
custody. The war also killed about 55 million civilians, including
28 million who died of war-related disease and famine. The
number of wounded has not been accurately documented, but

Modern World History 435

was probably similar to or greater than the death toll. More
than half those casualties were in
Russia and China. The Chinese death
toll was at least 20 million. The Soviet
Union lost 11,400,000 men in battle,
10 million civilians in _war-related
activities, and about 7 million through
famine caused by the war, for a total
of about 28 million. These losses
amounted to about 14% of the U.S.S.R’s
1940 population. Germany lost over 5
million soldiers and up to 3 million
civilians.

Americans celebrated the end of the war after V-J Day in August
1945. At home and abroad, the United States wanted a postwar
order that would guarantee global peace and domestic
prosperity. Although the alliance of convenience with Stalin’s
Soviet Union would rapidly collapse, Americans nevertheless
looked for the means to ensure postwar stability and economic
security for returning veterans. The inability of the League of
Nations to stop German, Italian, and Japanese aggressions
caused many to question whether any global organization could
effectively ensure world peace. Skeptics included Franklin
Roosevelt, who, as Woodrow Wilson’s undersecretary of the
navy, had witnessed the rejection of The League’s ideal of world
governance by both the American people and the Senate.

In 1941, Roosevelt believed postwar security could best be
maintained by an informal agreement between what he termed
the Four Policemen: the United States, Britain, the Soviet Union,
and China. But others, including Roosevelt’s secretary of state
Cordell Hull and British prime minister Winston Churchill,
convinced the president to push for a new global organization.
As the war ran its course, both Roosevelt and the American
public came around to the idea of the United Nations. Pollster
George Gallup noted a “profound change” in American
attitudes. In 1937 only a third of Americans polled supported
the idea of an international organization. But as war broke out

436 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

in Europe, half of Americans did. America’s entry into the war
bolstered support, and by 1945, 81 percent of Americans favored
the idea.

And Franklin Roosevelt had
always supported the ideals
enshrined in the United
Nations charter. In January
1941, he described Four
Freedoms that all of the
world’s citizens should enjoy:
freedom of speech, freedom
of worship, freedom from
want, and freedom from fear. greanor Roosevelt with the Universal
Roosevelt signed the Atlantic _ Declaration of Human Rights, 1949.
Charter with Churchill,
reinforcing those ideas and adding the right of self-
determination and promising some sort of economic and
political cooperation. Roosevelt first used the term united
nations to describe the Allied powers, not the subsequent
postwar organization. But the name stuck.

At Tehran in 1948, Roosevelt and Churchill convinced Stalin
to send a Soviet delegation to a conference in August 1944,
where they agreed on the basic structure of the new
organization. It would have a Security Council consisting of
the original Four Policemen and France, that would consult on
how best to keep the peace and when to deploy the military
power of the assembled nations. In a shift from the unarmed
diplomacy of the League of Nations, the U.N. would have a
military. The plan was a hybrid between Roosevelt's policemen
idea and a global organization of equal representation. There
would also be a General Assembly made up of all nations, an
International Court of Justice, and a council for economic and
social matters. The Soviets expressed concern over how the
Security Council would work, but the powers agreed to meet
again in San Francisco between April and June 1945 for further
negotiations. There, on June 26, 1945, fifty nations signed the
U.N. charter.


Modern World History 437

Questions for Discussion

Reflect on the death toll. Which nations paid the highest
price? How might this affect their post-war attitudes in
international negotiations?

How did the United Nations attempt to be a more useful
force for world peace?

Anticipating victory in World War II, American leaders not only
planned the postwar global order, they planned for the
returning servicemen. American politicians and business
leaders wanted to avoid another economic depression by
gradually easing returning veterans back into the civilian
economy. The brainchild of William Atherton, the head of the
American Legion, the G.I. Bill won support from progressives
and conservatives alike. Passed in 1944, the G.I. Bill was a
multibillion-dollar entitlement program that rewarded
honorably-discharged veterans with a range of important
benefits.

Faced with the prospect of

prepare foryour future over fifteen million members

MOTH Mra) Of the armed services

(including approximately
350,000 women) suddenly
returning to civilian life, the
G.L. Bill offered a variety of
incentives to slow their return
to the civilian workforce as
well as reward their service
with public benefits. The
legislation offered a year’s
worth of unemployment

CONSULT YOUR NEAREST OFFICE OF THE

VETERANS ADMINISTRATION i} income for veterans unable to

secure work. About half of
A government poster informing soldiers American veterans (eight

about the G.l. Bill ae z
million) received a total of $4

438 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

billion in unemployment benefits over the life of the bill. The
G.I. Bill also made a college education a reality for many. The
Veterans Administration paid educational expenses including
tuition, fees, supplies, and even stipends for living expenses,
sparking a boom in higher education. Enrollments at accredited
colleges, universities, technical, and professional schools spiked
from 1.5 million in 1940 to 3.6 million in 1960. The VA disbursed
over $14 billon in educational aid in just over a decade.

Furthermore, the G.I. Bill encouraged home ownership.
Roughly 40 percent of Americans owned homes in 1945, but
that figure climbed to 60 percent a decade after the close of
the war. Because the bill did away with down payment
requirements, veterans could obtain home loans for as little
as $1 down. Close to four million veterans purchased homes
through the G.I. Bill, sparking a construction bonanza that
propelled postwar growth. In addition, the V.A. helped nearly
two hundred thousand veterans buy farms and offered
thousands more guaranteed financing for small businesses. The
effects of the G.I. Bill were significant and long-lasting. It helped
sustain the great postwar economic boom and established the
hallmarks of American middle class life.

Question for Discussion

How much of a role do you think government assistance to
veterans through the G.I. Bill played in the post-war era?

Media Attributions

* Marines_with_LVT(A)-5_in_Iwo_Jima_1945 © Fifth
Marine Division photographer is licensed under a
Public Domain license

* Selassie_on_Time_Magazine_cover_1930 © Time
Magazine is licensed under a Public Domain license

* Soviet_armor_in_the_spanish_civil_war © Textidor is

Modern World History 439

licensed under a CCO (Creative Commons Zero) license

2560px-Francisco_Franco_1930 © Unknown is
licensed under a CCO (Creative Commons Zero) license
GUERNICA © Picasso is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

Bad Godesberg, Miinchener Abkommen, Vorbereitung
© Bundesarchiv, Bild is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

Anschluss Osterreich, Wien © Bundesarchiv is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Bundesarchiv_Bild_183-H27337,_Moskau,_Stalin_und
_Ribbentrop_im_Kreml © Bundesarchiv is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
2880px-Manchukuo_map_1939.svg © Emok is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Chinese_to_be_beheaded_in_Nanking_ Massacre ©
HJ.Timperley is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Contest_To_Cut_Down_100_People © Shinju Sato is
licensed under a Public Domain license
service-pnp-fsa-8d13000-8d13900-8d13979v © Roberts
is licensed under a Public Domain license
Russland-Siid, Panzer III, Schiitzenpanzer, 23.Pz.Div. ©
Bundesarchiv is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

KK-pesake 100m ryssista n. 5 km Lemetista pohjoiseen.
© Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license
Bundesarchiv_Bild_183-H25217,_Henry_Philippe_Pet
ain_und_Adolf_Hitler © Bundesarchiv is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Boulton_Paul_Defiant © B,J. Daventry is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Keep-calm-and-carry-on-scan © UK Government is
licensed under a Public Domain license

440 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Bundesarchiv_Bild_146-1972-026-43,_Minsk,_Widerst
andskampfer_vor_Hinrichtung © Bundesarchiv is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

2880px-
Attack_on_Pearl_Harbor_Japanese_planes_view ©
Imperial Japanese Navy is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Remember_december_7th © Allen Saalburg is licensed
under a Public Domain license
2880px-Army_B-25_(Doolittle_Raid) © U.S. Navy is
licensed under a Public Domain license

OLYMPUS DIGITAL CAMERA © Tom Yates is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
cmp3.10.3.3Lq4 Oxad6b4f35 © Grigory Vay] is licensed
under a Public Domain license

2880px-
Douglas_TBD-1_Devastators_of_VT-6_are_spotted_f
or_launch_aboard_USS_Enterprise_(CV-6)_on_4_Jun
e_1942_(80-G-41686) © U.S. Navy is licensed under a
Public Domain license
Marines_rest_in_the_field_on_Guadalcanal ©
Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license
Dresden, zerstértes Stadtzentrum © Bundesarchiv is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

B-29_in_flight © U.S. Air Force is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Tehran_Conference,_1943 © US Army is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Landscape © Robert F. Sargent is licensed under a
Public Domain license

British_Sherman_Firefly_Namur © Unknown is
licensed under a Public Domain license

WAR & CONFLICT BOOKERA: WORLD WAR II/

Modern World History 441

PERSONALITIES © US Govt is licensed under a Public
Domain license
2880px-ElbeDay1945_(NARA_ww2-121) © William E.
Poulson is licensed under a Public Domain license
German _officer_executes_Jewish_women_who_survi
ved_a_mass_shooting_outside_the_Mizocz_ghetto,_1
4_October_1942 © Gustav Hille is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Neues_Volk_eugenics_poster,_c._1937_(brightened) ©
Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license

2880px-Diary_of_Anne_Frank_28_sep_1942 © Anne
Frank is licensed under a Public Domain license
Mass_Grave_at_Bergen-
Belsen_concentration_camp_-_Fritz_Klein_-
_IWM_BU4260 © Oakes, Harry is licensed under a
Public Domain license

8c-Iwo_Jima © US Post Office is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Childsoldier_In_Okinawa © -K #40 - KES ECF
is licensed under a Public Domain license

Nagasaki_1945_-_Before_and_after_(adjusted) ©
Fastfission is licensed under a Public Domain license

Airacobra_P39_Assembly_LOC_02902u © Unknown
is licensed under a Public Domain license
Rationing_Means_a_Fair_Share_for_All_of_Us ©
Office of Price Administration is licensed under a
Public Domain license
2560px-We_Can_Do_It!_NARA_535413_-
_Restoration_2 © J. Howard Miller is licensed under a
Public Domain license

SPARS_-_NARA_-_ 515462 © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license

A.-Phillip-Randolph © Gordon Parks is licensed under
a Public Domain license

442 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Final_assembly_of_the_pilot’s_compartment_is_bein
g_made_by_these_Negro_workers_in_a_large_easter
n_aircraft_factory._The_-_NARA_-_535810_-
_restored © Unknown is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Seuss_cartoon © Dr. Seuss is licensed under a Public
Domain license
2880px-Selection_on_the_ramp_at_Auschwitz-
Birkenau,_1944_(Auschwitz_Album)_la © Ernst
Hoffmann or Bernhard Walter is licensed under a
Public Domain license
2880px-World_War_II_Casualties2.svg © Oberiko is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license
2880px-Eleanor_Roosevelt_UDHR_(27758131387) ©
FDR Presidential Library & Museum is licensed under
a CC BY (Attribution) license

GIBill © Cameron Addis is licensed under a Public
Domain license

[10]

Decolonization

Allied military personnel in Paris celebrating V-J Day on August 15, 1945,

The defeat of Germany and Japan freed the people of the
nations these two would-be empires had conquered, but it also
caused people dominated by older empires to question the
legitimacy of imperialism. In many of Europe’s and the United
States’ imperial possessions, the struggle for independence had
begun long before World War Two, however. As you'll recall
from previous chapters, European and American justifications

443

444 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

for empire included the claim that people such as Britain’s
subjects in India and the America’s in the Philippines were
unprepared to stand on their own as independent nations. This
claim was undermined by the effectiveness of the Indians and
Filipinos in World War II. Filipinos had proven their value as
guerrilla fighters. The Japanese only managed to control twelve
of the forty-eight provinces of the Philippines, and U.S. General
Douglas MacArthur said, “Give me ten thousand Filipinos and
I shall conquer the world!” And in imperial possessions like
India, the “civilizing project” of empire for generations had
including educating local administrators and training military
and police forces. The leaders of national liberation often came
out of these experiences reasoning that since they were already
experienced at running their own nations as administrators for
the empires, it was time for the imperialists to leave.
Furthermore, the war was full of inspirational examples of
Europeans and Asians who fought side by side against the fascist
occupiers in their conquered nations. The process was
accelerated by the strain of war on the European imperialists.
France and the Netherlands had been conquered and
themselves occupied as imperial subjects by the Germans, while
the British were greatly weakened.

Modern World History 445

q After the war, the nations
ee that had been targeted by
Germany (Britain, France,
and the Netherlands) all
attempted to separate their
reaction to this attack from
the response of colonial
populations to their return.
For instance, British leaders
like Winston Churchill hoped
and expected to expand their
empire, which they now
renamed a commonwealth,
and the Anglo-Iranian Oil
Company (now BP) had no
intention of giving back Iran’s
Winston Churchill waving the Victory sign Oil fields. This may seem a
to the crowd in Whitehall on the day he strange attitude for a nation

feeding and housing its own
population and leaned on U.S. aid like a crutch. But the British
retained their sense of cultural superiority and convinced
themselves that their help was still needed to “assist primitive
peoples in their march to modernity.”

The timing of national liberation was complicated by the
growing conflict between the United States and the Soviet
Union, which was both a competition to dominate territory
and control alliances as well as an ideological struggle between
capitalism and communism. This conflict was known as the
“Cold War,” since the two countries never directly attacked one
another. Instead they fought a series of proxy wars that occurred
within the context of decolonization. Each superpower
competed to recruit more new nations to their side, pouring
military and economic aid into the new developing countries.


446 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Despite the Cold War, at
times the process of
independence was peacefully
achieved through mutual
agreement. In the
Philippines, for example, the
U.S. government handed over
power to a local Filipino
government within a year of
ending the war with Japan.
The Americans fully
appreciated the _ sacrifices
made by the Filipinos under
Japanese occupation and the
contributions they had made
to their own liberation. FUGUOUS TET i) V7 /23//7/-
President Harry Truman
recognized the independence ?r°paganda poster depicting the Philippine
of the Philippines on July 4, resistance movement
1946. In the days leading up to
the announcement, the American and Filipino governments
worked out arrangements allowing the U.S. to retain dozens of
military bases and for American businesses to have preferential
access to the raw materials and markets of the newly
independent nation.

Sometimes, peaceful political pressure from organized
movements also led to liberation. Indian independence,
examined below, is the first and prime example of how non-
violent protest, boycotts, and moral suasion could result in
freedom. However, there are also many cases in which
independence could only be achieved through a more violent
guerrilla struggle, as European imperialists were unwilling to let
go of their colonies despite the desires of the colonized.

Questions for Discussion

Why did leaders like Churchill believe they would be able to

Modern World History 447

return to controlling their empires?

+ Why did colonized people disagree?

Independence and Partition in British India

One of the earliest examples of decolonization in the post-
war era and one that affected an extremely large portion of
the world’s population was the British withdrawal from India.
As mentioned earlier, India’s long struggle for independence
had been led by the India National Congress Party since the
nineteenth century.

Indian infantrymen of the 7th Rajput Regiment about to go on patrol, 1944.

After 700,000 Indians fought for Britain in the Great war, over
2.5 million soldiers from India fought alongside the British in
World War II. More than 87,000 of them were killed in action.
The British Field Marshall in charge of the Indian Army from
1942 onward said Britain “couldn’t have come through both
wars [World War I and World War II] if they hadn’t had the

448 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Indian Army.” When Britain called Indians to arms a second
time, the Muslim League supported the British recruitment.
However, the Indian National Congress demanded
independence before it would agree to help Britain again. When
the Congress began a “Quit India” campaign in August 1942, the
British imprisoned tens of thousands of leaders for the war's
duration until June 1945. Mohandas Gandhi was among those
jailed; he was released in May 1944 due to health concerns.

British war strategy led to a
major famine in Bengal in
1943 (modern-day
Bangladesh, at the mouth of
the Ganges River), and about
3 million people died of
starvation. The Japanese
invasion of Burma caused
Bengal famine of 1943: Dead and dying about a half million Indian
children on a Calcutta street published in pri gy refugees to flee to
the Statesman, August 22, 1943.

neighboring Bengal. At the
same time, the British decided to adopt a “scorched-earth”
policy in southern Bengal, burning thousands of boats and
destroying rice crops so they would not fall into the hands of the
Japanese, who they assumed would soon extend their invasion.
Poor harvests and wartime inflation in late 1942-early 1943 sent
internal rural refugees into Calcutta, the Bengali capital,
exacerbating the crisis. The British War Cabinet stalled in
sending needed grain to the starving Bengalis—perhaps as
policy, perhaps because of the strain on wartime shipping. Very
little sympathy was shown for the plight of the Bengalese by the
leaders of Great Britain. When presented with evidence of the
massive famine, Prime Minister Winston Churchill was
incredulous, reportedly asking, “Why hasn’t Gandhi died yet?”

Churchill was not only aware of Gandhi, he was aware of the
importance to India to the British war effort. In addition to 2.5
million soldiers, the British government borrowed billions of
pounds from India to finance the war. And India was no longer
merely a site of famines, it was becoming a source of essential
supplies. By the end of the war, India had become the world’s


Modern World History 449

fourth largest industrial power and its increased economic and
military influence paved the way for independence from the
British Empire in 1947.

Jawaharlal Nehru and Gandhi in 1946

However, Indian independence was complicated by internal
divisions, some exacerbated by the British themselves during
many decades of imperial rule. In particular, the British had
encouraged division between the majority Hindu and minority
Muslim populations; sending Hindu troops to police the
Muslims, and vice versa. Gandhi sought to eliminate the Hindu
caste system which deprived the poorest Indians of hope. Castes
were an integral part of Hinduism, but under British rule the
system had been expanded and the number of divisions had

450 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

been increased because the foreign rulers found it useful in
their divide-and-conquer strategy.

Religious divisions seeped into the independence movement
as well. While Gandhi simply wished for an independent, united
India after the end of British rule, Muhammad Ali Jinnah and
the Muslim League lobbied for the establishment of two states
in the territory. Jinnah proposed the creation of a Hindu India
and an Islamic “Pure Land” called Pakistan. Jinnah’s position
was embraced by Hindu nationalists who wanted to be rid of
the Muslim minority. As independence was being negotiated
after the war, escalating religious violence suggested that British
withdrawal might result in a bloody civil war. Muslims and
Hindus attacked each other in different towns and cities, so
Congress Party leader Jawaharlal Nehru (who would become the
first Prime Minister of India) accepted the partition of India
from Pakistan. The new Muslim nation at the time included
both the present territory of Pakistan in the west and the eastern
region now called Bangladesh.

After independence in August
1947, the partition created a
central Hindu nation with two
borders into Muslim Pakistan
to the east and west. These
new, arbitrarily-drawn
borders resulted in the
displacement of 12 million
people, as the former British
subjects fled their homes to
Four nations (India, Pakistan, Dominion of Jou the new nations that
Ceylon, and Union of Burma) that gained Matched their __ religions.
independence in 1947 and 1948 Millions died during the
chaos of the migration and
the refugee crises that followed. But even partition was not
enough for some Hindu nationalists. Gandhi himself was
assassinated by one such extremist shortly after he achieved his
dream of independence, in January 1948.
Not only was partition an imperfect solution to religious
differences the British empire had exacerbated, but the


Modern World History 451

arbitrary borders were drawn hastily. The state of Kashmir in
northern India is still disputed territory. In 1947, a local Hindu
prince convinced the British that the majority-Muslim region
should stay with India. The Government of Pakistan and many
local Kashmiris continue to protest this, causing internal and
external conflicts. Since both India and Pakistan are now nuclear
nations, the ongoing Kashmir dispute is a legacy of imperialism
that may still endanger regional or even global peace.

Question for Discussion

In what ways were the British responsible for the antagonism
between India and Pakistan since independence?

Israel

India was not the only region of the world from which Britain
walked away soon after World War Two. Another was Palestine.
After World War I, Britain had been given a “mandate” to
administer Palestine along with the oil-rich regions of Arabia
and Iraq. Between the wars the British continued to allow
Zionists, advocates of a Jewish homeland in Palestine, to
purchase land and move into the region. Migration of Zionist
Jews to the region had begun in the late nineteenth century.
This “second wave” of Zionist settlers included dedicated
socialists who created cooperative farms called kibbutzim, and
urban Europeans who built cities like Tel Aviv—one of the
prime examples of the Bauhaus architectural style popular in
Germany in the 1920s. However, accelerating Zionist
immigration increased tensions with the Palestinian Arabs who
had lived in the region for centuries. Competition for land and
water, as well as for political dominance, resulted in violent riots
between Arabs and Zionists in 1921, and a longer Arab revolt in
Palestine from 1936 to 1939.

452 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Zina Dizengoff Circle in Tel Aviv in the 1940s.

As mentioned previously, the Nazi Holocaust seemed to prove
the Zionist thesis: that Jews would never be safe in Europe and
needed to establish their own homeland. The British considered
a petition to allow 100,000 refugee survivors of the Nazi camps
to resettle in Palestine, but hesitated due to opposition from
Palestinian Arabs and the nearby Arab states. Zionist settlers
had already formed a mutual defense force, the Haganah, in the
1920s. After the war, the Haganah turned to sabotage against the
British occupation and organizing illicit arms shipments.

Modern World History 453

More radical terrorist
organizations also formed,
including the Jrgun, which in
1946 bombed the British
headquarters at the King
David Hotel in Jerusalem,
killing 91 people. The Jrgun
also led a terror attack on the
Palestinian town of Deir
Hassin in 1948, in which over
a hundred perished,
including women and

Israel's sixth prime minister, Menachem
children. Despite apologies Begin, was irgun leader at the time of the

from more mainstream @ttack, though he claimed he was not

Zionist groups (and, later, the Present

Israeli government), the Deir

Hassin massacre has served as a rallying cry and a justification
for terror attacks against Israelis by different Palestinian-related
terrorist groups ever since.

In 1947, the British relinquished their “mandate” over
Palestine to the new United Nations, which tried to develop a
new map for a Jewish homeland—the new state of Israel—while
taking into account the presence of the Arab Palestinians. The
Zionists received more land than could be justified by their
numbers at the time, as well as some of the more valuable
agricultural and water resources. As the British withdrew in
May 1948, Israel declared its independence based on the U.N.
borders, which the both the local Arabs and the neighboring
Arab countries had rejected. Israel’s new neighbors immediately
declared war, but the new nation had powerful allies and was
willing to fight for its survival. Israel defended itself and actually
extended its borders. The Israelis claimed they needed to have
a wider defensive perimeter and that the Arab Palestinians had
abandoned many of their towns anyway; which many had
because they thought the Arabs would win a decisive victory.
Israel eventually destroyed over 500 Arab villages and cleared
out Arab neighborhoods in major cities, causing the over
800,000 “temporary” Muslim and Christian war refugees to

454 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

seek more permanent shelter in neighboring Arab nations. A
series of wars in 1948, 1956, 1967, 1973, and 1982 continued the
conflict.

PALESTINE SHRINKING

VISUALIZINGPALESTINE

Israel expanding as Palestine shrinks, in an image produced by Palestinian activists.

With tenacity, superior organization, and a lot of aid from the
United States and Europe, the Israelis held their own in these
conflicts and embraced an ongoing expansion of the Israeli area
of settlement in a policy of creating “facts on the ground.” The
Arab world, considering Israel an arbitrary creation of western
powers, refused to recognize Israel as a legitimate state. Peace
processes with individual Arab nations have brought
agreements and diplomatic recognition from Egypt in 1979, to
whom Israel returned the Sinai Peninsula, taken in the 1967
war; and Jordan in 1994, which relinquished its claim to the
Palestinian West Bank of the Jordan River.

Weariness with war and terror, and a desire to qualify for U.S.
military and economic aid, have led the United Arab Emirates,
Bahrain, and Sudan to recognize Israel in 2020. But it is one
thing to have recognition from a government, and another
thing to be accepted as a nation by the “Arab Street”. Ordinary
Arab people are often tired of authoritarian rule in their own

Modern World History 455,

countries, and are more supportive of the Palestinian Arab
cause than the governments ruling them.

Questions for Discussion

Is it surprising that Palestinians resent Israel's existence?
Do you think the major issue is anti-Semitism, when both
Muslim and Christian Arabs have fought Israel?

How might the extremely high level of financial and military
Israel receives from the U.S. complicate Middle-eastern
diplomacy for both the Israelis and the Americans?

“British” Kenya

Although Great Britain had
retreated relatively peacefully
from India and had given up
its control over Palestine
voluntarily, this was not the
universal pattern. Reluctance
to abandon colonies was
especially a problem in
Africa, where there were
British settlers rather than
administrators. By the early
twentieth century, 30,000

> | . British settlers occupied all

the best farmland in Kenya,

Kenyan President Jomo Kenyatta, 1966. which they had bought or had
been assigned by the colonial

government, leaving 5 million Kenyans without. The settlers
were people something like the Dane Isek Dinesen, who wrote
of her experiences in Kenya in her 1987 book Out of Africa,
although most were generally less respectful and interested in
the natives than she. More were like farmer Mike Blundell, a


456 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

white man featured in a Life Magazine article who had arrived
as an unskilled farm apprentice but because he was white had
managed to get hold of 1200 acres of “virgin bush.” Blundell
despised the local Kikuyu tribes and believed the “Kukes” as he
called them had only “come out of the trees” in the last 50 years,
and probably as a result of contact with the whites. The attitude
of British farmers in Kenya was much like the relationship two
centuries earlier between English colonists in North America
and the Native Americans.

But this was the twentieth, not the eighteenth century. In
Kenya, a resistance movement called Mau Mau began in 1952
when natives restricted to reservations in their own country
revolted. After World War II, 1.25 million Kikuyu had 2,000
square miles of marginal farmland to feed themselves while
30,000 British settlers had 12,000 square miles in the fertile
hills of the Central and Rift Valleys, where they grew cash crops
like coffee using native labor. The Mau Mau uprising protested
this injustice and the British colonial government responded.
Declaring a state of emergency, the British moved about
450,000 Kikuyu to concentration camps and another million
were restricted to “enclosed villages”. Prisoners suspected of
being Mau Mau fighters were often tortured by British troops
(typically they were flogged to death, burned alive, or castrated).
In June 1957 the British attorney general of the colony wrote
to the governor that the mistreatment of captives was
“distressingly reminiscent of conditions in Nazi Germany or
Communist Russia.” He reminded the governor, “if we are going
to sin, we must sin quietly.”

Modern World History 457

Troops of the King's African Rifles, supporting the white settler government during the
Mau Mau Uprising, ca. 1953.

The uprising lasted until 1963, partly because white settlers
could not easily abandon their property and go back to Britain.
Power in Kenya eventually shifted from the British colonial
government to a native government, initially made up of many
members of the Kenyan African National Union (KANU) that
had led the resistance. Its leader, Jomo Kenyatta, became
Kenya’s first indigenous Prime Minister from 1963 to 1964 and
was President of Kenya and led the KANU party until his death
in 1978. Kenyatta, like other leaders such as Gandhi and Ho
Chi Minh, had travelled internationally. He attended the
Communist University of the Toilers of the East in Moscow as
well as University College in London and the London School
of Economics, although when the press mentioned him, they
typically observed he had “studied in Russia”. Kenyatta was
imprisoned from 1954 to 1961 for allegedly leading the
rebellion, and became leader of the party and the nation when
released. Kenyatta initially tried to heal the nation by
downplaying the atrocity of the recent war, and he welcomed
the multinational corporations that dominated the Kenyan
economy. The government helped African farmers buy out


458 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

white landowners and expanded education and social support
programs. Kenyatta was often accused of being a socialist, but
he was also hated by the British settlers for being married to
a white woman. His economic policies balanced capitalism and
social welfare. Kenyatta was regarded by many Africans as a
strong Pan-Africanist and was hailed as the Hero of the Kikuyu.
The current (2020) president of Kenya, Uhuru Kenyatta, is his
son.

Question for Discussion

+ Why might it be significant that revolutionaries like Kenyatta,
Ho, and Gandhi were world travelers?

“French” Algeria

The British were not the only Europeans to lose their colonial
empires. Although France had been conquered and occupied by
Germany, after the war the French fully expected to regain their
colonial possessions in Africa and Asia and resume where they
had left off. Their subject peoples in the colonies had different
ideas. In Algeria, revolutionaries had been organizing to resist
French imperialism since before the war. An Algerian People’s
Manifesto was published in 1943. On the morning of May 8,
1945, (the day that Nazi Germany surrendered, or VE Day), a
parade of about 5,000 Muslim Algerians celebrating the war's
end was met by armed French police. Marchers and police
exchanged gunfire and during the battle people on both sides
were shot. A few days later a smaller, peaceful protest by the
Algerian People’s Party was violently repressed by police. Rural
Algerians responded by attacking ethnic French settlers, called
pieds noirs, killing 102 Europeans. The French retaliated, killing
between 6,000 and 30,000 Algerians.

Modern World History 459

A video element has been excluded fram this version of the
text. You can watch it online here:
https://mpp.pressbooks.pub/modernworldhistory/2p=79

The Algerians did not forget this massacre and nearly a decade
later, on November 1, 1954, Algerian guerrilla forces attacked
civilian and military targets throughout the country. The
National Liberation Front (FLN), encouraged by the fact France
had just lost their colony of French Indochina, called on
Muslims in Algeria to join in the struggle for independence. The
FLN applied guerrilla “hit and run” tactics as well as terrorism
and torture of both French pieds noirs and Africans suspected of
supporting the regime. The French were equally brutal, and by
1956 there were more than 400,000 French troops in Algeria.

Barricades in Algiers, January 1960. The banner reads, “Long live Massu" (Vive Massu).

The war lasted eight years and killed over a million people. The
French military lost 25,000 troops and about 3,000 European
civilians were killed. French officials estimated the Algerian
death toll at 350,000, but other French and Algerian estimates

460 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

range from 960,000 to 15 million. The United States
recognized Algeria's independence in September 1962 and the
country became the 109th member of the U.N. in October.

Question for Discussion

How might the scope of European retaliation, killing about
ten Africans for every European killed, have effected world
public opinion?

“French” Indochina

France had also expected to
return to power in its colonies
in French Indochina
(Vietnam, Laos, and
Cambodia), but the people
living there also had other
ideas. Revolutionaries were
led by Ho Chi Minh
(1890-1969), who as a young
man had worked as a kitchen
helper on a steamship from
Saigon to Marseille in 1911.
Ho actually applied to the
French Colonial
Administrative School in
Marseille, but his application cy inh aso known as Nguyén Ai
was rejected and he returned quéc, about 1947.
to working on ships and
traveling the world for another five years (it’s interesting to
imagine how history would have been different if he had been
accepted). He visited the U.S. several times in his travels and
later claimed to have met Black nationalist Marcus Garvey. Ho
worked in England and France between 1913 and 1919. He


Modern World History 461

joined a group of Vietnamese nationalists in Paris, and at the
end of World War I, the group petitioned at the Versailles peace
talks for recognition of the civil rights of Vietnamese people,
citing Woodrow Wilson's statements about self-determination
in the famous “14 Points” speech. Ho wrote a letter to Wilson,
but the American President ignored him.

Rebuffed, Ho continued living in France in the early 1920s,
meeting socialists and becoming a founding member of the
French Communist Party. Ho began to write articles that were
noticed in Moscow and he was invited to visit the Soviet Union.
In 1923, Ho studied at the Communist University of the Toilers
of the East in Moscow before moving to Guangzhou China in
1924. When Chiang Kai-shek cracked down on communists in
China, Ho returned to Moscow and then moved on to Thailand.
In late 1929 he moved through India to Shanghai and Hong
Kong. By this time, he was becoming well-known in
revolutionary circles. Ho was arrested in Hong Kong in 1931 but
escaped and returned to Russia.

H6 Chi Minh (third from left, standing) with the OSS in 1945.

In 1938 Ho returned to China as an advisor to the Chinese
Communist army. In 1941 he returned to Vietnam to lead the
independence movement there. The Japanese invasion created
an opportunity for the patriots, who were aided in their

462 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

resistance of the Japanese and Vichy French by the U.S. Office of
Strategic Services (OSS), the predecessor of the CIA. At the end
of World War II, Ho wrote a declaration of independence for
Vietnam based on the US Declaration from 1776. Ho repeatedly
petitioned President Harry S. Truman to recognize Vietnam,
citing the Atlantic Charter, but Truman never responded.
Meanwhile, British and Chinese troops occupied the country in
support of France. Vietnamese rioted and killed a hundred or
so French citizens, and in retaliation French troops armed
Japanese prisoners of war and massacred over 6,000
Vietnamese. This was the same pattern of asymmetrical force
used by empires against their subjects throughout the colonial
period. However, the story of Vietnam is only half over; we will
return to it in the next chapter when we discuss the Cold War.
Kenya, Algeria, and Vietnam were not the only places where
the imperial powers and their international allies responded
violently to movements of national liberation among the
colonized. For example, the French killed 80,000 in
Madagascar in 1947 when the people of that island supported
independence. The Indonesian War of Independence raged
from the former Dutch East Indies declaration of independence
in 1945 and The Netherlands’ recognition of their claims in
1949. About 8,000 Dutch troops and their allies were killed, and
about 100,000 Indonesians. And growing fears of international
communism pushed the United States government into
supporting some of these actions. Although the Americans had
peacefully let go of the Philippines, the U.S. military helped
Korean militias massacre about 60,000 members of a peasant
insurgency. The Korean Peninsula had been divided at the end
of World War Two, like Germany, into Soviet and U.S.
occupation zones. Unsurprisingly, the two rivals backed
communist and non-communist leaders in North and South
Korea. The resulting conflict, the Korean War (1950-1958), will
be examined in more detail in the next chapter on the Cold War.

uestions for Discussion

Modern World History 463

Is it significant that Ho Chi Minh worked with the OSS during
World War Il when he was opposing Japan?

How many chances were there in Ho's story, where history
could have turned out differently?

New Nations and Development

The newly-founded countries in Africa and Asia all faced the
challenges of establishing borders, forming new governments,
building economic self-reliance, controlling natural resources,
and working toward a more just and equitable society. In
previous chapters, we have seen how the new nations in Latin
America had confronted similar issues since the early
nineteenth century. Other older but less-industrialized
countries, like Iran, also addressed questions of development
and national sovereignty.

Pahalgam Valley, Kashmir.

One of the major challenges faced by these new nations was
the problem of borders. The administrative boundaries drawn
by the European imperial powers did not always follow any
logic that served the colonized peoples. We have seen that

464 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

disagreements over Kashmir continue to cause tensions
between India and its neighbor Pakistan, which are further
complicated by the fact that both India and Pakistan are now
nuclear powers (India since 1974 and Pakistan since 1999). India
also supported the independence of East Pakistan (now
Bangladesh) in the early 1970s, a conflict which brought famine
and death to hundreds of thousands in the same region that had
been starved out thirty years before during World War II.

Sub-Saharan Africa’s
division by the European
powers had also haphazardly
thrown together peoples who
wanted separate _ nations.
Violent conflicts based on
tribal loyalties have caused
civil wars and__ political
instability. For instance, when
the Igbo people tried to form
a separate nation in Nigeria in
1965, the three-year civil war
that followed killed thousands
before Biafra was defeated.
The disputed region is
petroleum-rich (Nigeria leads
Africa in oil production); so
French journalist Gilles Caron photographs that even today, —_ Igbo
the starving children of Biafra during the separatists harass the
Nigerian Civil War, 1969. Nigerian government,

resentful that their oil wealth
seems to benefit the rest of the country more than it serves
them.

Such conflicts do not only result in separatist civil wars.
Although no tribe advocates establishing their own independent
state in Kenya, conflicting tribal loyalties often spill over into
political competition. Kenyan leader Jomo Kenyatta tended to
favor his Kikuyu people, who were a plurality but not a majority
in Kenya, during his long presidency. Resentment by the Luo
and Kalenjin people led to realignments of political parties,


Modern World History 465

which caused widespread violence after a contested election in
2008, with the death of hundreds.

Nearly all of the new nations embraced democratic
constitutions. But it is one thing to write a constitution, and
quite another to actually follow it. Like the older republics in
Latin America, many new nations suffered through periods of
authoritarian rule. Often, the military would step in and
overthrow a democratically-elected government in times of
perceived or actual economic or political chaos. The colonial
powers had trained militaries as well as educating local
administrators; army officers often felt that they were in a better
position to rule their countries than incompetent and corrupt
politicians, even if they had been elected democratically.
Similar arguments had been made by fascists and
authoritarians in interwar Europe; the mistakes of the
imperialists were often repeated in their former colonies. The
Cold War complicated this situation, as fear of communist-led
“wars of national liberation” frequently caused the United States
and other Western “democracies” to support repressive military
dictatorships.

466 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Again, the example of India
and Pakistan illustrates the
problem of political stability

in the new nations. India
successfully embraced
democracy and remains

today the largest democracy
by population. One reason
for this was the popularity of
the Congress Party, which
dominated Indian politics
until the 1990s. Another is the
prominence of the Nehru
family: after Indian Prime
Minster Jawaharlal Nehru
died of natural causes in 1964,
he was succeeded by his
daughter Indira Gandhi (no
relation to Mahatma Gandhi)

Indira Gandhi with her father, Jawaharlal

for twenty years, and she was
followed by her son Rajiv
Gandhi. Their dedication to

Nehru, and her sons Rajiv Gandhi and
Sanjay Gandhi, Nehru, Indira, and Rajiv
were Prime Ministers, Sanjay was a

Congress Party Member of Parliament until
he died in a private plane crash in 1980.

democratic traditions
brought a degree of political
stability, although India was not free of problems that beset
other new nations. Sikhs advocating for more power in Hindu
India murdered Indira Gandhi in 1984 and ethnic Tamil
separatists assassinated her son Rajiv in 1991. Despite these
shocks, elections continued, and even opposition parties have
taken the reins of government peacefully from the Congress
Party since the 1990s; including current Prime Minister
Narendra Modi, elected in 2014.

On the other hand, Pakistan has been ruled by their military
more often than not since independence. Unlike in Nehru’s
India, Pakistan did not benefit from an initial long premiership
by its founding father, Muhammad Ali Jinnah, who died barely
a year after independence of tuberculosis and lung cancer.
Internal and international crises led to repeated interventions
by the Pakistani military into national government. The 2013

Modern World History 467

Pakistani elections were the first time one democratically
elected government peacefully replaced another. But even
today the military plays an independent, often secretive role in
Pakistan, especially in foreign policy.

All of the new nations were faced with the question of how
to develop their economies. Some governments were inspired
by the apparent rapid industrial growth in the Soviet Union
under Stalin’s Five-Year Plans, while others embraced the role
of providing natural resources to the mature industrial
economies of the West. Independent economic self-reliance
was often difficult to achieve when industries and public utilities
remained foreign-owned. Some new governments nationalized
these businesses, so that the nation owned and operated them
in the name of the people rather than for the profits of foreign
shareholders. In India, for example, Nehru’s government
nationalized the railroads, electric utilities, and communication
systems. Seeing the results of India’s actions, many new African
and Asian countries did the same.

Critics of nationalized industries argued that like the
collectivized agriculture and industry of the Soviet Union, these
businesses faced no competition. Their objections were taken
seriously, partly because Stalin’s lies about the success of the
Five Year Plans were finally discovered, and partly because
nationalized industries often became inefficient as positions in
a railroad or a telephone company transformed into political
plums: no-show jobs awarded to loyal supporters. The foreign
businesses that had been pushed out supported this view, and
a reaction to nationalization, privatization, began in the 1980s.
In India the push for privatization was led by Rajiv Gandhi, the
grandson of the leader who had led nationalization efforts. In
privatization, government-run industries were sold back to the
private sector, which on occasion included, once again, foreign
investors. Newly-privatized industries often initially embraced
cost-cutting efficiencies and more competent management,
repairing broken-down electrical grids and rail lines. However,
as profits were once again exported abroad or held by a tiny
local elite, there has been a push back against privatization,
as some leaders once again seek more benefits for the entire
nation.

468 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Questions for Discussion

How did Stalin's lies about the success of the Five Year Plans
affect the decisions of newly decolonized nations?

In what ways did the problems of borders and religious
differences continue to plague the new nations?

The Mount Washington Hotel, in Bretton Woods, New Hampshire.

In recent decades, a leader in the political push for privatization
has been the International Monetary Fund (IMF), first
established at the July 1944 conference at the Mount
Washington Hotel in Bretton Woods, New Hampshire
mentioned earlier. Even before the war ended, forty-four allied
nations sent 730 delegates to establish what would become a
global system for regulating international balances of
commercial payments and securing what they hoped would
be financial stability for the post-war world. Initially, they were

Modern World History 469

mainly thinking of creating institutions and policies that would
both rebuild war-torn Europe and Asia and prevent the
hyperinflation and Great Depression that led to so much
instability between the wars.

There were two architects
of the meeting and the global
financial plan that came from
it. John Maynard Keynes was
the British economist who
had pioneered the “demand-
side” economic theory that
people like U.S. President
Franklin Roosevelt — had
adopted to confront the Great
Depression. Keynes’ claim
was that by spending money,
the federal government could
jump-start the economy,
create jobs, and put the

Harry Dexter White (left) and John Maynard ,
Keynes (right) at Bretton Woods, 1944. money in people’s pockets

that would enable them to

buy consumer products. This plan was temporarily derailed by
war production and rationing, so it is unclear to many
economists that Keynes was right and that deficit spending and
government borrowing was the key to ending the Depression.
At the time of the Bretton Woods Conference, Keynes was the
chief advisor to the Chancellor of the Exchequer in Britain. The
American, Harry Dexter White, worked closely with Treasury
Secretary Henry Morgenthau Jr. White dominated the
conference and although he considered himself a Keynesian,
he vetoed Keynes's proposal for the International Clearing
Union (ICU),a central bank with its own currency, the
“bancor”. White opposed the ICU and instead proposed an
International Stabilization Fund that would help debtor nations
maintain their balance of trade. This grew into the International
Bank for Reconstruction and Development (IRBD), which
became the World Bank.The U.S’s goal was to promote
international development but also to help establish markets for

470 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

American manufactures, now that the war effort had greatly
increased U.S. manufacturing capacity.

Another reason the U.S. rejected the ICU and the “bancor”
was to protect the leading position of the dollar in the world
economy. Since the U.S. had the strongest economy in the world
at the end of the World War II, they also dictated the trade
provisions agreed to at the conference. The major provisions
of the agreement were a foreign exchange system with the U.S.
Dollar as its base currency, along with a pledge by members
to convert their currency to gold for trade-related
demands. Countries were required to adopt the gold standard
and were not allowed to alter their currency’s exchange rate
by more than 10%. This would prevent debtor nations from
escaping their obligations to creditors by simply inflating their
currencies. Finally, all members had to pitch in to the new
bank’s assets, although the U.S. put up most of the money.

Bretton Woods also drafted a set of trade-related
recommendations and an International Trade Organization
(ITO) was proposed, with a goal of reducing tariffs. The United
States Senate, however, was not interested in ceding its
authority over tariffs to a new international organization, and
did not ratify the ITO’s charter. The less aggressive General
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) was adopted in its
place. We will discuss it when we cover Globalization.

Modern World History 471

Bretton Woods created the International Monetary Fund (IMF),
which lends money to distressed economies suffering from
hyperinflation or other financial chaos and, as a condition for
credit, stipulates how a borrower country should reorganize
government spending and finance. The IMF was designed to
oversee the international monetary and financial systems and to
monitor member nations. The U.S. undermined this mission
when itwent off the gold standard in197l. Inflationary
government spending on both the war in Viet Nam and the War
on Poverty begun by Lyndon Johnson, and a worsening balance
of trade led the Nixon administration to fear that foreign
holders of dollars would demand conversion to gold, which
would rapidly wipe out the U.S. gold reserves, held in Federal
Bullion Depositories such as Fort Knox. Nixon’s unilateral
decision was ratified by Congress in 1978. By the end of the
1970s, no major currency was convertible for gold. Although
the dollar is no longer redeemable in gold, the United States

472 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

continues to maintain a gold reserve of over 8.1 metric tons ,
more than half of it stored at Fort Knox in Kentucky. The next
largest national gold reserve, roughly 3.3 metric tons, belongs to
Germany

Losing their original reasons for existence, the IMF and World
Bank were forced to adapt. Rather than enforcing convertibility,
the IMF began using its ability to loan interest-free
development money to debtor nations as a way to intervene in
and direct the economic policies of the borrowers. The IMF's
stated aim was to avoid or mitigate financial crises, using the
“conditionality” of their loans. The IMF now analyses nations’
economic policies and offers “advice” which must be taken in
order to receive IMF loans.

The changes the IMF and the World Bank require are called
Structural Adjustment Programs. They typically include
deregulation, privatization, and removal of trade barriers. All of
these measures have been criticized by debtor nations as being
more beneficial for the lenders in developed industrialized
nations rather than for borrowers in the developing world.
Other structural adjustments can include reducing trade deficits
through currency devaluation, austerity programs to decrease
budget deficits, eliminating social welfare programs, cutting
public services, focusing economic output on resource
extraction, and attracting foreign direct investment. This
current bundle of structural adjustment programs is known as
the Washington Consensus and is associated with neoliberalism
or market fundamentalism, which we will discuss in a later
chapter. Even in its more modest formulation, IMF policy is
designed to liberalize trade, deregulate and privatize industries,
and protect property rights above all other concerns.

Questions for Discussion

What do you think the response of the communist U.S.S.R
may have been to the Bretton Woods Conference and the
IMF?

Is it possible to interpret the IMF's role as global lender as a


Modern World History 473

continuation of a new, economic form of imperialism?

The Green Revolution

The explosive improvement of agricultural yields throughout
the world known as the Green Revolution began in the 1960s
in a research station on the edge of the Mexican desert. The
scientist most associated with these advances is Norman
Borlaug, an agronomist who developed a disease-resistant strain
or dwarf wheat that increased yields of the grain worldwide,
especially in developing nations facing high population growth
and threat of famine. Borlaug (1914-2009) grew up on a 106-acre
Iowa farm and attended the University of Minnesota in the
1930s. Borlaug’s education included a stint in the Civilian
Conservation Corps during the Great Depression. He later
remembered that seeing the effect of hunger on people in
America “left scars” on him and motivated him to try to solve
the problems of supplying food to a growing world population.
Borlaug continued at the U of M after graduation, eventually
earning a Ph.D. in plant pathology and genetics in 1942. Borlaug
then went to work as a microbiologist at DuPont. After a couple
of years with DuPont, he joined the Cooperative Wheat
Research Production Program, a joint venture of the Rockefeller
Foundation and the Mexican Ministry of Agriculture.

474 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Borlaug's hybrid wheat.

Borlaug found that local Mexican farmers resisted planting
wheat because a fungus called stem rust reduced their yields
so much they couldn’t make a living. A related problem with
wheat farming in Mexico was that the plants grew too tall when
heavily fertilized and then “lodged” or fell over prior to harvest.
Borlaug and his team bred a new strain of dwarf wheat that
would not grow too tall when fertilized and that also resisted
rust. The process took ten years and over 6,000 cross-breeding
experiments between different types of wheat. The new wheat
had the additional advantage of being able to be planted twice
per year. Although it took Borlaug a while to convince local
farmers to try his new hybrid, they could see his fields and
were finally convinced. Between 1950 and 2000, Mexican wheat
yields increased between 400% and 500%.

In the 1960s, as the program was becoming successful in
Mexico, it was exported to India, which was facing
famine. American farmers shipped a fifth of their wheat
production to India in 1966 and 1967. The Indian situation
seemed dire, especially since India’s population crossed the
500-million mark in 1966 and was expected to grow by another
200 million by 1980. The prediction was accurate: India crossed

Modern World History 475

700 million in the early months of 1981, on its way to a current
level of 1.88 billion. India imported 18,000 tons of Borlaug’s
seed wheat in 1966. Wheat yields increased from 12.3 million
tons in 1965 to 20.1 million tons in 1970. By 1974 India was
self-sufficient in all cereal grains and the USAID (US Agency
for International Development) began calling Borlaug’s work a
Green Revolution. Since the 1960s India’s food production has
increased faster than population growth. By 2000 India was
producing 76.4 million tons of wheat.

Wheat yields in Least Developed Countries

2500

Yicld (kg/h)

2000

1500

1000

500

0
1960 =1970 1980 «1990 2000 20102020

Wheat yields have more than doubled in the least developed countries since 1961.

India’s improved crop yields, driven by Borlaug’s improved
wheat, have made it a net exported of wheat. India began
exporting wheat regularly in the 1970s and since 1980 has
exported wheat every year except three. The nation’s
exceptional agricultural turnaround was made possible by
Borlaug’s new wheat, but also by extensive use of fertilizer,
irrigation, and machinery. The improved crop and techniques
have prevented up to 100 million acres of virgin land from
being converted to farmland. This savings amounts to 18.6% of
India’s land, or about the area of California. Borlaug predicted

476 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

that as world population continued to rise, only new crops and
improved farming techniques would save the world’s remaining
forests and uncultivated lands.

Although the Green
Revolution has undoubtedly
saved lives and allowed
populations in India to
increase dramatically,
Borlaug and the Green
Revolution have been
criticized for bringing capital-
and energy-intensive western
agricultural techniques to
regions of the world that had
once relied on subsistence
farming. Western-style
farming tends to reward
large-scale operators and
often provides even greater
rewards to manufacturers of
Dr. Vandana Shiva agrochemicals and

machinery. Widening social
inequality and expanding farmer debt has led to issues like the
suicide crisis of India, where hundreds of thousands of indebted
farmers have killed themselves after becoming dependent on
hybrid seeds, chemical fertilizers and pesticides, and the
machinery needed to produce crops at the scale required by the
new economics of agriculture. Activists like Vandana Shiva have
argued that 80% of the world’s population is actually fed by the
produce of subsistence farmers rather than the industrialized
agriculture highlighted in the Green Revolution. If this is true,
then maybe the claims of the “revolution” are overblown.

Shiva also claims that the data she has compiled show that the
number one factor in the rapid improvement of yields in India
has been increased water use, not fertilizers or Borlaug’s “miracle
seed”. Shiva says this increased irrigation is unsustainable, and
cites studies showing a rapidly sinking water table across much
of India. She further charges that by using language like


Modern World History 477

“miracle seed”, the Green Revolution has become more a
mythology than a scientific, data-driven reality.

Shiva is also an important
activist against Genetically
Modified Organisms (GMOs)
who appears regularly on
stage giving speeches and
TED talks, or on television as
an anti-GMO
spokesperson. Although
Borlaug’s dwarf wheat was
not produced by the types of
genetic manipulations
currently used to produce
GMO crops, some people still

President George W. Bush along with
House Majority Leader Steny Hoyer and
House Speaker Nancy Pelosi congratulate
Borlaug during the Congressional Gold
Medal Ceremony on July 17, 2007.

resent it as a human intrusion on nature’s processes. Borlaug,
for his part, has stubbornly refused to believe there is a rational
argument against the “miracle” he helped bring about. He
received a Nobel Peace Prize, a Congressional Gold Medal, and
a Presidential Medal of Freedom. Toward the end of his life he
criticized people who questioned the Green Revolution as
elitists who had never gone hungry, but he also admitted that
although his contribution had helped save many lives, it had not

created a Utopia.

Question for Discussion

What were the pros and cons of the Green Revolution?


478 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Media Attributions

American_military_personnel_gather_in_Paris_to_ce
lebrate_the_Japanese_surrender © Office of the Chief
Signal Officer is licensed under a Public Domain license
Winston_Churchill_waves_to_crowds_in_Whitehall_i
n_London_as_they_celebrate_VE_Day,_8_May_1945.
_H41849 © Major W. G. Horton is licensed under a
Public Domain license
The_Fighting_Filipinos_-_NARA_-_534127 ©
National Archives and Records Administration is
licensed under a Public Domain license
INDIAN_TROOPS_IN_BURMA,_1944 © No 9 Army
Film & Photographic Unit is licensed under a Public
Domain license
Dead_or_dying_children_on_a_Calcutta_street_(The
_Statesman_22_August_1943) © Statesman is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Gandhi_and_Nehru_in_1946 © Dave Davis is licensed
under a Public Domain license

Partition_of_India © McMullen is licensed under a
Public Domain license
Zina_Dizengoff_Circle_in_the_1940s © xqwa rm pun
is licensed under a Public Domain license

Menachem_Begin_2 © MSGT DENHAM is licensed
under a Public Domain license

2WcVee9F4f58a2d9232f737498250c8es © Visualizing
Palestine is licensed under a CC BY-NC-ND
(Attribution NonCommercial NoDerivatives) license
Jomo_Kenyatta_1966-06-15 © Government Press
Office is licensed under a Public Domain license

KAR_Mau_Mau © Ministry of Defence is licensed
under a Public Domain license

2880px-
Semaine_des_barricades_Alger_1960_Haute_Qualité

Modern World History 479

© Christophe Marcheux is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license
2560px-Ho_Chi_Minh_1946 © Unknown is licensed
under a Public Domain license
Ho_Chi_Minh_(third_from_left_standing)_and_the_
OSS_in_1945 © U.S. Army is licensed under a Public
Domain license

Pahalgam_Valley © KennyOMG is licensed under a CC
BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
A_photographer_takes_pictures_of_starving_children
_in_Biafra_Nigerian_civil_war © Peter Williams is
licensed under a CCO (Creative Commons Zero) license
Indira_Gandhi,_Jawaharlal_Nehru,_Rajiv_Gandhi_an
d_Sanjay_Gandhi © Royroydeb is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Mt._Washington_Hotel © rickpilot_2000 is licensed
under a CC BY (Attribution) license

WhiteandKeynes © International Monetary Fund is
licensed under a Public Domain license
2880px-International_Monetary_Fund_logo.svg ©
Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain license
Wheat-haHula-ISRAEL2 © CarolSpears is licensed
under a CC BY (Attribution) license

2880px-
Wheat_yields_in_Least_Developed_Countries.svg ©
Grendelkhan is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license

Dr. Vandana Shiva © Augustus Binu is licensed under a
CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Borlaug_July172007 © Blueag9 is licensed under a
Public Domain license

[11]
Cold War

When we think of the Cold War between the United States
and the Soviet Union, we typically imagine the thousands of
nuclear missiles each nation pointed toward the other and of
a clash of ideologies as communism and capitalism battled for
world supremacy. A defining element of the Cold War was that
it did not become a hot war. Neither the U.S. not the U.S.S.R.
launched attacks on the territories of the other. Instead, the
superpowers supported or intervened in the conflicts of nations
in their spheres of influence. To a great extent, the Cold War was
a struggle by each superpower to extend its sphere of influence
and block the other from doing the same. The Soviets and the
Americans justified their actions in a variety of ways. Creating
a buffer-zone to protect the homeland. Defending like-minded
governments against a different political or economic
philosophy. One side said it was protecting the world from
the threat of totalitarian communist imperialism and the other
said it was protecting the world from imperialist capitalism.
Interestingly, both accused their antagonist of being an empire.

480

Modern World History 481

eee se 9 a ae

European military alliances during the Cold War

World War Two in Europe was nearly over when Stalin,
Roosevelt, and Churchill met at yalta in Febr ‘Ua!

1945, but the war in the Pacific was still
ongoing. This fact weighed heavily on
the British and Americans, who were
hoping for Soviet help in defeating
Japan. Stalin had signed a Non-
Agression Pact with the Japanese in
1941, which both sides maintained
during the conflict; at Yalta, he pledged
to declare war on Japan three months
after the German surrender. In
exchange, Roosevelt and Churchill

482 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

essentially agreed to the Soviet
military _ occupation of Eastern
Europe. It would turn out that this
would be the beginning of the Cold
War between the U.S. and the Soviet
Union, which would not be fought
directly between the two superpowers,
but rather through proxy wars in the
developing world over most of the
next five decades.

World War II in Europe was
nearly over when Stalin,
Roosevelt, and Churchill met
at Yalta in February 1945, but
the war in the Pacific was still
unresolved. Stalin had signed
a Non-Aggression Pact with
Japan in 1941 which both sides
had maintained during the
conflict. Roosevelt and
Churchill urged Stalin to join
them in defeating Germany’s
final Axis partner. Stalin
agreed to declare war on
Japan three months after the
German surrender. In

Occupation zone borders in Germany, and
the four zones of Berlin, 1947. exchange, Roosevelt and

Churchill essentially agreed
to accept the Soviet military occupation of eastern Europe. The
Allies were interested in winning the Second World War, but
were all aware that they were not natural allies in the long run.
After the war's end, Eastern Europe and Asia would both be
areas of contention between the U.S.S.R. and the “West”.

Despite promised democratic elections, by 1949 the Soviets
had set up one-party communist states mirroring their own
in Poland, Czechoslovakia, Hungary, Romania, and Bulgaria.

Modern World History 483

Stalin’s desire to dominate eastern Europe as a buffer zone
against attacks from the West was understandable, given the
history of European wars and the tremendous sacrifices of
blood and treasure by the Soviets during the war that had just
ended. Stalin also decided to retain the Polish territory first
taken by his armies in 1939 when he had been Hitler’s ally
and advocated pushing the borders of Poland farther west and
south into what had been Germany in 1939. And the Baltic states
the Red Army had conquered in 1939-1940 while Hitler was
attacking France also remained part of the Soviet Union.

The first Cold War challenge to post-
war peace occurred in Greece, where
communist and non-communist anti-
Nazi partisans began fighting for
contro! shortly after the Germans
withdrew from their country in late
1944. When the war ended, this
conflict soon turned into a full-blown
civil war. However, Greece was outside
of the Stalin’s sphere of influence. The
British and Americans began
supporting the beleaguered
parliamentary monarchy against the
communists, who were defeated in
1947. The conflict in Greece showcased
the new “Truman Doctrine” of
containment, under which the U.S. was
willing to concede to _ Soviet
domination of Eastern Europe, but
would “contain” the spread of
communist regimes in any other
country.

484 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

‘AYouTube element has been excluded from this version of the text.

You can view it online here: https://mlpp-pressbooks.pub/
modernworldhistory/2p=81

In 1946, former Prime Minister Winston Churchill visited
President Harry Truman in his home state of Missouri and
made a speech at Westminster College. Churchill said the
situation in Europe felt as if Stalin had dropped an “iron
curtain” separating East from West. It was an apt description:
neither the Soviets nor the new communist regimes permitted
free travel between the two sides. The division of. Europe into
East and West was complicated by the Allied agreement to
occupy defeated Germany in four sectors: U.S., British, French,
and Soviet. The German capital Berlin was also divided into
quarters by the four former allies, even though it was
surrounded by Soviet-occupied East Germany. The division of
Germany was completed when the western portion uniting in
a federal republic, the Bundesrepublik Deutschland (GDR), in
October 1949, complete with elections and multiple political
parties. At the same time, East Germany became the Deutsche
Demokratische Republik (DDR), a one-party communist satellite
state of the Soviet Union. I remember as a child being confused

Modern World History 485,

when I listened to the news, why America was enemies with a
nation that had Democratic in its name.

Although the United States
and the Soviet Union had
been allies in World War II,
the relationship did not last
long after the defeat of
Germany and Japan. In
February 1946, less than a
year after the end of the war,
the head of the U.S. embassy
in Moscow, George Kennan,
sent a message that became
known as the long telegram to
the State Department

The Iron Curtain in black, with a black dot
representing West Berlin. Warsaw Pact denouncing the Soviet Union.

countries in red, NATO members in blue. Although Kennan’s main

Militarily neutral countries in gray. . .
Yugoslavia, member country of the point was that the Soviet

Non-Aligned Movement, in green. Union was interested in
Communist Albania broke off contacts with expanding its worldwide
the Soviet Union in the early 1960s, .
aligning itself with China after the power, he made his argument
Sino-Soviet split; it appears stripe-hatched in the form of an attack on
with grey. communism which became a
regular element of Cold War
rhetoric. “World communism is like a malignant parasite which
feeds only on diseased tissue,” Kennan wrote, and “the steady
advance of uneasy Russian nationalism . . . is more dangerous
and insidious than ever before.”

Kennan argued that Russian imperialism had not ended with
the Russian empire and under the Soviets would advance under
what he called the “new guise of international Marxism”,
although the U.S.S.R. was being ruled not as a communist
democracy but as a totalitarian dictatorship under Josef Stalin.
Marx’s ideal of a “dictatorship of the proletariat”, where workers
would live together in such harmony that police and armies
would be unnecessary, never arrived for the Russian people.
There could be no cooperation between the United States and
the Soviet Union, Kennan wrote. Instead, the Soviets had to

486 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

be “contained.” As the Russians had advanced toward Germany
in the final years of World War II, they had not only retaken
Russian territory but had held onto the lands Stalin had
conquered when he was Hitler’s ally and expanded their control
over Eastern Europe. In the years after the war the U.S.S.R.
controlled not only East Germany but newly formed People’s
Republics of Poland, Hungary, Czechoslovakia, Romania,
Bulgaria, and Albania. In the alarm caused by the creation of
these satellite states, often ruled by Soviet-installed dictators,
anti-Soviet sentiment seized the American government and
soon the American people.

Questions for Discussion

Why were Western leaders so concerned about the threat of
Communism?

What do you think motivated the Soviets to try to expand
their sphere of influence?

Was the West's motivation different?

To try to prevent a drift
toward socialism in nations
struggling with food
shortages and rebuilding
from the destruction of the
war, the United States
launched the Marshall Plan in
1948 to rebuild western
Europe. The Soviets During the winter of 1947, thousands
responded to the $15 billion  Protestin West Germany against the
. disastrous food situation. The sign says,
aid program with an order we want coal, we want bread.”
that their satellite nations
reject it, because the financial assistance came with the
condition of economic cooperation that Stalin worried would
make small nations like Yugoslavia dependent on western


Modern World History 487

corporations. The United States was anxious to rebuild Europe
as quickly as possible, no only to reopen markets for U.S. goods,
but also to counter the influence of growing communist parties
in Italy, France, and other Western European countries. U.S.
Secretary of State George C. Marshall shipped food and other
material aid, and provided financial support to any European
country who requested it. The result was the largely capitalist
rebuilding of Western Europe and West Germany, while Eastern
Europe began industrializing by following Soviet-inspired Five-
Year Plans.

European
nations entered new military alliances along East-West lines as
well. In April 1949, Great Britain, France, and other Western
European Allies united with the U.S. and Canada in a military
alliance, the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO),
pledging to defend one another in case of attack. NATO became
alarmingly relevant later that summer when the Soviets
detonated their first atomic bomb, breaking the U.S. monopoly
on nuclear weapons. In the ensuing decades, both superpowers
would develop advanced missiles, air forces, and submarines
to deliver an overwhelming nuclear attack on the other side’s
homeland in case of war. The superpowers adopted a policy
of “mutually assured destruction” as a means of preventing a
conflict which would almost certainly have destroyed most of
the humans and probably much of life on the planet. Britain was

488 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

next to join the nuclear club in 1952, followed by France in 1960,
China in 1964, India in 1974, Pakistan in 1998, and North Korea
in 2006. Israel developed weapons in secret in the 1960s, and
South Africa developed a couple of weapons in the 1970s but
scrapped them and joined the non-proliferation movement by
1991, at the same time the De Klerk government was freeing
Nelson Mandela and beginning to end apartheid. Also in 1991
Kazakhstan left the Soviet Union and inherited a nuclear arsenal
larger than that of Britain and France, but became the first
nation to scrap its nuclear arsenal. We will return to both these
events later in the chapter.

Operation Castle series of U.S. tests of thermonuclear weapons (H-bombs) in the
Marshall Islands.

Modern World History 489

1949 ended with a new challenge in East Asia, when
communist forces led by Mao Zedong defeated the Nationalist
armies of Chiang Kai-Shek and established the People’s
Republic of China, which we will turn to shortly.

Stalin died in 1953 and after
a power struggle in the
Politburo a new Premier,
Nikita Khrushchev, took
power in Moscow.
Khrushchev distanced
himself from what he called
Stalin’s “cult of personality”
and revealed the extent of
Stalin’s atrocities against
perceived political enemies,
which had led to the deaths of
millions in purges, forced
labor, and famine in the
previous decades.

Khrushchev announced a .

Nikita Khrushchev, Time Magazine's Man of

new Soviet foreign policy of the year for 1957
“peaceful coexistence” with
the West, pledging not to extend communism by invading other
countries but creating a military alliance, the Warsaw Pact,
within the Soviet Bloc in Europe to counterbalance NATO.
Khrushchev wanted Soviet communism to provide a higher
standard of living for workers. Achieving this was difficult if the
military budget was too large, so he sought to lessen tensions
with the U.S. and its allies. But there were limits to Khrushchev’s
“liberalism”. In 1956, deMocratic reforms in
Hungary led to a possibility of
spreading anti-Soviet dissent in
neighboring communist countries
under Moscow’s control. The Soviets
and their Warsaw Pact satellite

countries sent troops and tanks to


490 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

repress any political changes in
Hungary and Eastern Europe.

Questions for Discussion

Do you think mutual assured destruction was a reasonable
strategy?

When you review the list of members of the “nuclear club",
are there any countries on it you weren't expecting to see?

The Cold War in Asia

Although the U.S.S.R. had
helped end the Pacific War by
invading Manchuria in
August 1945, the subsequent
reconstruction of Japan was
strictly a U.S. affair. By the
time the military occupation
ended in 1955, Japan had
returned to rule by a
democratically-elected
parliamentary monarchy
under the same Emperor,
Hirohito. The U.S. guaranteed
= Japan’s security through a
Emperor Hirohito and General MacArthur, treaty and a military base in
who led the occupation, at their first Okinawa, and __ provided
meeting at the U.S. Embassy, Tokyo, financial assistance and
September, 1945

preferential access to U.S.
markets to rebuild the Japanese economy. This was partly an
attempt to counter the perceived communist threat in Asia, and
Japan developed a highly successful public-private economic
model, ultimately producing electronics and automobiles that
would dominate their sectors worldwide.


Modern World History 491

After World War II, the Nationalists and Communists
restarted their civil war, which had been interrupted in 1937
by the Japanese invasion. Mao’s armies were victorious over
the corrupt and incompetent Nationalists led by Chiang Kai-
Shek. By the end, entire divisions of the Nationalist army were
going over to the Communists, and Chiang fled to
the island of Taiwan, which had been
relinquished to China after being a
part of the Japanese Empire for fifty
years. There, the Kuomintang
continued the Republic of China,
which was formally recognized as
“China” by the United Nations and the
US. until the 1970s. Cold War politics
was the reason for this diplomatic
decision, but even after its end
Taiwan’s autonomy from mainland
China is still guaranteed by the U.S.

As previously mentioned, war broke out on China’s border
a year after the establishment of the People’s Republic. The
Korean Peninsula had been divided like Germany at the end
of the war with the Soviets administering the north while the
south was controlled by the United States. The U.S.S.R. helped
establish a communist regime under Kim Il-sung, while the
Americans supported an authoritarian “nationalist”, Syngman
Rhee. In June 1950, Kim ordered the invasion of the south in
an attempt to unite the peninsula. As Kim’s forces quickly took
most of the south, the United Nations Security Council ordered
a military response, led by the United States. The Soviet Union
abstained instead of using its veto power in the Security
Council, casting doubt on the western suspicion that Stalin had
okayed Kim’s invasion of the south.

492 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Re

Combat in the streets of Seoul, 1950.

By October, U.S.-led United Nations forces had pushed the
communist North Korean forces out of the south and had taken
the northern capital, Pyongyang. U.N. armies continued to
advance northward toward the Chinese border at the Yalu River,
which brought China into the war on the North Korean side.
On October 25, U.N. troops were surprised by a counterattack
by millions of soldiers from China, as Mao defended Chinese
territory from foreign invasion and his own new communist
government, established only a year before. U.S. commander
Douglas MacArthur, a hero of the Pacific War in World War II
and leader of the occupation of Japan, talked about his ambition
to expand the conflict in Korea to a full-on war with China and
contemplated using nuclear weapons. Since the USSR also had
nuclear weapons and had signed a mutual-defense treaty with
Mao’s new government, a war with China was likely to escalate
into World War III. When the general refused to back down
and criticized the president’s judgment, Harry Truman fired
MacArthur.

Modern World History 493

é

and nearly 3 million Korean
deaths (and 54,000 U.S. GIs), ~~
the two sides agreed to a
cease-fire, but a peace treaty
was never concluded and the
area has remained a
flashpoint. North Korea has
become a totalitarian closed
society, largely isolated after
the fall of the Soviet Union
and China's embrace of
capitalism in the 1980s. The
Kim family has remained in
power despite famine and
mismanagement, while
defending their regime by
developing nuclear weapons.
South Korea was ruled by
Rhee and the military until a
transition to democracy in the 1990s, when it became a
successful industrial power following
the Japanese development model. the us
continues to maintain a military presence in South Korea, and
currently there are 28,500 troops stationed near the capital of
Seoul. The border between North and South is considered the
most heavily militarized zone in the world.

The establishment of the People’s Republic of China in 1949
led to continuing diplomatic conflict over the status of Taiwan
and war on the Korean Peninsula. An additional hotspot is Tibet,
a Himalayan region historically dominated by the Chinese
Empire that became an independent nation run by Buddhist
monks during the chaotic early years of the Chinese Republic
in the 1920s. Mao Zedong decided to reclaim Tibet for his
new People’s Republic, and sent in troops in 1951. Tenzin
Gyatso, the Dalai Lama from that time
is still the exiled spiritual leader of

After three years of fighting 06 1950 a
- S
\

Territory often changed hands early in the
war, until the front stabilized.

494 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Tibet, and the “Free Tibet” movement
is very active around the world.

Looking across the square at Jokhang temple, Lhasa Tibet.

Internally, Mao’s own totalitarian style had disastrous
consequences for the Chinese. The communists had already
begun land reform around 1946 in the parts of China they
controlled, well before their final victory; the policy had gained
them widespread support among the vast peasant population.
With the nationalists out of the way, Mao’s policy became more
aggressive. He called for the elimination of the landlord class
of peasants and redistribution of the land more evenly.
Unfortunately, when Mao said elimination, he meant it. Class-
motivated mass killings of landlords continued for the next 30
years and estimates of the death tolls range from 14 million to
28 million.

Modern World History 495

The purge of landlords was
followed by the Great Leap
Forward, an economic and
social plan from 1958 to 1962
that collectivized agriculture
and promoted industry. Mao
set up 25,000 “people’s
communes” of 5,000 families
each, which would be
responsible for not only
feeding themselves and their
fellow Chinese citizens, but
for providing surpluses to
export. Mao insisted on
keeping grain exports high in
spite of poor harvests. The
Backyard furnaces in China during the famine that resulted, known
Great Leap Forward era produced very as the Great Chinese Famine.
poor steel and a lot of pollution. ’

killed 55 million people,
although a few million were apparently beaten to death and
millions more committed suicide. In some regions of China,
people resorted to cannibalism.

This disaster caused some prominent communist party
members to question Mao’s leadership, but he maintained
support in the army and blamed the famine on a lack of socialist
commitment among the Chinese. Mao initiated his Great
Proletarian Cultural Revolution in 1966, leading the military to
recruit young people to reinforce Maoist ideology and purge
remnants of capitalist and traditional elements from Chinese
society. Schools and universities were closed, and Red Guard
troops were encouraged to harass and even murder
intellectuals. Educated people were beaten, terrorized, and
banished to the countryside to be “reeducated” by the peasants.
The death toll of the cultural revolution is debated, but
estimates range from 3 to 10 million. It delayed Chinese
industrialization and modernization, and a generation of
Chinese were deprived of an education.


496 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Propaganda oil painting of Mao and students holding up his “Little Red Book" during
the Cultural Revolution, 1967.

estions for Discussion

Could the Korean War have been avoided?

Was Mao Zedong an effective leader of China?

As seen in the last chapter, efforts by the Vietnamese to
liberate themselves from the French after World War II were
initially thwarted. This changed in 1954 when Ho Chi Minh’s
anti-colonial forces defeated the French in northern Vietnam at
the battle of Dien Bien Phu. The French decided to abandon
their colony of Indochina, preferring to focus their efforts on
maintaining their empire closer to home in Algeria (which we
have seen was also unsuccessful). Ignoring the example of the
Korean War, the French left Vietnam divided between a
communist north and a non-communist south; with the vague
promise of an eventual referendum in the south to determine
whether or not the country would be reunited.

The vote would never take place. The United States began
sending military advisers to South Vietnam almost as soon as
the French withdrew. President Dwight Eisenhower, elected in
1952, invoked the “domino theory” to help the unpopular

Modern World History 497

regime in South Vietnam prevent elections which would have
made the extremely popular Ho Chi Minh leader of a unified
nation. This theory posited that every country the “fell” to
communism represented one more step world domination by
America’s enemies, although after the “Sino-Soviet Split” of
1956, it was unclear which communist nation was the threat in
Vietnam, then Laos, then Cambodia, Burma, India, etc. The U.S.
also sent military and economic aid to neighboring Laos, also
newly independent from France, in an attempt to prop up a
monarchy that was in conflict with Soviet-supported Pathet Lao
guerrillas.

In the late 1950s and early 1960s the CIA and U.S. military
advisors supported the South Vietnamese government. By the
1960s, the issue of Vietnam would enormously affect domestic
politics in the United States, especially after President Lyndon
Johnson began sending hundreds of thousands of U.S. soldiers
to defend South Vietnam in 1965. In 1969 and 1970, Richard
Nixon bombed and invaded Cambodia, but could not defeat
the Viet Cong guerillas. The U.S. finally withdrew in 1978, after
58,000 U.S. troops and over a million Vietnamese had been
killed. Without U.S. support, the government of the South lost
the war and Vietnam was unified in 1975. Ho Chi Minh did not
live to see it — he died in 1969 at age 79.


498 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

AUS Marine moves an old man suspected of being Viet Cong during a search and clear
operation 15 miles west of Da Nang Air Base, 1965.

Question for Discussion

Could the Vietnam War have been avoided?

Cold War in the Middle East

In the last chapter, we examined how the establishment of Israel
in 1948 immediately led to a series of conflicts with its Arab
neighbors. The defeat of Arab forces by Israel in 1949 led to a
surge of Arab nationalism, led by Egyptian leader Gamal Abdul
Nasser, who became head of state in 1954 after a military coup
that ended the Egyptian monarchy. Nasser’s popularity was
cemented when he took control of the Suez Canal, surrounded
by Egypt but administered by the British and French, in 1956.

Modern World History 499

In this crisis, tbe U.S. and U.S.S.R. forced
Great Britain, France, and Israel to
accept Egyptian control of the canal to
avoid a ay er conflict. Nasser became
a hero for the Arab world, standing up
to both the old colonial powers and
what the Arabs saw as their creation,
the new state of Israel.

Nasser’s ruling model
became an inspiration for
many Arabs. Like Mustafa
Kemal Atatiirk in Turkey in §
the 1920s, Nasser established ¥
a secular state dedicated to
improving the lives of
ordinary people. He largely
separated religion = and
politics, supported
government intervention in

Nasser greeted by crowds in Alexandria
the economy to prevent one day after his announcement of the

foreign control, and provided 8rtish withdrawal and

a failed assassination attempt against him,

more and better social October 1954

services. Nasser, a former

army colonel, also relied on the military as the most reliable and
disciplined institution to maintain unity and order. This
“Nasserism” became the ideology of the Ba'ath Party, formed in
Syria and later in Iraq in the 1950s among military officers.

The Egyptian leader skillfully took advantage of Cold War
politics, playing the United States and the Soviet Union against
each other in order to gain military and economic aid. The
Soviets in particular supported the construction of the massive
Aswan Dam, completed in stages by 1970 to control the flooding
of the Nile while providing hydroelectric power to Egypt.

Nasser preached pan-Arabism, the goal that all Arabs should
be united in one federated nation. Egypt and Syria briefly
united under this model in the early 1960s, while after Nasser’s

death, Libya, Syria, and Iraq federated

500 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

for a time in the 1970s. The liberation of Algeria
from France in 1962 was a moment of inspiration; another
was the unification of Palestinians in the Palestine Liberation
Organization in 1964, led by Yasser Arafat and his Fatah Party.
Hatred and resentment for Israel was (and remains) a powerful
unifying factor in the region. Arab resistance and Cold War
considerations led the U.S. to continue its support of Israel,
which was supported by Jewish Americans, but also by Christian
fundamentalist evangelicals, many of whom consider the
reestablishment of the Israel as the beginning of the
apocalyptical End Times and the return of the Messiah.
Meanwhile, the Soviet Union sought allies in the Middle East,
which was much closer to its borders than to America. Russia
still maintains its only naval base on the Mediterranean in Syria,
dating from the time it began supporting the Ba’athi Assad
family in that country in the late 1970s.

Nasser (center) mediating an agreement between Yasser Arafat and Jordanian King
Hussein, during the emergency Arab League summit, September 1970.

Textbooks often describe the Islamic resurgence that began in
the 1970s, but usually consider this only as a religious
movement. Some critics of Islam claim the Muslim world has
never recovered from the First Crusade, when Christian armies
captured Jerusalem in 1099 CE and over the course of a few
days murdered almost the entire Muslim population of the city.
There may be some truth in this statement, but we don’t have

Modern World History 501

to look back several centuries to find reasons why populations
that happen to be Muslim resent populations that happen to
be Christian. And if globalization, which we will cover in more
detail in the next chapter, is primarily an economic
development that has overtaken world politics, then resistance
to globalization should be considered in economic and political
terms.

themselves in conflict are
often where western
Europeans and Americans
have been very active in
extracting natural resources
from territories occupied by
Muslims. Western oil
companies in the Persian
Gulf, for example, have had a
decisive role in the
relationships between the
governments of Britain and
Prime Minister Mosaddegh with US the US and the people and
President Truman in 1951 governments of the region.
For example, when the
Iranian Prime Minister, Mohammad Mosaddegh, decided to
nationalize the Anglo-Iranian Oil Company (now BP), Winston
Churchill convinced Harry S. Truman that Mosaddegh had to
go. Britain’s MI-6 and the CIA organized a coup against the
elected government of Iran and installed Shah Mohammed
Reza Pahlavi as ruler of Iran in 1958 to insure a steady flow of oil
out of Iran.
Oil production in Iran rose quickly from less than a million
barrels per day in the 1950s to 6 million barrels daily in the
mid-1970s. However, the oil boom of the 1970s widened the
gap between the rich and poor in Iran. In 1971, the 2,500th
anniversary celebration of the founding of the Persian Empire
by Cyrus the Great in the sixth century BCE was attended by
jet-setters from around the world while Iranians were excluded


502 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

and their poverty was ignored. The Shah began a policy of
embracing western culture and westernizing Iran; conservative
Muslims objected. The new consumer goods and cultural
changes were generally available only to the richest Iranians,
and were not accompanied by political liberalization. The
Shah’s secret police force, SAVAK, terrorized the population and
routinely assassinated the Shah’s critics. In 1977, SAVAK killed
several Islamic leaders including Mostafa Khomeini, son of the
ayatollah.

Armed protesters in front of a banner that says, “Long live anti-imperialism and
democratic forces”

The outbreak of the Iranian Revolution caught the Shah by
surprise. When the Muslim clergy announced an open-air
prayer meeting on the annual holiday marking the end of
Ramadan, the Shah panicked and declared martial law. 5,000
protesters took to the streets of Tehran. The army fired into the
crowd, killing 64 people. The ayatollah Khomeini claimed 4,000
people had been killed and workers at Tehran’s oil refineries and
government workers declared a general strike that brought the
economy to a standstill. By early December, more than 10% of
the Iranian people were marching in anti-Shah demonstrations.
The U.S. Government was hated for helping to install the Shah,
and also for statements by President Jimmy Carter supporting

Modern World History 503

the Iranian Government and the “special relationship” the Shah
had with the U.S. The ailing Shah abandoned Iran, eventually
arriving for treatment in the United States, while Khomeini
proclaimed a new Islamic Republic.

A group of Islamist students
stormed the American
Embassy in Tehran in
November 1979 and took the
staff as hostages. 52
Americans were held for 444
days, until the inauguration
of Ronald Reagan in January
1981. The ayatollah, who was
an astute politician as well as a_[fatian students storming the US Embassy
religious leader, supported in Tehran, November 1979
keeping the hostages on
purely political grounds. He told reporters, “This action has
many benefits... This has united our people. Our opponents do
not dare act against us. We can put the constitution to the
people’s vote without difficulty.”

However, the new Iranian regime also
confronted resistance from the Arab
world, especially from Iraqi leader
Saddam Hussein. Not only were the
Iranians Persian, rather than Arab,
most were also followers of Shia Islam,
rather than the more common Sunni
branch which is prevalent in the Arab
world and among all Muslims.
Although Shi'ites and Sunnis had lived
in peace for centuries, Iran’s new
clerical state was deemed a threat by
its Arab neighbors, especially by the
conservative Sunni regime in Saudi
Arabia.

Iraq, however, had its own


504 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

particularities: not only were the
specifically Shia holy sites located in
Saddam Hussein’s country, but a
majority of the Iraqis were Shiite
Arabs as well. Hussein, meanwhile, was
a Ba’athist, promoting — Arab
nationalism in a secular state ruled by
his military. In September 1980 he
sent his armies into Iran in an attempt
to take advantage of what they
supposed would be political chaos.
Hussein claimed that he was
protecting Arabs living in the Iranian

order region, although conveniently,
these areas also had vast oil deposits.
The Iran-Iraq War lasted 8 years and,
like the hostage crisis, helped
consolidate the power of the Khomeini
regime. The US, USSR, France, and
many Arab countries provided
support for Iraq, which used chemical
weapons against Iranian military and
civilian targets. The death toll has been
estimated as 800,000 Iranians and up
to 500,000 Iraqis.

Modern World History 505

An Iranian soldier wearing a gas mask during the Iran-Iraq War.

Hussein had pained nothing in the war

but debt and demands for autonomy
by non-Arab ethnic Kurds in northern
Iraq; he responded with chemical
attacks on civilian Kurdish
populations. In 1990, the Iraqi dictator
then decided to incorporate Kuwait
into his nation, claiming that it had
historically been part of Mesopotamia
(which was plausible, given the absurd
way the British had drawn national
boundaries after World War I). The
United Nations, led by the U.S. pushed
Hussein out of Kuwait. Not even the
Saudis wanted the Iraqi dictator to take
the tiny kingdom, which despite its
size had as much oil as Iraq. However,
although it decimated Hussein’s
retreating army on the infamous

506 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

“Highway of Death”, the coalition
stopped short of toppling Hussein
himself, which would have
consequences over the next two
decades.

Questions for Discussion

+ Was the Pan-Arab movement a positive or negative
development?

+ How do you think the history of U.S.-Iranian relations affects
the nations’ current relationship?

Latin America and the Cold War

The twentieth century began in Latin America with the Mexican
Revolution, when Pancho Villa in northern
Mexico and Emiliano Zapata in
southern Mexico created an
opportunity for new liberal forces led
by Alvaro Obregon. After defeatin
illa on the battlefield, Obregon held
a constitutional convention in 1917
which produced a document that
embraced agrarian reform, an eight-
hour work day and the right to
organize labor unions; and a
declaration that the subsoil belongs to
the state in the name of the people.
The was a return to the tradition of
the Spanish Empire that subsurface
minerals belonged to the people or to

Modern World History 507

the state, rather than to individuals or
companies. These ideas _ were
inspirational for the rest of Latin
America and even other parts of the
world: the Mexican Revolution
predated the Bolshevik Revolution by
several months.

It took a generation for
Mexico to realize this goal,

A) PEMEX but in the 1930s, under

President Lazaro Cardenas,

EL RESCATE DE LA SOBERANIA

land reform was
Logo of Petréleos Mexicanos, the implemented that brought
state-owned oil company established by aa.
. i. back indigenous communal
Cardenas. The motto means, "For the .
rescue of sovereignty. landholdings, broken up

during the Diaz period. And
in 1938, Cardenas nationalized Mexican oil, taking over leases
given to U.S. and British oil companies. The American
president, Franklin Roosevelt, who had begun a “Good
Neighbor Policy” toward Latin America when he took office, to
emphasize trade and cooperation rather than military force, did
not intervene when oil companies objected. Britain acquiesced
in order to assure Mexican support in what everyone
understood would soon be the next world war.

Cardenas was part of a wave of populist heads of state in Latin
America, charismatic leaders who tried to address the needs
of “the people,’ which by the 1930s and 1940s included rural
peasants as well as the urban working class. Latin American
Populism also attracted a rising professional middle class, shut
out of political power by traditional oligarchies. In Argentina,
this new middle class included first-generation immigrants
from Europe who supported a new Radical Party in the first
decades of the twentieth century. Argentina was second only to
the United States as an immigration choice for impoverished
Europeans, particularly Italians, Germans, and Eastern
European Jews. In other cases, army officers who had received
professional training either at home or abroad by European

508 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

military missions felt that the oligarchs were insufficiently
patriotic and needed to be replaced.

The populists also supported nationalist economic measures,
including policies of import substitution
industrialization, land reform, and
efforts to reduce dependency on
international markets for their mining
or agricultural goods. The crisis of the
Great Depression emphasized the
importance of building independent
domestic economies and_ instituting
education, housing, and infrastructure
improvements for all of the people.
The global war against fascism
inspired many to embrace democracy
and overthrow long-standing military
regimes, like in Guatemala, Venezuela,
and Cuba; although these attempts at
democratic practices were frequently
short-lived.

Modern World History 509

Brazilian President Getulio Vargas (left) and US President Franklin D. Roosevelt (right) in
1936

Two of the most notable populist leaders are also examples of
civilian and military versions of populism: Getilio Vargas of
Brazil and Juan Per6n of Argentina. Vargas was an opposition
candidate who lost in a fraudulent election to an oligarchy-
backed candidate in 1980; a brief uprising made him president.
He skillfully faced down a separatist revolt in the wealthy coffee
state of Sao Paulo, but after embracing a degree of liberal
democracy, in 1937 Vargas established an authoritarian state in
order to prevent communist-supported leftists being elected.
However, he also rooted out a new fascist movement and
disbanded it as well, setting himself up to accept U.S. aid and
support the Allies in World War II. Brazil was the only nation
in Latin America to send troops to fight alongside the Allies
in Europe. Vargas stepped down in 1945, but ran again for
president in 1950 and was reelected.

Peron, on the other hand, was an army officer who had served
as a military attache in Italy in the 1930s, witnessing up close
the fascist regime of Benito Mussolini. Argentina at the time was
governed by politicians elected through fraud that suppressed
calls for reform by the Radical Party. In 1943, in the midst
of World War II, the military overthrew the corrupt regime,

510 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

instituting a government that they felt was more dignified and
responded more directly to the people. Juan Peron, a key player
in the coup, chose to become the Minister of Labor. By
guaranteeing labor law and favoring the workers in
negotiations, he became popular among the urban masses in
Buenos Aires. Although the military regime grew nervous about
his growing popularity and had Peron arrested, the workers
came to his aid. He was released and was elected president of
Argentina in 1946.

Peron benefited from a postwar economic boom in Argentina.
He could promise and deliver on higher wages, better living and
working conditions, and vacations for workers as tax revenues
rolled in because of high international prices for Argentine
wheat and beef. In the context of the Cold War, Perén
proclaimed that he represented a “third way” between
unfettered capitalism and totalitarian communism. Perén
claimed that his government improved the lives of Argentinians
without having to take sides in the superpower conflict. This
made him particularly annoying to the United States, which
often had to face Argentine opposition at regional conferences.

Peron bet on never-ending
good times, especially when it
seemed that the Korean War
might lead to a World War III
in which Argentina would
benefit. However, shortly
after he was reelected in 1952,
Peron’s popular wife, Eva
Duarte, died of ovarian
cancer at age 33. Hundreds of
thousands attended __ her
funeral and a cult of “Santa
Evita” quickly took hold. The
Argentine economy began to
suffer as the world recovered
from World War II and_ Presidentjuan Perén and his wife, “Evita”,
Argentina faced competition 3¥¢ in Madrid.
for its wheat and beef in the


Modern World History 511

international market. Like Vargas, Peron also faced inflation and
political Scandals. A bitter fight with the
Catholic Church led to Peron’s ouster
by the military in 1955 and the
suppression of the Peronist movement
until Peron was invited back from exile
to be reelected president in 1973.

Questions for Discussion

+ Why might Populism have appealed to the people of Latin
American nations?

+ Was Mexico justified in nationalizing the countrys oil industry.

Although the United States congratulated itself that it had
replaced blatant military intervention and “dollar diplomacy”
with a “Good Neighbor Policy” under Franklin Roosevelt,
nations like Costa Rica, Guatemala and Honduras were still
thoroughly dominated by the United Fruit Company (UFC);
still Banana Republics. After World War II, the Dulles brothers
became leaders in developing U.S. foreign policy in Latin
America. John Foster Dulles was a corporate lawyer who had
helped negotiate huge land giveaways to UFC by the
governments of Guatemala and Honduras. After serving as a
Senator from New York, Dulles was appointed secretary of State
by Dwight Eisenhower in 1953. His brother Allen Dulles was
on UFC’s board of directors before he served as President
Eisenhower’s CIA Director.

In 1954 the democratically-elected government of Guatemala
began talking about seizing some of the vast tracts of land the
United Fruit Company had acquired but was not using. The
government planned to buy back the land from UFC and
redistribute it to the poor. The Dulles brothers accused the
Guatemalan government of having close ties with the Soviets
and sent in the CIA to overthrow it in a military coup.

512 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Guatemalans resisted the new regime and the country fell into a
civil war that lasted from 1960 to 1996 and killed up to 200,000
people.

President Dwight Eisenhower with John Foster Dulles, 1956.

One of the key elements of Latin America’s relationship with
the outside world seems to be the question of revolution and
the threat nations like the U.S. claimed to fear, of socialist, anti-
capitalist movements in the Western Hemisphere. In many
cases the anti-capitalism expressed by Latin Americans was
actually resistance to what they perceived as economic
imperialism by nations like the U.S., which regularly defended
American-based corporations that operated freely in their
nations and often intervened in their politics. Latin American
nationalist leaders like Getilio Vargas in Brazil (President from
1930-45 and 1951-54), Juan Peron in Argentina (President from
1946-55 and 1978-4), or Lazaro Cardenas in Mexico (President
from 1934-40), who nationalized the Mexican oil industry, were
not Marxists, or even particularly socialist in their orientation
or policies. Import Substitution Industrialization was a capitalist

Modern World History 513

approach to reducing dependency, and even when nations like
Mexico nationalized natural resource extraction, they usually
compensated foreign companies for the assets they were
expropriating and then they ran the extractive industries as
businesses in the world economy. Even when the government's
goal was something like land reform, they usually tried to
compensate the former owners. The conflict over land reform
in Guatemala was misrepresented by the Dulles brothers. The
Guatemalan government offered UFC a price for the lands it
took back based on the values claimed in the corporation’s tax
filings. It may have been an open secret that UFC was
defrauding the Guatemalan government, but the government
was well within its rights to call that bluff. A truly communist
government determined to eliminate capitalism in Guatemala
might simply have claimed UFC had acquired the lands illegally
and taken them with no offer of compensation.

Many idealists in Latin
America and elsewhere were
radicalized by the violence
nations such as the United
States approved or initiated to

% f) \4 protect the interests of
Wl corporations but justified as
fa defenses of democracy. An

Guevara (right) with Alberto Granado (left) example of this was the
in June 1952 on the Amazon River aboard experience Ernesto “Che”
their wooden raft, which was a gift from -

Guevara, who witnessed the
the lepers whom they had treated during “ve "
their motorcycle journey. Bolivian Revolution of 1952

before moving on to
Guatemala in 1954. Bolivia's struggle began when the candidate
of the Movimiento Nationalista Revolucionario)()MNR) won the
presidential election of 1951 but was prevented by the military
from taking office. Victor Paz Estenssoro armed civilians and
the MNR took power after 3 days and 600 casualties. He served
his first term from 1952 to 1956, and accepted US financial aid in
return for compensating the tin mines he
nationalized. Estenssoro softened the revolution’s approach to
rewriting the mineral and petroleum laws, but he did


514 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

redistribute land. Bolivians approved of his leadership and
Estenssoro was re-elected in 1960, 1964, and 1985.

Peasants on the altiplano, the high Andean plateau around the
city of Cochabamba, seeing the changes in the mining codes,
began seizing haciendas and dividing the land up amongst
themselves. The government passed an Agrarian Reform
Decree in 1958 to capture the campesinos’ support and control
the process a bit. Before the revolution, less than 1% of the
richest landowners in Bolivia owned half of the country’s land
and 6% owned 92% of Bolivia. Under the reform, 185,000
peasant families, about half of all rural families, got titles to an
average of about 20 hectares each. National agricultural output
fell by about 10% after the land distribution, but probably
because people were growing and keeping more produce for
home use and trading it informally rather than taking it to
commercial or export markets. Some cities saw food shortages,
but these were offset by imports and some foreign aid.

After witnessing _ this
revolutionary change in
Bolivia, Guevara went to
Guatemala and watched a
similar attempt crushed by
imperialist armies operating
to protect corporate profits.
This experience and_ his
romance with a Peruvian
Marxist economist named
Hilda Gadea Acosta, who he
married in 1955, radicalized
Che. When he was placed on
an enemies list by the new
Guatemalan regime, Guevara
escaped to Mexico where he che Guevara and Fidel Castro, 1961
met Ratl and Fidel Castro,
who were in exile there following a failed revolutionary coup in
Cuba. Guevara became an ally of the Castros in June 1955 and
joined the revolution. About 80 revolutionaries arrived in late
November 1956 on the eastern tip of Cuba, but their numbers


Modern World History 515

were reduced to about 20 in their first skirmish with Fulgencio
Battista’s army. The survivors fled into the Sierra Maestra
mountains and enlisted peasants into a guerilla army that
harried the Cuban army for the next two years. In 1958, Guevara
explained the guerillas’ success:

“The enemy soldier in the Cuban example which at present
concerns us, is the junior partner of the dictator; he is the man
who gets the last crumb left by a long line of profiteers that begins
in Wall Street and ends with him. He is disposed to defend his
privileges, but he is disposed to defend them only to the degree
that they are important to him. His salary and his pension are
worth some suffering and some dangers, but they are never worth
his life. If the price of maintaining them will cost it, he is better
off giving them up; that is to say, withdrawing from the face of
the guerrilla danger”

The cold war was played out mostly through proxy wars:
regional conflicts like the Korean War, the Vietnam War, and
the Russia-Afghanistan War where the combatants were
provisioned, supported, and sometimes joined by troops from
the superpowers. Occasionally, the heat level increased and the
US. and U.S.S.R. barely avoided direct conflict. One of those
times was during the Cuban Missile Crisis. The U.S.S.R. became
a trading partner of Cuba after Marxist revolutionaries Fidel
and Raul Castro and Che Guevara overthrew the American-
backed Battista government in 1959 and replaced it with a
revolutionary socialist state. President Kennedy supported a
CIA-sponsored plan to invade Cuba using anti-Castro Cubans
in 1961, but the Bay of Pigs invasion was a fiasco. In October
1962 the U.S. discovered that the U.S.S.R. had deployed nuclear
missiles in Cuba, less than 100 miles from the continental U.S.
Castro had not initially been looking for a close alliance with the
Soviets, but he seems to have believed that the U.S. was going
to continue its attacks (recently declassified CIA documents
describing several more coup and assassination plans proved
Castro’s fears were well-founded).

516 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

SURFACE-TO-AIR MISSILE ACTIVITY IN CUBA, 5 SEPTEMBER 1962

CIA map showing Surface-to-Air Missile activity in Cuba, September 1962.

The 13-day standoff ended with the Soviet Union withdrawing
its missiles in return for American promises not to try again
to overthrow Castro. Che Guevara announced “Our revolution
is endangering all American possessions in Latin America. We
are telling these countries to make their own revolution.” Che
headed the Cuban delegation to the United Nations in 1964,
where he made a speech criticizing apartheid in South Africa
and said of the U.S., “Those who kill their own children and
discriminate daily against them because of the color of their
skin; those who let the murderers of blacks remain free,
protecting them, and furthermore punishing the black
population because they demand their legitimate rights as free
men—how can those who do this consider themselves
guardians of freedom?” Guevara increasingly believed that the
global north (the northern hemisphere nations) was guilty of
oppressing the global south. He even criticized the U.S.S.R. for
not doing enough to end imperialism, accusing Russia of
forgetting Marx. Che supported the independence movements
of indigenous peoples and left Cuba to try to encourage these
revolutions, first in the Congo and then in Bolivia, where he
was captured by CIA-assisted Bolivian government forces in
1967 and summarily executed. Fidel Castro continued as Cuban
president until 2008 when his brother Raul became President.
Fidel died in 2016 and Raul handed over the Presidency in
2018, although he remains the First Secretary of the Communist
Party of Cuba until a planned retirement in 2021.

Modern World History 517

Twentieth-century —_cold-
war conflicts involving Oil
have not been limited to the
Persian Gulf. Development of
Venezuela’s oil resources,
thought to be at least a fifth of
known global reserves, began
in the 1910s when the
Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez relied | Country’s president granted
on oil revenue to run programs for the concessions to his friends to
poor, but failed to diversify his economy. explore, drill, and refine oil.

These concessions _ were
quickly sold to foreign oil companies. In 1941 a reform
government gained power and passed the Hydrocarbons Law of
1943 under which the government would receive 50% of the
profits of the oil industry. The outbreak of World War II had
increased demand for oil, and the Venezuelan government
granted a series of new concessions that were snapped up in
spite of the 50% tax. The postwar explosion of automobile
ownership in the U.S. continued to drive demand, and
Venezuelan production increased. Venezuela bought the Cities
Service company and CITGO gas became a key export of
Venezuela. In 1976, the government nationalized the oil
industry. Oil was a mixed blessing for Venezuela, providing high
levels of revenue to support government programs benefitting
the people; but also preventing Venezuelan industry from
diversifying. However, the CITGO sign became a welcome sight
for many New Englanders, as the company has donated
millions of gallons of home heating oil to help hundreds of
thousands of families in the Northeastern United States over
several decades.

Questions for Discussion

What were the ulterior motives of Americans behind their
choices to intervene in Latin America to fight communism?

What did Ernesto Guevara mean when he described the


518 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

differences between his soldiers and the government troops?

During the 1950s and 1960s colonialism mostly ended in Africa,
although not without occasional atrocities such as the British
oppression of the Kikuyu in Kenya in a conflict the British still
lost, despite having overwhelming force on their side. In South
Africa, the white government of F. W. De Klerk, who became
president in 1989, finally began to dismantle the apartheid
system that had oppressed the black majority for generations.
Nelson Mandela (1918-2013) was a member of a royal native
family of the Xhosa people who became a lawyer in
Johannesburg and became active in politics after the white
government began instituting apartheid policies in the 1940s.
Apartheid was a system of racial segregation that completely
separated the black majority from the white rulers and deprived
them of political and civil rights. Mandela became president
of the African National Congress (ANC), an organization
established in 1912 to defend the rights of native Africans and
mixed-race people in South Africa. He was arrested in 1956 for
sedition and treason. Despite a commitment to non-violence,
Mandela began leading acts of sabotage against government
properties in 1961 and was convicted in 1962 and sentenced to
life in prison.

Modern World History 519

De Klerk visited Nelson
Mandela in prison a few
months after becoming
President and spoke with him
for 3 hours. In 1990, De Klerk
called for a new Constitution
and shut down South Africa’s
nuclear weapons program.
Then he freed Mandela after
27 years as a political prisoner
Frederik de Klerk and Nelson Mandela and lifted the ban on the ANC
shake hands at the Annual Meeting ofthe gperating as a political party.
World Economic Forum in 1992. After losing the presidential

election to him in 1994, De
Klerk served as one of Mandela’s Deputy Presidents from
1994-6. Mandela served as president for a single term and then
stepped down. He focused on reconciliation while in office and
in his retirement devoted himself to combatting poverty and
AIDS.

Cold War in the US

Wisconsin Senator Joseph McCarthy
burst onto the American _ political
scene during a speech in eeling,
West Virginia, in February 1950.
Waving a sheet of paper in the air,
McCarthy falsely announced that he
was holding a list of 205 names “that
were made known to the Secretary of
State as being members of the
Communist party and who
nevertheless are still working and
shaping [U.S.] polic ” Since McCarthy
had no actual list, the number quickly
changed to fifty-seven, then eighty-

520 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

one. Finally, he promised to disclose
the name of just one communist, the
nation’s “top Soviet agent.” The
shifting numbers brought ridicule, but
it didn’t matter: McCarthy’s lies won
him fame and fueled a new “red
scare.”

McCarthyism was part of a | ih
widespread anticommunist
propaganda campaign
directed at Cold War America
by the U.S. government. Only
two years after World War II,
President Truman __ issued
Executive Order 9835,
establishing loyalty reviews
for federal employees. The

FBI conducted close
examinations of all potential
“security risks” among

Foreign Service _ officers.
When the Korean War began, J. Edgar Hoover, head of the Federal

FBI Director J. Edgar Hoover Bureau of investigation, 1961
unsuccessfully petitioned

Truman to suspend habeus corpus and detain 12,000 Americans
suspected of disloyalty. Hoover grew increasingly frustrated
with what he saw as the President’s and Supreme Court’s
obstruction of his ability to prosecute people for their political
opinions. In 1956, Hoover began a counterintelligence program,
COINTELPRO, to disrupt the Communist Party of the USA
(CPUSA). The scope of Hoover's suspicions and COINTELPRO’s
targets grew to include civil rights groups, feminists,
environmentalists, Native American activists, and anti-war
protestors before the program’s dissolution in 1971. The
program’s domestic espionage and psychological warfare tactics
were widely criticized. Many believed the FBI had greatly

Modern World History 521

overstepped its authority; some even accused COINTELPRO of
planning the assassinations of some of the program’s targets.

In Congress, the House Un-American Activities Committee
(HUAC) and the Senate Permanent Subcommittee on
Investigations held over a hundred investigations and hearings
on communist influence in American society between 1949 and
1954. The Internal Security Act, passed by Congress in
September 1950, required all “communist organizations” to
register with the government, gave the government greater
powers to investigate sedition, and made it possible to prevent
suspected individuals from gaining or keeping their citizenship.
In the first year, the new law turned away over 50,000
immigrants from Germany and over 10,000 displaced Russians.
There were, of course, American communists in the United
States. The CPUSA enjoyed most of its influence as labor
organizers and as strong opponents of Jim Crow segregation.
But even at the height of the Depression, communism never
attracted many American. McCarthy’s and Hoover's witch-
hunts hurled accusations and ruined careers less on people’s
communist sentiments and more on their opposition to civil
rights and anti-war protestors.

The arms race was not only about nuclear technology, but also
a contest to improve the distance and accuracy of missiles which
could carry a nuclear load. The missile race indirectly led to the
space race, as both the U.S. and the Soviets initiated programs
for space exploration. As Germany collapsed at
the close of World War II, the United
States and the Soviet Union had raced
toward Berlin, hoping not only to be
first to occupy the capital but to
acquire elements of the Nazi V-2
missile program and jet propulsion
project. In the last months of the war,
the Nazis had developed a “vengeance
weapon” to terrorize England, even
though Germany had no hope of
winning. The V-2 was the world’s first

522 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

guided ballistic missile, capable of
carrying an explosive payload up to six
hundred miles. Both the U.S. and the
U.S.S.R. hoped to capture scientists,
designs, and manufacturing
equipment to build their own rockets.
Germany’s top rocket _ scientist,
Wernher von Braun, surrendered to
USS. troops and eventually became the
leader of the American space program.
About 1,600 German scientists and
engineers found their way into the
American program. The Soviet
Union’s program was managed by Red
Army colonel Sergei Korolev, although
the Soviet program also had about
2,000 Germans. Both engineering
teams worked to adapt German rocket
technology to create an
intercontinental ballistic — missile
(ICBM) that could carry the new
nuclear weapons.

eC gst technology
eveloped even
more rapidly. By
the time of the
Korean War, jet

fighters

supported both
F-86s of the 4th Fighter-interceptor wing, . .
Korean War sides, using

identical German
technology acquired after World War
Two. ommercial jetliners were

Modern World History 523

introduced in the 1950s, replacing
ocean liners by the 1970s as passenger

transport.

The Soviets
achieved success
in the missile race
first. They even
used the ICBM
launch vehicle in
October 1957, to
send Sputnik, the
world’s first
human-made
satellite, into
orbit. It was a
decisive
technological
victory, and the
Soviet d
propaganda
Painistry took full
advantage of the
opportunity to
begin a space race
while at the same
time warning the
U.S. that it could
deliver nuclear
weapons to
American targets.

In response, the US.
government rushed to perfect

its own ICBM technology and
in 1958 established the

The Apollo 11 Saturn V rocket lifts off, July
16, 1969.

524 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) to
launch satellites and astronauts into space. Initial American
attempts to launch a satellite into orbit suffered spectacular
failures, heightening fears of Soviet domination in space. While
the American space program struggled, the Soviet Union’s Luna
2 capsule became the first human-made object to touch the
moon in September 1959. Then the U.S.S.R. successfully
launched a pair of dogs (Belka and Strelka) into orbit and
returned them to Earth alive in August 1960 while the American
Mercury program languished behind schedule (the first dog the
Soviets sent to orbit, Laika, died during the trip). Cosmonaut
Yuri Gagarin was launched into orbit on April 12, 1961.
American astronaut Alan Shepard accomplished a suborbital
flight in the Freedom 7 capsule on May 5. The United States
had been embarrassed, and John Kennedy used America’s
frustration over early losses in the “space race” to bolster
funding for a manned moon landing, which succeeded on July
20, 1969.

Questions for Discussion

How did anxiety about communism injure civil rights in
America?

Why was the United States so motivated to beat the U.S.S.R
in the space race?

The Cold War ended with the 80s. Between 1989 and 1991, the
Soviet system collapsed and Russia lost control of its Eastern
European satellites. Soviet leaders Yuri Andropov and Mikhail
Gorbachev began relaxing the strict controls the state had been
exercising on satellite states. Andropov prevented the U.S.S.R.
from invading Poland in 1981 to crush the Solidarity movement,
as they had done during the Prague Spring in 1968. By 1989,
Solidarity was included in multiparty elections in Poland and
the movement’s leader, Lech Walesa, was elected President
(1990-95). Andropov’s successor, Gorbachev began a process of

Modern World History 525

perestroika, restructuring the economy, in 1986 and introduced
glasnost, a policy of increased openness in politics and support
for individual rights including freedom of speech. The freedom
of speech Gorbachev granted included freedom to criticize the
government, which he would be unable to control.

In October 1989, East Germany’s longtime leader resigned.
Erich Honecker had been instrumental in building the Berlin
Wall in 1961. Honecker had then ruled the communist nation
from 1971 until 1989, and had ordered East German troops to
fire on people trying to escape to West Berlin. Over a thousand
people were killed over the years. The wall only lasted three
weeks after Honecker’s removal from office. He fled first to
Russia and then to Chile to evade prosecution over giving the
order to fire on people fleeing from East Germany, but by this
time he was suffering from advanced liver cancer. Germany
didn’t fight too hard to extradite Honecker and he died in 1994
in Santiago.

Honecker had honestly
believed the Berlin Wall was
unavoidable and that by
building it he had prevented a
“third world war with
millions dead.” Tearing down
the wall and reunifying
Germany in 1990 were
milestones in the end of the
Germans stand on top of the Wallin front_ Cold War. In 1991, Gorbachev
of Brandenburg Gate in the last days agreed to allow the Baltic

.efore the Wall was torn down

Republics (Latvia, Lithuania,
and Estonia) to secede from the U.S.S.R., and hard-liners in the
Kremlin tried to overthrow him in a coup. The president of the
Russian Federation, Boris Yeltsin, supported Gorbachev and
thwarted the coup. Although Gorbachev had been returned to
the Kremlin, Yeltsin began gaining power for himself and Russia
at the expense of the Gorbachev and the U.S.S.R. In late 1991,
Yeltsin flew the Russian flag over the Kremlin alongside the
Soviet flag. On December 25, 1991, Gorbachev resigned as
President of the USSR in a televised speech, and handed over


526 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

the Soviet nuclear codes to Yeltsin. The following day, the
U.S.S.R. was dissolved and Yeltsin moved into Gorbachev's office
at the Kremlin.

The collapse of the Soviet Union left the US as the world’s
only superpower. This was not welcome news to some of the
officials of the old U.S.S.R. We'll look at how these people
consolidated their power in the new Russia when we discuss
Globalization in the next chapter.

Question for Discussion

Do you think Mikhail Gorbachev intended to end the U.S.S.R.?

Media Attributions

* Cold_war_europe_military_alliances_map_en © San
Jose is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license

* 2880px-Map-Germany-1945.svg © 52 Pickup is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

* 2880px-Iron_Curtain_map.svg © Sémhur is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

* Krefeld, Hungerwinter, Demonstration © Bundesarchiv
is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

* 2880px-Flag_of_NATO.svg © Mysid is licensed under a
Public Domain license

* Operation_Castle_-_Romeo_001 © United States
Department of Energy is licensed under a Public
Domain license

* Nikita-Khrushchev-TIME-1958 © Time Magazine is
licensed under a Public Domain license

* Macarthur_hirohito © US Army is licensed under a

Modern World History 527

Public Domain license
2880px-KoreanWar_recover_Seoul © Naval Historical
Center is licensed under a Public Domain license
Korean_war_1950-1953 © Leomonaci98 is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Jokhang_Temple_Lhasa_Tibet_China_ iii _firi® 14
= _-_panoramio_(6) © Hiroki Ogawa is licensed under
a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
Backyard_furnace4 © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

1967-11_1967%_ 2B Rie WAL Dew © ARBHR- (AR
#i#i) is licensed under a Public Domain license

Vietcongsuspect © PFC G. Durbin is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Nasser_and_RCC_members_welcomed_by_Alexandri
a,_1954 © Bibliotheca Alexandrina is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Nasser_brokering_ceasefire_with_Chairman_Arafat_a
nd_King_Hussein © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

lossy-pagel-2880px-
President_Truman_and_Prime_Minister_Mohammad
_Mossadegh_of_Iran.TIF © Nara.gov is licensed under
a Public Domain license

2880px-Enghlab_Iran © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

Iran_hostage_crisis_-
_lraninan_students_comes_up_U.S._embassy_in_Te
hran © Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain
license

Chemical_weaponl © GFDL is licensed under a CC BY
(Attribution) license

2880px-Logo_Petroleos_Mexicanos.svg © Jorge Diaz
Serrano is licensed under a Public Domain license

528 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

* Vargas_e_Roosevelt © Unknown is licensed under a
Public Domain license

* Eva_Duarte_de_Peron_en_Esparia © Numa Ayrinhac
is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

* President_Eisenhower_and_John_Foster_Dulles_in_1
956 © Unknown is licensed under a Public Domain
license

* CheOnRaftl952 © Unknown is licensed under a Public
Domain license

* CheyFidel © Alberto Korda is licensed under a Public
Domain license

* 1962_Cuba_Missiles_(80848755396) © CIA is licensed
under a Public Domain license

* Operemm-2 © Presidencia de la Nacién Argentina is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

« Frederik_de_Klerk_with_Nelson_Mandela_-
_World_Economic_Forum_Annual_Meeting_Davos_1
992 © World Economic Forum is licensed under a CC
BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

* Hoover-JEdgar-LOC © Marion S. Trikosko is licensed
under a Public Domain license

+ F-86-4fiw © USAF is licensed under a Public Domain
license

* File written by Adobe Photoshop? 5.2 © NASA is
licensed under a Public Domain license

* West_and_East_Germans_at_the_Brandenburg_Gate
_in_1989 © Lear 21 is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

[12]

Neoliberal Globalization

The term Globalization has a modern sound to it, and an
air of inevitability. But what does it really mean? What are the
consequences of political and economic decisions made by
governments and transnational business corporations? And
what does Neoliberal refer to? What's new about the agenda
described by this adjective, and what's liberal?

529

530 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Panamax container ship SHENZHEN BAY transiting the Panama canal.

At its most basic, globalization refers to business activities
and the actions of governments beginning to be conducted on
a worldwide scale. As we've seen, this has been happening
throughout the modern period we've been covering, if not
before. The voyages of Zheng He, the European colonial project
in the Americas, the Atlantic Slave Trade, and the activities
of the British East India Company in India and China were
all conducted at a worldwide scale, and all had commercial
elements. Conflicts such as the Seven Years War, the War of 1812,
and World Wars | and II have also involved multiple continents.
And events like the Columbian Exchange, which made
American staple crops available to feed growing world
populations, and the “Spanish Flu” pandemic which killed up
to 500 million people throughout the world, also had global
consequences.

Modern World History 531

As we begin to look at the most recent wave of economic and
political globalization, big commodities like petroleum become
prominent again. Twentieth-century economic colonialism
involving oil was not limited to the Persian Gulf. As we have
seen, before Iran, Iraq, and Saudi Arabia became leading
producers, Mexico was a heavy supplier of oil to the US in the
1920s. In 1938, Mexican President Lazaro Cardenas invoked the
new, 1917 Mexican Constitution to nationalize all oil production
in Mexico.

The constitution, which had been written during the Mexican
Revolution, stated that the nation owned all the subsoil assets
of Mexico, and Cardenas formed the government-owned oil
company PEMEX to extract and refine Mexican petroleum
resources. Although the corporations (particularly Royal Dutch
Shell and Standard Oil) objected loudly, Franklin Roosevelt’s
administration, which was busy implementing the New Deal
at home to ease the impact of the Great Depression on the
American people, acknowledged the right of the Mexican
people to control their own resources. Soon, the advent of
World War II encouraged the Allied nations to put anti-fascist
solidarity before the losses of a couple of U.S. corporations.
PEMEX prospered and became Latin America’s second largest
corporation in 2009 (after Petrobras, the Brazilian national oil
company).

532 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

As I’ve mentioned earlier,
development of Venezuela’s
oil resources (thought to be at
least 1/5th of known global
reserves) began in the 1910s,
when the country’s president
granted concessions to his
friends to explore, drill, and
refine oil - and_ these Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez ona
concessions were quickly sold visit to Brazil in 2003.
to foreign oil companies. In
1941 a reform government gained power which quickly passed
the Hydrocarbons Law of 1943 which allowed the government
to claim 50% of the profits of the oil industry. The outbreak of
World War II increased demand for oil to such an extent that
the government was able to grant several new concessions in
spite of the 50% tax. The postwar explosion of automobile
ownership in the U.S. continued to drive demand and push oil
prices higher, and Venezuelan production increased. Venezuela
bought the Cities Service company and CITGO gas became a
key export of Venezuela. In 1976, the government nationalized
the oil industry. Oil was a mixed blessing for Venezuela,
providing high levels of revenue for the government but also
preventing Venezuelan industry from diversifying. In recent
decades, Venezuela used its oil revenue to pay for a wide range
of social welfare programs for its people. The U.S. criticized
these policies as socialist, but they were rarely done without
widespread popular support in Venezuela. Hugo Chavez, who
was president from 1998 to his death in 2013, criticized the U.S.
government vehemently but also continued the Venezuelan
policy of giving free heating oil to hundreds of thousands of
poor people in the US and Europe.

Questions for Discussion

Why did President Franklin Roosevelt decide not to intervene

Modern World History 533

on behalf of foreign oil companies in Mexico?

What was Venezuela's motivation for nationalizing its oll and
then giving some away to poor people in the U.S.?

After increasing during the Arab oil embargo of the 1970s
and then peaking during Russia’s invasion of Afghanistan in the
early 1980s, oil prices languished in the late 80s, exacerbating
the Soviet Union’s economic problems. In the early 1990s after
the Soviet breakup, Russia began exporting millions of barrels
daily into the world market. The dissolution of the U.S.S.R. and
the Warsaw Pact accelerated the globalization of commerce.
Globalization in this new phase is characterized by increased
foreign investment by transnational corporations, privatization
of state enterprises, free movement of capital across national
borders, and a reduction of tariffs that impede the movement of
products. A wave of deregulation accompanied these changes,
as nations competed to attract businesses that were suddenly
free to locate themselves anywhere resources, labor, and
environmental costs were lowest.

This free movement of
capital across national
borders was heralded by
western pundits as the final,
decisive victory of the free
market over socialism and
communist totalitarianism. In
Russia, people who had been
President Boris Yeltsin handing the members of the political elite
Presidential Emblem to Vladimir Putin. were suddenly in position to

buy up state-owned assets the
government was selling at fire-sale prices. These opportunities
were especially lucrative during Vladimir Putin’s
administration, which began in 1999 when Putin became Prime
Minister while Yeltsin was still president. The new Prime
Minister had previously been a K.G.B. counter-intelligence


534 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

officer in East Germany, who had become Director of the F.S.B.
(the successor to the K.G.B.) in 1998. Putin's friends and allies
did extremely well in the sell-off of Soviet state industries. With
the spike in oil prices in the early 2000s these men made vast
fortunes and became some of the billionaire oligarchs we now
see running the Russian economy for their own benefit. The
change to capitalism in Russia did much less than it might have
to benefit the general population because the oligarchs captured
so much of the profit. The man who captured the most profit
seems to have been Vladimir Putin himself. Putin’s net worth
in 2018 was estimated around $200 billion, or about twice the
wealth of Jeff Bezos and four times that of Bill Gates, the two
men who then topped the Forbes list of the world’s richest
people.

Question for Discussion

+ Why might a leader such as Alexander Putin wish to hide his
wealth?

One of the important
forces driving globalization has been the removal of
protectionist trade policies around the world. This trend began

Modern World History 535

in 1947 with the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
(GATT), a free-trade agreement of 23 noncommunist nations.
Over time, GATT reduced average tariff levels between member
nations from 22% in 1947 to just 5% in 1999. The World Trade
Organization (WTO) that followed GATT is a more permanent
agreement that covers trade in services and intellectual
property as well as physical products. The WTO, headquartered
in Geneva, has 164 member states including, recently, China.
Although the WTO’s charter calls on it to “ensure that trade
flows as smoothly, predictably, and freely as possible”
throughout the world, critics argue it favors rich nations over
poor nations; especially in its binding arbitration processes that
function like an international trade court, whose decisions take
precedence over local or even national court judgments. Global
corporations that can deploy teams of lawyers (or even station
them permanently in Geneva) to argue in their interest seem
to have a disproportionate influence on WTO decisions. The
process is designed to take a year (or 15 months with appeals)
and the WTO says that since 1995, over 500 disputes have been
brought and 350 rulings have been issued. Most of these rulings
have benefitted the transnational corporations, often at the
expense of workers, consumers, and the environment.

Fortune Global 500 list of 2020

Rank ¢ Company ¢| Country Industry ‘| Revenue in USD ¢
1 Walmart United States | Retail $524 billion
2 Sinopec Group WiChina Petroleum $407 billion
3 State Grid WChina Energy $384 billion
4 China National Petroleum | ij China Petroleum $379 billon
5 Royal Dutch Shell Sretheriands | Petroleum $362 billion
6 ‘Saudi Arameo HB Saudi Arabia | Energy $330 billon
7 Volkswagen Germany ‘Automobiles $283 billion
8 8p {5% United Kingdom | Petroleum $283 billion
9 ‘Amazon.com BS United States | Internet Services and Retailing | $281 bilion
10 _| Toyota Motor © Japan ‘Automobiles $275 billion

The 2020 Fortune Global 500 Top 10 corporations.

Transnational corporations are uniquely suited to take
advantage of this new world economy. Technically there are
about 50,000 global corporations, but the number of
corporations that are as important as states in the world

536 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

economy is a bit smaller. Last year’s (2020) Fortune Magazine
Global 500 was topped by Walmart, Sinopec Group (a Beijing-
based oil and gas company), State Grid (the Chinese national
electric company), China National Petroleum (another Beijing-
based oil and gas company), and Royal Dutch Shell Toyota.
The next five on the list are Saudi Aramco (oil company),
Volkswagen, BP, Amazon, and Toyota. Placement on this list is
based on revenues, which is similar to the GDP used to measure
the size of national economies. If Walmart was a nation, it would
be larger than all but 23 of the 211 members of the United
Nations.

Questions for Discussion

What are the implications of the top global corporations
being larger than all but the largest nations?

How might a greater shift toward China in the "Top 500’ list
affect the world balance of political power?

Free trade and “laissez faire” capitalism are typically believed
to be a “conservative” value, so some people have been
surprised to see the recent Republican (Trump) administration
opposing agreements like NAFTA and TPP and the Democrats
(Clinton, Obama, Biden) supporting them. Globalist trade
policies have often been called “neoliberal,” but this is another
confusing term. The elements that make this ideology “Neo”
are in many ways the opposite of liberalism. Since the
Enlightenment in social and political thinking that preceded
the American Revolution, “liberal” has referred to a focus on
expanding the rights and liberties of regular people, often
against the power of governments. Today the liberties being
protected by neoliberalism are often those of corporations,
which in many cases have gained so much power over the lives
of regular people that they are a more immediate threat than
governments.

Modern World History 537

President Bill Clinton watching V.P. Al Gore debate Ross Perot about NAFTA.

NAFTA was an example of neoliberal policy that increased the
liberty of corporations at the expense of people. In a 1992
presidential debate, billionaire Reform Party candidate Ross
Perot argued:

“We have got to stop sending jobs overseas. It’s pretty simple: If
you're paying $12, $18, $14 an hour for factory workers and you
can move your factory south of the border, pay a dollar an hour
for labor,..have no health care—that’s the most expensive single
element in making a car—have no environmental controls, no
pollution controls and no retirement, and you don’t care about
anything but making money, there will be a giant sucking sound
going south”

Perot went on to explain that although in the long run and from
a global perspective, globalization makes economic sense, it was
not necessarily good for America. He said,’when [Mexico’s] jobs
come up from a dollar an hour to six dollars an hour, and ours
go down to six dollars an hour, and then it’s leveled again. But
in the meantime, you've wrecked the country with these kinds
of deals.” Perot ultimately lost the election, and the winner, Bill
Clinton, supported the North American Free Trade Agreement,
which went into effect on January 1, 1994.

538 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

The aim of NAFTA was to create a free-trade zone in North
America and eliminate tariff barriers that made American
exports more expensive in Mexico and Mexican exports more
expensive in the U.S. Among the results, Mexico has risen to the
second largest market for U.S. agricultural products, especially
meat. Mexico has also become a large consumer of U.S. corn
which receives extensive subsidies from the U.S. government.
Cheap American corn has impacted the ability of Mexican
farmers to compete and has also impacted the biodiversity of
maize, which you'll remember was originally developed in
Mexico. Indigenous varieties are threatened by the
monoculture of U.S.-developed hybrids - and since corn is
wind-pollenated, the indigenous varieties are in actual danger
of being lost. The danger of losing the genetic diversity of
Mexican maize is that monocultures are vulnerable -
remember the Irish potato famine? A pest or disease that wiped
out Monsanto’s GMO corn would be bad for the company, but
it would become a global disaster if scientists had no other
varieties they could use to produce a new, resistant hybrid. Corn
is the leading staple crop in the world. Do we really want to put
all our eggs in one basket?

Although the proponents of NAFTA claimed and predicted
that the trade agreement would benefit all three nations, about
eleven months after the agreement went into effect, the Mexican

Modern World History 539

economy melted down. In late 1994, after Mexican investors
decided to put their now-mobile capital in more stable
investments abroad, the Mexican government was forced to
devalue its currency and implement painful deflationary and
austerity programs in order to get a bailout from the IMF. The
experts and pundits all agreed that NAFTA was not to blame,
and for the most part, the press either ignored or
misrepresented the Mexican financial crisis, which it nicknamed
the Tequila Crisis.

Perhaps the greatest effect of NAFTA on Mexico has been
the rise of Mexican factories called maquialadoras which were
located just south of the border and made products for the US
market. In the five years after NAFTA’s 1994 implementation,
maquila employment nearly doubled. These factories in border
towns adjacent to the U.S. manufacture goods using supplies
shipped to them duty-free, which they then ship back north.
By 2004, maquiladoras accounted for 54% of Mexico’s exports
to the U.S., and U.S. exports had grown to 90% of Mexico's
total exports. The advantages for U.S. manufacturers were lower
wages than the U.S. (in 2015 the Mexican hourly wage averaged
$0.55) and fewer environmental and worker-safety regulations.

540 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Although Mexico has fairly strict labor laws, maquiladoras are
immune and the majority of workers are young women who are
less likely to organize. As low as the pay is, after the Mexican
recession of the 1990s these jobs sometimes pay better than
other available work for poor Mexicans. However, the gains
in Mexican employment have been matched by losses in the
USS. As Perot had predicted, until wages for factory workers in
Mexico rise substantially, workers in the United States will not
be able to compete for these jobs. Despite the U.S. recession in
the early 2000s and competition from other even lower-wage
areas like Asia, there are still over 3,000 maquiladoras along the
US-Mexican border.

Questions for Discussion

Why did NAFTA receive so much bipartisan support in the
USS. before its passage?

Were the overall affects of NAFTA positive or negative for the
us?

Who benefitted the most? Who suffered most?

TPP, the Trans-Pacific Partnership, was designed to be NAFTA
on steroids. TPP was established in 2016 to create a common
market for countries bordering the Pacific. It sought to
eliminate tariff and regulatory barriers to trade between most
of the nations on the Pacific rim, to create a common market
between Asia and the west coasts of North and South America.
TPP would also to establish an Investor-state dispute system that
would allow global corporations to sue countries for practices
they deem to be discriminatory. This means that if a national
government tries to set a national minimum wage, mandate
worker rights or safety regulations, or protect the environment,
corporations can sue to have the laws changed or can demand
compensation for their “losses”.

Modern World History 541

Map of TPP. Dark green are members; light green nations interested in joining.

Critics argue this raises the status of corporations to make them
equal or even superior to sovereign nations, allowing them to
sue in an “Investor Court” that would favor their interests over
the rights of citizens passing laws to safeguard workers’ rights,
the environment, or other local concerns that impact the global
corporation’s profits. This is another way neoliberal policies
subvert the democratic institutions created by the original
liberalism of the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries.
Ironically, NAFTA already includes an investor-state court
system for the U.S., Canada, and Mexico, but since most of
the companies that would use this system are U.S.-based, it
is not seen as being an issue for Americans. TPP would be a
much bigger source of lawsuits from transnational corporations
not originally based in America and the U.S., which has higher
minimum wages, worker safety standards, and environmental
regulations, would probably be a target of many.

In 1999, protestors picketed
meetings of the WTO in
Seattle and in 2011 Occupy
‘Wall Street protested wealth
inequality in New York.
President Trump’s move in
January 2017 to withdraw the
U.S. from TPP was applauded

. i ~~ Banner from the 1999 WTO protest in
by Progressives like Bernie seattle.

Sanders and Elizabeth

542 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

‘Warren. In rare agreement with Trump, Sanders said, “For the
last 80 years, we have had a series of trade deals...which have
cost us millions of decent-paying jobs and caused a ‘race to
the bottom’ which has lowered wages for American workers.”
On the other hand, mainstream Republicans like Senator John
McCain criticized what he called “a troubling signal of American
disengagement in the Asia-Pacific region at a time when we can
least afford it.” McCain’s concerns may have been genuine, but
in the last five years of his life, McCain’s campaign committee
and PAC raised and spent about $17 million dollars, mainly from
corporations like General Electric and Pinnacle West Capital
that had an interest in the success of TPP. The support shown
by “centrists” of both political parties in the U.S., and the
opposition of populists on the left and right wings of both
parties, suggests a growing sense among regular people that
both parties are under the control of their political donors, and
no longer governing for the people.

Questions for Discussion

In what ways might TPP be more challenging for the U.S. than
NAFTA?

What do you make of the agreement of “Populists” on the left
and the right over U.S. trade policy?

An important element of the shift away from a U.S.-centered
globalization is the growing economic power of Asia. Japan’s
economy was jump-started after WWII by U.S. aid including
a $2 billion direct investment and letting Japan off the hook
for war reparations. Japanese goods were also given preferential
access to U.S. consumer markets, so the Japanese economy
focused on low-wage industries producing products for export
to America. The United States no longer considered Japan a
threat, but rather as a potential ally against communist China.
The Japanese people, already quite accustomed to austerity,
complied with their government’s new industrial policy and

Modern World History 543

Japan reinvested its earnings and rapidly grew from a producer
of cheap knock-off copies of American products to an innovator
in high technology.

Other Asian nations like
Singapore, South Korea, and
Taiwan followed in Japan’s
footsteps in the 1960s and
70s, often also with aid from
the U.S. designed to slow the
spread of communism during
the Cold War. After the death
of Mao Zedong in 1976, Deng
Xiaoping gained power in
1978 and China began shifting
toward a market economy in
which the government would
direct development with
incentives rather than decrees

Chinese leader Deng Xiaoping with US on _
President Jimmy Carter in 1979. and directives. In addition to

a plentiful supply of cheap
labor, China had high savings rates and Deng’s devaluation of
the nation’s currency allowed Chinese savings and foreign
exchange surpluses to be invested in securities like American
government bonds. This made China the world’s bank, as
nations like the U.S. fell deeper into debt. Finally, a rising
standard of living in China has created a new middle class and a
huge consumer market.

In 2002, ninety percent of the Chinese population lived in
poverty, with seven percent listed as middle class, two percent
upper-middle class, and one percent considered affluent by
world standards. By 2012, the number of poor in China has been
reduced to twenty-nine percent. Two thirds of the poor (nearly
a billion people) have improved standards of living, in one of
the most momentous shifts in world history. Fifty-four percent
of Chinese in 2012 were considered middle class, and that fifty-
four percent is expected to rise to upper-middle class status by
2022, with another twenty-two percent moving from poverty
into the middle class, leaving only sixteen percent of Chinese
people in poverty. This is nearly the same income demographic

544 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

we see in nations like the U.S., which has a ten percent poverty
rate. China is becoming a dominant force in the world economy
once again, and the increased spending power of the Chinese
people will soon drive the global market. Chinese demand for
items like automobiles is expected to outpace the rest of the
world for the foreseeable future. Companies like Foxconn,
which began as a contract manufacturer of low-tech items like
computer cases, has become a nearly $5 billion manufacturer
of the highest tech items like Apple iPhones and computers.
Lenovo, which began as a Hong Kong PC clone company in
1984, has been the world’s largest personal computer maker
since 2013. Lenovo acquired IBM’s PC division in 2005, and the
famous IBM ThinkPad became a Chinese product. Lenovo does
about $45 billion in annual revenue and was the world’s largest
cell-phone maker until 2016 when it was overtaken by Apple
and Samsung.

»

As Chinese purchasing power increases, world industry is will
be challenged with producing consumer goods without
exhausting finite resources or destroying the environment.
Chinese cities have been known for their pollution, especially
for their poor air quality. An increasingly affluent population
may become less willing to tolerate environmental destruction,
which might be a positive change. Hopefully, Chinese interest

Modern World History 545,

in projects such as the Belt and Road Initiative, which seeks
to connect China with the rest of Asia, Europe, and Africa in
a “New Silk Road”, will include a commitment to the
environments of the places China finds its natural resources
and markets for consumer goods, rather than the approach to
hinterlands taken by earlier world economic powers, in which
out of sight often meant out of mind.

Questions for Discussion

In what ways was the U.S. instrumental in creating the “Asian
Tiger” economies?

How did Mao Zedung’s death change Chinese economic and
trade policy?

The European Union grew

out of a 1957 trade agreement

1957 that expanded on GATT to
form the European Economic

Community (EEC) including

France, Belgium, West

Germany, the Netherlands,

and Luxembourg. Like

NAFTA, the EEC reduced

tariffs and other barriers to

~ trade. In 1998, the European
Union was formed including
the original EEC members as
well as Austria, Denmark,
Finland, Greece, Ireland, Italy, Portugal, Spain, Sweden, and the
United Kingdom. In 1999, 16 member nations adopted a single
currency, the Euro, although Sweden and the UK retained the
Krone and the Pound Sterling. The English financial district
called the City of London has always been a center of European
banking and finance, and the British were desperate to protect

4
a
Growth of the European Economic
Community/European Union.

546 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

the Pound against the German Deutschmark and the growing
power of the Frankfurt-based European Central Bank. In the
early 2000s several Eastern European nations joined, bringing
membership up to 28 nations. Most of these new members
adopted the Euro as well, and after the global financial crisis of
2007-8, the Eurozone established emergency loan procedures
that allowed richer members to bail out the economies of
poorer members in exchange for what the lenders termed
economic reforms. Borrowers often viewed these reforms as a
takeover of their economies and harsh austerity programs.

In June 2016 the United Kingdom held a referendum and in
a shocking nationalist vote the majority decided to leave the
European Union. Brexit is scheduled to go into effect at the
end of March 2019. The residents of Scotland and Northern
Ireland both voted to remain in the EU, but their votes were
outweighed by the English and they will be forced to leave along
with the rest of the UK. The Republic of Ireland will remain an
EU member, which will complicate the situation on the border
between Ireland and British Northern Ireland. The economic
impact on Britain is difficult to calculate, but EU nations seem
disinclined to allow Britain to retain the favored trade status
it currently enjoys. And although many British people and
politicians wished to reverse the decision to leave, the EU was
unwilling to pretend the Brexit decision never happened.
During 2020, an eleven-month transition period was agreed
upon, to allow negotiators to establish post-Brexit policies. At
the end of 2020, an agreement seems to have been reached that
will allow the UK and the EU to continue trading without tariffs
in 2021.

Modern World History 547

Question for Discussion

What were the arguments for and against “Brexit"? Which do
you find more compelling?

In addition to the increase in international trade, global
culture has been permanently changed by communications
technology. Computer networks and cell phones continued a
process begun with the printing press, the telegraph, radio, and
television. Each of these technologies has been used to spread
ideas to wider audiences, often against the wishes of those in
power. More recent inventions like fax machines, data
communication via modems, the internet, and most recently
smart phones and social networks have been used to spread
news of events like the Tiananmen Square protests, the Arab
Spring, and the Egyptian Revolution of 2011. In spite of the
efforts of some nations like China and Saudi Arabia to censor
media and limit internet access, it is increasingly difficult to
firewall societies from the global media culture.

548 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Because the virtual world is
becoming as important to the
global economy as _ the
physical world of “bricks and
mortar” commerce and
communication, let’s take a
moment to review the
technological, government,
and business changes that arpaneTin 1970
enabled it. One of the first
computer networks was the semi-automatic business research
environment (SABRE) launched by IBM in 1960, which initially
connected two mainframe systems and grew into an airline
reservation system. In 1963, American psychologist and
computer scientist JCR Licklider proposed a concept he called
the “Intergalactic Computer Network” when he became the first
director of the Pentagon’s Advanced Research Projects Agency
(ARPA). Licklider described it as “an electronic commons open
to all, the main and essential medium of informational
interaction for governments, institutions, corporations, and
individuals.”

ARPANET, begun in 1969, was a network of networks, joining
government facilities and research universities on a system
dedicated to official communications. It was permissible for
researchers and users to occasionally communicate personally
with each other using email. Commercial and_ political
communications, however, were strictly forbidden. A computer
scientist named Ted Nelson developed the basic ideas that
became hypertext and the web between 1965 and 1972. Nelson’s
version of hypertext was based on the idea that there would be a
“master” record of any document on the network. Exact copies
of that document (which Nelson called transclusions in his 1980
book, Literary Machines) would point back to the original. Ideally,
rather than just referring to the original, they would actually call
up the original document wherever possible, eliminating the
proliferation of copies.


Modern World History 549

Photo of the Hypertext Editing System (HES) console in use at Brown University, circa
October 1969.

This ideal was never really achieved, because even though
storage was expensive, bandwidth was even scarcer. This is
unfortunate, because the existence of bi-directional links would
have allowed the owner of a document to know where and when
it was used, and to have received compensation for its use. Two-
way linkage was much more difficult to implement than a one-
way hyperlink that launched the user to a new place on the web.
Apple co-founder Steve Wozniak compared the two in a speech
about Nelson in the 1990s, saying one-way linking was a cool
hack, while two-way linking required computer science.

Questions for Discussion

How do computers and communication networks affect
world culture and politics?

What do you think the internet would be like now, if it had not
originally been a scientific/government network?


550 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

After the introduction of Apple Macintosh and IBM Personal
Computers in the 1980s and the growth of online
communication and file-sharing using services such as
Compuserve and Prodigy in the early 1990s, in 1992, an online
game provider called Quantum Link that had renamed itself
America Online offered a Windows version of its free access
software. AOL free trial CDs became ubiquitous; CEO Steve
Case claimed that at one point in the 90s half the CDs produced
worldwide had an AOL logo. By the mid-1990s, AOL had passed
both Prodigy and CompuServe, and in 1997 more than half of
all U.S. homes with internet access got it through AOL. The
economic power of the online access was becoming apparent: in
1998 AOL acquired Netscape, in 1999 MapQuest, and in 2000
AOL merged with Time Warner.

The commercial nature of
subscriptions like AOL stood
in sharp contrast, for a while,
to the early internet. The
inventor of the World Wide
Web, Tim Berners-Lee, was a
scientist at CERN in
Switzerland when he wrote
“Information Management: A
Tim Berners-Lee's NeXT computer, the Proposal” in March 1989.
world’ first web server. Somebody jotted on the front

page of the paper, “Vague but
exciting”, and Tim was given time to work out the details on a
NeXT computer in his lab. By October 1990, Berners-Lee had
written the three basic technologies of the web: HTML
(Hypertext Markup Language), the formatting language of the
web; URI (Uniform Resource Identifier, AKA URL), which
contains the protocol (http, ftp, etc.), the domain name
(example.com), and folder and file names (like /blogs/index);
and HPPT (Hypertext Transfer Protocol), which allows retrieval
of linked resources.

Being a government-funded research facility, CERN decided
to make the protocols freely available, but it was the


Modern World History 551

development of the MOSAIC browser by graduate student Marc
Andreessen in 1993 that made Berners-Lee’s inventions the
solid basis of the web. Andreessen graduated, moved to
California and met Jim Clark, who had recently left Silicon
Graphics. They formed Netscape and made their browser,
called Navigator, available for free to non-commercial users.
Netscape Navigator was destroyed by Microsoft's decision to
bundle its own browser, Internet Explorer, with Windows 95.
Microsoft made it very difficult for PC manufacturers or even
users to uninstall IE and use Netscape and Java, which led to
an antitrust case in Feb 2001, in which the court ruled that
Microsoft had abused its monopoly powers. Netscape never
recovered from losing the “first browser war” however, and was
acquired by AOL in 1999.

From 1991 (when there was only one at CERN) to 1994, when
Yahoo launched, the number of websites rose to 2,738. The
following year, when Altavista, Amazon, and AuctionWeb began,
the number of websites had increased nearly tenfold to 23,500.
In 1998, when Google launched, the number of websites had
jumped tenfold again, to 2,410,000. The early years of the web,
known as Web 1.0, were a period when people with modest
skills could acquire a domain and build a website. One of the
first powerful and intuitive apps for building websites and pages
was Microsoft's Frontpage. It was a Windows app that provided
a WSIWYG design interface and output usable HTML code.
Millions of people used the program to build personal and small
commercial websites. Discontinued in 2008, Frontpage was not
replaced by anything with similar power and ease of use. Partly
this is because in Web 2.0 the do-it-yourself (DIY) element of
the web has largely disappeared.

In 1999, a new generation of the web called Web 2.0 was
announced, which claimed to focus on participation by users
rather than people simply viewing content passively. One
example of this participatory nature of the new web is the
proliferation of social media. Another is people posting videos
on YouTube. The web has also become a site of commerce
though, so the most important instance of “participation” by
web users is as consumers buying stuff - either web content

582 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

like Netflix videos or iTunes music, or real-world goods on e-
commerce sites like Amazon.

Map of the internet about 2005.

By 2001, when Wikipedia began, there were over a half billion
internet users and over 29 million websites. There were a billion
users in 2005, when YouTube and Reddit began, but growth
had slowed to only 64,780,000 websites and a much larger
percentage of them were commercial rather than personal. By
2010, when Pinterest and Instagram launched, there were 2
billion web users and the number of websites had actually
declined from the previous year for the first time, to about
207,000.

In the 2010s the rest of the world caught up to the US in web
use and website building. By 2015 there were well over 8 billion
people using the web and by 2017 there were 1.7 billion websites.

Modern World History 553

Since then the number of websites has decreased, dropping by
nearly 10% per year. And about three quarters of these new
websites aren’t active, but are parked domains or redirects. The
actual number of sites in active use is probably closer to
200,000.

For people who wanted a presence on the web but didn’t have
the skills or interest to own a domain or code a website, what
some have called web 2.5 saw the beginning of social networking
sites. The biggest of these from 2003 to 2008 was called
Myspace. People could create a profile page, post images and
multimedia, and see what their friends were up to. It was much
less structured than what we're used to today, allowing users
a lot of flexibility to personalize their pages. Myspace was
overtaken by a service, Facebook, that provided even more ease
of use and uniformity. Facebook is extremely easy to use, which
may be why it has recently become the place for grandparents
to stalk millennials.

Questions for Discussion

Most of the hardware and software you use was developed
during your lifetime. Do you think this has implications for a
“generation gap" between your generation and your parents’
generation?

The final element in the story of computing and networks
involves the battle between free, open resources and commerce,
which we've already seen in the growth of the web. Operating
systems in early mainframes and personal computers were
tightly controlled by manufacturers like IBM, Digital
Equipment Company, or Hewlett Packard, software businesses
like Microsoft (DOS and Windows), and a number of
workstation companies like Sun Microsystems and Silicon
Graphics, which each owned a proprietary version of an
operating system that had originally been developed by
researchers at AT&T Bell Labs (which was prevented by an anti-

554 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

trust ruling to get into computers) and the University of
California, Berkeley. The Uniplexed Information
and Computing Service, called UNIX,
had originally been more or less open,
but had become commercialized when
AT&T sold its rights to a network
software company, Novell, which later
sold those rights to Santa Cruz
Operation (SCO). In time, other
organizations released versions which
only ran on their hardware (and often
cost thousands of dollars), including
IBM (AIX), Microsoft (Xenix), Sun
Microsystems (Solaris), SGI (IRIX) - all

roprietary distributions with similar

unctionality.

In 1991, Finnish graduate
student Linus Torvalds
became frustrated with the
high cost of UNIX. He wrote
an operating system kernel in
C, which he planned on
calling Freax. Instead, early
users called it Linux. The
open-source operating
system rapidly gained
popularity among hackers
due to its free distribution
and its easy configurability. A
programmer could configure
the Linux kernel with just the
features desired, which led to
an explosion of both OS
distributions (Red Hat, Debian, Ubuntu, Darwin, Android) as
well as uses in embedded systems which were becoming
popular. PC manufacturers like IBM and Dell adopted Linux as
an option to reduce the cost of their systems and break

Linus Torvalds in 2002

Modern World History 555,

Microsoft’s monopoly on the OS. Linux became especially
popular for running file servers and internet routers, replacing
expensive proprietary systems like IRIX, Microsoft NT, and
Cisco. And organizations like NASA discovered that clusters of
networked off-the-shelf PCs running Linux could rival the
computing power of proprietary supercomputers. Companies
like Sun and SGI found the markets for their workstations and
servers disappearing overnight. Currently all the systems on the
Top-500 supercomputer list run Linux.

Question for Discussion

How did the development of open source operating systems
like Linus change the economics of high tech?

Fifteen years ago, China
had no computers on the
Top-500 list. Today it owns
the top two spots. The #2
machine, which was the
world’s fastest supercomputer
from 20138 to 2016, uses Intel
Xeon CPUs. But in 2015, the =
U.S. government banned the
sale of these processors to
China. The official reason for the ban was national security
concerns, but many suspected a desire to recover the status as
the world’s fastest computer for America may have been a
strong motivation as well. China responded by very rapidly
shifting to using its own Sunway CPUs, based on a new
architecture and instruction set completed in 2016. The Sunway
processors reportedly have 260 cores and the “Taihulight”
supercomputer built from them runs at up to 125.44 petaflops (1
petaflop = one thousand million million floating point

Top 500 Supercomputers by country.

556 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

operations per second), a lead the US and Japan are unlikely to
be able to catch up with anytime soon.

As computing power enables increasingly complex artificial
intelligence (AI) systems that can control financial trading
systems, power grids, and scientific research, the challenges of
national technology competitions become apparent. But even
the new web technology has its dark side. Social media has been
implicated in helping cause the genocide in Myanmar against
the minority Rohinga population. Russian meddling and
manipulation of Facebook data by a company called Cambridge
Analytica may have influenced the 2016 Brexit vote. Foreign
hacking and social media manipulation were both alleged
during the 2016 and 2020 US presidential election, although it’s
unclear whether the intervention changed the outcome. In the
course of investigating charges of Russian interference, details
have come to light of just how compromised social media sites
like Facebook have become and how much of their users’ data
they hold. And in 2018 American whistleblower Edward
Snowden released information to journalists showing that
intelligence agencies such as the NSA and British GCHQ are
systematically invading the privacy of citizens in a number of
illegal ways. As a result of these disclosures, Snowden has been
forced to live in exile in Russia. It is not clear, however, whether
the practices have been discontinued.

Modern World History 557

Question for Discussion

Which do you think is a greater threat to the future: foreign
domination of high performance computing or the
government's invasion of citizen privacy? Why?

Finally, even when there’s not an adversary regime like Russia
spreading disinformation, Social Media algorithms create “filter
bubbles” in which people only see information that doesn’t
threaten their world-views. In an attempt to generate greater
advertising revenues, social media platforms and search engines
routinely direct users to information that will attract and hold
their attention for the longest time possible. The objective of the
algorithms is not necessarily to promote a certain worldview,
but simply to keep the user engaged as long as possible so that

558 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

more ads can be placed and sold. However, as a result, users
are directed to information that conforms with their “profile” of
beliefs and biases. When information that does not conform to
the user’s preconceptions is presented, it is often presented in
an adversarial way, to generate anger (which is another way to
insure engagement). News and information are tailored either
to conform to audiences’ beliefs and prejudices, or to outrage.
As time goes on, people on different sides of issues can literally
find themselves living in different worlds, basing their beliefs on
different data, and believing the other side is irrational and evil.

A YouTube element has been excluded from this version of the text.
You can view it online here: https://mipp.pressbooks.pub/
modernworldhistory/

Some have argued that global media access disproportionately
benefits nations like the U.S. which has a multi-billion-dollar
content-creation industry, and that it spreads values some
societies disapprove of, including consumerism and
pornography. Even in the U.S. and the developed world, the
internet is changing from the democratic, peer-to-peer sharing
institution it was designed to be, into a platform for commerce

Modern World History 559

and media consumption. In the early days of the internet,
communication was text-based because bandwidths were low.
The advent of fiber optic network backbones in the 1990s and
the worldwide web created the opportunity to communicate
using images and ultimately streaming video. 4G and 5G
cellular networks allow media to be streamed to smartphones
and tablets. This rapidly expanding bandwidth created an
opportunity for the internet to replace broadcast television just
as it had replaced the analog, landline telephone network. But
access may not be universally available for long.

As technology exploded, many people expected a renaissance
of DIY content-creation, and the explosion of websites, blogs,
vlogs, podcasts, Instas, snapchats and YouTube channels has
definitely expanded the ability of regular people to be heard.
Five billion YouTube videos are watched daily and 300 hours
of video are uploaded every minute. On the other hand, more
content is produced for the web by global corporations daily,
and the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) has begun
to eliminate net neutrality so corporations can buy “fast-lane”
access that will turn the web into just another platform for
corporate media. The promise of the early internet was that
even though corporations participated, it was basically a peer-
to-peer platform. Eliminating net neutrality could potentially
kill that, unless hackers can come up with a new disruptive
technology that allows the people to stay ahead of the
corporations. If corporations can pay to have certain types of

560 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

data or media fast-tracked, they can also pay to have other
types of information slow-tracked or even suppressed. Imagine
if a group with deep pockets and a political agenda could start
editing what you can see on the internet. Oh wait. Don’t imagine
it. It’s already happening.

Questions for Discussion

Why are “filter bubbles” a problem?
Do you think technology has led to cultural imperialism?

What is the danger of a loss of network neutrality?

Media Attributions

* Panamax_container_ship © Williamborg is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

* 1599px-Pemex_gas_station © Magister Mathematicae
is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

* Hugo_Chavez_in_Brazil-1861 © Carlosar is licensed
under a CC BY (Attribution) license

¢ Vladimir_Putin_with_Boris_Yeltsin-3 © Kremlin.ru is
licensed under a CC BY (Attribution) license

+ WTO. © Samhitha Bhat is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

* Screen Shot 2020-12-28 at 9.29.56 AM © Wikipedia is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

* photograph-of-president-william-j-clinton-watching-
vice-president-albert-gore-b3b7cc-small © National
Archives is licensed under a Public Domain license

* GEM_corn © USDA is licensed under a Public Domain

Modern World History 561

license

Maquiladora © Guldhammer is licensed under a Public
Domain license

TPP_enlargement © Hanzlan is licensed under a CC
BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

1600px-WTO_protest_sign_ (14988892087) ©
Kingofthedead is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license
Deng_Xiaoping_and_Jimmy_Carter_at_the_arrival_c
eremony_for_the_Vice_Premier_of_China._-
_NARA_-_183157-restored(cropped) © National
Archives is licensed under a Public Domain license

1280px-One-belt-one-road.svg © Kjerish is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

Enlargement_of_the_European_Union_77 © JLogan is
licensed under a Public Domain license

800px-Anti-
Brexit,_People’s_Vote_march,_London,_October_19,_.
2019_05 © Ilovetheeu is licensed under a CC BY-SA.
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

ARPANET_1970_Map © UCLA and BBN is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

HypertextEditingSystemConsoleBrownUniv1969 ©
Greg Lloyd is licensed under a CC BY (Attribution)
license

First_Web_Server © Coolcaesar is licensed under a CC
BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

Internet_map_1024_-_transparent,_inverted ©
Kesaperuna is licensed under a CC BY (Attribution)
license

Linus_Torvalds © Unkonwn is licensed under a CC BY-
SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

2880px-
TOP500_Supercomputers_by_Country_June_2016.sv
g © sim_graph is licensed under a CC BY-SA

562 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

(Attribution ShareAlike) license

* 11584878615_d9ca4e86el_z © Eddie Codel is licensed
under a CC BY-NC-SA (Attribution NonCommercial
ShareAlike) license

* NN-save-the-internet © Joseph Gruber is licensed
under a CC BY-ND (Attribution NoDerivatives) license

[13]

Limits to Growth?

‘Are human societies able to continue growing forever, or are
there limits to the Earth's carrying capacity?

One of the most basic but often overlooked aspects of human
interactions with the environment that has come to the
attention of historians and more recently the public is the
impact of population growth and resource scarcity. There are a
number of reasons society prefers to avoid thinking about the
danger of having too many humans around. We like people.
Especially those who are close to us. And historically, the growth
of our own particular group has been important for our survival
and therefore has been desirable. In the past, people haven't
always been too concerned if the success of their particular
community came at the expense of their neighbors. But
recently that neighborhood has expanded to cover the whole
globe.

564 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

There’s an — economic
concept called the zero sum
game which says that in many
situations, for every winner
there has to be a_ loser.
Especially when societies face
scarcity, attention focuses on
how a shrinking or too-small
pie is divided up. Since the
industrial revolution though,
Westerners have been able to
live outside of the
constrictions of zero sum
logic. To a great extent, this

Thomas Robert Malthus, one of the first abundance and sense that the
philosophers to concern himself with the
question of overpopulation

pie was growing was based
first on the increase in staple
foods made available throughout the world by the Columbian
Exchange and the Green Revolution, and also by the harnessing
of fossil fuels such as coal and oil. But that doesn’t mean
Westerners have been unaware of the question. At the very
beginning of the modern age, an English economist named
Thomas Robert Malthus (1766-1834) published a short book
called An Essay on the Principle of Population. Malthus’s theory,
published in 1798, became instantly controversial on both sides
of the Atlantic. Thomas Jefferson sent a copy of the book to his
favorite economist (Jean-Baptiste Say) and asked for an opinion.

Malthus stated his basic idea like this: “The increase in
population is necessarily limited by the means of
subsistence...the population does invariably increase when the
means of subsistence increase, and ..the superior power of
population is repressed and the actual population is kept equal
to the means of subsistence only by misery and vice.” Another
way of saying that is, population grows as long as there is food
and water to support it, and when these resources run out,
population is brought back down through famine, disease, and
war. These three causes of depopulation are often termed
“Malthusian disasters.”

Modern World History 565

A Quantity

Population

Malthusian catastrophe
Production of food

Time

The Malthusian catastrophe simplistically illustrated

Malthus went on to observe that populations tend to increase
geometrically: two people become four, four become eight,
eight become sixteen, etc. In contrast, he said, food supplies at
best increase only arithmetically: two bushels of wheat become
four, which become six, which become eight. By this logic it is
easy to see that a society can easily outrun its ability to feed
itself if the population is not kept down by reducing births
or increasing deaths, and to understand why early modern
Europeans were so obsessed with acquiring new territories to
improve their food production abilities.

The famines, diseases, and wars of European history gave
Malthus the examples he needed of the types of crises that
tended to reduce populations. If society was going to avoid these
periodic disasters, he argued, then it would need to find some
way of limiting the birthrate to avoid starving. The Malthusian
theory, as it is called, was intensely controversial right from the
start. One of the reasons was that it advocated birth control.
Malthus himself only called for what he termed “moral
restraint” to help reduce the birth rate, but many Malthusians
had more active contraceptive measures in mind. The idea of
limiting reproduction was seen by most religious people as a
violation of the injunction to “be fruitful and multiply,’ and

566 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

eliminating the risk of pregnancy was seen as an
encouragement of vice and an invitation to sin. Over two
centuries later, we have not left these arguments behind.

FGA Clobal deaths in conflicts since the year 1400

The other big controversy surrounding Malthusian thought
was that it was used by some members of the British upper
classes to argue that the conditions of the poor should not be
improved. If poor people had higher wages and more to eat,
they argued, they would have more children and more of their
children would survive, which would put unnecessary stress on
the social system and in the long run lead to mass starvation.
The poor simply had to suffer, they said, or society was doomed.
Some critics accused these upper-class Malthusians of simply
wanting to hoard more of everything for themselves. But some
of them sincerely believed that there just wasn’t enough to go
around, and that adding more hungry mouths wasn’t good for
the poor or the rich.

It turns out, however, that the assumption held by Malthus
and those members of the British upper class (and by many
people today) that feeding the poor would lead to a population
explosion is actually untrue. Population scientists today agree,
after studying societies all over the world, that as economic
security increases, a “demographic shift” occurs and birth rates
decline. In other words, if the poor have enough to eat, infant
mortality rates and people’s fear of starving in their old age

Modern World History 567

decrease. Death rates of children decline and as a result parents
needing to insure that someone will survive to take care of them
in their old age have fewer children. Educating women is the
other major factor demographers have credited with reducing
birthrates. Both factors have contributed to a demographic shift
in the developed world where family sizes have decreased from
an average of six children per family in the early nineteenth
century to 1.6 in the twentieth. Many developed nations now
face decreased growth or even shrinkage in their native
populations.

In spite of the developed world’s success limiting population
growth by providing education for women and a social safety
net, the argument is still raging regarding the “developing
world.” The Gates Foundation recently started a campaign
called #StopTheMyth. A few years ago Melinda Gates made a
short video titled “You Decide: Save the People or Save the
Planet,” claiming that the issue is still very poorly understood.
Gates compared two nations, Afghanistan and Thailand, which
currently have populations of similar size. She pointed out that
in Afghanistan, where 10% of children die before the age of five,
population is expected to nearly double by 2050. In Thailand,
on the other hand, the number of children dying has decreased
substantially. And so has the birthrate. “Clearly,” Gates
concluded, “letting children die now so they don’t strain the
planet later doesn’t really work. It’s a myth.”

568 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

YouTube element has been excluded from this version of the text
You can view it online here: https://mlpp-pressbooks.pub/
modernworldhistory/2p=

The other assumption you may have noticed in the
Malthusian theory was that food production is expected to
increase much more slowly than population. As we have already
seen, this has not been the experience of the nineteenth and
twentieth centuries. New staple crops from the Americas,
abundant land, fertilizers, and technology created a global
Green Revolution that has allowed us to continually outrun
Malthus for the last two centuries. But an agricultural scientist
named Karl Sprengel noticed in 1828 that plant growth was
limited by the availability of the essential nutrient with the
lowest concentration. Sprengel’s contemporary, biologist Justus
von Liebig, realized this idea had wider applications and
popularized it as Liebig’s Law, which became a key idea in
ecology. The Law states that growth is dictated not by the total
resources available, but by the scarcest resource, which he called
the limiting factor. So the question is, will we be able to keep

Modern World History 569

outrunning Malthus forever, or will a limiting factor end our
exponential growth?

Questions for Discussion

Why did Malthus worry that overpopulation would lead to
chaos?

What has prevented a Malthusian catastrophe so far?

Why do you think Melinda Gates felt she needed to set the
record straight on population?

Until very recently in human history, the Earth has been so
big and the total human population relatively so small, that the
resources available to us have often seemed infinite. In 1800
there were fewer than a billion people on the planet. In 1900
there were still less than two billion. By 1960 there were three
billion, and in 1999 there were six billion. Current world
population is about 7.7 billion people. During this dramatic
increase, there were periods like the early industrial revolution
when worriers like Malthus and his followers expressed doubts
and anxiety.

Malthus had no idea that his nation was about to expand its
empire into Africa and Asia, or that emigration to the Americas
and Australia would continue to reduce populations at home.
And of course he couldn't anticipate advances in technology
or the demographic effects of increasing economic security we
have just considered. But sometimes even these advances
proved temporary or subject to disruption.

The population of Ireland boomed in the first decades of the
nineteenth century, as potatoes increased the calories available
to poor people and seemed to eliminate the threat of famine.
The Irish population peaked at over 8 million in 1841, based
on the potato. About a third of all Irish people ate no other
solid food, and lived on a diet of milk and potatoes. Worse, the
entire nation (indeed all of Europe) grew just a single variety
of potato, called the Irish Lumper. The blight that attacked this

570 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

monoculture and destroyed potato harvests for several years in
Ireland and throughout Europe killed over a million people and
forced a million more to flee to America. The Irish population is
about 4.8 million today, a little more than half its peak 175 years
ago. As the science of ecology developed in the second half
of the twentieth century and we began to distinguish between
renewable and nonrenewable resources, and to worry about
the dangers of depending on monoculture food supplies.
Malthusian anxiety has returned.

‘AYouTube element has been excluded from this version of the text.

You can view it online here: https://mlpp.pressbooks.pub/
modernworldhistory/2p=

In 1968 Stanford University Biology professor Paul R. Ehrlich
published a sensational book called The Population Bomb, that
was an instant bestseller. It began with the statement, “The battle
to feed all of humanity is over. In the 1970s, hundreds of
millions of people will starve to death in spite of any crash
programs embarked upon now. At this late date, nothing can
prevent a substantial increase in the world death rate.” Ehrlich
became an instant celebrity and publicized his theories of social

Modern World History 571

collapse on popular media like Johnny Carson’s Tonight Show.
Ehrlich’s scenarios inspired some great dystopian science
fiction, but luckily they did not happen in the way Ehrlich had
predicted. Actually, a couple hundred million people did die of
hunger in the decades after The Population Bomb was published.
It’s hard to tell exactly because when the United Nations
reported worldwide deaths in the 1970s and 80s, it specifically
omitted deaths from hunger. But these deaths did not reduce
world population overall or result in the social chaos that
Ehrlich had prophesied.

The Population Bomb may have done more harm than good
in the long run, by making worry over the population issue an
easy target for critics. But people remained concerned about
the rapid increase of the world’s human population. In 1972 an
international organization called The Club of Rome published
a study titled The Limits to Growth. Unlike Ehrlich’s sensational
predictions of doom, The Limits to Growth applied mathematical
systems modeling to five particular variables: world population,
industrialization, pollution, food production, and natural
resource depletion. The researchers used newly-available
computer technology to produce a study that illustrated the
complex interactions of these variables by showing three
potential future outcomes. In two of these scenarios, the global
system experiences what the researchers called “overshoot and
collapse” in either the middle or toward the end of the twenty-
first century. In the third scenario the computer models arrived
at what the researchers called a stabilized world system.

572 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

resources 4

food per
capita

lo} lo}
lo) oO
fo) ial

N

World Model Standard Run as shown in The Limits to Growth, which the authors claim
has been validated by the data from the last thirty years.

In 2008, the original authors of The Limits to Growth returned
to their models and published a 30-year review of how accurate
their predictions had been. They found that measurements of
all the variables they had identified were tracking with the
predictions the computer models had made for an “overshoot
and collapse” scenario. The accuracy of the predictions the
study had made for the short term does not prove their longer-
term predictions were accurate, of course. However, the findings
do suggest that further study might be in order.

uestions for Discussion

Modern World History 573

What monocultures do we depend on today that might make
us vulnerable, similar to the Irish potato situation in the 19th
century?

Why did Paul Ehrlich’s book possibly do more harm than
good?

Do you think the possibility of social collapse, even if
uncertain, is something we should study more closely?

4 T T T

proven reserves
250x10 © bbls

umulative Future discoveries
production 910x10 ° bbls
0x10 ° bbls

Production (10 ° bbls/yr)

1850 1900 1950 2000 2050 2100 2150 2200

‘tar

Abell-shaped production curve, as originally suggested by M. King Hubbert in 1956

Not all the warnings that humanity is reaching resource limits
have come from university academics or international think-
tanks that are naturally distrusted by regular people and
corporate leaders. Marion King Hubbert was an American
geophysicist working for Shell Oil in 1956 when he presented
a research paper to an oil industry trade group The American
Petroleum Institute, where he showed that for any geographical
area (and by implication, for the planet as a whole), petroleum
production follows a predictable bell-shaped curve. Hubbert’s
theory, which became known as Peak Oil, correctly predicted
that oil production in the continental US would peak between

574 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

1965 and 1970, and then begin to decline. Hubbert also
predicted that world oil production would peak “in about fifty
years.” Although the data and especially its interpretation are
very controversial, several credible sources suggest that the peak
in world production happened between 2003 and 2004, right
on Hubbert’s schedule.

Petrochemical prices can be expected to rise as supplies
diminish. Currently, new technologies such as fracking and
converting tar sands have added some new sources to the supply
we now designate as “petroleum.” These new additions do not
refute the logic of Hubbert’s predictions, although they do
potentially push back the timing of the supply crunch that we
would expect to raise prices. Two elements of The Limits to
Growth's computer mode, industrial production and food
supplies, depend heavily on the price of energy, and a third
(pollution) is an issue for both fracking and tar sands processing.
A reduction of the supply of oil, an increase in its cost, or
an increase in pollution could all have a significant negative
impacts on those variables.

Hubbert’s words actually echoed Malthus. “Our principal
constraints,” he said, “are cultural. During the last two centuries
we have known nothing but exponential growth, and in parallel
we have evolved what amounts to an exponential growth
culture. Hubbert said our growth culture is “so dependent on
the continuation of exponential growth for its stability that it
is incapable of reckoning with problems of non-growth.” These
are not the words of some dewy-eyed environmentalist or crazy
academic or sensationalist. Hubbert was an oil industry analyst.
Some have argued that possible future discoveries of more oil
could postpone society’s shift to a non-fossil fuel energy
economy. But even the oil industry for the most part agrees that
production will decline. So the question we are left with is, how
quickly will we use up what remains? And, given what we have
learned in the last decade about the effect of burning fossil fuels
on the global climate, should we?

uestion for Discussion

Modern World History 575

What did Hubbert mean by an “exponential growth culture’?

Some climate activists have
begun to suggest that for the
sake of the environment, we
ought to switch from fossil
fuels to other energy sources
as soon as possible and leave
as much as possible of what is
left in the ground. The
argument against burning the
rest of the oil (and coal) is that
fossil fuels are one of the

biggest contributors of
atmospheric carbon that
leads to global warming.

Global temperature in the Common Era
°F

3 4 20

3 10-

E 15

& Indirect temperature

& 51 measurement 510

2 os/ measureme

& 0s

So 0

3

6 47-05
05+ Direct measurement after 1880 _/ 4
Yearo 500-1000 1500 2000

Global surface temperature reconstruction
over the last millennia using proxy data
from tree rings, corals, and ice cores in
blue. Observational data is from 1880 to
2019.

While this is true, other factors such as deforestation and even
agribusiness release comparable amounts of carbon. Simply
stopping the use of oil will not solve the whole climate change
problem, although it is a key element of the change society
needs to make to stabilize the global climate.

576 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Carbon dioxide emissions Land use
by source since 1880
Coal

Oil

Gas

Other
1880 1900 1920 1940 1960 1980 2000 2018

But because energy is such a large part of the economies of
developed nations, any change is heavily contested. Global
energy corporations have an incredible ability to influence
politics. A few years ago BP (British Petroleum, established in
1908 as the Anglo-Persian Oil Company and now operating in
72 countries) issued an “Energy Outlook” report for the year
20385. BP claimed that Hubbert’s Peak Oil scenario was actually
incorrect and announced the company’s intention to burn just
as much as possible over the next two decades. BP’s claim that
oil production hasn't peaked, however, depended on redefining
the word oil to include both tar sands and biofuels such as
ethanol. Ethanol production depends not only on the energy-
intensive production of surplus corn and cane sugar (used in
Brazil as the primary plant source), but in government subsidies
that keep the prices of these commodities below their cost of
production. So it’s hard to see how biofuels could legitimately
be called a new source of “oil.”

Climate change, more than any other environmental concern,
has dominated the attention of Americans in recent years (and
has in many cases pushed pollution off the table, which is
unfortunate). Although the idea that the planet’s climate has
been adversely affected by human activity is very controversial
in the media, politics, and popular culture, it is almost
universally accepted by scientists. According to NASA, at least

Modern World History 577

97% of climate scientists agree that global warming over the past
couple of centuries is due to human activities, or anthropogenic.
American and international science organizations like the
American Geophysical Union, the American Meteorological
Society, and the American Medical Association, in addition to
the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, have all gone
a step further, agreeing with the American Physical Society, “We
must reduce emissions of greenhouse gases beginning now.”

Worldwide CO, Emissions
(2018; by region; per capita; growth)

ve re Ay peep LRH

. ae eo re)

Population (ions)

Per capita carbon emissions by country. Height = per capita emission; width = size of
population. Color = rate of change.

Of course who they mean by “we” is unclear, and the penalties
for heeding their warnings are really hard to specify. We often
hear that “The forecasts show that it is China, India, and the
other emerging economies that are increasing their carbon
dioxide emissions at a speed that will cause dangerous climate
change. In fact, China already emits more CO2 than the USA,
and India already emits more than Germany.’ This objection
came from a European Union environment minster, speaking at
the World Economic Forum at Davos in 2007. The population
of China is 1.886 billion. India is 1.839 billion, USA 327 million,
Germany 82.79 million. That means that although China emits
more total CO2 than the US, on a per person basis, we still
emit twice as much (15.7 tons per person to China’s 7.7 tone).

578 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

Similarly, on a per capita basis, Germany emits more (9.7 tons)
than China, and five times more than India (1.8 tons per capita).
While it’s important for China and India to get their carbon
emissions under control, it is unacceptable for Europe and
America to try to shift the blame when we still outproduce them
on a per capita basis. Especially since most of the carbon now in
the atmosphere was put there by us.

Questions for Discussion

Why is atmospheric carbon a global rather than a regional or
national problem?

Why is it misleading to compare current total carbon
emissions between countries in trying to assess “blame”?

CLASSIC
TRAILER

A YouTube element has been excluded from this version of the text.


Modern World History 579

You can view it online here: https://mlpp.pressbooks.pub/
modernworldhistory/2p=85

Climate science is complicated and it can be difficult for some
people to understand. And to make matters worse, most
Americans share a belief system that distrusts science and
scientists, because science seems to contradict their most
cherished religious doctrines about the nature of the world and
their place in it. To make matters even worse, concern over
climate change has been identified with a particular political
orientation, with people like former Vice President Al Gore
seeming to suggest that if people aren't alarmed by climate
change, they’re monsters who don’t love their children. The
claim that only liberals care about the environment is not only
absurd, but it ignores the traditional meaning of the word
conservative. In reality, this is not a liberal vs. conservative issue.
However, in addition to the negative reaction many people had
to the tone of messages like the trailer above, the argument
against recognizing climate change and doing something about
it has also been carefully managed and funded by political
action committees and foundations representing corporations
that oppose changes in fossil fuel energy policy.

Academic studies of scientific consensus
on human-caused global warming

Carlton
2015

Although 97% of climate scientists agree on anthropogenic

580 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

climate change, when Americans are asked by pollsters, “Do
most scientists believe that the Earth is getting warmer because
of human activity?” 55% say either “No” or that they don’t know.
Less than half of Americans are aware that scientists are
basically unanimous on this issue, and thinking that scientists
are unsure affects their own opinions about climate change and
the the government policies they are willing to support to
mitigate it. A recent study found that most of the public
statements against climate change made from 2003 to 2010
could be traced to about 91 organizations which received
$558,000,000 in funding during that period. From 2003 to
2007 this money was easily traceable to sources such as Exxon-
Mobil and Koch Industries, two corporations opposed to any
changes in energy policy.

With the changes in foundation funding that followed the
2008 Citizens United Supreme Court decision that allowed
corporations to hide their political spending, the sources of
money paying for climate change denial have been more
difficult to trace. Ultra-free market foundations and even a few
religious organizations like the John Templeton Foundation pay
the bills of websites like Climatedepot.com that go out of their
way to label any scientist endorsing climate change a “Warmist”
who is probably working for Al Gore in an effort to regulate
every aspect of our lives in some big global prison state. Climate
deniers warn of the “command economies” they claim
environmentalists wish to impose, using language designed to
rile up libertarians and free market enthusiasts and mobilize
them against changing the economy in ways that although they
would be very bad for big oil companies, would almost certainly
create millions of new jobs.

A Recent study found that conservative think tanks funded by
energy corporations play a central role in “denying the reality
and significance of anthropogenic global warming (AGW),
especially by manufacturing uncertainty over climate science.”
The conservative think tanks sponsored the publication of 108
books denying climate change through 2010. American think
tanks have also recently begun funding publishing in foreign
countries to spread their message.

The study also examined the credentials of the authors and

Modern World History 581

editors of these climate change denial books and found that “an
increasing portion of denial books are produced by individuals
with no scientific training. It appears that at least 90% of denial
books do not undergo peer review, allowing authors or editors
to recycle scientifically unfounded claims that are then
amplified by the conservative movement, media, and political
elites.”

1.0°C

Global average temperature change

0.5 °C

1850 1875 1900 1925 1950 1975 2000

One deceptive approach is cherry picking data from short time periods to falsely assert
that global average temperatures are not rising. Blue trend lines show short-term
countertrends that mask longer-term warming trends (red trend lines). Blue dots show
the so-called global warming hiatus.

582 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

= 7 This is unfortunate, to say

the least. While Germany is
becoming a world leader in
solar energy deployment, in
spite of receiving only as
much sunlight as Alaska, and
while Britain is mapping its
shift to a post-oil based
economy with its “transition
The Solar Settlement, a sustainable towns,” many Americans
Coreen Project in Freiburg, continue wasting their time
arguing over the make-
believe issue of climate change denial. Most economists agree
that there are currently more jobs in the renewable energy
sector than in the fossil fuel sector, and that trend is going to
increase. The overall economy would be better off, if we shifted
to sustainable energy sources and reduced carbon emissions. Of
course, the global petroleum industry would be decimated, so
they're spending their money trying to slow the transition.

Of nearly 14,000 peer-reviewed climate articles published
between 1991 and 2012, only 24 reject global warming. There
really isn’t any doubt that the Earth’s climate is changing in ways
that are going to cause serious social disruption in the future.
When political leaders say there is still doubt about the need to
address climate change, we should follow the money to discover
why. Our unwillingness or inability to understand the situation
causes us to continue being manipulated by organizations
interested in maintaining the status quo, and may mean that our
choices in the future will be much more limited than they need
to be.

Questions for Discussion

How does politicizing the climate debate make it more
difficult to find solutions?

What motivates some organizations to resist the idea that
humans have caused global warming?


Modern World History 583

+ Would addressing climate change more rapidly hurt or help
the global economy?

Media Attributions

1920px-
Thomas_Robert_Malthus_Wellcome_L0069087_-
crop © John Linnell is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

2880px-Malthus_PL_en.svg © Kravietz is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license
2880px-Wars-Long-Run-military-civilian-fatalities ©
Max Roser is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license
2560px-Limits-to-growth-figure-35.svg ©
YaguraStation is licensed under a CC BY-SA
(Attribution ShareAlike) license

2880px-Hubbert_peak_oil_plot.svg © Hankwang is
licensed under a CC BY (Attribution) license

2880px-Common_Era_Temperature.svg © Efbrazil is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

2880px-CO2_Emissions_by_Source_Since_1880.svg ©
Efbrazil is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license
2880px-2018_Worldwide_CO2_Emissions_(by_region
,per_capita),_variwide_chart © Tom.schulz is
licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike)
license

2880px-20201209_Academic_studies_of_scientific_co
nsensus_-_global_warming,_climate_change-en.svg ©
RCraig09 is licensed under a CC BY-SA (Attribution
ShareAlike) license

584 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

* 20200327_Climate_change_deniers_cherry_picking_
time_periods © RCraig09 is licensed under a CC BY-
SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

* SoSie+SoSchiff_Ansicht © Andrewglaser is licensed
under a CC BY-SA (Attribution ShareAlike) license

[14]

Appendix A: Choosing a Chief
Executive and Voting

Three Branches of Government: Legislative, Executive and
Judicial

Since the late 18th century, many republics have separated
governmental responsibilities into three branches, the
legislative, executive and judicial.

The legislative branch (usually called a congress, parliament,
or assembly), writes laws (including those that raise revenue)
and appropriates funds for governmental departments and
agencies. Some legislative branches have two chambers—for
instance, the United States has a Senate in which states have
equal representation, and a House of Representatives, whose
members are apportioned according to each state’s population.
Bills—proposed laws—need to pass through both chambers.

The executive (a president or prime minister on the national
level, or governor on a state level, or mayor on a city level)
administers and enforces the laws passed by the executive
branch, while generally conducting foreign policy. They select
members of their “cabinet,” usually with the approval of the
legislative branch, who are called secretaries of departments
(like in the U.S.) or ministers of ministries. These individuals
run the agencies created by the legislatures to address various
social and economic aspects of society. Foreign policy is mainly

a
60.
a

586 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

run through the chief executive and a foreign minister (the
“Secretary of the State Department” in the U.S.). Local, state,
and national executives enforce laws through the police and the
operation of prisons, while national chief executives are often
the commanders-in-chief of the armed forces.

The judicial branch is made up of the courts, who interpret
the laws, determining whether or not a law has been broken.
The highest court (for instance, the Supreme Court in the U.S.)
decides whether or not particular laws are “constitutional,”
following the foundational law of the country.

How Democracies Choose a Chief Executive

Democratic countries choose the chief executive through
either a _ presidential, parliamentary, or presidential-
parliamentary system.

The Presidential System

In the presidential system, citizen voters choose the chief
executive (usually called a “president”). In addition to the
executive powers described above, the president can also veto
laws passed by the legislative branch, which then usually need
a super-majority (like two-thirds of all members of each
chamber), to pass the law “over” the presidential veto. This
system originated in its modern form in the U.S. Constitution.
It is also common in most Latin American countries.

The United States has its own indirect method of choosing a
president, which is unique in the world: The Electoral College.
Technically, in a presidential election, U.S. voters do not directly
choose a presidential candidate, but instead vote for “electors”
who are pledged to vote for a certain candidate. The number
of electors for each state is the number of Senators (always
two) plus the number of Representatives in the House of
Representatives (which is allocated based on population). The
least-populated states have a minimum of three electors
(example: North and South Dakota); the most-populated state
(California) has 55; Minnesota and Wisconsin each have ten; and
Iowa has seven. Because of this system, it is mathematically
possible for a candidate to win the popular vote and lose the
electoral college vote—most recently, this happened in the
2000 and 2016 elections.

No matter how the president is chosen, the presidential

Modern World History 587

system can result in the situation of a president from one
political party and a legislative branch (Congress) led by another
party. Because of this “divided government,’ critics point out
that it is difficult to legislate, while others claim that it is an
important check on executive power. Recent examples in the
US. include most of the Clinton presidency, the last two years
of George W. Bush presidency, and most of the Obama
administration. In the last two years of the Trump
administration, the House of Representatives had a Democratic
majority while President Trump was a Republican as were most
members of the Senate.

Another potential check on executive power in the
presidential system is the process of impeachment, in which
the legislature can decide to remove a president from office for
criminal activity.

The Parliamentary System

In a parliamentary system, citizens elect the members of the
legislative branch (usually called a “parliament”), which then
chooses the chief executive (usually called the “prime minister”
but referred to as the “chancellor” in Germany). In most cases,
the legislative branch has only one chamber instead of two.

The system originated in Great Britain and is common in
many former British colonies (i.e. Australia, Canada, New
Zealand, and Jamaica). Parliamentary systems sometimes
include a monarch involved in the government, but usually as
a figurehead who holds only symbolic power (i.e. Great Britain,
Spain, Netherlands, and Sweden).

The Prime Minister is usually a member of the largest party,
which means that legislation is more easily passed; it is
impossible for the executive branch to be controlled by one
party and the legislative branch controlled by another, as has
occurred frequently in the U.S.

Parliament has the right to vote against a prime minister,
which may force a new election. This especially happens in a
multi-party system, where a Prime Minister needs the support
of coalitions of several political parties: if one party decides to
not support the Prime Minister, there are new elections.

Presidential-Parliamentary system: Two chief executives

588 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

In this system, voters elect both a president and a parliament;
the parliament also chooses a prime minister.

The system is common in countries that previously had
monarchs (Germany, France, Italy, Iraq, and India) but not
always (Israel). Like most monarchs, the president in this case
is frequently just a figurehead who only holds symbolic power,
but not always (for instance, in France).

Sometimes the president plays a key role in multi-party
democracies in which the president asks the head of a political
party to form a government, usually in coalition with other
parties. A historical example we discussed earlier was
Germany’s Weimar Republic. This is how Hitler became
chancellor. When a parliament votes against a prime minister,
the president may ask some other party to form a government
instead of calling for new elections.

Voting Systems in Democracies

There are several ways in which elections can be organized in
democracies.

Winner-take-all

In this system, the candidate with the most votes wins,
meaning they can win with a plurality rather than a majority
of votes. It is common in most elections in the United States,
especially in choosing members of Congress and in choosing
presidential electors.

Winner-take-all usually results in a two-party system, as in
the U.S., since voters feel that they are “wasting” their votes
if they choose a third-party candidate. This often results in
people voting against candidates they don’t want rather than
for candidates they do. They reason that the candidate they
actually prefer might take votes away from the “lesser-of-two-
evils” candidate, resulting in a government that they really do
not want.

Still, this voting system may result in candidates winning with
less than a majority of the vote when there are more than three
viable candidates (such as the U.S. presidential elections of 1992,
1996, 2000, and 2016; Minnesota Senate election of 2008;
Minnesota elections for governor from 1998 through 2010).
Some criticize this system since voters are limited in their
choice of candidates; others argue that the additional system of

Modern World History 589

“primary elections’—in which voters choose which candidate
will represent a party in the “general election’—gives all voices
a chance to be heard.

Proportional Representation

This system is only used in legislative elections. In
proportional representation, voters choose a party; parties are
assigned their number of seats in a legislature based on the
percentage of votes that the party wins.

Fictional example: 100 seats in the Minnesota Senate,
elected statewide by proportional representation

Democratic Party: | 30%—380 seats

Republican Party:  35%—35 seats

Independence Party: 20%—20 seats

Green Party: 15%—15 seats

Proportional representation almost always results in a multi-
party system, since voters do not feel that they are “wasting” a
vote on a third party, since every party wins something (if they
reach a certain percentage of total votes).

The system of choosing who will represent the party varies; it
may occur before the elections (parties draw up an ordered list
of potential representatives) or on the day of the election (voters
choose both the party and the individual, so that vote tallies for
individuals determine the order of potential representatives).
In the fictional case described above, if the Republicans won 35%
of the vote, the first 35 individuals on their list would win a seat
in the legislature.

Combined with a parliamentary or a_ presidential-
parliamentary system of government, a multi-party situation
frequently means that a prime minister is chosen as part of
a coalition of parties, if no party has a clear majority in the
legislature. This is the current situation in Germany, Italy, and
Israel.

Fifty Percent Plus One

Candidates in this system must win at least a simple majority
of votes (fifty percent plus one); if this does not happen, the top
two vote-winners compete in a second (run-off) election.

This system is common in choosing presidents in both the
presidential and presidential-parliamentary systems (an
important exception is the U.S.). It encourages a multi-party

590 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

situation, while preventing a candidate from being elected with
only a small plurality. This system is used in some
Congressional elections in the U.S. (Texas currently has this
system). Historical example: Electing the President in the
Weimar Republic.

Ranked Choice Voting

A variation of the “fifty percent plus one” system is called
Instant Run-Off Voting (IRV), where voters rank their first
choice, then their second choice, and then their third choice. If
no candidate receives more than 50% as a first choice, the next
count is limited to the top two vote-getters, with the second-
choice votes cast by those whose first choice lost added to the
top two vote-getters. This system is currently being used in the
Twin Cities in elections for city council and mayor.

[15]

Appendix B: Finance and Taxes

Basics of Banking: Lending Money at Interest

Banks earn a profit by lending money at interest; when
borrowers pay back what they owe, they also pay the bank
a percent above the amount lent. Borrowers include both
individuals who want to purchase homes and consumer goods,
and businesses which are financing their operations or investing
in their own expansion.

To acquire money to lend, banks do at least two things: attract
depositors by guaranteeing to pay them interest on their savings
accounts; and borrow money from other, larger banks. In most
countries, banks can also borrow from a central government-
run bank (called the Federal Reserve in the United States). Also,
in some countries (including the United States), banks make
investments in stocks, bonds, and other financial instruments to
earn higher rates of return.

What is Money Worth?

Like any commodity—corn, soybeans, cars, shoes—the value
of any currency is based on supply and demand: high demand
and low supply raises the value of money, while low demand
and high supply lowers the value. The trick to remember,
however, is that if there is a high supply and low demand of
a currency—too much money in the money supply—the value
of money drops, so prices actually go up. The consumer needs

592 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

more currency to buy things if the market feels that there is too
much of it. This is called inflation.

Until the early 1970s, most national currencies were “backed”
by gold (and silver); in other words, its “worth” was
denominated in metal. Since that time, countries have
generally based the value of their currency on whatever the
domestic and international financial markets determine it to be
(through the concept of supply and demand explained above).
Almost always, international finance is denominated in U.S.
dollars (although the Euro, the British pound, the Chinese yuan,
and the Japanese yen are also important international
currencies).

As seen in the example of hyperinflation during the Weimar
Republic in Chapter 8, too much money in the money supply
may mean that wages chase prices, which in turn chase wages;
causing an inflationary spiral with people losing their savings to
buy basic food items. However, the example of hyperinflation
reveals one positive aspect to inflation: it is easier to pay off
debts since the new currency is worth less than what was
borrowed.

Normal inflation, therefore, can be a good thing, since it can
encourage borrowing to buy things: what you borrow today
may not be worth as much by the time you pay off your loan.

However, defining what is “normal” inflation, and achieving
that level, is the challenge faced by banking systems. Usually
central banks in each country play a key role in determining the
money supply; in the United States, that is the Federal Reserve
System—the “Fed.”

Financial Concepts in the U.S.: Inflation and the Federal
Reserve System.

The Federal Reserve System was established in the United
States in 1913 during the period of activist government known as
the Progressive Era. Other countries already had government-
run central banks, and the U.S. had experimented with this
idea in the 1820s and 1830s, but had abandoned it, relying
exclusively on the private banking system.

A few years before the Fed existed, in 1907, a financial crisis
broke out, called the “Bankers’ Panic.” Banks stopped lending
to businesses and to each other, fearing that they would not

Modern World History 593

be paid back, threatening the stability of the U.S. economy.
However, private banking tycoon J.P. Morgan stepped in, lent
money to banks that were on the verge of collapse, and
investors’ confidence in the financial system was restored.

After the panic, many people began thinking that maybe
having the entire U.S. banking system dependent on a single
private citizen was a bad idea, and that the U.S. should adopt the
“central bank” concept from other countries. Thus, the Fed was
organized. There are checks and balances involved: members
of the Federal Reserve board and its chair are appointed by the
US. President for set terms of office; and their appointments
need to be approved by the Senate.

Interest Rates, Banks, and Lending

The Fed lends money to banks at interest, which then lend
to each other and to the rest of the economy at a higher rate
of interest. The interest rate banks use to lend to each other
is called the prime rate. It is usually three percentage points
above the Fed’s interest rate to the banks. For example, if the
Fed's rate is 1%, then the prime rate is 4%. Banks make profits by
lending money at interest—but they have to also pay back the
Fed.

The banks that borrow from other banks establish a higher
interest rate than the prime rate for loans to businesses and
personal borrowers. Borrowers are typically required to pay
back at least the monthly interest rate plus a bit of “principle”
(the original amount borrowed).

The bank’s rate may fluctuate for individual borrowers based
on how much confidence a bank has that they will be paid back.
This decision is based on a “credit rating” which is established
by private companies like Standard and Poor's and Moody’s.
The credit rating is measured by determining previous
borrowing history and how well a borrower reliably pays back
their loans (including on credit cards). Banks also consider
other factors, for both individuals and businesses, such as
savings and other investments, before lending money.

If a bank or other lending institution has less confidence in
a borrower, they will charge a higher interest rate. This means
the borrower would have to make higher required monthly
payments—the reasoning is that if they borrower eventually

594 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

stops making payments, at least more of the debt will be paid off
to the bank up front.

Controlling the Money Supply: The Fed’s Interest Rate and Monetary
Policy

As mentioned, the Federal Reserve plays an important role
in determining interest rates. It uses this power to establish a
healthy rate of inflation or to help stimulate the economy.

Consider the following problems and their solutions:

Problem—High inflation. Solution—Fed raises
interest rates.

If the Fed's rate goes up, the prime rate goes up and
banks, businesses, and consumers borrow less and buy
less because borrowing gets too expensive. This means
less money in the money supply, which controls
inflation. However, high interest rates may also slow
down the economy because businesses will invest less
and consumers will not buy as much.

Problem—Slow economic growth or a recession.
Solution—Fed lowers interest rates.

If the interest rate goes down, banks, businesses, and
consumers borrow more and buy more. This stimulates
the economy. However, lower interest rates may lead
to inflation—more money in the money supply—or to
investors taking too many risks (the fundamental
problem behind the 2008 Financial Crisis).

The Fed's Monetary Policy, 1979-Today

In the late 1970s and early 1980s, when there was a recession
with over 10% inflation and high unemployment, the Fed raised
interest rates and the prime rate went up to control inflation.
At the time, banks actually competed with prizes and other
incentives to attract depositors, including establishing high rates
of interest on savings accounts. People spent less and saved
more, which also affected the money supply. The policy also
deepened the recession, in the short run.

After the crisis began to fade, the Fed gradually lowered
interest rates, just in time for the huge technology boom of the

Modern World History 595

1990s. New companies borrowed more at low interest rates.
However, when the tech boom slowed down around 1999, the
Fed lowered interest rates even more to stimulate the economy.
This policy led to increased borrowing to buy real estate, which
indirectly led to the 2008 Financial Crisis.

Since 2008, the prime rate has been very low, sometimes
barely above 0%, in order to stimulate economic growth. In the
US., the recovery was gradual but sustained—jobs were added
to the economy for every month from mid-2009 until the
beginning of the 2020 Coronavirus Pandemic.

The Fed and Quantitative Easing: Another Tool in the Toolbox

At the beginning of the 2008 Financial Crisis, the Fed also
began a policy of “quantitative easing.” This means that the
Fed buys bank debt—what banks borrow from the Fed or other
banks—so that banks can lend money instead of using it to
pay off their own debts. This also stimulates the economy by
encouraging more lending.

The Fed Compared to Other Central Banks: No “Sovereign Funds”

Unlike other central banks—for instance, those of China and
Japan—the Fed does not make investments. In the case of China
and Japan and other countries, central banks maintain
“sovereign funds” by buying investments in their own countries,
or in others. In this way, these sovereign funds purchase U.S.
government debt by buying U.S. bonds (see below).

Taxes, Government Borrowing and the World Economy

Taxes and Government Revenue

Taxes pay for government services (military, police, prisons,
education, infrastructure, Social Security, etc.), but there are
several different kinds of taxes. For instance in the United States,
the U.S. federal government raises revenue by taxing—taking
a percentage—of individual income and corporate earnings.
The federal government also raises revenue through some sales
taxes, especially on gasoline, alcohol and tobacco. Customs and
tariffs (taxes on foreign imports) are still around but are a lot less
important than they were in the nineteenth century as a source
of revenue.

State governments in the U.S. are more likely to raise revenue
through sales taxes and fees for certain government services
(license plates, hunting licenses, etc.) Sales taxes are a

596 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

percentage of the purchase price of consumer goods, but not
all goods are taxed (for instance, Minnesota is unique in that
the state does not levy a sales tax on clothing). Most, but not
all, states also have taxes on personal income and corporate
earnings.

Municipal governments in the U.S. usually collect property
taxes (and, in some cities, sales taxes) to raise revenue. Property
taxes are based on the value of real estate held by an individual
or corporation.

School taxes in the U.S. are also almost always property taxes,
which explains why rich suburban school districts can provide
better public schools than poor urban and rural districts.

The Tax Debate: “Tax and Spend” vs. “Trickle Down”

“Tax and Spend”: Classic Keynesian economics. Advocates of
this perspective argue that government projects and services
help build the country’s future (infrastructure, education,
affordable housing, etc.) while providing jobs, especially during
hard economic times. (Most Democrats agree with this idea to a
degree).

“Trickle Down”: Cut taxes as much as possible. Those who
promote this theory believe that individuals and businesses
should have more money to spend any way they wish.
Consumers will stimulate the market through personal
spending, while businesses will reinvest and help grow the
economy. This will create more government revenue as new
workers and growing businesses are paying taxes. (Most
Republicans agree with this theory to a degree).

Government Borrowing: Selling Bonds

Governments at every level and all over the world borrow
money by selling bonds to finance spending on projects and
services. Bondholders are paid interest on bonds, but, like
stocks, may also resell them to other investors. Government
bonds are paid with revenue (through taxes) gradually over
years, spreading the debt to the next generations. This makes
some sense: Why should current taxpayers pay completely for
a new bridge, school, or public park which will be used by
everyone for decades to come? Spreading the debt is seen as
fairer.

United States federal Treasury Bonds are sold around the

Modern World History 597

world to individuals, banks, and global sovereign funds (the
government banks of China, Japan, and many others). The U.S.
government has consistently made payments on its bonds for
over two centuries and so U.S. bonds are considered globally as
the best and safest investment-they are purchased even if they
are being sold at almost no interest (which has been the case for
most of the last 12 years).

Congress determines the maximum debt the U.S. government
can maintain through bonds, called the “Debt Ceiling.” The
debate about whether or not to raise the debt ceiling is similar
to the tax debate: some, especially among Democrats, advocate
issuing bonds to invest in America’s future, especially while
interest rates are low. Others, particularly among Republicans,
feel that the government should not burden future generations
with more government debt. Like determining the best rate of
inflation, the proper prime rate for an economy, and the level
of taxation, economists and politicians also debate about how
much government debt is too much.

Confidence in Government Debt

An important consideration for investors interested in buying
government bonds is the confidence in a government's ability
to pay its debt. Just like individuals and businesses, as long
as a government continues to pay its debt completely and on
time, then banks will lend more money to the government,
adjusting the interest rate based on their level of confidence.
Even countries have credit scores from rating agencies to help
lenders and investors make decisions.

However, unlike individuals, governments never completely
pay off debt, but that is less important than their ability to
borrow based on how well they keep up on payments. For
instance, Germany did not finish paying all reparations from
World War One until 2010, yet this fact had little effect on its
economy, which has consistently been among the world’s top
three for decades.

If a nation’s economy collapses or some other disaster
happens, or the debt gets too big (and again, there is a lot of
debate over what “too big” is), then investors will have less
confidence and a government will be unable to sell bonds and
borrow money. This has happened not only to countries but

598 Dan Allosso and Tom Williford

also U.S. territories, most recently Detroit and Puerto Rico.
The debt payments are restructured by the lenders, or reneged
upon entirely, with future borrowing greatly affected because of
the lack of confidence by investors and lenders. Sometimes a
government built infrastructure that did not end up stimulating
economic growth; other times, they did not foresee huge
changes—like a population leaving a city for the suburbs. And
sometimes, especially in certain developing nations, corrupt
politicians and administrators robbed the funds, saddling a
government with debt but leaving nothing of value.

